	James Baskett
 
 James Baskett (February 16, 1904 – July 9, 1948) was an American actor known for his portrayal of Uncle Remus, singing the song "Zip-a-Dee-Doo-Dah" in the 1946 Disney feature film Song of the South. In recognition of his warm portrayal of the famous black storyteller he was given an Honorary Academy Award,  making him the very first male performer of African descent to receive an Oscar.  
Career
 After abandoning his studies of pharmacology for financial reasons, James Baskett supported himself as an actor, moving from his home town of Indianapolis, Indiana to New York City, New York and joining the company of Bill Robinson, better known as Mr. Bojangles. As Jimmie Baskette, he appeared on Broadway with Louis Armstrong in the all-black musical revue Hot Chocolates in 1929, and was announced for Hummin' Sam in 1933, although it failed to open. Mr. Baskett also acted in several all-black films made in the New York area, including Harlem is Heaven (1932) starring Bill Robinson. He went to Los Angeles, California and had a supporting role in Straight to Heaven (1939), starring Nina Mae McKinney, and bit parts in the films Revenge of the Zombies (1943) and The Heavenly Body (1944). He was invited by Freeman Gosden to join the cast of the Amos 'n' Andy radio show as lawyer Gabby Gibson, whom he portrayed from 1944 to 1948.In 1945, he auditioned for a bit part voicing one of the animals in the new Disney feature film Song of the South (1946), based on the Uncle Remus stories by Joel Chandler Harris. Walt Disney was impressed with Baskett's talent and hired him on the spot for the lead role of Uncle Remus. Baskett was also given the voice role of Brer Fox, one of the film's animated antagonists, and even filled in as the main animated protagonist, Brer Rabbit, in one sequence.Baskett was not allowed to attend the film's premiere in Atlanta, Georgia because Atlanta was racially segregated by law.   On March 20, 1948, Baskett received an Honorary Academy Award for his performance as Uncle Remus.   He was the first black man to win an Academy Award.  
DeathOn July 9, 1948, Mr. Baskett died of heart disease at the age of 44 and was survived by his wife, Margaret.  He is buried at Crown Hill Cemetery in Indianapolis. 
Filmography

Year Title Role Notes 
1932 Harlem is Heaven Money Johnson Credited as Jimmy Baskette 
1933 20,000 Cheers for the Chain Gang  Uncredited 
1938 Policy Man  Credited as Jimmie Baskette 
1938 Gone Harlem  Credited as Jimmie Baskette 
1939 Straight to Heaven   
1940 Comes Midnight   
1943 Revenge of the Zombies Lazarus Alternative title: The Corpse Vanished 
1944   Porter Uncredited 
1946 Song of the South Uncle Remus Brer Fox  Voice 

See also


List of African American firsts


References
 
External links

 
 

 
DEFAULTSORT










 
 
 
 
	Robert Watson (scientist)
 
Sir Robert Tony Watson CMG (born March 21, 1948) is a British scientist who has worked on atmospheric science issues including ozone depletion, global warming and paleoclimatology since the 1980s.
Education and awards
Watson received a PhD in Chemistry from Queen Mary College, University of London in 1973. He has received awards for his contributions to science, including the NAS Award for Scientific Reviewing from the National Academy of Sciences in 1992,    the American Association for the Advancement of Science Award for Scientific Freedom and Responsibility in 1993 and the insignia of Honorary Companion of St Michael and St George from the British Government in 2003.
Career
Watson was the Director of the Science Division and Chief Scientist for the Office of Mission to Planet Earth at the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA). Watson then became Associate Director for Environment in the Office of the President of the United States in the White House.In 1996, Watson joined the World Bank as Senior Scientific adviser in the Environment Department, became Director of the Environment Department and Head of the Environment Sector Board in 1997 and is currently the Chief Scientist and Senior Adviser for Sustainable Development. He took up a position as Chair of Environmental Science and Science Director of the Tyndall Centre at the University of East Anglia, United Kingdom, in August 2007  and joined the British Government's Department for Environment, Food and Rural Affairs (Defra) as Chief Scientific Adviser in September 2007. He was Chairman of the Global Environment Facility's Scientific and Technical Advisory Panel from 1991 to 1994, Chair of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) from 1997 to 2002 and Board co-chair for the Millennium Ecosystem Assessment from 2000 to 2005. He is currently Director of the International Assessment of Agricultural Science and Technology for Development and co-chair of the International Scientific Assessment of Stratospheric Ozone. He has been Chair or co-chair of other international scientific assessments, including the IPCC Working Group II, the United Nations Environment Programme/World Meteorological Organization (UNEP/WMO), and the UNEP Global Biodiversity Assessment.Professor of Environmental Sciences; Director of Strategic Development, Tyndall at the University of East Anglia,Watson was knighted in the 2012 New Year Honours for his government service.  
Background
Andrew Revkin writing for the New York Times described Watson as an "outspoken advocate of the idea that human actions—mainly burning coal and oil—are contributing to global warming and must be changed to avert environmental upheavals." In April 2002 the United States pressed for and won his replacement by Rajendra Pachauri as IPCC chair. According to New Scientist, "The oil industry seems to be behind the move." The industry campaign to oust Watson had begun days after George W. Bush's inauguration in January 2001, with a memo to the White House from Randy Randol of oil giant ExxonMobil asking "Can Watson be replaced now at the request of the US?" 
Opinion
In 2010, he warned the IPCC against overstatement: 

"The mistakes all appear to have gone in the direction of making it seem like climate change is more serious by overstating the impact. That is worrying. The IPCC needs to look at this trend in the errors and ask why it happened." Adding "We should always be challenged by sceptics. The IPCC’s job is to weigh up the evidence. If it can’t be dismissed, it should be included in the report. Point out it’s in the minority and, if you can’t say why it’s wrong, just say it’s a different view." 

Ten years earlier in 2000, he also said:

The overwhelming majority of scientific experts, whilst recognizing that scientific uncertainties exist, nonetheless believe that human-induced climate change is inevitable. Indeed, during the last few years, many parts of the world have suffered major heat waves, floods, droughts, fires and extreme weather events leading to significant economic losses and loss of life. While individual events cannot be directly linked to human-induced climate change, the frequency and magnitude of these types of events are predicted to increase in a warmer world.



The question is not whether climate will change in response to human activities, but rather how much (magnitude), how fast (the rate of change) and where (regional patterns). It is also clear that climate change will, in many parts of the world, adversely affect socio-economic sectors, including water resources, agriculture, forestry, fisheries and human settlements, ecological systems (particularly forests and coral reefs), and human health (particularly diseases spread by insects), with developing countries being the most vulnerable. The good news is, however, that the majority of experts believe that significant reductions in net greenhouse gas emissions are technically feasible due to an extensive array of technologies and policy measures in the energy supply, energy demand and agricultural and forestry sectors. In addition, the projected adverse effects of climate change on socio-economic and ecological systems can, to some degree, be reduced through proactive adaptation measures. These are the fundamental conclusions, taken from already approved/accepted IPCC assessments, of a careful and objective analysis of all relevant scientific, technical and economic information by thousands of experts from the appropriate fields of science from academia, governments, industry and environmental organizations from around the world. 


See also

Anthopogenic global warming
Global Warming
Kyoto Protocol


References
 
External links

Brief bio
University of East Anglia bio
Short CV
New Scientist, 20 April 2002, "Too hot for head of climate panel"
Slate, April 22, 2002, "Did Exxon Mobil Get Bush To Oust the Global Warming Chief? – Al Gore spoils Dubya's Earth Day"
ExxonMobil memo

 
 
 
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT









 
 
	Chiang Ching-kuo
 
 
 
 
 Chiang Ching-kuo ( ; Shanghai/Ningbo dialect:  ) (April 27, 1  1910 – January 13, 1988), Kuomintang (KMT) politician and leader, was the son of Generalissimo and President Chiang Kai-shek and held numerous posts in the government of the Republic of China (ROC). He succeeded his father to serve as Premier of the Republic of China between 1972 and 1978, and was the President of the Republic of China from 1978 until his death in 1988. Under his tenure, the government of the Republic of China, while authoritarian, became more open and tolerant of political dissent. Towards the end of his life, Chiang relaxed government controls on the media and speech and allowed native Taiwanese into positions of power, including his successor Lee Teng-hui.
Early life
The son of President Chiang Kai-shek and his first wife Mao Fumei, Chiang Ching-kuo was born in Fenghua, Zhejiang, with the courtesy name of Jiànfēng (建豐). He had an adopted brother, Chiang Wei-kuo. "Ching" literally means "longitude" while "kuo" means "nation"; in his brother's name, "wei" literally means "parallel (of latitude)". The names are inspired by the references in Chinese classics such as the Guoyu, in which "to draw the longitudes and latitudes of the world" is used as a metaphor for a person with great abilities, especially in managing a country.While the young Chiang Ching-kuo had a peaceable relationship with his mother and grandmother (who were deeply rooted to their Buddhist faith), his relationship with his father was strict, utilitarian and often rocky.  Chiang Kai-shek appeared to his son as an authoritarian figure, sometimes indifferent to his problems.  Even in personal letters between the two, Chiang Kai-shek would sternly order his son to improve his Chinese calligraphy.From 1916 until 1919 Chiang Ching-kuo attended the "Grammar School" in Wushan in Hsikou. Then, in 1920, his father hired tutors to teach him the four books, considered the basis of all Chinese culture. On June 4, 1921, Ching-kuo's grandmother died. What might have been an immense emotional loss was compensated for by Chiang Kai-shek moving his family to Shanghai. Chiang Ching-Kuo's stepmother, historically known as the Chiang family's "Shanghai Mother", went with them. During this period, Chiang Kai-shek concluded that Chiang Ching-kuo was a son to be taught, while Chiang Wei-Kuo was a son to be loved.During his time in Shanghai, Ching-kuo was supervised by his father by being made to write a weekly letter containing 200-300 Chinese characters. Chiang Kai-shek also underlined the importance of classical books and of learning English, two areas he was hardly proficient in himself.  On March 20, 1924, Ching-kuo was able to present to his now-nationally famous father a proposal concerning the grass-roots organization of the rural population in Hsikou.  Chiang Ching-kuo planned to provide free education in order to allow people to read and to write at least 1000 characters. In his own words: 
I have a suggestion to make about the Wushan School, although I do not know if you can agree to it. My suggestion is that the school establish a night school for common people who cannot afford to go to the regular school. My school established a night school with great success. I can tell you something about the night school:
Name: Wuschua School for the Common People
Tuition fee: Free of charge with stationery supplied
Class hours: 7 pm to 9 pm
Age limit: 14 or older
Schooling protocol: 16 or 20 weeks.
At the time of the graduation, the trainees will be able to write simple letters and keep simple accounts. They will be issued a diploma if they pass the examinations. The textbooks they used were published by the Commercial Press and were entitled "One thousand characters for the common people." I do not know whether you will accept my suggestion. If a night school is established at Wushan, it will greatly benefit the local people.
 His father's reply was negative; Kai-shek stating that rural peasants were not interested in, nor needed, a formal education.In early 1925, Chiang Ching-kuo entered the Shanghai's Pudong college, but immediately afterwards Chiang Kai-shek decided to send him on to Beijing because of warlord action and spontaneous riots in Shanghai. In Beijing he attended the school organized by a friend of his father, Wu Chih-hui (吳稚暉), a renowned scholar and linguist. The school combined classical and modern approaches to education. While there, Ching-kuo started to identify himself as a progressive revolutionary and participated in the flourishing social scene inside the young Communist community. The idea of studying in Moscow now seized his imagination.  Within the help program provided by the Soviet Union to the countries of East Asia there was a training school that later became the Moscow Sun Yat-sen University. The participants to the university were selected by the CPSU and KMT members, with a participation of CPC Central Committee. Chiang Ching-kuo asked his teacher Wu Chih-hui to name him as a KMT candidate. Though Wu Chih-hui did not try to dissuade him, Wu was a key figure of the right-leaning and anti-Communist "Western Hills Group" of the Kuomintang, which help to realize the purge of the Communist and the KMT break with Moscow. In the summer of 1925, Chiang Ching-kuo traveled to Whampoa to discuss with his father about the plans to go to Moscow.Chiang Kai-shek was not keen on sending his son to the USSR, but after a discussion with Ch'en Kuo-fu (陳果夫) he finally agreed. In a 1996 interview, Ch'en's brother, Li-fu, claimed that the reason behind Chiang Kai-shek acceptance was the need to have Soviet support during a period when his hold over the KMT was not guaranteed. 
MoscowIn 1925, Chiang Ching-Kuo went on to Moscow to study at a Communist school. While in Moscow, Ching-kuo was given the Russian name Nikolai Vladimirovich Elizarov (Николай Владимирович Елизаров) and put under the tutelage of Karl Radek at the Communist University of the Toilers of the East. Noted for having an exceptional grasp of international politics, his classmates included other children of influential Chinese families, most notably the future Chinese Communist party leader, Deng Xiaoping. Soon Ching-kuo was an enthusiastic student of Communist ideology, particularly Trotskyism; though following the Great Purge, Joseph Stalin privately met with him and ordered him to publicly denounce Trotskyism. Chiang even applied to be a member of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union, although his request was denied.In April 1927, however, Chiang Kai-Shek purged the KMT leftists and Communists from the Central Government and expelled his Soviet advisers. Following this, Chiang Ching-kuo wrote an editorial that harshly criticized his father's actions and was detained as a "guest" of the Soviet Union as a practical hostage. Debate still continues as to whether he had been forced to write it, and it is known that some years beforehand he had seen many of his Trotskyist friends arrested and killed by the Russian secret police. It is possible that Chiang Ching-kuo was held to be used by Stalin as leverage in Sino-Soviet relationships. Nevertheless, the Soviet government sent Chiang Ching-kuo to work in the Ural Heavy Machinery Plant, a steel factory in the Urals, Yekaterinburg,  where he met Faina Ipat'evna Vakhreva, a native Belarusian. They married on March 15, 1935, and she would later become known as Chiang Fang-liang. In December of that year, a son, Hsiao-wen was born. A daughter, Hsiao-chang, was born the next year.Chiang Kai-shek wrote about the situation in his diary, "It is not worth it to sacrifice the interest of the country for the sake of my son."       Chiang even refused to negotiate a prisoner swap for his son in exchange for the Chinese Communist Party leader.  His attitude remained consistent, and he continued to maintain, by 1937, that "I would rather have no offspring than sacrifice our nation's interests." Chiang had absolutely no intention of stopping the war against the Communists.   Stalin allowed Chiang Ching-kuo to return to China with his Belarusian wife and two children in April 1937 after living in the USSR for 12 years. By then, the Nationalists under Chiang Kai-shek and the Communists under Mao Zedong had signed a ceasefire to create the Second United Front and fight the Japanese invasion of China, which began in July. Stalin hoped the Chinese would keep Japan from invading the Soviet Pacific coast, and he hoped to form an anti-Japanese alliance with the senior Chiang.On his return, his father assigned a tutor, Hsu Dau-lin, to assist with his readjustment to China.   Chiang Ching-Kuo was appointed as a specialist in remote districts of Jiangxi where he was credited with training of cadres and fighting corruption, opium consumption, and illiteracy. Chiang Ching-kuo was appointed as commissioner of Gannan Prefecture ( ) between 1939 and 1945; there he banned smoking, gambling and prostitution, studied governmental management, allowed for economic expansion and a change in social outlook. His efforts were hailed as a miracle in the political war in China, then coined as the "Gannan New Deal" (贛南新政). During his time in Gannan, from 1940 he implemented a "public information desk" where ordinary people could visit him if they had problems, and according to records, Chiang Ching-kuo received a total of 1,023 people during such sessions in 1942. In regards to the ban on prostitution and closing of brothels, Chiang implemented a policy where former prostitutes became employed in factories. Due to the large number of refugees in Ganzhou as a result from the ongoing war, thousands of orphans lived on the street; in June 1942, Chiang Ching-kuo formally established the Chinese Children's Village (中華兒童新村) in the outskirts of Ganzhou, with facilities such as a nursery, kindergarten, primary school, hospital and gymnasium. During the last years of the 1930s, he met Wang Sheng, with whom he would remain close for the next 50 years.The paramilitary "Sanman Zhuyi Youth Corps" was under Chiang's control. Chiang used the term "big bourgeoisie", in a disparaging manner to call H.H. Kung and T.V. Soong. Chiang and his wife had two more sons, Hsiao-wu, born in Chungking, and Hsiao-yung, born in Shanghai. Out of his affair with Chang Ya-juo, Chiang also had twin sons in 1941: Chang Hsiao-tz'u and Chang Hsiao-yen. (Note the identical generation name of Hsiao between all sons, legitimate or not.)
Hostage claimJung Chang and Jon Halliday claim that Chiang Kai-shek allowed the Communists to escape on the Long March, allegedly because he wanted his son Chiang Ching-kuo who was being held hostage by Joseph Stalin back.    This is contradicted by Chiang Kai-shek himself, who wrote in his diary, "It is not worth is to sacrifice the interest of the country for the sake of my son."    Chiang even refused to negotiate for a prisoner swap, of his son in exchange of the Chinese Communist Party leader.  Again in 1937 he stated about his son- "I would rather have no offspring than sacrifice our nation's interests." Chiang had absolutely no intention of stopping the war against the Communists.  Chiang Kaishek urged the Ma warlords of northwest China to hammer away at the communists, including allowing the governor of Qinghai to stay in office since he wiped out an entire communist army. Chang and Halliday also made another claim asserting Chiang Ching-kuo was "kidnapped", however evidence shows that he went to study in the Soviet Union with Chiang Kai-shek's own approval. 
Economic policies in Shanghai
After the Second Sino-Japanese War and during the Chinese Civil War, Chiang Ching-kuo briefly served as a liaison administrator in Shanghai, trying to eradicate the corruption and hyperinflation that plagued the city. He was determined to do this because of the fears arising from the Nationalists' increasing lack of popularity during the Civil War. Given the task of arresting dishonest businessmen who hoarded supplies for profit during the inflationary spiral, he attempted to assuage the business community by explaining that his team would only go after big war profiteers.Ching-kuo copied Soviet methods, which he learned during his stay in the Soviet Union, to start a social revolution by attacking middle class merchants. He also enforced low prices on all goods to raise support from the Proletariat. As riots broke out and savings were ruined, bankrupting shopowners, Ching-kuo began to attack the wealthy, seizing assets and placing them under arrest. The son of the gangster Du Yuesheng was arrested by him. Ching-kuo ordered Kuomintang agents to raid the Yangtze Development Corporation's warehouses, which was privately owned by H.H. Kung and his family, as the company was accused of hoarding supplies. H.H. Kung's wife was Soong Ai-ling, the sister of Soong May-ling who was Ching-kuo's stepmother. H.H. Kung's son David was arrested, the Kung's responded by blackmailing the Chiang's, threatening to release information about them, eventually he was freed after negotiations, and Ching-kuo resigned, ending the terror on the Shanghainese merchants. 
Political career in TaiwanAfter the Nationalists lost control of mainland China to the Communists in the Chinese Civil War, Chiang Ching-kuo followed his father and the retreating Nationalist forces to Taiwan. On December 8, 1949, the Nationalist capital was moved from Chengdu to Taipei, and early on December 10, 1949, Communist troops laid siege to Chengdu, the last KMT controlled city on mainland China. Here Chiang Kai-shek and his son Chiang Ching-kuo directed the city's defense from the Chengdu Central Military Academy, before the aircraft May-ling evacuated them to Taiwan; they would never return to mainland China.In 1950, Chiang's father appointed him director of the secret police, which he remained until 1965. An enemy of the Chiang family, Wu Kuo-chen, was kicked out of his position of governor of Taiwan by Chiang Ching-kuo and fled to America in 1953.    Chiang Ching-kuo, educated in the Soviet Union, initiated Soviet style military organization in the Republic of China Military, reorganizing and Sovietizing the political officer corps, surveillance, and Kuomintang party activities were propagated throughout the military. Opposed to this was Sun Li-jen, who was educated at the American Virginia Military Institute.  Chiang orchestrated the controversial court-martial and arrest of General Sun Li-jen in August 1955, allegedly for plotting a coup d'état with the American CIA against his father.   General Sun was a popular Chinese war hero from the Burma Campaign against the Japanese and remained under house arrest until Chiang Ching-kuo's death in 1988. Ching-kuo also approved the arbitrary arrest and torture of prisoners.  Chiang Ching-kuo's activities as director of the secret police remained widely criticized as heralding a long era of human rights abuses in Taiwan.From 1955 to 1960, Chiang administered the construction and completion of Taiwan's highway system. Chiang's father elevated him to high office when he was appointed as the ROC Defense Minister from 1965 until 1969. He was the nation's Vice Premier between 1969 and 1972, during which he survived an assassination attempt while visiting the U.S. in 1970.  Afterwards he was appointed the nation's Premier between 1972 and 1978. As Chiang Kai-shek entered his final years, he gradually gave more responsibilities to his son, and when he died in April 1975, the presidency was turned over to Yen Chia-kan and Chiang Ching-kuo succeeded to the leadership of the Kuomintang (he opted for the title "Chairman" rather than the elder Chiang's title of "Director-General").
PresidencyChiang was officially elected President of the Republic of China by the National Assembly after the term of President Yen Chia-kan on May 20, 1978. He was reelected to another term in 1984.  At that time, the National Assembly consisted mostly of "thousand year" legislators, men who had been elected in 1947-48 before the fall of mainland China and who would hold their seats indefinitely.During the early years of his term in office Chiang maintained many of his father's autocratic policies, continuing to rule Taiwan as a military state under martial law as it had been since the Nationalists established its capital there. In a move that broke from his father's domineering industrial and economic policies, Ching-kuo launched the "Fourteen Major Construction Projects", the "Ten Major Construction Projects" and the "Twelve New Development Projects" which contributed to the "Taiwan Miracle."  Among his accomplishments were accelerating the process of economic modernization to give Taiwan a 13% growth rate, $4,600 per capita income, and the world's second largest foreign exchange reserves.However, in December 1978, U.S. President, Jimmy Carter announced that the United States would no longer recognize the ROC as the legitimate government of China. Under the Taiwan Relations Act, the United States would continue to sell weapons to Taiwan, but the TRA was purposely vague in any promise of defending Taiwan in the event of an invasion. The United States would now end all official contact with the Chiang's government and withdraw its troops from the island.In an effort of bringing more Taiwan-born citizens into government services, Chiang Ching-kuo "exiled" his over-ambitious chief of General Political Warfare Department, General Wang Sheng, to Paraguay as an ambassador (November 1983),  and hand-picked Lee Teng-hui as vice-president of the Republic of China (formally elected May 1984), first-in-the-line of succession to the presidency.In 1987, Chiang finally ended martial law and allowed family visits to the Mainland China. His administration saw a gradual loosening of political controls and opponents of the Nationalists were no longer forbidden to hold meetings or publish papers. Opposition political parties, though still illegal, were allowed to form without harassment or arrest. When the Democratic Progressive Party was established in 1986, President Chiang decided against dissolving the group or persecuting its leaders, but its candidates officially ran in elections as independents in the Tangwai movement.
Death and legacy
Chiang died of heart failure and hemorrhage in Taipei at the age of 78. Like his father, he was interred temporarily in Daxi (Tahsi) Township, Taoyuan County, but in a separate mausoleum in Touliao, a mile down the road from his father's burial place. The hope was to have both buried at their birthplace in Fenghua once mainland China was recovered. Chinese music composer Hwang Yau-tai or Huang Youdi, Huang Yu-ti (黃友棣) wrote the Chiang Ching-kuo Memorial Song in 1988. In January 2004, Chiang Fang-liang asked that both father and son be buried at Wuchih Mountain Military Cemetery in Hsichih, Taipei County (now New Taipei City). The state funeral ceremony was initially planned for Spring 2005, but was eventually delayed to winter 2005.  It may be further delayed due to the recent death of Chiang Ching-kuo's oldest daughter-in-law, who had served as the de facto head of the household since Chiang Fang-liang's death in 2004.  Chiang Fang-liang and Soong May-ling had agreed in 1997 that the former leaders be first buried, but still be moved to mainland China.Unlike his father Chiang Kai-shek, Chiang Ching-kuo built himself a folk reputation that remains generally known even among local Taiwanese electorate. Both his memory and image are frequently invoked by the Kuomintang, which is unable to base their electoral campaign on Chiang's successor, President and KMT Chairman Lee Teng-hui because of Lee's support of Taiwan for Taiwanese. Chiang Ching-kuo, however, did admit he had become "Taiwanese" after fleeing mainland China in 1949.Among the Tangwai and later the Pan-Green Coalition, opinions toward Chiang Ching-kuo are more reserved. While long-time supporters of political liberalization do give Chiang Ching-kuo credit for relaxing authoritarian rule, they point out that Taiwan remained authoritarian throughout the early years of his rule, and only liberalized in his twilight years. Nonetheless, as with Pan-Blue followers, he is recognized for his efforts and openness in economic developments.Under President Chen Shui-bian, pictures of Chiang Ching-kuo and his father gradually disappeared from public buildings. The AIDC, the ROC's air defense company, has nicknamed its AIDC F-CK Indigenous Defense Fighter the Ching Kuo in his memory.All of his legitimate children studied abroad and two of his children married in the United States. Only two remain living: John Chiang is a prominent KMT politician, while Chiang Hsiao-chang, her children and grandchildren reside in the United States.
See also 
 

Chiang Kai-shek
Madame Chiang Kai-shek
History of the Republic of China
Military of the Republic of China
President of the Republic of China
Politics of the Republic of China
Second Sino-Japanese War
National Revolutionary Army
Kuomintang
Seven Seas Residence
Sino-German cooperation
Chiang Ching-kuo Foundation
Peter Huang


Notes

Many sources, even Taiwanese official ones, give March 18, 1910 as his birthday, but this actually refers to the traditional Chinese lunar calendar


References 

Taylor, Jay. The Generalissimo's Son: Chiang Ching-Kuo and the Revolutions in China and Taiwan. ISBN 0-674-00287-3


External links 

ROC Government biography
Remembering Chiang Ching-kuo
1981 GIO video: Hello, Mr. President-Chiang Ching-kuo and His People
Kuomintang Official Website

 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT

















  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Maurice Chevalier
Maurice Auguste Chevalier (September 12, 1888 – January 1, 1972) was a French actor, singer, entertainer and a noted Sprechgesang performer. He is perhaps best known for his signature songs, including Louise, Mimi, Valentine, and Thank Heaven for Little Girls and for his films including The Love Parade and The Big Pond. His trademark attire was a boater hat, which he always wore on stage with a tuxedo.Born in Paris, he made his name as a star of musical comedy, appearing in public as a singer and dancer at an early age before working in four menial jobs as a teenager. In 1909, he became the partner of the biggest female star in France at the time, Fréhel. Although their relationship was brief, she secured him his first major engagement, as a mimic and a singer in l'Alcazar in Marseille to which he received critical acclaim by French theatre critics. In 1917 he discovered jazz and ragtime and went to London, where he found new success at the Palace Theatre.After this he toured the United States. Whilst there, he met the American composers George Gershwin and Irving Berlin and brought Dédé to Broadway in 1922. He also developed an interest in acting, and had success in the operetta Dédé. When talkies arrived, he went to Hollywood in 1928 where he played his first American role in Innocents of Paris. In 1930 he was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actor, for his roles in The Love Parade (1929) and The Big Pond (1930), which secured his first big American hit, Livin' in the Sunlight, Lovin' in the Moonlight.In 1957, he appeared in Love in the Afternoon which was his first Hollywood film in more than 20 years. In the early 1960s, he made eight films, including Can-Can in 1960 and Fanny the following year. In 1970 he made his final contribution to the film industry where he sang the title song of the Disney film The Aristocats. He died in Paris, on January 1, 1972, aged 83.
Early lifeHe was born in Paris to a house painter father and a mother of Belgian descent. He made his name as a star of musical comedy, appearing in public as a singer and dancer at an early age.He worked a number of jobs; a carpenter's apprentice, electrician, printer, and even as a doll painter. He started in show business in 1901. He was singing, unpaid, at a café when a member of the theatre saw him and suggested he try for a local musical. He got the part. Chevalier made a name as a mimic and a singer. His act in l'Alcazar in Marseille was so successful, he made a triumphant rearrival in Paris.In 1909, he became the partner of the biggest female star in France, Fréhel. However, due to her alcoholism and drug addiction, their liaison ended in 1911. Chevalier then started a relationship with 36-year-old Mistinguett at the Folies Bergère where he was her 23 year old dance partner; they eventually played out a public romance.
World War IWhen World War I broke out, Chevalier was in the middle of his national service, already in the front line, where he was wounded by shrapnel in the back in the first weeks of combat and was taken as a prisoner of war in Germany for two years. In 1916, he was released through the secret intervention of Mistinguett's admirer, King Alfonso XIII of Spain, the only king of a neutral country who was related to both the British and German royal families.In 1917, Chevalier became a star in le Casino de Paris and played before British soldiers and Americans. He discovered jazz and ragtime and started thinking about touring the United States. In the prison camp, he studied English and had an advantage over other French artists. He went to London, where he found new success at the Palace Theatre, even though he still sang in French.
Hollywood
After the war, Chevalier went back to Paris and created several songs still known today, such as "Valentine" (1924). He played in a few pictures, including Chaplin's A Woman of Paris (a rare drama for Chaplin, in which his character of The Tramp does not appear) and made a huge impression in the operetta Dédé. He met the American composers George Gershwin and Irving Berlin and brought Dédé to Broadway in 1922. The same year he met Yvonne Vallée, a young dancer, who became his wife in 1927.When Douglas Fairbanks was on honeymoon in Paris in 1920, he offered him star billing with his new wife Mary Pickford, but Chevalier doubted his own talent for silent movies (his previous ones had largely failed).  When sound arrived, he made his Hollywood debut in 1928. He signed a contract with Paramount Pictures and played his first American role in Innocents of Paris. In 1930 he was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actor, for his roles in The Love Parade (1929) and The Big Pond (1930). The Big Pond gave Chevalier his first big American hit songs, "Livin' in the Sunlight, Lovin' in the Moonlight" with words and music by Al Lewis and Al Sherman, plus "A New Kind of Love" (or "The Nightingales").  He collaborated with film director Ernst Lubitsch. He appeared in Paramount's all-star revue film Paramount on Parade (1930).While under contract with Paramount, Chevalier's name was so recognized that his passport featured in the Marx Brothers film Monkey Business (1931). In this sequence, a little more than halfway through the film, each brother uses Chevalier's passport, and tries to sneak off the ocean liner where they were stowaways by claiming to be the singer—with unique renditions of "You Brought a New Kind of Love to Me" with its line "If the nightingales could sing like you". In 1931, Chevalier starred in a musical called The Smiling Lieutenant with Claudette Colbert and Miriam Hopkins. Despite the disdain audiences held for musicals in 1931, History of Musical Film 1930s: Part I "Hip, Hooray and Ballyhoo" by John Kenrick  it proved a successful film. In 1932, he starred with Jeanette MacDonald in Paramount's film musical, One Hour With You which became a success and one of the films instrumental in making musicals popular again. Due to its popularity, Paramount starred Maurice Chevalier in another musical called Love Me Tonight (also 1932), and again co-starring Jeanette MacDonald. It was about a tailor who falls in love with a princess when he goes to a castle to collect a debt and is mistaken for a baron. Featuring songs by Richard Rodgers and Lorenz Hart, it was directed by Rouben Mamoulian, who, with the help of the songwriters, was able to put his ideas of the integrated musical (a musical which blends songs and dialogue so the songs advance the plot). It is considered one of the greatest film musicals of all time. 
In 1934, he starred in the first sound film of the Franz Lehár operetta The Merry Widow, one of his best-known films. In 1935, he signed with MGM and returned to France later that year.During his years in Hollywood, Chevalier had a reputation as a penny-pincher. When filming at Paramount, he balked at parking his car in the Paramount lot at ten cents a day. After bargaining, he managed to get five cents per day. Another story is told of Chevalier (a smoker) having a conversation with someone who offered him a cigarette. He took it, said "Thank you", put it in his pocket, and continued with the conversation. But in Hollywood he seemed to be a divided character. When not playing around with young chorus-girls, he actually felt quite lonely, and sought the company of Adolphe Menjou and Charles Boyer, also French, but both much better educated than Chevalier. Boyer in particular introduced him to art galleries and good literature, and Chevalier would try to copy him as the man of taste. But at other times, he would 'revert to type' as the bitter and impoverished street-kid he basically was. When performing in English, he always put on a heavy French accent, although his normal spoken English was quite fluent and sounded more American.In 1937, he married the dancer Nita Raya. He had several successes, such as his revue Paris en Joie in the Casino de Paris. A year later, he performed in Amours de Paris. His songs remained big hits, such as Prosper (1935), Ma Pomme (1936) and Ça fait d'excellents français (1939).In 1957, Chevalier was awarded The George Eastman Award, given by George Eastman House for distinguished contribution to the art of film.
World War IIDuring World War II, Chevalier kept performing for audiences. In 1941, he performed a new revue in the Casino de Paris: Bonjour Paris, which was another success. Songs like "Ça sent si bon la France" and "La Chanson du maçon" became hits. The Nazis asked Chevalier to perform in Berlin and sing for the collaborating radio station Radio Paris. He refused but did perform for prisoners of war in Germany at the camp where he was interned in World War I, and succeeded in liberating ten people in exchange. In 1942 he returned to Bocca, near Cannes, but returned to the capital city in September. In 1944 when Allied forces freed France, Chevalier was accused of collaborationism. Even though he was acquitted by a French convened court, the English-speaking press remained hostile and he was refused a visa for several years.  
After World War IIIn his own country, however, he was still popular. In 1946, he split from Nita Ray and started writing his memoirs, which took many years to complete.

He started to paint and collect and acted in Le silence est d'or (1946) by René Clair. He still toured throughout the United States and other parts of the world and returned to France in 1948.In 1944, he had already participated in a Communist demonstration in Paris. He was therefore even less popular in the U.S. during the McCarthyism period; in 1951, he was refused re-entry into the U.S. because he had signed the Stockholm Appeal.In 1949, he performed in Stockholm in a Communist benefit against nuclear arms. Also in 1949, Chevalier was the subject of the first official roast at the New York Friars' Club, although celebrities had been informally "roasted" at banquets since 1910. In 1952, he bought a large property in Marnes-la-Coquette, near Paris, and named it "La Louque",  as a homage to his mother's nickname. He started a relationship in 1952 with Janie Michels, a young divorcee with three children. In 1954, after the McCarthy era abated Chevalier was welcomed back in the United States. His first full American tour was in 1955, with Vic Schoen as arranger and musical director. The Billy Wilder film Love in the Afternoon (1957) with Audrey Hepburn and Gary Cooper was his first Hollywood film in more than 20 years. Introduction by Robert Osborne, Turner Classic Movies, 11 August 2009 Chevalier appeared in the movie musical Gigi (1958) with Leslie Caron and Hermione Gingold, with whom he shared the song "I Remember It Well", and several Walt Disney films. The success of Gigi prompted Hollywood to give him an Academy Honorary Award that year for achievements in entertainment. He also appeared as himself in the 1958 Lucy Goes to Mexico television episode of The Lucy-Desi Comedy Hour.
Final yearsIn the early 1960s, he toured the United States and between 1960 and 1963 made eight films, including Can-Can (1960) with Frank Sinatra. In 1961, he starred in the drama Fanny with Leslie Caron and Charles Boyer, an updated version of Marcel Pagnol's "Marseilles Trilogy." In 1962, he filmed Panic Button; (not released until 1964); playing opposite blonde bombshell/sex symbol, Jayne Mansfield. In 1965, at 77, he made another world tour. In 1967 he toured in Latin America, again the US, Europe and Canada. The following year, on October 1, 1968, he announced his farewell tour.Historical newsreel footage of Chevalier appeared in the Marcel Ophüls documentary The Sorrow and the Pity. In a wartime short film near the end of the film's second part, he explained his disappearance during World War II (see the "World War II" section in this entry) as rumors of his death lingered at that time, and emphatically denies any collaboration with the Nazis.  His theme song "Sweepin' the Clouds Away" from the film Paramount on Parade (1930) was one of its theme songs and was played in the end credits of the film's second part.In 1970, several years after his retirement, songwriters Richard M. and Robert B. Sherman got him to sing the title song of the Disney film The Aristocats, which ended up being his final contribution to the film industry.He died in Paris, on January 1, 1972, aged 83, and was interred in the cemetery of Marnes-la-Coquette in Hauts-de-Seine, outside Paris, France.Chevalier has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame at 1651 Vine Street.
Famous songs

"Madelon de la Victoire" (1918)
"Dans la vie faut pas s'en faire" (1921)
"Valentine" (1924)
"Louise" (1929)
"(Up On Top Of A Rainbow) Sweepin' The Clouds Away" (1930)
"You Brought a New Kind of Love to Me" (1930)
"Living In the Sunlight, Loving In the Moonlight" (1930)
"Mimi" (1932)
"Prosper (Yop La Boum)" (1935)
"Quand un Vicomte" (1935)
"Ma Pomme" (1936)
"Le Chapeau de Zozo" (1936)
"Mimile (un gars du Ménilmontant)" (1936)
"Ça Fait d' Excellents Français" (1939)
"Paris sera toujours Paris" (1939)
"Ça sent si bon la France" (1941)
"La Chanson du Maçon" (1941)
"Notre Espoir" (1941)
"Thank Heaven For Little Girls" (1957)
"I Remember It Well" (1957)
"Enjoy It!" (1967)
"The Aristocats" (1970)


References 
Bibliography

 
 
 
 
 


External links 
 

 
 
 
Photographs of Maurice Chevalier

  
DEFAULTSORT




















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Dan Castellaneta
 
Daniel Louis "Dan" Castellaneta (born October 29, 1957) is an American actor, voice actor, comedian and screenwriter. Noted for his long-running role as Homer Simpson on the animated television series The Simpsons, he voices many other characters on The Simpsons, including Abraham "Grampa" Simpson, Barney Gumble, Krusty the Clown, Groundskeeper Willie, Mayor Quimby and Hans Moleman.Born in Oak Park, Illinois, a suburb of Chicago, Castellaneta started taking acting classes at a young age. He would listen to his father's comedy records and do impressions of the artists. After graduating from Northern Illinois University, Castellaneta joined Chicago's Second City in 1983, and performed with the troupe until 1987. He was cast in The Tracey Ullman Show, which debuted in 1987. The Tracey Ullman Show included a series of animated shorts about a dysfunctional family. Voices were needed for the shorts, so the producers decided to ask Castellaneta to voice Homer. His voice for the character started out as a loose impression of Walter Matthau, but later evolved into a more robust voice. The shorts would eventually be spun off into The Simpsons. Castellaneta has won four Primetime Emmy Awards for Outstanding Voice-Over Performance for his work on the show as well as an Annie Award for Outstanding Individual Achievement in the Field of Animation in 1993. Castellaneta has co-written four episodes of The Simpsons with his wife Deb Lacusta.Castellaneta has also had roles in several other television programs, including the live-action sitcom Sibs, The Adventures of Dynamo Duck, and the animated series Darkwing Duck, Back to the Future: The Animated Series, Earthworm Jim, Cow and Chicken, The Batman, Aladdin and Hey Arnold!. In 1999, he appeared in the Christmas special Olive, the Other Reindeer and won an Annie Award for his portrayal of the Postman. Castellaneta has also released a comedy CD, I Am Not Homer, and wrote and starred in a one-person show titled Where Did Vincent van Gogh?
Early lifeCastellaneta was born in Oak Park, Illinois, a suburb of Chicago, on October 29, 1957,   to Elsie and Louis Castellaneta. His father was an amateur actor who worked for a printing company.  Castellaneta became adept at impressions at a young age and his mother enrolled him in an acting class when he was sixteen years old. He would listen to his father's comedy records and do impressions of the artists.  He was a "devotee" of the works of many performers, including Alan Arkin and Barbara Harris and directors Mike Nichols and Elaine May.  He attended Oak Park and River Forest High School  and upon graduation, started attending Northern Illinois University (NIU) in the fall of 1975.    He studied art education, with the goal of becoming an art teacher.  He became a student teacher and would entertain his students with his impressions.   Castellaneta was also a regular participant in The Ron Petke and His Dead Uncle Show, a radio show at NIU. The show helped Castellaneta hone his skills as a voice-over actor. He recalled "We did parodies and sketches, we would double up on (characters), so you learned to switch between voices. I got my feet wet doing voiceover. The show was just barely audible, but we didn't care. It was the fact that we got a chance to do it and write our own material."  He took a play-writing class and auditioned for an improvisational show. A classmate first thought Castellaneta would "fall on his face with improvisation" but soon "was churning out material faster than [they] could make it work." 
Career
Early careerCastellaneta started acting after his graduation from Northern Illinois University in 1979. He decided that if his career went nowhere he would still have a chance to try something else.  He began taking improvisation classes, where he met his future wife Deb Lacusta.  Castellaneta started to work at The Second City, an improvisational theatre in Chicago, in 1983 and continued to work there until 1987.  During this period, he did voice-over work with his wife for various radio stations.  He auditioned for a role in The Tracey Ullman Show and his first meeting underwhelmed Tracey Ullman and the other producers. Ullman decided to fly to Chicago to watch Castellaneta perform. His performance that night was about a blind man who tries to become a comedian and Ullman later recalled that although there were flashier performances that night, Castellaneta made her cry. She was impressed and Castellaneta was hired. 
The SimpsonsCastellaneta is most famous for his role as Homer Simpson on the long-running animated television show The Simpsons. The Tracey Ullman Show included a series of animated shorts about a dysfunctional family. Voices were needed for the shorts, so the producers decided to ask Castellaneta and fellow cast member Julie Kavner to voice Homer and Marge Simpson rather than hire more actors.       Homer's voice began as a loose impression of Walter Matthau, but Castellaneta could not "get enough power behind that voice" and could not sustain his Matthau impression for the nine to ten hour long recording sessions.    He tried to find something easier, so he "dropped the voice down", and developed it into a more versatile and humorous voice during the second and third season of the half-hour show.    Castellaneta's normal speaking voice has no similarity to Homer's.    To perform Homer's voice, Castellaneta lowers his chin to his chest,  and is said to "let his IQ go." Mirkin, David. (2004). Commentary for "Bart's Inner Child", in The Simpsons: The Complete Fifth Season [DVD]. 20th Century Fox.  Castellaneta likes to stay in character during recording sessions,  and tries to visualize a scene in his mind so that he can give the proper voice to it.  Despite Homer's fame, Castellaneta claims he is rarely recognized in public, "except, maybe, by a die-hard fan."   Castellaneta also provides the voices for numerous other characters, including Grampa Simpson, Barney Gumble, Krusty the Clown, Groundskeeper Willie, Mayor Quimby, Hans Moleman, Sideshow Mel, Itchy, Kodos, the Squeaky Voiced Teen and Gil Gunderson. Krusty's voice is based on Chicago television's Bob Bell, who had a very raspy voice and portrayed WGN-TV's Bozo the Clown from 1960 to 1984.    Barney's trademark is a loud belch. During early recording sessions for the show, he recorded a new version of the belch for every episode but discovered that it was not easy for him to do it every time a script called for it. Castellaneta chose a recording of what he believed was his best belch and told the producers to make that the standard.  Groundskeeper Willie's first appearance was in the season two episode "Principal Charming". The character was written as an angry janitor and Castellaneta was assigned to perform the voice. He did not know what voice to use and Sam Simon, who was directing at the time, suggested he use an accent. Castellaneta first tried using a Hispanic voicing, which Simon felt was too clichéd. He then tried a "big dumb Swede", which was also rejected. For his third try, he used the voice of an angry Scotsman, which was deemed appropriate enough and was used in the episode. Reiss, Mike (2002). Commentary for "Principal Charming", in The Simpsons: The Complete Second Season [DVD]. 20th Century Fox.  The voice was based partially on Angus Crock, a kilt-wearing chef from the sketch comedy show Second City Television, who was portrayed by Dave Thomas.    Mayor Quimby, who first appeared in "Bart Gets an F", is a parody of various members of the Kennedy family. The episode script did not call for Quimby to be a parody of them, and Castellaneta improvised the accent.  Sideshow Mel's voice is Castellaneta's impression of Kelsey Grammer, the voice of Sideshow Bob. Jean, Al. (2003). Commentary for "Black Widower", in The Simpsons: The Complete Third Season [DVD]. 20th Century Fox.  Gil is a spoof of actor Jack Lemmon's portrayal of Shelley Levene in the 1992 film adaptation of the play Glengarry Glen Ross. Scully, Mike (2006). Commentary for "Realty Bites", in The Simpsons: The Complete Ninth Season [DVD]. 20th Century Fox.  Show runner Mike Scully  thought that Gil would be "a one-shot thing"  but "Dan Castellaneta was so funny at the table read doing the character, we kept making up excuses in subsequent episodes to put him in."  The Blue-Haired Lawyer's voice, as well as his demeanor, is based on lawyer Roy Cohn. Castellaneta has won several awards for voicing Homer, including four Primetime Emmy Awards for "Outstanding Voice-Over Performance" in 1992 for "Lisa's Pony", 1993 for "Mr. Plow",    2004 for voicing several characters in "Today I Am a Clown",  and 2009 for voicing Homer in "Father Knows Worst".    In 1993, Castellaneta was given a special Annie Award, "Outstanding Individual Achievement in the Field of Animation", for his work as Homer on The Simpsons.   In 2004, Castellaneta and Julie Kavner (the voice of Marge) won a Young Artist Award for "Most Popular Mom & Dad in a TV Series".    Homer was placed second on TV Guide ' s 2002 Top 50 Greatest Cartoon Characters,    and in 2000, Homer and the rest of the Simpson family were awarded a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame located at 7021 Hollywood Boulevard. Until 1998, Castellaneta was paid $30,000 per episode.  During a pay dispute in 1998, Fox threatened to replace the six main voice actors with new actors, going as far as preparing for casting of new voices.  The dispute was soon resolved and he received $125,000 per episode until 2004 when the voice actors demanded that they be paid $360,000 an episode.    The issue was resolved a month later,  and Castellaneta earned $250,000 per episode.  After salary re-negotiations in 2008, the voice actors received approximately $400,000 per episode.  Three years later, with Fox threatening to cancel the series unless production costs were cut, Castellaneta and the other cast members accepted a 30 percent pay cut, down to just over $300,000 per episode. In the early 1990s, Castellaneta and Deb Lacusta wrote a script for an episode in which Barney becomes sober. They pitched their idea to show runner Al Jean. Jean liked the story, but turned it down because he felt that it was too similar to "Duffless", an episode that the writers were already working on. They waited several years and offered their script, which they updated, to then-show runner Mike Scully, who liked it and had them make a few changes. Affleck, Neil; Castellaneta, Dan; Lacusta, Deb; Maxtone-Graham, Ian; Meyer, George; Scully, Mike (2008). Commentary for "Days of Wine and D'oh'ses", in The Simpsons: The Complete Eleventh Season [DVD]. 20th Century Fox.  Their script became the eleventh season episode "Days of Wine and D'oh'ses", which first aired April 9, 2000.  Castellaneta and his wife have also written the episodes "Gump Roast", "The Ziff Who Came to Dinner", "Kiss Kiss, Bang Bangalore", and "The Fight Before Christmas". In 2007, they were nominated for a Writers Guild of America Award for the episode "Kiss Kiss, Bang Bangalore".    Castellaneta is also credited as a consulting producer. 
Further careerCastellaneta has been a regular cast member in several other television series. In 1991, he played Warren Morris in the short-lived ABC live-action sitcom Sibs.  Heide Perlman, creator of Sibs, wrote the part with Castellaneta in mind.    He also provided the voice of the eponymous character in The Adventures of Dynamo Duck, Megavolt in Darkwing Duck, "Doc" Emmett Brown in Back to the Future: The Animated Series,  the lead character in Earthworm Jim  and several characters, including Grandpa Phil and the mentally unstable ice cream truck driver, on Nickelodeon's Hey Arnold!.    He guest starred as The Robot Devil in three episodes of Futurama, as well as the film The Beast with a Billion Backs. Castellaneta has also made guest appearances in a number of television series episodes. In 1992, he guest-starred in an episode of the legal drama L.A. Law, as a Homer Simpson meetable character at a California amusement park who is dismissed for inappropriate behavior while in costume.  In 2005, he appeared in the episode "Sword of Destiny" in Arrested Development as Dr. Stein, a deadpan incompetent doctor.  In 2005, Castellaneta guest-starred as Joe Spencer in the Stargate SG-1 season eight episode "Citizen Joe".  He also appeared in episodes of ALF, Campus Ladies, Entourage, Everybody Loves Raymond, Frasier, Friends, Greek, How I Met Your Mother,  Mad About You, Married... with Children, Murphy Brown, NYPD Blue, Reba, Reno 911!, That '70s Show, Veronica Mars, Yes, Dear,    and Desperate Housewives. He appeared as the Genie in the Aladdin sequel The Return of Jafar and on the 1994 Aladdin television series. The Genie had been voiced by Robin Williams in Aladdin, and Castellaneta described replacing him as "sort of like stepping into Hamlet after Laurence Olivier did it, how can you win?"  Castellaneta portrayed Aaron Spelling in the 2004 NBC film Behind the Camera: The Unauthorized Story of Charlie's Angels, which followed the true story of how Spelling created the show. Other films in which Castellaneta has appeared include Nothing in Common, Say Anything..., Super Mario Bros., The Client, Space Jam, My Giant, Rugrats in Paris: The Movie, Recess: School's Out, Hey Arnold!: The Movie, The Cat in the Hat and The Pursuit of Happyness.  In 2000, he won an Annie Award for his portrayal of the Postman in the animated Christmas television special Olive, the Other Reindeer.  In 2006, he appeared in Jeff Garlin's independent film I Want Someone to Eat Cheese With along with several other Second City alumni. On February 22, 2000, his first music CD Two Lips was published.  It was followed on April 23, 2002 by his first comedy CD, I Am Not Homer, in which he and his wife perform several comedy skits. The majority of the sketches had been written and performed before the CD was recorded, and Castellaneta thought that it would be a good idea to preserve them "since [he and Lacusta] don't perform them much anymore."  Some came from their sketch series on a local radio station in Chicago and had to be lengthened from the "two-minute bits" that they were originally, while several others were stage sketches performed in a comedy club in Santa Monica.    Additionally, "Citizen Kane", a sketch in which two people discuss the film Citizen Kane with different meanings, was something the pair had performed at an art gallery.  Castellaneta noted that "we already knew that these skits were funny, [but] some of them we polished and tightened."  The skits were principally written by improvising from a basic point, transcribing the results and then editing them to the finished scene.  Castellaneta chose the title I Am Not Homer as a parody of Leonard Nimoy's famous first autobiography I Am Not Spock, as well as to show that most of the comedy featured "is not the typical Homer comedy."   Alongside his television and film work, Castellaneta has appeared in a number of theatrical productions. In 1992, he starred in Deb & Dan's Show alongside his wife.  In 1995, Castellaneta started writing Where Did Vincent van Gogh?, a one man play in which he portrays a dozen different characters, including artist Vincent van Gogh.  He first officially performed the play at the ACME Comedy Theatre in Los Angeles in 1999.  In 2007, he appeared in The Bicycle Men at The King's Head Theatre in London. 
Personal lifeCastellaneta lives in Los Angeles with his wife Deb Lacusta. He is a vegetarian and teetotaler and exercises regularly (despite being known for voicing a character who eats meat, drinks beer, and rarely, if ever, exercises).  Castellaneta also practices T'ai Chi.  His mother Elsie Castellaneta died in January 2008. 
Filmography 
Discography 

Album Released Label Notes 
Two Lips February 2000 Oglio Records all-music comedy album.  
I Am Not Homer April 23, 2002 Oglio Records Comedy album released with Deb Lacusta.  
Also featured in:

The Simpsons Sing the Blues (1990)
Songs in the Key of Springfield (1997)
The Yellow Album (1998)
Go Simpsonic with The Simpsons (1999)
The Simpsons: Testify (2007)


Awards

Year Award Category Role Series Result 
1992 Primetime Emmy Award Outstanding Voice-Over Performance Homer Simpson Grampa various others The Simpsons   
1993 Annie Award Outstanding Individual Achievement in the Field of Animation Various characters The Simpsons   
1993 Primetime Emmy Award Outstanding Voice-Over Performance Homer Simpson The Simpsons   
2000 Annie Award Outstanding Voice Acting by a Male Performer in a Television Series The Postman Olive, the Other Reindeer   
2004 Primetime Emmy Award Outstanding Voice-Over Performance Various characters The Simpsons   
2004 Young Artist Award Most Popular Mom & Pop in a Television Series Homer Simpson The Simpsons   
2007 WGA Award Animation  The Simpsons   
2009 Primetime Emmy Award Outstanding Voice-Over Performance  Homer Simpson The Simpsons   
2010 Primetime Emmy Award Outstanding Voice-Over Performance  Homer Simpson, Grampa Simpson The Simpsons   
2011 Primetime Emmy Award Outstanding Voice-Over Performance    Homer Simpson, Barney Gumble, Krusty the Clown, Louie The Simpsons   

References 
External links 

 

 
   
 
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Mistinguett
 
 
 
Mistinguett (5 April 1875 – 5 January 1956) was a French actress and singer, whose birth name was Jeanne Bourgeois. She was at one time the best-paid female entertainer in the world.   
BiographyThe daughter of  Antoine Bourgeois, a 30-year-old day-laborer, and Jeannette Debrée, a 21-year-old seamstress, Jeanne Florentine Bourgeois was born at 5 Rue du Chemin-de-Fer (today Rue George-Israël), in Enghien-les-Bains, Val-d'Oise, Île-de-France, France. The family moved to Soisy-sous-Montmorency where she spent her childhood; her parents later worked as mattress-makers.  Flanner, Janet, Paris Journal, Volume Two, 1956—1964 (Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1965), page 6 At an early age Bourgeois aspired to be an entertainer. She began as a flower seller in a restaurant in her hometown, singing popular ballads as she sold blossoms. After taking classes in theatre and singing, she began her career as an entertainer in 1885. One day on the train to Paris for a violin lesson, she met Saint-Marcel, who directed the revue at the Casino de Paris. He engaged her first as a stage-hand, and here she began to pursue her goal to become an entertainer, experimenting with various stage-names, being successively Miss Helyett, Miss Tinguette, Mistinguette and, finally, Mistinguett.   Bourgeois made her debut as Mistinguett at the Casino de Paris in 1895 and went on to appear in venues such as the Folies Bergère, Moulin Rouge and Eldorado. Her risqué routines captivated Paris, and she went on to become the most popular French entertainer of her time and the highest paid female entertainer in the world, known for her flamboyance and a zest for the theatrical.  In 1919 her legs were insured for 500,000 francs.Though Mistinguett never married, she had a son, Léopoldo João de Lima e Silva, by Brazilian diplomat Leopoldo de Lima e Silva (died 1931); the latter was a grandson of the Duke of Caxias.  She also had a long relationship with Maurice Chevalier, 13 years her junior.She first recorded her signature song, "Mon Homme", in 1916. It was popularised under its English title "My Man" by Fanny Brice and has become a standard in the repertoire of numerous pop and jazz singers.During a tour of the United States, Mistinguett was asked by Time magazine to explain her popularity. Her answer was, "It is a kind of magnetism. I say 'Come closer' and draw them to me."
DeathMistinguett died in Bougival, France, at the age of 80, attended by her son, a doctor.   She is buried in the Cimetiere Enghien-les-Bains, Île-de-France, France.Upon her death, writer Jean Cocteau observed in an obituary, "Her voice, slightly off-key, was that of the Parisian street hawkers—the husky, trailing voice of the Paris people. She was of the animal race that owes nothing to intellectualism. She incarnated herself. She flattered a French patriotism that was not shameful. It is normal now that she should crumble, like the other caryatids of that great and marvelous epoch that was ours". 
Filmography

Carosello del varietà (1955)
Paris 1900 (1947)
Rigolboche (1936) .... Lina Bourget
L'Île d'amour (1928) ... aka Island of Love (International: English title)
Mistinguett détective II (1917)
Mistinguett détective (1917)
Fleur de Paris (1916) .... Margot Panard et Mistinguett
Sous la menace (1916)
Chignon d'or (1916) .... Mistinguett ... aka The Gold Chignon (USA: literal English title)
Doppia ferita, La (1915)
Valse renversante, La (1914)
Misérables – Époque 4: Cosette et Marius, Les (1913) .... Éponine
Misérables – Époque 3: Cosette, Les (1913) .... Éponine
Misérables – Époque 2: Fantine, Les (1913) .... Éponine Thénardier
Misérables – Époque 1: Jean Valjean, Les (1913) .... Éponine Thénardier
Glu, La (1913) .... Fernande, dite 'La Glu'
Une bougie récalcitrante (1912)
Parapluie, Le (1912)
Vocation de Lolo, La (1912)
À bas les hommes (1912)
Bal costumé (1912)
Coup de foudre, Le (1912)
Folle de Penmarch, La (1912) .... Yvonne ... aka Folle de Pen-March, La (France)
Moche, La (1912)
L'Oubliée, L (1912)
Un enfant terrible (1912)
Clown et le pacha, Le (1911)
Épouvante, L (1911) .... La star de music-hall ... aka Terror-Stricken (UK)
Ruse de Miss Plumcake, La (1911) .... Miss Plumcake
Timidités de Rigadin, Les (1910) .... La fiancée de Rigadin
Ce bon docteur (1909)
L'Enlèvement de Mademoiselle Biffin (1909)
Un mari qui l'échappe belle (1909)
Fiancée récalcitrante, La (1909)
Fleur de pavé (1909)
L'Empreinte ou La main rouge (1908)


References 
Paris Journal was written by Janet Flanner, Paris writer for the New Yorker, 1925-1975.
External links

 
Fan Site
Mistinguett by Lenci, c.1924
Photographs and literature

 
DEFAULTSORT






 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Robert Browning
  
Robert Browning (7 May 1812 – 12 December 1889) was an English poet and playwright whose mastery of dramatic verse, especially dramatic monologues, made him one of the foremost Victorian poets.
Early yearsRobert Browning was born in Camberwell - a district now forming part of the borough of Southwark in South London, England - the only son of Sarah Anna (née Wiedemann) and Robert Browning. Browning, Robert. Ed. Karlin, Daniel (2004) Selected Poems Penguin p9   His father was a well-paid clerk for the Bank of England, earning about £150 per year. John Maynard, Browning's Youth  Browning’s paternal grandfather was a wealthy slave owner in Saint Kitts, West Indies, but Browning's father was an abolitionist. Browning's father had been sent to the West Indies to work on a sugar plantation, but revolted by the slavery there, he returned to England.  Browning’s mother was a daughter of a German shipowner who had settled in Dundee, and his Scottish wife.  Browning had one sister, Sarianna. Browning's paternal grandmother, Margaret Tittle, who had inherited a plantation in St Kitts, was rumoured within the family to have had some Jamaican mixed race ancestry. Author Julia Markus suggests St Kitts rather than Jamaica.    There is little evidence to support this rumour, and it seems to be merely an anecdotal family story.  Robert's father, a literary collector, amassed a library of around 6,000 books, many of them rare. Thus, Robert was raised in a household of significant literary resources. His mother, to whom he was very close, was a devout nonconformist and a talented musician.   His younger sister, Sarianna, also gifted, became her brother's companion in his later years, after the death of his wife in 1861. His father encouraged his children's interest in literature and the arts. By twelve, Browning had written a book of poetry which he later destroyed when no publisher could be found.  After being at one or two private schools, and showing an insuperable dislike to school life, he was educated at home by a tutor via the resources of his father's extensive library.   By the age of fourteen he was fluent in French, Greek, Italian and Latin. He became a great admirer of the Romantic poets, especially Shelley. Following the precedent of Shelley, Browning became an atheist and vegetarian, both of which he gave up later. At the age of sixteen, he studied Greek at University College London but left after his first year.  His parents' staunch evangelical faith prevented his studying at either Oxford University or Cambridge University, both then open only to members of the Church of England.  He had inherited substantial musical ability through his mother, and composed arrangements of various songs. He refused a formal career and ignored his parents' remonstrations, dedicating himself to poetry. He stayed at home until the age of 34, financially dependent on his family until his marriage. His father sponsored the publication of his son's poems. 
First published worksIn March 1833, Pauline, a fragment of a confession was published anonymously by Saunders and Otley at the expense of the author, the costs of printing having been borne by an aunt, Mrs Silverthorne.   It is a long poem composed in homage to Shelley and somewhat in his style.  Originally Browning considered Pauline as the first of a series written by different aspects of himself, but he soon abandoned this idea.  The press noticed the publication.  W.J. Fox writing in the The Monthly Repository of April 1833 discerned merit in the work.  Allan Cunningham praised it in the The Athenaeum.  Some years later, probably in 1850, Rosetti came across it in the Reading Room of the British Museum and wrote to Browning, then in Florence to ask if he was the author.     John Stuart Mill, however, wrote that the author suffered from an "intense and morbid self-consciousness".   Later Browning was rather embarrassed by the work, and only included it in his collected poems of 1868 after making substantial changes and adding a preface in which he asked for indulgence for a boyish work. In 1834 he accompanied the Chevalier George de Benkhausen, the Russian consul-general, on a brief visit to St Petersburg and began Paracelsus, which was published in 1835.     The subject of the 16th century savant and alchemist was probably suggested to him by the Comte Amédée de Ripart-Monclar, to whom it was dedicated.  The publication had some commercial and critical success, being noticed by Wordsworth, Dickens, Landor, J.S. Mill and others, including Tennyson (already famous).  It is a monodrama without action, dealing with the problems confronting an intellectual trying to find his role in society.  It gained him access to the London literary world.As a result of his new contacts he met Macready, who invited him to write a play.   Strafford was performed five times.  Browning then wrote two other plays, one of which was not performed, while the other failed, Browning having fallen out with Macready.  In 1838 he visited Italy, looking for background for Sordello, a long poem in blank verse,presented as the imaginary biography of the Mantuan bard spoken of by Dante in the Divine Comedy, canto 6 of Purgattory, set against a background of hate and conflict during the Guelph-Ghibelline wars.  This was published in 1840 and met with widespread derision, gaining him the reputation of wanton carelessness and obscurity. Tennyson commented that he only understood the first and last lines and Carlyle claimed that his wife had read the poem through and could not tell whether Sordello was a man, a city or a book. Browning's reputation began to make a partial recovery with the publication, 1841-1846, of Bells and Pomegranates, a series of eight pamphlets, originally intended just to include his plays.  Fortunately his publisher, Moxon, persuaded him to include some "dramatic lyrics", some of which had already appeared in periodicals. 
Marriage 

In 1845, Browning met the poet Elizabeth Barrett, six years his elder, who lived as a semi-invalid in her father's house in Wimpole Street, London. They began regularly corresponding and gradually a romance developed between them, leading to their marriage and journey to Italy (for Elizabeth's health) on 12 September 1846. Browning, Robert. Ed. Karlin, Daniel (2004) Selected Poems Penguin p10  The marriage was initially secret because Elizabeth's domineering father disapproved of marriage for any of his children. Mr. Barrett disinherited Elizabeth, as he did for each of his children who married: “The Mrs. Browning of popular imagination was a sweet, innocent young woman who suffered endless cruelties at the hands of a tyrannical papa but who nonetheless had the good fortune to fall in love with a dashing and handsome poet named Robert Browning. ”  At her husband's insistence, the second edition of Elizabeth’s Poems included her love sonnets. The book increased her popularity and high critical regard, cementing her position as an eminent Victorian poet. Upon William Wordsworth's death in 1850, she was a serious contender to become Poet Laureate, the position eventually going to Tennyson.From the time of their marriage and until Elizabeth's death, the Brownings lived in Italy, residing first in Pisa, and then, within a year, finding an apartment in Florence at Casa Guidi (now a museum to their memory).  Their only child, Robert Wiedemann Barrett Browning, nicknamed "Penini" or "Pen", was born in 1849.  In these years Browning was fascinated by and learned from the art and atmosphere of Italy. He would, in later life, describe Italy as his university. As Elizabeth had inherited money of her own, the couple were reasonably comfortable in Italy, and their relationship together was happy.  However, the literary assault on Browning's work did not let up and he was critically dismissed further, by patrician writers such as Charles Kingsley, for the desertion of England for foreign lands. 
Major worksIn Florence, probably from early in 1853, Browning worked on the poems that eventually comprised his two-volume Men and Women, for which he is now well known;  in 1855, however, when these were published, they  made relatively little impact. Elizabeth died in 1861: Robert Browning returned to London the following year with Pen, by then 12 years old, and made their home in 17 Warwick Crescent, Maida Vale. It was only when he returned to England and became part of the London literary scene—albeit while paying frequent visits to Italy— (though never again to Florence) that his reputation started to take off.  In 1868, after five years work, he completed and published the long blank-verse poem The Ring and the Book. Based on a convoluted murder-case from 1690s Rome, the poem is composed of twelve books, essentially ten lengthy dramatic monologues narrated by the various characters in the story, showing their individual perspectives on events, bookended by an introduction and conclusion by Browning himself. Long, even by Browning's own standards (over twenty thousand lines), The Ring and the Book was the poet's most ambitious project and arguably his greatest work; it has been praised as a tour de force of dramatic poetry.  Published separately in four volumes from November 1868 through to February 1869, the poem was a success both commercially and critically, and finally brought Browning the renown he had sought for nearly forty years. Browning, Robert. Ed. Karlin, Daniel (2004) Selected Poems Penguin p11  The Robert Browning Society was formed in 1881 and his work was recognised as belonging within the British literary canon. 
Last years and death
In the remaining years of his life Browning travelled extensively. After a series of long poems published in the early 1870s, of which Balaustion's Adventure and Red Cotton Night-Cap Country were the best-received.  The volume Pacchiarotto, and How He Worked in Distemper included an attack against Browning's critics, especially Alfred Austin, later to become Poet Laureate. According to some reports Browning became romantically involved with Louisa, Lady Ashburton, but he refused her proposal of marriage, and did not re-marry. In 1878, he revisited Italy for the first time in the seventeen years since Elizabeth's death, and returned there on several further occasions. In 1887, Browning produced the major work of his later years, Parleyings with Certain People of Importance In Their Day. It finally presented the poet speaking in his own voice, engaging in a series of dialogues with long-forgotten figures of literary, artistic, and philosophic history. The Victorian public was baffled by this, and Browning returned to the brief, concise lyric for his last volume, Asolando (1889), published on the day of his death. Browning died at his son's home Ca' Rezzonico in Venice on 12 December 1889.  He was buried in Poets' Corner in Westminster Abbey; his grave now lies immediately adjacent to that of Alfred Tennyson. Browning was awarded many distinctions. He was made LL.D. of Edinburgh, a life Governor of London University, and had the offer of the Lord Rectorship of Glasgow. But he turned down anything that involved public speaking.
Browning's poetic style 

Browning is often known by some of his short poems, such as Porphyria's Lover, My Last Duchess,Rabbi Ben Ezra, How they brought the good News to Aix, Evelyn Hope, The Pied Piper of Hamelin, A Grammarian's Funeral, A Death in the Desert.  Initially, Browning was not regarded as a great poet, since his subjects were often recondite and lay beyond the ken and sympathy of the great bulk of readers; and owing, partly to the subtle links connecting the ideas and partly to his often extremely condensed and rugged expression, the treatment of theme was often difficult and obscure.Browning’s fame today rests mainly on his dramatic monologues, in which the words not only convey setting and action but also reveal the speaker’s character. Unlike a soliloquy, the meaning in a Browning dramatic monologue is not what the speaker directly reveals but what he inadvertently "gives away" about himself in the process of rationalizing past actions, or "special-pleading" his case to a silent auditor in the poem.  Rather than thinking out loud, the character composes a self-defence which the reader, as "juror," is challenged to see through.  Browning chooses some of the most debased, extreme and even criminally psychotic characters, no doubt for the challenge of building a sympathetic case for a character who does not deserve one and to cause the reader to squirm at the temptation to acquit a character who may be a homicidal psychopath.  One of his more sensational dramatic monologues is Porphyria's Lover.Yet it is by carefully reading the far more sophisticated and cultivated rhetoric of the aristocratic and civilized Duke of My Last Duchess, perhaps the most frequently cited example of the poet's dramatic monologue form, that the attentive reader discovers the most horrific example of a mind totally mad despite its eloquence in expressing itself. The duchess, we learn, was murdered not because of infidelity, not because of a lack of gratitude for her position, and not, finally, because of the simple pleasures she took in common everyday occurrences.  She is reduced to an objet d'art in the Duke's collection of paintings and statues because the Duke equates his instructing her to behave like a duchess with "stooping," an action of which his megalomaniac pride is incapable.  In other monologues, such as Fra Lippo Lippi, Browning takes an ostensibly unsavory or immoral character and challenges us to discover the goodness, or life-affirming qualities, that often put the speaker's contemporaneous judges to shame.  In The Ring and the Book Browning writes an epic-length poem in which he justifies the ways of God to humanity through twelve extended blank verse monologues spoken by the principals in a trial about a murder.  These monologues greatly influenced many later poets, including T. S. Eliot and Ezra Pound, high modernists, the latter singling out in his Cantos Browning's convoluted psychological poem Sordello about a frustrated 13-century troubadour, as the poem he must work to distance himself from. These concerns reflected Victorian society in the late 19th century.But he remains too much the prophet-poet for the conceits, puns, and verbal play of the metaphysical poets of the seventeenth century.  His is a modern sensibility, all too aware of the arguments against the vulnerable position of one of his simple characters, who recites: "God's in His Heaven; All's right with the world."  Browning endorses such a position because he sees an immanent deity that, far from remaining in a transcendent heaven, is indivisible from temporal process, assuring that in the fullness of theological time there is ample cause for celebrating life.
History of sound recordingAt a dinner party on 7 April 1889, at the home of Browning's friend the artist Rudolf Lehmann, an Edison cylinder phonograph recording was made on a white wax cylinder by Edison's British representative, George Gouraud. In the recording, which still exists, Browning recites part of "How They Brought the Good News from Ghent to Aix" (and can be heard apologizing when he forgets the words).  When the recording was played in 1890 on the anniversary of his death, at a gathering of his admirers, it was said to be the first time anyone's voice "had been heard from beyond the grave."  
Legacy and cultural references
In his introduction to the Oxford University Press edition of Browning's poems 1833-1864  Ian Jack comments that Thomas Hardy, Rudyard Kipling, Ezra Pound and T S Eliot "all learned from Browning's exploration of the exploration of the possibilities of dramatic poetry and of colloquial idiom".In 1930 the story of Browning and his wife Elizabeth was made into a play The Barretts of Wimpole Street, by Rudolph Besier.  The play was a success and brought popular fame to the couple in the United States.  The role of Elizabeth became a signature role for the actress Katharine Cornell. It was  twice adapted into film. It was also the basis of the stage musical Robert and Elizabeth, with music by Ron Grainer and book and lyrics by Ronald Millar.The basis of Terence Rattigan's 1948 play  is a pupil making a parting present to his teacher of an inscribed copy of what is referred to as The Browning Version (Robert Browning's translation of The Agamemnon of Aeschylus).  Stephen King's The Dark Tower was chiefly inspired by the poem "Childe Roland to the Dark Tower Came" by Robert Browning, whose full text was included in the final volume's appendix.A memorial plaque on the site of his London home,  Warwick Crescent, was unveiled on 11 December 1993. Browning Close in Royston, Hertfordshire, is named after Robert Browning.
Complete list of works


Pauline: A Fragment of a Confession (1833)
Paracelsus (1835)
Strafford (play) (1837)
Sordello (1840)
Bells and Pomegranates No. I: Pippa Passes (play) (1841)
Bells and Pomegranates No. II: King Victor and King Charles (play) (1842)
Bells and Pomegranates No. III: Dramatic Lyrics (1842)
"Porphyria's Lover"
"Soliloquy of the Spanish Cloister"
"My Last Duchess"
"The Pied Piper of Hamelin"
"Count Gismond"
"Johannes Agricola in Meditation"
Bells and Pomegranates No. IV: The Return of the Druses (play) (1843)
Bells and Pomegranates No. V: A Blot in the 'Scutcheon (play) (1843)
Bells and Pomegranates No. VI: Colombe's Birthday (play) (1844)
Bells and Pomegranates No. VII: Dramatic Romances and Lyrics (1845)
"The Laboratory"
"How They Brought the Good News from Ghent to Aix"
"The Bishop Orders His Tomb at Saint Praxed's Church"
"The Lost Leader"
"Home Thoughts from Abroad"
Bells and Pomegranates No. VIII: Luria and A Soul's Tragedy (plays) (1846)
Christmas-Eve and Easter-Day (1850)
Men and Women (1855)
"Love Among the Ruins"
"The Last Ride Together"
"A Toccata of Galuppi's"
"Childe Roland to the Dark Tower Came"
"Fra Lippo Lippi"
"Andrea Del Sarto"
"The Patriot/ An Old Story"
"A Grammarian's Funeral"
"An Epistle Containing the Strange Medical Experience of Karshish, the Arab Physician"
Dramatis Personae (1864)
"Caliban upon Setebos"
"Rabbi Ben Ezra"
The Ring and the Book (1868-9)
Balaustion's Adventure (1871)
Prince Hohenstiel-Schwangau, Saviour of Society (1871)
Fifine at the Fair (1872)
Red Cotton Night-Cap Country, or, Turf and Towers (1873)
Aristophanes' Apology (1875)
The Inn Album (1875)
Pacchiarotto, and How He Worked in Distemper (1876)
The Agamemnon of Aeschylus (1877)
La Saisiaz and The Two Poets of Croisic (1878)
Dramatic Idylls (1879)
Dramatic Idylls: Second Series (1880)
Jocoseria (1883)
Ferishtah's Fancies (1884)
Parleyings with Certain People of Importance In Their Day (1887)
Asolando (1889)
Prospice


Notes 
Further reading

 
Chesterton, G.K. Robert Browning (Macmillan, 1903)
DeVane, William Clyde. A Browning handbook. 2nd. Ed. (Appleton-Century-Crofts, 1955)
Drew, Philip. The poetry of Robert Browning: A critical introduction. (Methuen, 1970)
Finlayson, Iain. Browning: A Private Life. (HarperCollins, 2004)
Garrett, Martin ed., Elizabeth Barrett Browning and Robert Browning: Interviews and Recollections. (Macmillan, 2000)
Garrett, Martin. Elizabeth Barrett Browning and Robert Browning. (British Library Writers' Lives). (British Library, 2001)
Hudson, Gertrude Reese. Robert Browning's literary life from first work to masterpiece. (Texas, 1992)
Karlin, Daniel. The courtship of Robert Browning and Elizabeth Barrett. (Oxford, 1985)
Kelley, Philip et al. (Eds.) The Brownings' correspondence. 19 vols. to date. (Wedgestone, 1984-) (Complete letters of Elizabeth Barrett Browning and Robert Browning to 1853.)
Litzinger, Boyd and Smalley, Donald (eds.) Robert Browning: the Critical Heritage. (Routledge, 1995)
Markus, Julia. Dared and Done: the Marriage of Elizabeth Barrett and Robert Browning (Bloomsbury, 1995)
Maynard, John. Browning's youth. (Harvard Univ. Press, 1977)
Ryals, Clyde de L. The Life of Robert Browning: a Critical Biography. (Blackwell, 1993)
Woolford, John and Karlin, Daniel. Robert Browning. (Longman, 1996)


External links 
 
 
 

Profile and poems written and audio at the Poetry Archive
Profile and poems at the Poetry Foundation
Profile and poems at Poets.org
The Brownings: A Research Guide (Baylor University)
The Browning Letters Project (Baylor University)
The Browning Society
 
 
Works by Robert Browning in e-book
An analysis of "Home Thoughts, From Abroad"
Browning archive at the Harry Ransom Center at The University of Texas at Austin
Works by Robert Browning, from the Internet Archive
The British Library - Robert Browning read by Robert Hardy and Greg Wise Hear audio recordings of Browning's poetry with accompanying biography and discussion

 
DEFAULTSORT








 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Rod Steiger
 
Rodney Stephen "Rod" Steiger (April 14, 1925 July 9, 2002) was an Academy Award-winning American actor known for his performances in such films as On the Waterfront, The Big Knife, Oklahoma!, The Harder They Fall, Across the Bridge, The Pawnbroker, Doctor Zhivago, In the Heat of the Night,  and Waterloo as well as the television programs Marty and Jesus of Nazareth.
Early lifeSteiger was born in Westhampton, New York, the son of Lorraine (née Driver) and Frederick Steiger,     of French, Scottish, and German descent.       Steiger was raised as a Lutheran.   He never knew his father, a vaudevillian who had been part of a traveling song-and-dance team with Steiger's mother (who subsequently left show business).  Steiger grew up with his alcoholic mother before running away from home at age sixteen to join the United States Navy during World War II, where he saw action on destroyers in the Pacific. 
CareerSteiger appeared in over 100 motion pictures. He began his acting career in theatre and on live television in the early 1950s. On May 24, 1953, an episode of Goodyear Television Playhouse jump-started his career. The episode was the story of Marty written by Paddy Chayefsky. Marty is the story of a lonely homely butcher from the Bronx in search of love. Refusing to sign a seven-year studio contract, Steiger later turned down the role in the film version in 1955. Signing a studio contract at that time would "pigeon-hole" Steiger as to the roles he would later play and image portrayed on screen; those were two things Steiger objected to throughout his career. The role of Marty was turned over to Ernest Borgnine. Borgnine would receive the Academy Award for Best Actor in a Leading Role. Rod Steiger never regretted his decision to turn down the film role of Marty.He won the Best Actor Oscar for his portrayal of Chief of Police Bill Gillespie in In the Heat of the Night (1967) opposite Sidney Poitier. He was nominated for the Best Supporting Actor Oscar for On the Waterfront (1954), in which he played Marlon Brando's character's brother. He was nominated again, this time for Best Actor, for the gritty The Pawnbroker (1965), a Sidney Lumet film in which Steiger portrays an emotionally withdrawn Holocaust survivor living in New York City.He played Jud Fry in the film version of the Rodgers and Hammerstein musical Oklahoma!, in which he did his own singing. One of his favorite roles was as Komarovsky in Doctor Zhivago (1965). Steiger, the only American in the cast of that film, was initially apprehensive about working with such great British actors as Ralph Richardson and Alec Guinness and was afraid that he would stick out, but he won acclaim for his performance. He also befriended fellow actor Tom Courtenay on this film;  the two remained friends until Steiger's death.He also appeared in The Big Knife as an overly aggressive film studio boss who berates film star Jack Palance; as Al Capone in Al Capone (1959); as Mr. Joyboy in The Loved One; as the serial killer in No Way to Treat a Lady; and as a repressed gay NCO in The Sergeant (1968); as Rabbi Saunders in The Chosen (1981).
He also played well-known figures such as Napoleon Bonaparte in Waterloo (1970); Benito Mussolini in The Last Four Days (1974) and again in Lion of the Desert (1981); W. C. Fields in W. C. Fields and Me (1976); Pontius Pilate in Franco Zeffirelli's TV miniseries
Jesus of Nazareth
(1977); and mob boss Sam Giancana in the TV miniseries, Sinatra (1992). He appeared in several Italian films, including Hands Over the City (1963) and Lucky Luciano (1974) (both Francesco Rosi's), and also Sergio Leone's A Fistful of Dynamite (1971). In France, he starred in Claude Chabrol's Innocents with Dirty Hands opposite Romy Schneider.In his later years he appeared in The Amityville Horror (1979); The Specialist (1994), and Mars Attacks!. On television, he appeared in the miniseries Jackie Collins' Hollywood Wives (1985), Armistead Maupin's Tales of the City (1993), and a 1995 Columbo television film. Among his final roles was the judge in the prison drama, The Hurricane (1999). The film reunited him with director Norman Jewison, who had directed him in In the Heat of the Night. His last film was A Month of Sundays.Steiger also starred in the film version of Kurt Vonnegut's play Happy Birthday, Wanda June (1971). In 1969, he appeared in the film adaptation of Ray Bradbury's The Illustrated Man with his then-wife, Claire Bloom. He was offered the title role in Patton, but turned it down because he did not want to glorify war.  The role was then given to George C. Scott, who won a Best Actor Oscar. Steiger called this refusal his "dumbest career move". Steiger has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame, at 7080 Hollywood Boulevard which was unveiled 1 April 1997. 
Personal lifeSteiger was married five times: actress Sally Gracie (1952–1958),  actress Claire Bloom (1959–1969),  Sherry Nelson (1973–1979),  Paula Ellis (1986–1997)  and actress Joan Benedict Steiger (married 2000 until his death).  He had a daughter,  opera singer Anna Steiger (born in 1960) by Bloom, and a son, Michael Steiger (born in 1993), from his marriage to Ellis. 
DeathSteiger died in Los Angeles on July 9, 2002, aged 77, from pneumonia and complications from surgery for a gall bladder tumor. 10 July 2002 "Rod Steiger" The Guardian.  He is buried in Forest Lawn - Hollywood Hills Cemetery.The film Saving Shiloh, released in 2006, was dedicated to his memory. 
Filmography 
 

Teresa (1951)
On the Waterfront (1954)
Justice (NBC, 1954)
Oklahoma! (1955)
The Big Knife (1955)
The Court-Martial of Billy Mitchell (1955)
Jubal (1956)
The Harder They Fall (1956)
Back from Eternity (1956)
The Unholy Wife (1957)
Run of the Arrow (1957)
Across the Bridge (1957)
Cry Terror! (1958)
Al Capone (1959) (as Al Capone)
Seven Thieves (1960)
The World in My Pocket (1961)
The Mark (1961)
13 West Street (1962)
Convicts 4 (1962)
The Longest Day (1962)
Hands Over the City (1963)
Time of Indifference (1964)
The Pawnbroker (1964)
A Man Named John (1965)
The Loved One (1965)
Doctor Zhivago (1965)
In the Heat of the Night (1967)
The Girl and the General (1967)
No Way to Treat a Lady (1968)
The Sergeant (1968)
The Illustrated Man (1969)
Three Into Two Won't Go (1969)
Waterloo (1970)
A Fistful of Dynamite (1971)
Happy Birthday, Wanda June (1971)
The Moviemakers (1973) (short subject)
Lolly-Madonna XXX (1973)
The Heroes (1973)
Mussolini: The Last Four Days (1974)
Lucky Luciano (1974)
Innocents with Dirty Hands (1975)
Hennessy (1975)
W.C. Fields and Me (1976)
Portrait of a Hitman (1977)
Jesus of Nazareth (1977)
F.I.S.T. (1978)
Wolf Lake (1978)
Breakthrough (1979)
The Amityville Horror (1979)
Love and Bullets (1979)
Klondike Fever (1980)
The Lucky Star (1980)
Lion of the Desert (1981)
Cattle Annie and Little Britches (1981)
 

The Chosen (1981)
The Magic Mountain (1982)
The Naked Face (1984)
The Glory Boys (1984)
Sword of Gideon (1986)
Catch the Heat (1987)
The Kindred (1986)
American Gothic (1988)
The Exiles (1989) (documentary) (narrator)
That Summer of White Roses (1989)
The January Man (1989)
Tennessee Nights (1989)
Try This One for Size (1989)
In the Line of Duty: Manhunt in the Dakotas (1991)
Men of Respect (1991)
The Ballad of the Sad Cafe (1991)
Guilty as Charged (1991)
The Player (1992) (Cameo)
Sinatra (1992) (as Sam Giancana)
The Neighbor (1993)
Living on Borrowed Time (1993)
Tales of the City (1993) (Cameo)
The Last Tattoo (1994)
The Specialist (1994)
Captain Nuke and the Bomber Boys (1995)
Seven Sundays (1995)
In Pursuit of Honor (1995)
Carpool (1996)
Shiloh (1996) (Doc.Wallace)
Mars Attacks! (1996)
The Kid (1997)
Truth or Consequences, N.M. (1997)
Livers Ain't Cheap (1997)
Off the Menu: The Last Days of Chasen's (1997) (documentary)
Incognito (1997)
The Snatching of Bookie Bob (1998) (short subject)
Body and Soul (1998)
Alexandria Hotel (1998)
Animals and the Tollkeeper (1998)
Modern Vampires (1998)
Legacy (1998)
Cypress Edge (1999)
Crazy in Alabama (1999)
Shiloh 2: Shiloh Season (1999) (Doc.Wallace)
The Hurricane (1999)
End of Days (1999)
Moby Dick (1999) (animated short subject)
The Last Producer (2000)
Lightmaker (2001)
The Flying Dutchman (2001)
A Month of Sundays (2001)
The Hollywood Sign (2001)
Muhammad Ali: Through the Eyes of the World (2001) (documentary)
The Gangster Hit (2001) to (2003) as Big Frank (television film)
Poolhall Junkies (2002)

 
References 
External links 

 
 
He Blowed Up Real Good (TCM Movie Morlocks on Rod Steiger in Hennessy)
Rod Steiger on BBC Radio Desert Island Discs

 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT






















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Tamora Pierce
   Tamora Pierce (born December 13, 1954) is an author of fantasy literature for young adults. She is an alumna of the University of Pennsylvania. Best known for writing stories involving young heroines, she made a name for herself with her first quartet The Song of the Lioness, which followed the main character Alanna through the trials and triumphs of training as a knight. Many of her books contain feminist themes.
BiographyPierce was born in South Connellsville, Pennsylvania in Fayette County, on December 13, 1954. Her mother wanted to name her "Tamara" but the nurse who filled out her birth certificate misspelled it as "Tamora". When she was five her sister Kimberly (whom she based Alanna on)  was born and a year later her second sister, Melanie, was born. From the time she was five until she was eight, she lived in Dunbar. In June 1963 she and her family moved to California. They first lived in San Mateo on El Camino Real and then moved to the other side of the San Francisco Peninsula, in Miramar. They lived there for half a year, in El Granada a full year, and then three years in Burlingame.She began reading when she was very young and started writing at about 6 years old. Her interest in fantasy and science fiction began when she was introduced to J. R. R. Tolkien's The Lord of the Rings, and so she started to write the kind of books that she was reading. After her parents divorced, her mother moved her and her sisters back to Fayette County in 1969, where she spent two years at Albert Gallatin Senior High. When her family moved again, she spent her senior year at Uniontown Area Senior High School, acting, singing, and writing for the school paper.While at the University of Pennsylvania she wrote the books that became The Song of the Lioness quartet. The first book of this quartet, Alanna: The First Adventure was published by Atheneum Books in 1983.Pierce lived with her husband Tim Liebe (Spouse-Creature) in New York City, with their four cats and multiple other pets, until they moved to Syracuse, New York. In 2008, she donated her archive to the department of Rare Books and Special Collections at Northern Illinois University. 
Writing processOn her homepage, Pierce states she gets most ideas from things she stumbles upon. Her concept of magic as a tapestry of threads comes from her experiences in crocheting, and in her world, all mages are somehow based on British naturalist Sir David Attenborough after watching his nature documentaries. Fantasy novels and Arthurian legend were the base of the worlds she thought up as a girl, and later she added contemporary issues like youth crime, cholera outbreaks in Africa. In general, Pierce states: "The best way to prepare to have ideas when you need them is to listen to and encourage your obsessions." Pierce draws on elements of people and animals around her for inspiration. The character of Alanna is loosely based on Pierce's sister.  Thayet's appearance is based on a friend of Pierce's. Beka's pigeon friends in Provost's Dog are all based on actual pigeons of Pierce's acquaintance.  Tamora Pierce first started writing to escape from the drama of her parents' divorce. She wrote fan fiction based on her favorite stories, imitating them closely.  Pierce says she decided to write her stories strong female characters because she noticed a lack of them in the books she read when she was young. 
Bibliography
The Tortall UniverseTortall is a major country in the universe in which the series Song of the Lioness, Immortals, Protector of the Small, Daughter of the Lioness (sometimes known as the Trickster books) and the Provost's Dogs Trilogy (sometimes known as the Beka Cooper books) take place. Its capital is Corus, located near the western coast on the Emerald Ocean. To the north is Scanra, a wild and somewhat barbaric country with whom Tortall went to war in the last two books of the Protector of the Small quartet and the first Trickster book, "Trickster's Choice." To the east are Galla, Tusaine, and Tyra, and past them are Maren and Sarain. Carthak is south of Tortall across the Inland Sea, while to the west lie the Yamani Islands and the Copper Isles. To the far north of Tortall and Scanra is The Roof of the World, a large mountain range. The Trickster books mostly take place in the Copper Isles, further south than the Yamani islands. In addition, Emperor Mage from the Immortals Quartet takes place in Carthak. Also, as the Beka books take place hundreds of years before the other books, Barzun, a nation between Tortall and the Inland Sea later conquered by Tortall, is occasionally mentioned.Tortall is a place somewhat reminiscent of the European Middle Ages, with its monarchy, court, nobility, and knights, but is otherwise a completely different world. Magic is very real and practical to Tortallans, from the common herbwitch to the King's court mages. Religious deities are revered and often play a part in human lives, sometimes choosing humans as champions, sometimes using them to further their own purposes. Though these deities are shown as powerful beyond belief, they rely on their human instruments to shape the world.
The Song of the Lioness   
 
Alanna of Trebond (later Alanna of Pirate's Swoop and Olau) is a ground-breaking female knight. Although noble-born girls traditionally go to the convent to learn how to be proper noblewomen and wives, Alanna desires to become a knight, a position only given to noble-born boys (although, as seen in the Beka Cooper books, there had historically been other lady knights). In order to achieve her dream, Alanna disguises herself as a boy under the name of Alan and goes to the palace in place of her twin brother Thom. As Thom has no interest in becoming a knight, and is far more interested in his magic, Thom forges a letter so that he can go to a temple to become a sorcerer. The twins' father is concerned only with his studies, and pays them little attention, which helps their masquerade. He is also very strongly against magic, as he believed that it should have saved his wife when she died in childbirth, so he is opposed to the idea of Thom becoming a sorcerer. Alanna has a few romantic relationships throughout the series, including Prince Jonathan, George Cooper and Liam Ironarm, the Shang (an intensely powerful martial arts society) Dragon. The series follows Alanna's training and the early years of her knighthood, a timespan of ten years.The Song of The Lioness was originally written as a single book for adults, but was rejected by the publisher. Pierce literally cut up the manuscript    and used the pieces to form four new books for teenagers.

Alanna: The First Adventure (1983) – Alanna, a young noble girl, disguises herself as a boy with the help of her twin brother, Thom, in order to realize her dream of becoming a knight as Thom goes to a temple to become a mage. She makes powerful friends, including the crown prince and the King of the Rogue, and also powerful enemies, (Duke Roger, the prince's cousin whom she does not trust.)
In the Hand of the Goddess (1984) – Finding life as a knight-in-training more difficult than she imagined but still in her disguise, (though several people, including Prince Jonathan and George Cooper, the Rogue, know her secret,) Alanna serves as a squire to Prince Jonathan of Conté, fights in a war alongside her knight master and struggles with the attention of the evil Duke Roger of Conté. She also struggles to find her identity as a woman along with her dreams of becoming a knight, made even more complicated as both Jonathan and George begin to court her. She also kills her greatest enemy, Duke Roger of Conte.
The Woman Who Rides Like a Man (1986) – After gaining her shield 'Sir Alanna' travels south, meeting up with a Bazhir tribe. She learns to reconcile with her magic, a part of her she formerly despised, and becomes a shamaan. Jonathan also becomes "The Voice," an honored Bazhir figure who is able to speak to every one who has performed the traditional Bazhir rituals. By doing this he reconciles the Bazhir, who have long resented the Conte rule, to the capital city of Corus. Jonathan and Alanna also fight, and break up. Alanna soon finds another relationship with George, the King of the Rogue, but continues to struggle with her feelings for Jonathan, who has gone on to court a "proper woman," a princess of the Copper Isles.
Lioness Rampant (1988) – Alanna travels to the "Roof of the World" in search of the Dominion Jewel in order to prove her worth. The Dominion Jewel is a legendary artifact rumored to unite any ruler who holds it with the land that he or she rules. During this journey she meets Princess Thayet, her bodyguard Buri, and the Shang Dragon, whom she develops a romantic relationship with, despite his open fear of magic, even her magic. She also duels with Duke Roger after he is resurrected by her brother Thom, and tries once again to take over Tortall, this time not as king, but by destroying it and everyone in it.


The Immortals 
This story is about Veralidaine (Daine) Sarrasri who was orphaned when raiders attacked her village. Daine has an unusual (and extremely strong) gift of wild magic which is mistaken as insanity because she is unable to control it. Though convinced she has no magical Gift, it is discovered that she has 'wild magic' - a magic that is not uncommon, but for some reason is a disregarded branch of magic. What is rare is the amount of it that Daine possesses, and what she is able to do with it. This magic gives her a unique connection with animals. Her abilities manifest gradually throughout the series, allowing her first to speak with animals, to heal their injuries and eventually to shape-shift into animal forms. The series covers a timespan of four years, following Daine as she learns to communicate with humans, animals and Immortals.

Wild Magic (1992) – Daine, a 13-year-old girl, finds out her knack with wild animals is in fact a rare and powerful form of magic. Under the guidance of the mage Numair Salmalín (the most powerful mage in Tortall) she learns to control her magic, which proves very important for herself and her companions. This first novel in the quartet also reunites us briefly with the protagonist of the Song of the Lioness quartet, Alanna of Pirate's Swoop and Olau, formerly Alanna of Trebond.
Wolf-Speaker (1994) – When traveling with Numair, Daine meets a pack of wolves, who show her the devastation that the destruction of the valley and the pack's home is connected with a treasonous conspiracy against her adopted king and country.
Emperor Mage (1995) – Daine joins a delegation of Tortallan diplomats sent to Carthak, where she finally meets the Emperor Ozorne, of whom she has heard so much. Daine is caught up in a strange battle involving displeased gods and strange magics.
The Realms of the Gods (1996) – Caught in a mysterious attack, Daine and Numair are snatched into the Divine Realms, where they meet Daine's parents (her father is a minor god of the hunt and when her mother died he brought her into the Divine Realm) and struggle to make their way back to Tortall, where war is raging again. This book takes place in both the Divine (immortal) and mortal realms.
Tamora Pierce will also be writing two books on Numair's last years at the University of Carthak, his clash with Emperor Ozorne, and subsequent flight to Tortall. The working titles are Numair: The Early Years 1 and Numair: The Early Years 2, but these are likely to change.  They are to be published in 2014 and 2015, respectively. A third, untitled book scheduled for 2015 will follow the coming-of-age of Lady Maura of Dunlath.
Protector of the Small 
This story is of Keladry of Mindelan, the first girl to follow in Alanna's footsteps—legally and without disguise, after a law is passed allowing girls to try for knighthood. As she begins her training, Kel is constantly harassed, injured, plagued by doubters and put on probation by her training master, who thinks a girl will never succeed. Kel discovers the hazing of young pages and fights the bullies to put a stop to it. Kel makes memorable friends throughout the series, including the wry Nealan of Queenscove and Lord Raoul of Goldenlake, an old friend of Alanna's. She also meets some key enemies, including Joren of Stone Mountain, her fellow page. The series follows Kel's training and the first year of her knighthood, a timespan of nine years.

First Test (1999) – Keladry of Mindelan, the first official female page, faces giant spidrens (Immortals, see the Immortals series), hazing, bullying and the mistrust of her superiors in her first probationary year as a page.
Page (2000) – Kel, to the surprise of many, is allowed to complete her page's training. In this second book of the series Kel faces dangers that will change the way pages are taught.
Squire (2001) – In the second half of her training, Kel has a new master, Raoul of Goldenlake, who gives her new duties, and teaches her new skills. Alongside her own study, Kel becomes increasingly involved with the war that brews on Tortall's northern border.
Lady Knight (2002) – Though she is a knight, Kel is still inexperienced. She struggles with her sense of duty when her commanders assign her not to the front lines of the war, but to manage a refugee camp. Also, she had a vision in the chamber of a quest to turn the tide of the war.


Tricksters  
This duology (also known as Daughter of the Lioness) is actually as long as the earlier quartets, because these books are about twice the length of the earlier works. Pierce explained that the success of the Harry Potter books finally showed publishers that young readers will read big books.The duology is the story of Alianne (Aly) of Pirate's Swoop, the 16-year-old daughter of the legendary Alanna the Lioness. Disallowed work as a Tortallan spy by her parents, Aly leaves home only to be captured by pirates and sold into slavery in the Copper Isles. Under the guidance of Kyprioth, the god of tricksters, Aly involves herself with a conspiracy of the native raka people against their luarin conquerors, in accordance with a prophecy made by Kyprioth himself through one of his priestesses, centuries earlier. The duology covers a timespan of two years. Aly is a much different person from her mother, saying of herself, “Why, I’m just as true and honest as dirt. And I’m even more charming than dirt.”

Trickster's Choice (2003) – When Aly is taken by pirates, she is sold as a slave in the Copper Isles and makes a bet with the god Kyprioth, to protect the children of the Balitang family from unknown dangers. She soon learns that the two daughters, Saraiyu Balitang (Sarai) and Dovasary Balitang (Dove), are linked to the prophecy that predicts one of them will become queen. She learns to speak crow, and makes a wonderful friend, Nawat Crow, a crow turned man.
Trickster's Queen (2004) – Returning to Rajmuat after their short exile, the Balitang household prepares to overthrow the Rittevon throne that has ruled the Copper Isles for centuries and replace the vicious monarchs with a raka queen. Alianne, Alanna's daughter, is the conspiracy's spymaster.


Beka Cooper  
This trilogy is set in the realm of Tortall, 200 years before Alanna: The First Adventure. The first book in the series, Terrier, was released on October 24, 2006.George Cooper is a young boy, six years of age, who is caught stealing. His ashamed mother then tells him about his famous ancestress, named Rebakah Cooper. "Beka" Cooper is a trainee for the Provost's Guard, which is Tortall's equivalent of a police force. In those days, they were called "Dogs" and trainees were known as "Puppies," both of whom were stationed at "Kennels" (this was where the term "Provost's Dog" came from).The first book in the new trilogy, Terrier, concerns Beka's first months as a Puppy. All of Pierce's previous books were written in the third person, but this series is told from a diary-style first person perspective. Beka's entries detail how hard she works to try to make her home, the Lower City of Corus, safer.Beka's roots in the Lower City give her both a keen insight and a sense of empathy for the people she is there to protect. Beka is referred to as a "Terrier" for her youth and dogged determination despite her size.The second book in this trilogy, Bloodhound, was released on April 14, 2009.  Here, we follow Beka to Port Caynn, where a secretive ring of cole-mongers threatens to destroy the country. The third and final book of the trilogy is Mastiff, formerly titled Elkhound. It was released October 25, 2011.  An excerpt from Mastiff is included in Tortall and Other Lands: A Collection of Tales. After a devastating attack at the summer palace, Beka is assigned to recapture what was stolen, but a traitor will make the quest difficult.
The Circle UniverseThe "Circle of Magic" books are set in the land of Emelan, while the 'Circle Opens' series is set in various neighbouring countries.The series tell the story of four children, Sandrilene fa Toren, Trisana Chandler, Daja Kisubo and Briar Moss (formerly Roach), known as Sandry, Tris, Daja, and Briar, respectively, who are discovered and brought together by a powerful mage Niklaren Goldeye (called Niko) and told that they are "ambient mages," which means that they use magic from outside themselves. The four youths do not fit in with the other children of the monastic community to which Niko brings them, and are put together in a separate cottage, called Discipline. Here they each learn of their hidden talents; Sandry with thread, Tris with weather, Daja with fire and metal, and Briar with plants. They live with two mages: Lark, a gentle woman especially attentive to Sandry since she also has thread magic, and Rosethorn, a sharp woman who shares Briar's ability with plants. Also teaching and guiding them is Niko, technically Tris's teacher, but available to all four. Daja is mentored and guided by Dedicate Initiate Frostpine, a smith mage. Their teachers, with the exception of Niko, are also ambient mages. At first it seems that a merchant, a street rat, a noblewoman, and a Trader (a trading race that is often hated by others) will never get along, but an extraordinary circumstance brings them together. They are all powerful individually, but they discover that together they are even stronger. Through an earthquake, they realize their full potential and are bound closely together forever. As children skilled in an uncommon magic, they struggle to earn the respect of the adults they encounter.
Circle of Magic 

Sandry's Book, UK title The Magic in the Weaving (1997) – The four young mages are brought together to learn about their newfound magic. When they are trapped in the midst of an earthquake, they must spin their powers together to survive.
Tris's Book, UK title The Power in the Storm (1998) – Winding circle is attacked by pirates with a strange new weapon and a spy amongst the mages. The Winding Circle temple faces complete destruction. What will the four do to stop the attack?
Daja's Book, UK title The Fire in the Forging (1998) – Duke Vedris takes the four and their teachers to northern Emelan where wild grass fires had been ruining the harvest. Daja finds a Trader caravan and is torn between two fates, to be back with the people she was raised with but labelled her an outcast or to stay with her friends and teachers.
Briar's Book, UK title The Healing in the Vine (1999) – When a deadly illness strikes Summersea, the four and their teachers work to stop it. Just as they begin to succeed, the illness strikes back at what Briar loves most.


The Circle Opens  
During this series the young mages are officially certified by Winding Circle and become teachers. In this quartet the original four protagonists decide to travel with their teachers, each taking on a new student and combating problems abroad.

Magic Steps (2000) – Sandry finds a dance-mage boy in Summersea, the twelve-year-old Pasco Acalon, the son and grandson of two police families (known as "harriers" in Summersea). When a rich trading family falls prey to a serial killer, she and Pasco must work together to stop the killer mages who have a deadly weapon- unmagic, which is the absence of magic and life.
Street Magic (2001) – In Chammur, Briar discovers a street girl named Evvy (Evumeimei Dingzai), and finds she has stone-magic. But the noblewoman-sponsor of the sinister Viper gang has her eye on Evvy, and Briar must protect his young student from the lady's greed.
Cold Fire (2002) – Daja travels to Namorn in the far north, and discovers her host's twin daughters' magical talent: Niamara (Nia), whose magic is with carpentry and woodwork, and Jorality (Jory), whose magic is with cooking. All the while someone is setting fires throughout the city, despite the best efforts of Bennat Ladradun, head of the firefighters.
Shatterglass (2003) – Tris encounters Kethlun Warder (Keth), an undiscovered glass mage who "lost" his glass talent when he was hit by lightning, but gained the ability to mix lightning and glass.  Keth can create glass balls that contain visions of the work of a murderer who incidentally orphaned Glakisa Irakory (Glaki), a 4 year old academic mage who lives in the same place as Keth. Keth also created a living glass dragon, named Chime by Tris. Together, Tris and Keth are the only ones who can expose the murderer.

These books take place as the children go from about age 10, in the first series, to 14 in the second.
The Will of the Empress  

The Will of the Empress (UK October 2005, ISBN 0-439-44171-4; US November 2005, ISBN 0-439-44171-4)

The initial working title for this book was The Circle Reforged.  It is the first book in "The Circle Reforged" series. Sandry's cousin, the Empress of Namorn (Berenene dor Ocmor), has been begging her to come visit her for years. Finally the stitch witch agrees, but her uncle requests that her childhood friends accompany her. However, during the time they were separated the foursome has broken apart, and are now adults with secrets that they once would have shared. Sandry expects to visit her cousin for the summer then return home to her uncle in Emelan, but the Empress has other plans. As the four soon find out, the iron will of the Empress is considered law, and the four must set aside their doubts and trust each other as they once did if they are to escape.It is hinted throughout this book that Briar and Rosethorn had significant adventures in Gyongxe, the first home of the Living Circle temples. These events have been announced to be the subject of a forthcoming book.
Melting Stones  
This story was first released as a full-cast audio book (produced by Full Cast Audio) to be followed by paper versions. This is the first full length novel written expressly for audio. The recording date had been postponed, and the audiobook was finally released in fall 2007. Pierce herself directs the recording. The print version was released in fall 2008. The story is based on Evvy, who, with Rosethorn, goes to investigate the weird happenings of an island. Plants and animals are dying and the two mages are there to find out why. Meanwhile Evvy meets two lava/magma spirits and is caught up in their quest to escape their mountain tomb.
Forthcoming publicationsTamora Pierce currently has two Circle books in the works. The first, Battle Magic, set sometime between the events of Street Magic and The Will of the Empress, will tell the story of Briar, Evvy and Rosethorn and their adventures in Yanjing and Gyongxe. This story is set for release in 2013. The other forthcoming Circle book, set after the events of Empress, will follow Tris as she enrolls "at the mages' university in Lightsbridge under an assumed name, in an attempt to become an ordinary mage practicing normal academic magic (spells, charms, potions) with no one knowing her real name or power." She does so after realizing that her prospective employers only want to use her weather craft as war magic.  This story is set for release in 2014.
Short stories

"Plain Magic" - A fantasy short story. (1986, first published in Planetfall, re-published in 1999 in Flights of Fantasy, republished in 2010 in Tortall and Other Lands)
"Testing" - A contemporary, short story based on events that happened to the author while she was the housemother in a group home for teenage girls. (2000, published in Lost and Found, republished in 2010 in Tortall and Other Lands)
"Elder Brother" - A Tortallan short story. (2001, published in Half Human, an anthology edited by Bruce Coville, also published in a two-in-one Circle of Magic book titled Books One and Two: Water and Fire and Tortall and Other Lands)
"Student of Ostriches" - A Tortallan short story. (2005, published in Young Warriors: Stories of Strength, an anthology edited by Pierce and Josepha Sherman, republished in 2010 in Tortall and Other Lands)
"Huntress" - A contemporary fantasy short story. (2006, published in Firebirds Rising, an anthology edited by Sharyn November, republished in 2010 in Tortall and Other Lands)
"Hidden Girl" - A Tortallan short story, set in the same country as "Elder Brother". (2006, published in Dreams and Visions, an anthology edited by M. Jerry Weiss, republished in 2010 in Tortall and Other Lands)
"Time of Proving" - A fantasy short story, about the coming of age of a young girl. (2006, published in Cricket, republished in 2010 in Tortall and Other Lands)
"Slippery in the Stairwell, 1965" - A contemporary, real-life short story. (2009, published in My Little Red Book)
"The Dragon's Tale" - A Tortall short story about Kitten (Skysong), Daine's dragon (2009, published in The Dragon Book, republished 2010 in Tortall and Other Lands)
"Lost" - A Tortall short story about a girl from Tusaine and a darking. (2010, published in Tortall and Other Lands)
"Mimic" - A Tortall short story about a girl named Ri and the animals she saves. (Published in 2010 in Tortall and Other Lands)
"Nawat" - A character-driven Tortall story which takes place after the Trickster series. (2010, published in Tortall and Other Lands)


Comics

On February 24 at New York Comicon, Marvel Comics announced that Pierce and her husband Tim Liebe would be writing a new series, starring former FBI agent Angela Del Toro as the new White Tiger. White Tiger launched as a six-issue series drawn by French artist Phil Briones in November 2006 [1].
.
References 

"Podcast Interview about 'White Tiger' with Tamora Pierce and Timothy Liebe"
"Tiger Tiger Burning Bright: Pierce Talks 'White Tiger'" by David Richards, Comic Book Resources, March 6, 2006
"Eye of the White Tiger: Meet Marvel's Tamora Pierce" by Newsarama, February 27, 2006
Brown, Joanne, & St. Clair, Nancy, Declarations of Independence: Empowered Girls in Young Adult Literature, 1990–2001 (Lanham, MD, & London: The Scarecrow Press, 2002 Scarecrow Studies in Young Adult Literature, No. 7) ISBN 0-8108-4290-4
Cart, Michael, From Romance to Realism: 50 Years of Growth and Change in Young Adult Literature (New York: HarperCollins, 1996) ISBN 0-06-446161-0
Dailey, Donna, Tamora Pierce (New York: Chelsea House, 2006 Who Wrote That?) ISBN 0-7910-8795-6
Egoff, Sheila A., Worlds Within: Children’s Fantasy from the Middle Ages to Today (Chicago & London: American Library Association, 1988) ISBN 0-8389-0494-7
Melano, Anne L., "Utopias of Violence: Pierce's Knights of Tortall and the Contemporary Heroic" (Crossroads: An Interdisciplinary Journal for the Study of History, Philosophy, Religion and Classics, vol 3 issue 2, 2009)
Lennard, John, Tamora Pierce: The Immortals (Tirril: Humanities-Ebooks, 2007) ISBN 978-1-84760-037-0
-- 'Of Stormwings and Valiant Women: The Tortallan World of Tamora Pierce', in Of Modern Dragons and other essays on Genre Fiction (Tirril: Humanities-Ebooks, 2007), pp. 191–228 ISBN 978-1-84760-038-7
Sullivan III, C. W., ed., Young Adult Science Fiction (Westport, CT: Greenwood Press, 1999 Contributions to the Study of Science Fiction and Fantasy 79) ISBN 0-313-28940-9
Trites, Roberta Seelinger, Disturbing the Universe: Power and Repression in Adolescent Literature (Iowa City: University of Iowa Press, 2000) ISBN 0-87745-857-X


External links

Official site
 
 

 
 
 
 
DEFAULTSORT










 
 
 
 
	John Wayne Gacy
 
 
 John Wayne Gacy, Jr. (March 17, 1942 – May 10, 1994) was an American serial killer and rapist who sexually assaulted and murdered at least 33 teenage boys and young men between 1972 and 1978. Gacy buried 26 of his victims in the crawl space of his home, buried three others elsewhere on his property, and discarded the remains of his last four known victims in a nearby river. He was convicted of 33 murders and sentenced to death for 12 of these killings. He was executed in May 1994.Gacy later became known as the "Killer Clown" due to his charitable services at fundraising events, parades and children's parties where he would dress as "Pogo the Clown", a character he devised himself.
Early lifeJohn Wayne Gacy was born in Chicago, Illinois, the second of three children born to John Stanley Gacy (June 20, 1900 – December 25, 1969) and Marion Elaine Robinson (May 4, 1908 – December 14, 1989).      Gacy was of Polish and Danish heritage. (His paternal grandparents had been born in Poland.)   As a child, he was overweight and nonathletic. He was close to his two sisters and mother, but endured a difficult relationship with his father, an alcoholic who was physically abusive toward his wife and children.  Throughout his childhood, Gacy strove to make his father proud of him, but seldom received his approval: one of Gacy's earliest childhood memories was of being beaten with a leather belt by his father at the age of 4 for accidentally disarranging car engine components his father had assembled.  He was regularly belittled by his father and often compared unfavorably with his sisters, enduring disdainful accusations of being "dumb and stupid". The friction between father and son was constant throughout his childhood and adolescence, yet in interviews after his arrest, Gacy always vehemently denied he hated him.  When he was 6 years old, Gacy stole a toy truck from a neighborhood store. His mother made him walk back to the store, return the toy and apologize to the owners. When his mother told his father, Gacy was beaten with a belt. After this incident, Gacy's mother attempted to shield her son from his father's verbal and physical abuse,  yet this only succeeded in Gacy earning accusations from his father that he was a "sissy" and a "Mama's boy"  who would "probably grow up queer."At the age of 9, Gacy was molested by a family friend,  a contractor who would take Gacy for rides in his truck, then fondle him. Gacy never told his father about these incidents as he was afraid his father would blame him.At school, where he was ordered to avoid all sports due to a heart condition, Gacy was an average student with few friends who was an occasional target for mockery and bullying by neighborhood children and classmates.  He was known to assist the school truant officer and volunteer to run errands for teachers and neighbors.  During the fourth grade, Gacy began to suffer blackouts. He was occasionally hospitalized as a result of these seizures, and also in 1957 for a burst appendix. Gacy later estimated that he spent almost a year in the hospital for these episodes between the ages of 14 and 18, and attributed the decline in his grades to his time out of school. His father suspected the episodes were an effort to gain sympathy; on one occasion he accused his son of faking even as the boy lay in a hospital bed.  Gacy's medical condition was never conclusively diagnosed,  although his mother, sisters and few close friends themselves never doubted his illness. A friend of Gacy's named Richard Dalke was also able to recall several instances in which Gacy Sr. ridiculed or beat his son without provocation: on one occasion in 1957, Gacy's father began shouting at his son for no reason, then began hitting him.  Gacy's mother attempted to remonstrate between her son and her husband. Dalke recalled Gacy simply "put up his hands to defend himself", adding that he never struck his father during these altercations.At the age of 18, Gacy became involved in politics, working as an assistant precinct captain for a Democratic Party candidate in his neighborhood. This decision earned more criticism from his father, who accused his son of being a "patsy".  Gacy himself later speculated the decision may have been an attempt to seek the acceptance from others that he never received from his father.The same year Gacy became a Democratic Party candidate, his father bought him a car,  with the title of the vehicle being in his father's name until Gacy had completed the monthly repayments to his father. These repayments took several years to complete, and his father would confiscate the keys to the vehicle if Gacy would not do as his father said. On one occasion in 1962, Gacy bought an extra set of keys after his father confiscated the original set of keys from him and used the extra set of keys to drive the vehicle. In response, his father removed the distributor cap from the vehicle; withholding the component for three days. Gacy recalled that as a result of this incident, he felt "totally sick; drained". When his father replaced the distributor cap, Gacy drove to Las Vegas, Nevada, where he found work within the ambulance service before he was transferred to work as a mortuary attendant. He worked in this role for three months before returning to Chicago. In his role as a mortuary attendant, Gacy slept in a cot behind the embalming room.  In this role, he observed morticians embalming dead bodies and later confessed to the fact that on one evening while alone, he had clambered into the coffin of a deceased teenage male,  embracing and caressing the body before experiencing a sense of shock.The shock of the previous evening inspired Gacy to call his mother the next day and ask whether his father would allow him to return home.  His father agreed and the same day, Gacy drove back to live with his family in Chicago. Upon his return, Gacy, despite the fact he had failed to graduate from high school, successfully enrolled in the Northwestern Business College  from which he graduated in 1963. Gacy subsequently undertook a management-trainee position within the Nunn-Bush Shoe Company. In 1964, the Nunn-Bush Shoe Company transferred Gacy to Springfield, Illinois, initially to work as a salesman,  although Gacy was subsequently promoted to manager of his department. In March of that year, he became engaged to Marlynn Myers, co-worker within the department he managed. After a nine-month courtship, the couple married in September 1964. Marlynn Myers' father subsequently purchased three Kentucky Fried Chicken restaurants in Waterloo, Iowa and he and his wife moved to Waterloo in order for him to manage the restaurants, with the understanding that Gacy and his wife would move into Marlynn's parents' home. During his courtship with Marlynn, Gacy joined the Jaycees and became a tireless worker for the organization; being named Key Man for the organization in April 1964. The same year, Gacy had his first homosexual experience. According to Gacy, he acquiesced to this incident after a colleague of his within the Springfield Jaycees plied him with drinks, invited him to spend the evening upon his sofa, then performed oral sex upon him while he was drunk.   By 1965, Gacy had risen to the position of vice-president of the Springfield Jaycees.  The same year, he was named as the third most outstanding Jaycee within the State of Illinois. 
Move to IowaIn 1966, Gacy's father-in-law offered him the opportunity to manage the three Kentucky Fried Chicken restaurants he had purchased in Waterloo, Iowa.  The offer was lucrative: $15,000 per year plus a share of profits. Gacy accepted the offer and, following his obligatory completion of a managerial course, he and his wife relocated to Waterloo in the autumn of that year.In Waterloo, Gacy joined the local chapter of the Jaycees, regularly offering extensive hours to the organization in addition to the twelve- and fourteen-hour days he worked as a manager of three KFC restaurants. Although considered ambitious and somewhat of a braggart by his colleagues in the Jaycees, he was highly regarded as a tireless worker on several fund-raising projects. In 1967, he was named "outstanding vice-president" of the Waterloo Jaycees.  At Jaycee meetings, Gacy would often provide free KFC chicken to his colleagues and insisted upon being given the nickname "Colonel" by his colleagues.  The same year, Gacy served on the Board of Directors for the Waterloo Jaycees.Gacy's wife gave birth to two children during the time the couple lived in Iowa: a son named Michael was born in March 1967, followed by a daughter named Christine in October 1968. Gacy later described this period of his life as being "perfect."  His achievements in life earned him approval from his father, who told him during a 1967 visit, "Son, I was wrong about you." However, there was a seedier side of Jaycee life in Waterloo, one that involved wife swapping,  prostitution, pornography and drugs. Gacy was deeply involved in many of these activities and regularly cheated on his wife.  He is also known to have opened a "club" in his basement, where he allowed employees to drink alcohol and play pool. Although he employed teenagers of both sexes at his restaurants, he socialized only with his male employees. Many were given alcohol before Gacy made sexual advances toward them, which he would dismiss as a joke if the teenager rebuffed his advances. 
First offensesIn August 1967, Gacy committed his first known sexual assault upon a teenage boy. The youth was a 15-year-old named Donald Voorhees, the son of a fellow Jaycee. Gacy lured the youth to his house upon the promise of showing Voorhees pornographic films.  Gacy plied Voorhees with alcohol and persuaded the youth to perform oral sex upon him. Several other youths were sexually abused over the following months, including one whom Gacy encouraged to sleep with his wife before blackmailing the youth into performing oral sex upon him.  Several teenagers were tricked into believing Gacy was commissioned with carrying out homosexual experiments in the interests of "scientific research," for which the youths were each paid up to $50. In March 1968, Donald Voorhees reported to his father that Gacy had sexually assaulted him. Voorhees Sr. immediately informed the police and Gacy was arrested and subsequently charged with oral sodomy in relation to Voorhees and the attempted assault of a 16-year-old named Edward Lynch.  Gacy vehemently denied the charges and demanded to take a polygraph test. This request was granted, although the results indicated Gacy was lying when he denied any wrongdoing in relation to either Voorhees or Lynch.Despite the charges against him, Gacy publicly denied any wrongdoing and insisted the charges against him were politically motivated. (Voorhees Sr. had opposed Gacy's nomination for appointment as president of Iowa Jaycees.)  Several fellow Jaycees found Gacy's story credible and rallied to his support. However, on May 10, 1968, Gacy was indicted upon the sodomy charge.
 
On August 30, 1968, Gacy persuaded one of his employees, an 18-year-old named Russell Schroeder, to physically assault Donald Voorhees in an effort to discourage the boy from testifying against him at his upcoming trial. The youth agreed to lure Voorhees to a secluded spot, spray Mace in his face and beat the youth upon the promise that if he did so, he would be paid $300. In early September, Schroeder lured Voorhees to an isolated county park, sprayed the Mace supplied by Gacy into the youth's eyes, then beat him, all the while shouting that the youth was not to testify against Gacy at his upcoming trial. Voorhees immediately reported the assault to police, identifying Schroeder as his attacker, and the youth was arrested the following day. Despite initially denying any involvement, the youth confessed to having assaulted Voorhees, indicating that he had done so at Gacy's behest. Gacy was arrested and additionally charged in relation to hiring Schroeder to assault and intimidate Voorhees.  On September 3, Gacy was ordered to undergo a psychiatric evaluation at the Psychiatric Hospital of the State University of Iowa.  Two doctors examined Gacy over a period of 17 days and concluded he was an antisocial personality, unlikely to benefit from medical treatment and whose behavior pattern was likely to bring him into repeated conflict with society.  The doctors also concluded he was mentally competent to stand trial.
Conviction and imprisonmentUpon advice from his attorney, Gacy entered a plea of guilty to one count of sodomy in relation to the charges filed against him by Donald Voorhees. He pleaded not guilty to the other charges lodged against him by other youths at a formal arraignment held on November 7, 1968. Before the judge, Gacy contended that he and Voorhees had indeed engaged in sexual relations, yet he insisted Voorhees had offered his sexual services to him and that he had acted out of curiosity.  His story was not believed. Despite his lawyers' recommendations for parole, Gacy was convicted of sodomy on December 3, 1968,  and sentenced to 10 years at the Anamosa State Penitentiary.  The day Gacy was sentenced, his wife petitioned for divorce;  requesting possession of the couple's home, property and subsequent alimony payments.  The Court ruled in her favor and the divorce was finalized in September 1969. Gacy never saw his first wife or children again. 

Inside the Anamosa State Penitentiary, Gacy rapidly acquired a reputation as a model prisoner.  Within months of his arrival, he had risen to the position of head cook; Gacy also joined the inmate Jaycee chapter and increased their membership figure from 50 to 650 in the space of less than 18 months. He is also known to have both secured an increase in the inmates' daily pay in the prison mess hall  and to have actively supervised several projects to improve conditions for inmates at the prison. On one occasion, Gacy oversaw the installation of a miniature golf course in the prison's recreation yard.  In June 1969, Gacy first applied to the State of Iowa Board of Parole for early release: this application was denied. In preparation for a second scheduled parole hearing in May 1970, Gacy completed 16 high school courses, for which he obtained his diploma in November 1969.  Gacy's father died from cirrhosis of the liver on Christmas Day 1969.  Gacy was not told that his father had died until two days after his death. When he heard the news, Gacy broke down in tears and had to be supported by prison staff.  Gacy requested supervised compassionate leave from prison to attend his father's funeral, but his request was denied. 
ParoleGacy was granted parole with 12 months' probation  on June 18, 1970 after serving 18 months  of his 10-year sentence.   Upon his release, Gacy announced to a friend who collected him from prison that he intended to re-establish himself in Waterloo. However, within 24 hours of his release, Gacy opted to relocate to Chicago to live with his mother.  He arrived in Chicago on June 19 and obtained a job as a short-order cook in a restaurant. On February 12, 1971, Gacy was charged with sexually assaulting a teenage boy.  The youth claimed that Gacy had lured him into his car at Chicago's Greyhound bus terminal and had attempted to force him into sex. The complaint was subsequently dismissed when the youth failed to appear in court. The Iowa Board of Parole did not learn of this incident (which violated the conditions of his parole) and the records of Gacy's previous convictions were subsequently sealed: he was restored to full citizenship in October 1971.  Gacy hid his criminal record until police began investigating him for his later murders.   With financial assistance from his mother, Gacy bought a house in Norwood Park, an unincorporated area of Cook County, Illinois. The address, 8213 West Summerdale Avenue, would be where he resided until his arrest in 1978 and where all his known murders would be committed. In August 1971, shortly after Gacy and his mother moved into the house, he became engaged to Carole Hoff, a divorcee with two young daughters. Hoff had been a friend of his younger sister whom he had briefly dated in high school. His fiancée moved into his home soon after the couple announced their engagement and Gacy's mother subsequently moved out of the house shortly before his wedding, which was held on July 1, 1972. One week prior to Gacy's wedding, on June 22, 1972, Gacy was again arrested and charged with battery after another young man complained to police that Gacy, impersonating a police officer, had flashed a sheriff's badge, lured him into his car, and forced him to perform oral sex upon him. These charges were dropped after this complainant attempted to blackmail Gacy into paying money in exchange for dropping the charges. 
Businessman and community volunteerFollowing Gacy's marriage to Carole Hoff, his new wife and stepdaughters moved into the Summerdale Avenue house.  In 1972, Gacy quit his job as a cook and started his own construction business, PDM Contractors (PDM being the initials for 'Painting, Decorating and Maintenance').  The business initially undertook minor repair work, such as signwriting, pouring concrete and redecorating, but later expanded to include projects such as interior design, remodeling, installation, assembly and landscaping. By 1978, PDM's annual turnover would gross over $200,000. In 1973, Gacy and an employee of PDM Contractors traveled to Florida to view property Gacy had purchased. On the first night the two were alone in Florida, Gacy raped the youth in their hotel room:  as a result, this youth refused to stay in the same hotel room as Gacy and instead slept on a beach. Upon returning to Chicago, this employee drove to Gacy's house as Gacy was in his yard and beat him. Gacy's mother-in-law stopped the youth attacking Gacy further and the youth drove away. Gacy explained to his wife that this attack happened because he had refused to pay the youth for poor quality work he had performed.To his neighbors in Norwood Park, Gacy became known as a gregarious, helpful individual: active in his local community and, from 1974, hosting annual summer parties.  He also became active in Democratic Party politics, initially offering the labor services of his PDM employees free of charge.  Gacy was rewarded for his community services by being appointed to serve upon the Norwood Park Township street lighting committee.  He subsequently earned the title of precinct captain.    In 1975, Gacy was appointed director of Chicago's annual Polish Constitution Day Parade — an annual event he was to supervise from 1975 until 1978. Through his work with the parade, Gacy met and was photographed with then First Lady Rosalynn Carter on May 6, 1978.  Rosalynn Carter signed one photo: "To John Gacy. Best wishes. Rosalynn Carter".  The event later became an embarrassment to the United States Secret Service, as in the pictures taken Gacy can be seen wearing an "S" pin, indicating a person who has received a special clearance by the Secret Service.  
Through joining a local Moose Club, Gacy became aware of a "Jolly Joker" clown club whose members — dressed as clowns — would regularly perform at fundraising events and parades in addition to voluntarily entertaining hospitalized children.  By late 1975, Gacy had joined the Jolly Jokers and had created his own performance character, "Pogo the Clown".  Gacy designed his own costumes and taught himself how to apply clown makeup.  The sharp corners Gacy painted at the edges of his mouth are contrary to the rounded borders that professional clowns normally employ, so as not to scare children.  Gacy is known to have performed as Pogo at numerous local parties and charitable events, and although he often spoke of entertaining at children's hospitals, there is no evidence of his doing so.  Gacy is also known to have arrived, dressed in his clowning garb, at a favorite drinking venue named "The Good Luck Lounge" on several occasions with the explanation he had just performed as Pogo and was stopping for a social drink before heading home. By 1975, Gacy had openly admitted to his wife he was bisexual.  On May 11 (Mother's Day), after making love, he informed her they would never again have sex.  He began spending most evenings away from home only to return in the early hours of the morning with the excuse he had been working late.  His wife observed Gacy bringing teenage boys into his garage and also found gay pornography inside the house.  The Gacys divorced by mutual consent in March 1976. 
MurdersOn January 2, 1972, Gacy picked up a 15-year-old youth named Timothy Jack McCoy from Chicago's Greyhound bus terminal. Gacy took McCoy—who was traveling en route from Michigan to Omaha —on a sightseeing tour of Chicago, and then drove him to his home on the promise that he could spend the night and be driven back to the station in time to catch his bus. Gacy later said that he awoke the following morning to find McCoy standing in his bedroom doorway with a kitchen knife in his hand.  Gacy leapt from his bed and McCoy raised both arms in a gesture of surrender, tilting the knife upwards and accidentally cutting Gacy's forearm (Gacy had the scar on his arm to support this claim).  Gacy twisted the knife from McCoy's wrist, banged his head against his bedroom wall, kicked him against his wardrobe and walked towards him. McCoy then kicked him in the stomach and Gacy grabbed the youth, wrestled him to the floor, then stabbed him repeatedly in the chest as he straddled him with his body.  Gacy claimed he then went to his kitchen and saw an opened carton of eggs and a slab of unsliced bacon on his kitchen table. McCoy had also set the table for two; he had walked into Gacy's room to wake him while absentmindedly carrying the kitchen knife in his hand.  Gacy subsequently buried McCoy in his crawl space and later covered the youth's grave with a layer of concrete. In an interview after his arrest, Gacy stated that immediately after killing McCoy, he felt "totally drained", yet noted that he had experienced orgasm as he killed the youth. In this 1980s interview, he added: "That's when I realized that death was the ultimate thrill." Gacy later stated that the second time he killed was around January, 1974. The victim was an unidentified teenage youth with medium brown, curly hair estimated to be aged between 15 and 17 whom Gacy strangled    before stowing the youth's body in his closet prior to burial. Gacy later stated that fluid leaked out of this youth's mouth and nose as he was stored in his closet, staining his carpet.  As a result of this experience, Gacy later stated he regularly stuffed cloth rags or the victims' own underwear in their mouths to prevent a recurrence of this incident. This particular unidentified victim was buried approximately 15 feet from the barbecue pit in Gacy's backyard. By 1975, Gacy's business was expanding rapidly; by his own later admission, he began working 12- and 16-hour days to fulfill agreed commitments upon an increasing number of contracts. Much of the labor workforce of PDM Contractors consisted of high school students and young men. One of these youths was a 15-year-old named Anthony Antonucci, whom Gacy had hired in May 1975. In July 1975, Gacy arrived at the youth's home while the youth was alone, having injured his foot at work the day prior. Gacy plied the youth with alcohol, wrestled him to the floor and cuffed Antonucci's hands behind his back.  The cuff upon Antonucci's right wrist was loose: Antonucci freed his arm from the handcuff after Gacy left the room. When Gacy returned, Antonucci—a member of his high school wrestling team—pounced upon him. The youth wrestled Gacy to the floor, obtained possession of the handcuff key and cuffed Gacy's hands behind his back. Gacy screamed threats, then calmed down and promised to leave if Antonucci removed the handcuffs. The youth agreed and Gacy left the house.Antonucci later recalled that Gacy had told him as he lay on the floor: "Not only are you the only one who got out of the cuffs; you got them on me." One week after the attempted assault on Antonucci, on July 29, 1975, another of Gacy's employees, 17-year-old John Butkovitch, disappeared. The day prior to his disappearance, Butkovitch had threatened Gacy over two weeks' outstanding back pay.  Gacy later admitted to luring Butkovitch to his home while his wife and stepchildren were visiting his sister in Arkansas,  ostensibly to settle the issue of Butkovitch's overdue wages. Gacy conned the youth into cuffing his wrists behind his back, then strangled him to death and buried his body under the concrete floor of his garage. Gacy later admitted to having "sat on the kid's chest for a while"  before killing him. Butkovitch's Dodge sedan was found abandoned in a parking lot with the youth's wallet inside and the keys still in the ignition.  Butkovitch's father called Gacy, who claimed he was happy to help search for the youth but was sorry Butkovitch had "run away". Gacy was questioned about Butkovitch's disappearance and admitted the youth and two friends had arrived at his apartment demanding Butkovitch's overdue pay, but claimed all three youths had left after a compromise had been reached. Over the following three years, Butkovitch's parents called police more than 100 times,  urging them to investigate Gacy further. 

Following a heated argument with his wife regarding her failing to correctly balance a PDM Contractors checkbook in October 1975,  Carole Gacy asked for a divorce. Gacy agreed to his wife's request although by mutual consent, Carole continued to live at 8213 West Summerdale until February 1976, when she and her daughters moved into their own apartment. One month later, the Gacys' divorce was finalized. [Murder In Mind issue 11 ISSN1364-5803 p. 28/ Murder In Mind p. 28]  Within one month of his divorce, Gacy had abducted and murdered an 18-year-old youth named Darrell Sampson. Sampson was last seen alive in Chicago on April 6, 1976. Five weeks later, on the afternoon of May 14, a 15-year-old named Randall Reffett disappeared while walking home from Senn High School; the youth was gagged with a cloth and strangled.  Hours after Reffett had been abducted, a 14-year-old named Samuel Stapleton vanished as he walked to his home from his sister's apartment.  Both youths were buried in the same grave in the crawl space. On June 3, 1976, Gacy killed a 17-year-old Lakeview youth named Michael Bonnin. Bonnin was strangled with a ligature and buried in the crawl space.  Ten days later, a 16-year-old Uptown youth named William Carroll was murdered and buried directly beneath Gacy's kitchen. Carroll may have been the first of four youths known to have been murdered between June 13 and August 6, 1976 and who were buried in a common grave located beneath Gacy's kitchen and laundry room.  (This common grave also held the body of a fifth youth estimated to have been killed after this date.) The two identified youths killed between June 13 and August 6 were aged 16 and 17 years old; the two unidentified youths are respectively estimated to have been aged between 15 and 19 and 22 and 30 years old. The first of these two unidentified youths known to have been murdered between these dates is a youth with medium dark brown hair estimated to have been aged between 22 and 30 years old and between 5'1" and 5'6" tall. This youth is also known to have had two missing upper front teeth at the time of his disappearance,    leading investigators to believe this particular victim most likely wore a denture. All that is known about the second unknown youth known to have been murdered between these dates is that he had dark brown hair, was estimated to have been aged between 15 and 19 years old and that he was strangled to death. On July 26, 1976, Gacy employed an 18-year-old named David Cram. On August 21,  Cram moved into his house. The following day, Gacy conned the youth into donning handcuffs while the youth was inebriated. Gacy swung Cram around while holding the chain linking the cuffs, then informed the youth that he intended to rape him. Cram, who had spent a year in the Army, kicked Gacy in the face, then freed himself from the handcuffs as Gacy lay prone. One month later, Gacy appeared at Cram's bedroom door with the intention to rape the youth and said: "Dave, you really don't know who I am. Maybe it would be good if you give me what I want."  Cram resisted Gacy's attempts to assault him and Gacy left his bedroom. After this incident, Cram moved out of Gacy's home and subsequently left PDM Contractors.Two further unidentified youths are estimated to have been killed between August and October 1976. One of these youths was buried directly above the body of William Carroll, who had been murdered on June 13, yet higher than the body of a 17-year-old Bensenville youth named Rick Johnston, who was last seen on August 6. This particular unidentified youth is estimated to have been aged between 21 and 27 years old and sequential burial patterns of victims within the crawl space, plus the circumstancial fact that Cram had not lived with Gacy between the dates of August 6 and August 20, leave a possible date of between August 6 and August 20, 1976 as the time this particular youth was murdered. The second unidentified youth likely to have been murdered between August and October 1976 is a youth with dark brown hair aged between 19 and 21 years old, who is known to have suffered from an abscessed tooth at the time of his murder.  This youth was buried in the northeast corner of the crawl space. Subsequent recollections by an employee of PDM Contractors of a trench Gacy had ordered him to dig on or prior to October 5, 1976 being the location where this particular victim was buried suggest a date between August and October 5, 1976 as being when this youth was murdered.   On October 24, 1976, Gacy abducted and killed two teenage youths named Kenneth Parker and Michael Marino:  the teenage friends were last seen outside a restaurant on Clark Street. Both youths were strangled and buried in the same grave in the crawl space. Two days later, a 19-year-old employee of PDM Contractors named William Bundy disappeared after informing his family he was to attend a party. Bundy was also strangled and buried in the crawl space, buried directly beneath Gacy's master bedroom.In December 1976, another PDM employee, 17-year-old Gregory Godzik, disappeared: he was last seen by his girlfriend outside her house having driven her home following a date.  Godzik had worked for PDM for only three weeks before he disappeared. In the time he had worked for Gacy, he had informed his family Gacy had had him "dig trenches for some kind of (drain) tiles" in his crawl space.  Godzik's car was later found abandoned in Niles. His parents and older sister, Eugenia, contacted Gacy about Greg's disappearance. Gacy claimed to the family that Greg had run away from home, having indicated to Gacy prior to his disappearance that he wished to do so. Gacy also claimed to have received a recorded answering machine message from Godzik shortly after the youth had disappeared. When asked if he could play back the message to Godzik's parents, Gacy stated that he had erased it.  A month later, on January 20, 1977, John Szyc, a 19-year-old acquaintance of Butkovich, Godzik and Gacy, disappeared. Szyc was lured to Gacy's house on the pretext of selling his Plymouth Satellite to Gacy. He was buried in Gacy's crawl space directly above the body of Godzik.  A ring worn by Szyc, which bore his initials, was retained in a dresser in Gacy's master bedroom.  Gacy also kept Szyc's portable Motorola TV in his bedroom and later sold the youth's car to another of his employees, 18-year-old Michael Rossi.Between December 1976 and March 1977, Gacy is known to have killed an unidentified young man estimated to be around 25 years old.    His body was buried in the crawl space beneath the body of a 20-year-old named Jon Prestidge, a Michigan youth visiting friends in Chicago whom Gacy killed on March 15. After the murder of Prestidge, Gacy is believed to have murdered one further unidentified youth exhumed from his crawl space, although the timing of this particular youth's murder is inconclusive. The youth was buried parallel to the wall of Gacy's crawl space directly beneath the entrance to his home. The two victims murdered on the same day in May 1976 were buried alongside this youth, yet sequential burial patterns of three victims murdered in 1977 leave an equal possibility this particular victim may have been murdered in the spring or summer of 1977. All that is known about this particular youth is that he was aged between 17 and 21 years old and that he had suffered a fractured left collarbone prior to his disappearance.In March 1977, Gacy was hired as a construction supervisor for PE Systems; a firm which specialized in the nationwide remodeling of drugstores. As a result of this contract, Gacy regularly traveled to other states to supervise construction projects and he later stated that, through both businesses (PDM Contractors and PE Systems), almost 80 buildings alone were successfully remodeled in 1977. In April 1977,  Gacy became temporarily engaged to a woman he had been dating for three months and his fiancée moved into his house. By mutual agreement, the engagement was called off in June of that year and his fiancée moved out of his home.  The following month, Gacy killed a 19-year-old Crystal Lake youth named Matthew Bowman. He was buried in the crawl space with the tourniquet used to strangle him still knotted around his neck. In August 1977, a clue emerged to the disappearance of John Szyc.  Michael Rossi, who had bought Szyc's car from Gacy, was arrested for stealing gasoline from a service station while driving the car. The attendant noted the license plate number and police traced the car to Gacy's house. (Rossi lived with Gacy at this point and had worked for PDM Contractors since May, 1976.)  When questioned, Gacy told officers that Szyc had sold the car to him in February with the explanation that he needed money to leave town. The police did not pursue the matter further,  although they did inform Szyc's mother that her son had sold his car to Gacy. Throughout the autumn and winter of 1977, Gacy began dating Carole Hoff  in the hope of a reconciliation. (Carole became engaged to another man the following year.) By the end of 1977, Gacy is also known to have murdered a further six young men between the ages of 16 and 21. The first of these six victims, 18-year-old Robert Gilroy, was last seen alive on September 15. Gilroy—the son of a Chicago Police Sergeant —was suffocated and buried in the crawl space. On September 12, Gacy had flown to Pittsburgh to supervise a remodeling project and did not return to Chicago until September 16.  As Gacy is known to have been in another state at the time the youth was last seen, it is possible that Gacy's subsequent claims that he had not acted alone in some murders may have held credence. Ten days after Gilroy was last seen, a 19-year-old U.S. Marine named John Mowery disappeared after leaving his mother's house to walk to his own apartment. Mowery was strangled to death and buried in the northwest corner of the crawl space perpendicular to the body of William Bundy.  On October 17, a 21-year-old Minnesota youth named Russell Nelson disappeared: he was last seen outside a Chicago bar. Nelson died of suffocation and was also buried in the crawl space. Less than 4 weeks later, a 16-year-old Kalamazoo youth named Robert Winch was murdered and buried in the crawl space and on November 18, a 20-year-old father-of-one named Tommy Boling disappeared after leaving a Chicago bar. Both Winch and Boling were buried beneath the hallway in Gacy's crawl space and on December 9, a 19-year-old U.S. Marine named David Talsma disappeared after informing his mother he was to attend a rock concert in Hammond.  Talsma was also buried in the crawl space.On December 30, 1977, Gacy abducted a 19-year-old student named Robert Donnelly from a Chicago bus stop at gunpoint.  Gacy drove Donnelly home with him, raped him, tortured him with various devices, and repeatedly dunked his head into a bathtub filled with water until he passed out, then revived him. Donnelly later testified at Gacy's trial that he was in such pain that he asked Gacy to kill him to "get it over with",  to which Gacy replied: "I'm getting round to it". After several hours of assaulting and torturing the youth, Gacy drove Donnelly to his place of work, removed the handcuffs from the youth's wrists, and released him. Donnelly reported the assault and Gacy was questioned about it on January 6, 1978. Gacy admitted to having had "slave-sex" with Donnelly, but insisted everything was consensual. The police believed him and no charges were filed.  The following month, Gacy killed a 19-year-old youth named William Kindred, who disappeared February 16, 1978, after telling his fiancée he was to spend the evening in a bar.  Kindred was the final victim to be buried in Gacy's crawl space,   and Gacy began disposing of his victims in the Des Plaines River.

In March 1978, Gacy lured a 26-year-old named Jeffrey Rignall into his car. Upon entering the car, the young man was chloroformed and driven to the house on Summerdale, where he was raped, tortured with various instruments including lit candles, and repeatedly chloroformed into unconsciousness.  Rignall was then driven to Lincoln Park, where he was dumped, unconscious but alive.  Eventually he managed to stagger to his girlfriend's apartment. Rignall was later informed the chloroform had permanently damaged his liver. Police were again informed of the assault, but did not investigate Gacy. Rignall remembered, through the chloroform haze of that night, Gacy's black Oldsmobile, the Kennedy Expressway and particular side streets. He staked out the exit on the Expressway where he knew he had been driven until—in April —he saw Gacy's distinctive black Oldsmobile, which Rignall and his friends followed to 8213 West Summerdale. Police issued an arrest warrant,  and Gacy was arrested on July 15. He was facing an impending trial for a battery charge for the Rignall incident when he was arrested in December for the murders. 
Gacy later confessed to police that he had thrown a total of five bodies off the I-55 bridge into the Des Plaines River in 1978, one of which he believed had landed upon a barge,  although only four of these five bodies were ever found. The first known victim thrown from the I-55 bridge into the Des Plaines River, 20-year-old Tim O' Rourke, was killed in mid-June and found six miles downstream on June 30. The two further victims known to be thrown into the river were murdered in November, one of whom, Frank Landingin, was found on November 12 and the other, James Mazzara, was found on December 28. Both Landingin and Mazzara were found with their own underwear lodged down their throat. The cause of death in both these cases was suffocation.
InvestigationOn December 11, 1978, John Gacy visited a Des Plaines pharmacy to discuss a potential remodeling deal with Phil Torf, the owner of the store. While discussing the potential deal with Torf, Gacy was heard mentioning that his firm hired teenage boys while he was within earshot of a 15-year-old employee named Robert Jerome Piest. After Gacy left the store, Piest told his mother that "some contractor wants to talk to me about a job". Piest left the store, promising to return shortly.  When Piest failed to return, his family filed a missing person report on their son with the Des Plaines Police. The owner of the pharmacy named Gacy as the contractor Piest had most likely left the store to talk with.Gacy denied talking to Piest when Des Plaines police called him the next day,  and promised to come to the station later that evening to make a statement confirming this, indicating he was unable to do so at that moment as his uncle had just died. At 3:30 a.m., Gacy, covered in mud, arrived at the police station, claiming he had been involved in a car accident.  Upon returning to the station later that day, Gacy flatly denied any involvement in Piest's disappearance, and denied offering him a job.Des Plaines police were convinced Gacy was behind Piest's disappearance and checked Gacy's record, discovering that he had an outstanding battery charge against him in Chicago and had served a prison sentence in Iowa for sodomy.  A search of Gacy's house, ordered by a judge at the request of detectives, on December 13, turned up several suspicious items: a 1975 high school class ring engraved with the initials J.A.S., various driver's licenses, handcuffs, a two-by-four with holes drilled in the ends, books on homosexuality and pederasty,  a syringe, clothing too small for Gacy, a 6mm Brevettata starter pistol and a photo receipt from the pharmacy where Robert Piest worked. Police decided to confiscate Gacy's Oldsmobile, along with other PDM vehicles and assign two two-man surveillance teams to follow Gacy, while they continued their investigation of Gacy regarding Piest's disappearance. Murder casebook number 84 ISBN 0-7485-1454-6, p. 1915 The following day, investigators received a phone call from Michael Rossi, who informed the investigators both of Gregory Godzik's disappearance  and the fact another PDM employee, Charles Hattula, had been found drowned in an Illinois river the previous year.On December 15, Des Plaines investigators obtained further details upon Gacy's battery charge, learning the complainant, Jeffrey Rignall, had reported that Gacy had lured him into his car, chloroformed him, raped him and dumped him, suffering severe chest and facial burns and rectal bleeding, in Lincoln Park the following morning. In an interview with Gacy's former wife the same day, they learned of the disappearance of John Butkovich.  The same day, the Maine West High School ring was traced to a John A. Szyc.  In an interview with Szyc's mother the same day, she informed officers of the January 1977 disappearance of her son and that several items from his apartment were also missing, including a Motorola TV set. She added that investigators had informed her that her son had apparently sold his Plymouth Satellite to a John Gacy the month following his disappearance. Investigators noted that one of Gacy's employees drove a similar car to Szyc's: A check of the VIN confirmed the car had belonged to Szyc.By December 16, Gacy was becoming affable with the surveillance detectives, regularly inviting them to join him for meals in various restaurants and occasionally for drinks in bars or his home. He repeatedly denied that he had anything to do with Piest's disappearance and accused the officers of harassing him because of his political connections or because of his use of recreational drugs. Knowing these officers were unlikely to arrest him on anything trivial, he openly taunted them by flouting traffic laws and succeeded in losing his pursuers on more than one occasion.On December 17, investigators conducted a formal interview of Michael Rossi, who informed them Gacy had sold Szyc's vehicle to him with the explanation that he had bought the car from Szyc because the youth needed money to move to California. A further examination of Gacy's Oldsmobile was conducted on this date. In the course of examining the trunk of the car, the investigators discovered a small cluster of fibers which may have been human hair. These fibers were sent for further analysis. That evening, officers conducted a test using three trained German shepherd search dogs to determine whether Piest had been present in any of Gacy's vehicles.  The dogs were allowed to examine each of Gacy's vehicles, whereupon one dog approached Gacy's Oldsmobile and lay upon the passenger seat in what the dog's handler informed investigators was a "death reaction", indicating the body of Robert Piest had been present in this vehicle.That evening, Gacy invited two of the surveillance detectives to a restaurant for a meal. In the early hours of December 18, he invited the same officers into another restaurant where, over breakfast, he talked of his business, his marriages and his activities as a registered clown. At one point during this conversation, Gacy remarked to one of the two surveillance detectives: "You know… clowns can get away with murder."  By December 18, Gacy was beginning to show visible signs of strain as a result of the constant surveillance: looking unshaven, tired, appearing anxious and drinking heavily. That afternoon, he drove to his lawyers' office to prepare a $750,000 civil suit against the Des Plaines police,  demanding the police surveillance cease. The same day, the serial number of the Nisson Pharmacy photo receipt found in Gacy's kitchen was traced to a Kim Byers, a colleague of Piest's at Nisson Pharmacy, who admitted when contacted in person the following day that she had worn the jacket and had placed the receipt in his parka pocket just before she gave the parka to Piest as he left the store to talk with a contractor.  This revelation contradicted Gacy's previous statements that he had had no contact with Robert Piest on the evening of December 11: the presence of the receipt indicated that Gacy must have been in contact with Robert Piest after the youth had left the Nisson Pharmacy on December 11.The same evening, Michael Rossi was interviewed a second time: on this occasion, Rossi was more cooperative, informing detectives that in the summer of 1977, Gacy had had him spread ten bags of lime in the crawl space of the house. On December 19, investigators began compiling evidence for a second search warrant of Gacy's house. The same day, Gacy's lawyers filed the civil suit against the Des Plaines police. The hearing of the suit was scheduled for December 22. That afternoon, Gacy invited two of the surveillance detectives inside his house. On this occasion, as one officer distracted Gacy with conversation, another officer walked into Gacy's bedroom in an unsuccessful attempt to write down the serial number of the Motorola TV set they suspected belonged to John Szyc. While flushing Gacy's toilet, this officer noticed a smell he suspected could be that of rotting corpses emanating from a heating duct; the officers who previously searched Gacy's house failed to notice this as on that occasion the house had been cold. David Cram was interviewed by investigators on December 20. The youth informed investigators of Gacy's attempts to rape him in 1976 and stated that after he and Gacy had returned to his home after the December 13 search of his property, Gacy had turned pale upon noting a clot of mud on his carpet which he suspected had come from his crawl space. Cram then stated Gacy had grabbed a flashlight and immediately entered the crawl space to look for evidence of digging. When asked whether he had been to the crawl space, Cram replied he had been asked by Gacy to spread lime down there and also dug trenches upon Gacy's behest with the explanation they were for plumbing.  Cram stated these trenches were two feet wide, six feet long and two feet deep—the size of graves.On the evening of December 20, Gacy drove to his lawyers' office in Park Ridge to attend a pre-scheduled meeting he had arranged with them, ostensibly to discuss the progress of his civil suit. Upon his arrival, Gacy appeared disheveled and immediately asked for an alcoholic drink, whereupon Sam Amirante fetched a bottle of whisky from his car. Upon his return, Amirante asked Gacy what he had to discuss with them. Gacy picked up a copy of the Daily Herald from Amirante's desk; he pointed to a front page article covering the disappearance of Robert Piest and informed his lawyers "This boy is dead. He's in a river."Over the following hours, Gacy gave a rambling confession which ran into the early hours of the following morning. He began by informing Amirante and Stevens he had "been the judge [...] jury and executioner of many, many people",  most of whom he stated were buried in his crawl space and others in the Des Plaines River. Some victims he referred to by name; most he dismissed as "male prostitutes", "hustlers" and "liars" whom he would give "the rope trick". On other occasions, he stated he would wake up to find "dead, strangled kids" on his floor. In reference to Robert Piest, Gacy harked that as he placed the tourniquet around his neck, that Piest was "crying, scared".  As a result of the alcohol he had consumed, Gacy fell asleep midway through his confession and Amirante immediately arranged a psychiatric appointment for Gacy at 9 a.m. that morning. Upon awaking several hours later, Gacy simply shook his head when informed by Amirante he had earlier confessed to killing approximately 30 people, stating "Well, I can't think about this right now. I've got things to do."  Ignoring his lawyers' advice regarding his scheduled appointment, Gacy left their office to attend to the needs of his business.

Gacy later recollected his memories of his final day of freedom as being "hazy," adding that he knew his arrest was inevitable and that, in his final hours of freedom, he intended to visit his friends and say his final farewells.  Upon leaving his lawyers' office, Gacy drove to a Shell gas station where, in the course of filling his rental car, he handed a small bag of marijuana to the attendant, a youth named Lance Jacobson. Jacobson immediately handed the bag to the surveillance officers, adding that Gacy had told him "The end is coming (for me). These guys are going to kill me." Gacy then drove to the home of a fellow contractor, Ronald Rhode. Inside Rhode's living room, Gacy hugged Rhode before bursting into tears and saying: "I killed thirty people, give or take a few." Gacy then left Rhode's home to meet with Michael Rossi and David Cram. As he drove along the expressway, the surveillance officers noted he was holding a rosary to his chin as he prayed while driving. After talking with Cram and Rossi at Cram's home, Gacy had Cram drive him to a scheduled meeting with Leroy Stevens. As he spoke with his lawyer, Cram informed the officers that Gacy had earlier divulged to both himself and Rossi that the previous evening, he had confessed to his lawyers his guilt in over thirty murders. Upon concluding his meeting with his lawyer, Gacy had Cram drive him to Maryhill Cemetery, where his father was buried.As Gacy drove to various locations that morning, police outlined their formal draft of their second search warrant. The purpose of the warrant was specifically to search for the body of Robert Piest in the crawl space. Upon hearing radioed reports from the surveillance detectives that, in light of his erratic behavior, Gacy may be about to commit suicide, police decided to arrest him upon a charge of possession and distribution of marijuana  in order to hold him in custody as the formal request for a second search warrant was presented. At 4:30 on the afternoon of December 21, the eve of the hearing of Gacy's civil suit, the request for a second search warrant was granted by Judge Marvin J. Peters.Armed with the signed search warrant, police and evidence technicians quickly drove to Gacy's home. Upon their arrival, officers found that Gacy had unplugged his sump pump and that the crawl space was flooded with water; to clear the water they simply replaced the plug and waited for the water to drain. After it had done so, an evidence technician named Daniel Genty entered the crawl space and crawled to the southwest area of the crawl space and began digging. Within minutes, he had uncovered putrefied flesh and a human arm bone. Genty immediately shouted to the investigators that they could charge Gacy with murder. 
Arrest and confessionAfter being informed that police had found human remains in his crawl space and that he would now face murder charges, Gacy told officers he wanted to "clear the air",  adding that he knew his arrest was inevitable since he had spent the previous evening on the couch in his lawyers' office.In the early hours of December 22, 1978, Gacy confessed to police that since 1972, he had committed approximately 25–30 murders, all of whom he falsely claimed were teenage male runaways or male prostitutes,  whom he would typically abduct from Chicago's Greyhound Bus station or off the streets and lure to his house with either the promise of a job with his construction company, with an offer of money for sex, or simply grab them by force.Once back at Gacy's house, the victims would be handcuffed or otherwise bound, then choked with a rope or a board as they were sexually assaulted. Gacy would often stick clothing in the victims' mouths to muffle their screams. Many of his victims had been strangled with a tourniquet, which Gacy referred to as his "rope trick". Occasionally, the victim had convulsed for an "hour or two" after the rope trick before dying. When asked where he drew the inspiration for the two-by-four found at his house in which he had manacled many of his victims, Gacy stated he had been inspired to construct the device from reading about the Houston Mass Murders. The victims were usually lured alone to his house, although on approximately three occasions,  Gacy had what he called "doubles"—occasions wherein he killed two victims on the same evening.Most victims were buried in Gacy's crawl space where, periodically, he would pour quicklime to hasten the decomposition of the bodies.  Gacy stated he had lost count of the number of victims buried in his crawl space and had thrown the final five victims—all killed in 1978—off the I-55 bridge into the Des Plaines River because his crawl space was full.   When asked about Robert Piest, Gacy confessed to strangling the youth, adding that he had been interrupted by a phone call from a business colleague while doing so; he also admitted to having disposed of Piest's body in the Des Plaines river and stated that the reason he had arrived at Des Plaines police in a disheveled manner in the early hours of December 13 was because he had been in a minor traffic accident after disposing of Piest's body en route to his appointment with Des Plaines officers.  He also confessed to police he had buried the body of John Butkovitch in his garage.  To assist officers in their search for the victims buried in his house, Gacy drew a diagram of his basement to show where the bodies were buried. 
Search for victimsAccompanied by police, Gacy returned to his house on December 22 and showed police the location in his garage where he had buried Butkovitch's body, then police drove to the spot on the I-55 bridge where he had thrown the body of Piest and four other victims (although only four of the five victims Gacy claimed to have disposed of in this way were ever recovered from the Des Plaines River).Between December 22 and December 29, 1978, a total of 27 bodies were recovered from Gacy's property,
  26 of which were found buried in his crawl space,  with one additional victim, John Butkovitch, being found buried beneath the concrete floor of his garage precisely where Gacy had marked the youth's grave with a can of spray paint. Following a temporary postponement of the excavations imposed in January 1979 due to a severe winter snowfall in Chicago, excavations of the property resumed in March—despite Gacy's insistence to investigators that all the victims' bodies buried upon his property had been found. On March 9, the body of a 28th victim was found buried in a pit close to a barbecue grill in the backyard of the property: the victim was found wrapped within several plastic bags and sported a ring on the wedding finger of his left hand, indicating the possibility he had been married.  One week later, on March 16, the skeletal remains of another victim were found buried beneath the joists of the dining room floor,  bringing the total number of bodies exhumed at 8213 West Summerdale Avenue to 29.  In April of 1979, Gacy's house was demolished.Three additional bodies, which had been found in the nearby Des Plaines River between June and December 1978, were also confirmed to have been victims of Gacy.Several of the bodies were found with the ligature used to strangle them still knotted around their necks. In other instances, cloth gags were found lodged deep down the victims' throats, leading the investigators to conclude that 13 of Gacy's victims died not of strangulation, but of asphyxiation.  In some cases, bodies were found with foreign objects such as prescription bottles lodged into their pelvic region, the position of which indicated the items had been thrust into the victims' anus.   Some victims were identified due to their known connection to Gacy through PDM Contractors;  others were identified due to their personal artifacts being found at 8213 Summerdale: one victim, 17-year-old Michael Bonnin, who had disappeared June 3, 1976 while traveling from Chicago to Waukegan,  was identified because his fishing license was found at Gacy's home;  another youth, Tim O' Rourke, was last heard mentioning that a contractor had offered him a job.  Of Gacy's identified victims, the youngest were Samuel Todd Stapleton and Michael Marino, both 14 years old; the oldest were Russell Nelson and James Mazzara, both 21 years old. Seven of the victims have never been identified.On April 9, 1979, Robert Piest's body was discovered on the banks of the Des Plaines River: his autopsy revealed that "paper-like material" had been shoved down his throat while he was alive. 
TrialJohn Gacy was brought to trial on February 6, 1980, charged with 33 murders.  He was tried in Chicago before Judge Louis Garippo; the jury was selected from Rockford, Illinois, due to saturation of press coverage in Cook County. In the year before his trial, at the request of his defense counsel, Gacy spent over 300 hours with the doctors at the Menard Correctional Center undergoing a variety of psychological tests  before a panel of psychiatrists to determine whether he was mentally competent to stand trial.Gacy had attempted to convince the doctors he was suffering from a multiple personality disorder.  His lawyers, however, opted to plead not guilty by reason of insanity to the charges against him, and produced several psychiatric experts who had examined Gacy the previous year to testify to their findings.  Three psychiatric experts appearing for the defense at Gacy's trial testified they found Gacy to be a paranoid schizophrenic who suffered from a multiple personality disorder.The prosecution's case was that Gacy was sane and fully in control of his actions.  The prosecution produced several witnesses to testify to the premeditation of his actions and the efforts he went to in order to escape detection, plus doctors who refuted the defense doctors' claims of multiple personality and insanity. Two witnesses who testified were PDM employees, who confessed Gacy had made them dig trenches in his crawl space. One of these employees, Michael Rossi, testified that in August 1977,  Gacy had marked a location in the crawl space with sticks and told him to dig a drainage trench.When asked where in the crawl space he had dug, Rossi turned to a diagram of Gacy's home on display in the courtroom. The diagram showed where the bodies were found in the crawl space and elsewhere on the property, and pointed to the location of the remains of an unidentified victim known as "Body 13".  Rossi stated he had not dug any other trenches, but—at Gacy's request—had supervised other PDM employees digging trenches in the crawl space.Rossi also testified that Gacy would periodically look into the crawl space to ensure employees did not deviate from the precise locations he had marked.  Gacy had testified after his arrest that he had only dug five of the victims' graves in his crawl space  and had had employees (including Gregory Godzik) dig the remaining trenches in order that he would "have graves available". 
During the third week of the trial, Gacy's defense team attempted to raise the possibility that all 33 murders were accidental erotic asphyxia deaths: the Cook County Coroner countered this assertion with evidence that Gacy's claim was impossible. On February 29, one of the youths Gacy had sexually assaulted in 1967, Donald Voorhees, testified to his ordeal at Gacy's hands, and that Gacy had subsequently paid another youth to beat him and spray Mace in his face so he would not testify against him.  The youth felt unable to testify, but did attempt to briefly, before being asked to step down. Robert Donnelly testified the week after Voorhees, recounting his ordeal at Gacy's hands in December 1977. Donnelly was visibly distressed as he recollected the abuse he endured at Gacy's hands and came close to breaking down on several occasions. As the youth testified, Gacy repeatedly laughed at Donnelly's expense,  but the youth finished his testimony. One of Gacy's defense attorneys, Robert Motta, during Donnelly's cross-examination attempted to discredit his testimony, but Donnelly did not waver from his testimony of what had occurred. During the fifth week of the trial, Gacy wrote a personal letter to Judge Garippo requesting a mistrial  on a number of bases, including that he did not approve his lawyers' insanity plea approach; that his lawyers had not allowed him to take the witness stand (as he had desired to do); that his defense had not called enough witnesses, and that the police were lying about statements he had purportedly made to detectives after his arrest and that, in any event, the statements were "self-serving" for use by the prosecution.  Judge Garippo addressed Gacy's letter by informing him that under the law he had the choice as to whether he wished to testify, and he was free to indicate to the Judge if he wished to do so.On March 11, final arguments from both prosecution and defense attorneys began (these arguments concluded the following day). Prosecuting attorney Terry Sullivan argued first, outlining Gacy's history of abusing youths, the testimony of his efforts to avoid detection and describing Gacy's surviving victims—Voorhees and Donnelly—as "living dead". After the state's four-hour closing, counsel Sam Amirante and Robert Motta argued for the defense. Motta and Amirante argued against the testimony delivered by the doctors who had testified for the prosecution. The defense lawyers attempted to portray Gacy as a "man driven by compulsions he was unable to control".  In support of these arguments, the defense counsel repeatedly referred to the testimony of the doctors who had appeared for the defense. Amirante and Motta then argued that the psychology of Gacy's behavior would be of benefit to scientific research and that the psychology of his mind should be studied.Following the testimony of Amirante and Motta, William Kunkle again testified for the prosecution. Kunkle referred to the defense's contention of insanity as "a sham", arguing that the facts of the case harked to Gacy's ability to think logically and control his actions. Kunkle also referred to the testimony of a doctor who had examined Gacy in 1968; this doctor had diagnosed Gacy as an antisocial personality, capable of committing crimes without remorse. Kunkle indicated that had the recommendations of this doctor been heeded, Gacy would have not been freed. At the close of his argument, Kunkle pulled each of the 22 photos of Gacy's identified victims off a board displaying the images and asked the jury to not show sympathy but to "show justice". Kunkle then asked the jury to "show the same sympathy this man showed when he took these lives and put them there!"  before throwing the stack of photos into the opening of the trap door of Gacy's crawl space, which had been introduced as evidence and was on display in the courtroom. After Kunkle had finished his testimony, the jury retired to consider their verdict. The jury deliberated for less than two hours and found Gacy guilty of the thirty-three charges of murder for which he had been brought to trial; he was also found guilty of sexual assault and taking indecent liberties with a child; both convictions in reference to Robert Piest.   The following day, March 13, both the prosecution and defense made alternate pleas for the sentence the jury should decide: the prosecution requesting a death sentence for each murder committed after the Illinois statute on capital punishment came into effect in June 1977;  the defense requesting life imprisonment.The jury deliberated for more than two hours before they returned with their verdict: Gacy was sentenced to death for the twelve counts of murder upon which the prosecution had sought this penalty.   An initial date of execution was set for June 2, 1980. 
Death rowAfter sentencing, the State of Illinois transferred Gacy to the Menard Correctional Center in Chester, Illinois, where he remained for 14 years on death row.In prison, Gacy began to paint. The subjects Gacy painted varied, although many were of clowns, some of which depicted himself as "Pogo". Many of his paintings were sold at various auctions with individual prices ranging between $200 and $20,000 apiece. Murder casebook number 11 ISSN 1364 5803, p. 36 While in prison Gacy read law books and thereupon filed voluminous motions and appeals, although he did not prevail on any. Gacy mainly contended that he had "some knowledge" of only five murders: those of McCoy, Butkovitch, Godzik, Szyc and Piest,  and that the other 28 murders had been committed by employees who were in possession of keys to his house while he was away on business trips.In the summer of 1984, the Supreme Court of Illinois upheld Gacy's conviction and ordered that he be executed by lethal injection on November 14.  Gacy filed an appeal against this decision, which on March 4, 1985, the Supreme Court of the United States denied.After his final appeal to the U.S. Supreme Court was denied in October 1993, the Illinois Supreme Court set his execution date for May 10, 1994. 
ExecutionOn the morning of May 9, 1994, Gacy was transferred from the Menard Correctional Center to Stateville Correctional Center in Crest Hill to be executed. That afternoon, he was allowed a private picnic on the prison grounds with his family. That evening, he observed prayer with a Catholic priest before he was escorted to the Stateville execution chamber to receive a lethal injection. Before the execution began, the chemicals used to perform the execution unexpectedly solidified, clogging the IV tube administering the chemicals into Gacy's arm and complicating the execution procedure. Blinds covering the window through which witnesses observed the execution were drawn, and the execution team replaced the clogged tube to complete the procedure. After ten minutes, the blinds were reopened and the execution resumed. The entire procedure took a total of 18 minutes to complete.  Anesthesiologists blamed the problem on the inexperience of prison officials who were conducting the execution, stating that had correct execution procedures been followed, the complications would never have occurred. This error apparently led to Illinois' subsequent adoption of an alternate method of lethal injection. On this subject, one of the prosecutors at Gacy's trial, William Kunkle, said: "He still got a much easier death than any of his victims."   According to published reports, Gacy was a diagnosed psychopath Robert D. Hare. Without Conscience. The Guildford Press, 1999, p. 23. ISBN 978-1-57230-451-2.  who did not express any remorse for his crimes. His final statement to his lawyer before his execution was that killing him would not compensate for the loss of others, and that this was the state murdering him.  It is reported that his final spoken words were simply, "Kiss my ass". In the hours leading up to Gacy's execution, a crowd estimated to number over 1,000  gathered outside the correctional center to observe the execution; the majority of them were vocally in favor of the execution, although anti-death penalty protesters were also present. Of those in favor of the execution, some wore T-shirts harking to Gacy's previous community services as a clown and bearing satirical slogans such as "no tears for the clown".    The anti-death penalty protesters present observed a silent candlelight vigil. After Gacy's death was confirmed at 12:58 a.m. May 10, 1994, his brain was removed. It is in the possession of Dr. Helen Morrison, a witness for the defense at Gacy's trial,  who interviewed Gacy and other serial killers in an attempt to isolate common personality traits of violent sociopaths. An examination of Gacy's brain after his execution revealed no abnormalities.   
ArtworkIn the months following Gacy's execution many of his paintings were auctioned. A total of 19 were sold by autograph dealer Steve Koschal, who had commissioned many of them directly from Gacy.    Selling prices ranged from $195 for an acrylic painting of a bird to $9,500 for a painting depicting cartoon characters resembling Disney's Seven Dwarfs playing baseball against the Chicago Cubs.  The baseball painting had been autographed by numerous members of the Baseball Hall of Fame, though Koschel admitted that the signers had not been told the identity of the painter.    Some were bought so that they could be destroyed: 25 paintings were burned in June, 1994 in Naperville, Illinois, at a communal bonfire attended by approximately 300 people, including family members of nine of Gacy's victims.   Exhibitions of Gacy's artwork have been held since the 1980s and continue to be held.  Gacy dismissed criticism that he was permitted to keep money from the sale of his paintings, claiming his artwork was intended "to bring joy into people's lives". In 2011 the Arts Factory Gallery in Las Vegas sold Gacy's self-portrait Goodbye Pogo ($4,500) and 73 other Gacy paintings, drawings and audio recordings to benefit various charitable organizations. The National Center for Victims of Crime, one of the named beneficiaries, demanded that the gallery cease using its name in connection with the sale.   
Victims

Identified victims (age in parentheses)Only 25 of Gacy's victims were ever conclusively identified. By the time of Gacy's trial, a total of 22 victims had been identified. In March 1980, two further bodies unearthed from Gacy's crawl space were identified via dental and radiology records  as those of Kenneth Parker and Michael Marino, two teenage friends who were reported missing on October 25, 1976;  the day after they had disappeared.  However, DNA analysis conducted in 2012 has confirmed that the 14th body exhumed from the crawl space—initially believed to have been Michael Marino—was misidentified. In May 1986,  the 9th victim exhumed from Gacy's crawl space was identified as Timothy McCoy, Gacy's first victim.  One further victim was identified in November 2011 through DNA testing as William George Bundy, a 19-year-old construction worker who was last seen by his family on his way to a party on October 26, 1976.  "Sheriff: Gacy victim identified through DNA", Chicago Tribune, November 29, 2011  Bundy had apparently worked for Gacy before his murder.  Shortly after Gacy's arrest, his family had contacted Bundy's dentist in the hope of submitting his dental records for comparison with the unidentified bodies. However, the records had been destroyed after the dentist had retired.  
 

Timothy McCoy (15) January 3, 1972 
John Butkovitch (17) July 29, 1975 
Darrell Sampson (18) April 6, 1976 
Randall Reffett (15) May 14, 1976 
Samuel Stapleton (14) May 14, 1976 
Michael Bonnin (17) June 3, 1976 
William Carroll (16) June 13, 1976 
Rick Johnston (17) August 6, 1976 
Kenneth Parker (16) October 24, 1976 
 

William Bundy (19) October 26, 1976 
Gregory Godzik (17) December 12, 1976 
John Szyc (19) January 20, 1977 
Jon Prestidge (20) March 15, 1977 
Matthew Bowman (19) July 5, 1977 
Robert Gilroy (18) September 15, 1977 
John Mowery (19) September 25, 1977 
Russell Nelson (21) October 17, 1977 
 

Robert Winch (16) November 10, 1977 
Tommy Boling (20) November 18, 1977 
David Talsma (19) December 9, 1977 
William Kindred (19) February 16, 1978 
Timothy O' Rourke (20) June 16–23, 1978 
Frank Landingin (19) November 4, 1978 
James Mazzara (21) November 24, 1978 
Robert Piest (15) December 11, 1978 
 Suspected misidentified victim

Michael Marino (14) October 24, 1976  


Unidentified victimsEight victims remain unidentified, seven of whom had been buried beneath Gacy's crawl space; one additional youth was found buried approximately 15 feet from the barbecue pit in his backyard.  Experts used the skulls of the unidentified victims to create facial reconstructions.  Based upon Gacy's confession, where the victims were buried in his crawl space relative to Gacy's identified victims, and forensic analysis, police were able to determine the most likely dates when his unidentified victims were killed.
 
 

January, 1974. Body 28. Backyard. Male aged 14–18. 
June 13 - August 6, 1976. Body 26. Crawl space. Male aged 22–30. 
June 13 - August 6, 1976. Body 24. Crawl space. Male aged 15–19 
August 6 - October 24, 1976. Body 21. Crawl space. Male aged 21–27. 
 

August 6 – October 5, 1976. Body 13. Crawl space. Male aged 17–21. 
c. October 24, 1976. Body 14. Crawl space. Male aged c. 14. 
December, 1976 – March 15, 1977. Body 5. Crawl space. Male aged 22–32. 
March 15 - July 5, 1977. Body 10. Crawl space. Male aged 17–21. 
 
On October 11, 2011, Cook County Sheriff Thomas Dart announced that investigators, having obtained full DNA profiles from each of the unidentified victims, were to renew their efforts to identify all of Gacy's victims. At a press conference held to announce this intention, Sheriff Dart stated investigators are actively seeking DNA samples from individuals across the United States related to any male missing between 1970 and 1979.  Test results thus far conducted have confirmed the identification of one victim, ruled out the possibility of numerous other missing youths as being victims of Gacy   and solved an unrelated cold case dating from 1978.  In October and December 2011 respectively, two youths whom investigators had initially believed likely matches to unidentified victims of Gacy were found alive. One of these individuals, Harold Lovell, had disappeared from Aurora in May 1977 at age 19. Lovell was located in Florida and subsequently reunited with his family.  Lovell had been listed by investigators as one of the most likely matches for the eight unidentified victims; having last told his mother he was to find a construction job. The other individual, Theodore Szal, had disappeared from Glen Ellyn in March 1977 at age 24.  Szal was located in Oregon and had also worked in construction prior to his disappearance. In September 2012, sheriff Thomas Dart announced that through efforts made to identify Gacy's unidentified victims, investigators had solved an unrelated cold case relating to a 21-year-old Peoria youth named Daniel Noe. Noe, an Illinois native, was last seen alive on September 30, 1978 hitchhiking from Bellingham to Chicago.  His remains had been found near Mount Olympus in 2010. As Noe had been listed as a possible unidentified victim of Gacy, investigators had collected DNA samples from his family which, although negative when compared to the seven remaining unidentified victims exhumed from Gacy's property, proved a positive match to the unidentified remains found in Utah in 2010.On October 25, 2012, DNA tests conducted upon remains identified in 1980 through dental analysis  as those of a missing Chicago youth named Michael Marino revealed that the remains had been misidentified. Marino's mother had always doubted the identification of her son due to the fact clothing found upon the body was inconsistent with what her son had worn when she last saw him. In addition, the dental X-ray conducted upon the victim identified as Michael Marino had revealed the victim had all of his second molars, whereas a dental X-ray conducted upon Marino in March of 1976 revealed one molar had not erupted. The original misidentification of the body identified as Michael Marino has been disputed due to the fact the body was identified in 1980 via dental records and neither an upper nor a lower jaw bone was present upon the exhumed body,  leading to strong speculation that either the body of Marino may have been buried as that of Kenneth Parker and vice versa or the incorrect set of unidentified remains of another unidentified victim of John Gacy had been released to Marino's mother as those of her son. In addition, the orthodontist who initially identified Marino's remains has stated he is convinced his initial findings are correct, stating: "The dental identification is 100 percent solid [...] no question. We compared 32 teeth, probably half a dozen of them had very distinct fillings and every one of them was consistent with Michael Marino." Investigators do acknowledge strong circumstantial evidence does point to the remains of the 14th body unearthed from the crawl space as being those of Michael Marino, including the fact the body shared a common grave with that of Kenneth Parker; a close friend of Marino who disappeared on the same day as he. 
Possible additional victimsAt the time of Gacy's arrest he had claimed to both Des Plaines and Chicago investigators that the total number of victims he had killed could be as high as 45.  However, only 33 bodies were ever found which were linked to Gacy. Investigators did excavate the grounds of his property until they had exposed the substrata of clay beneath the foundations, yet only 29 bodies were found buried upon his property.On May 8, 1977, a 26-year-old named Charles Hattula was found drowned in a river near Freeport, Illinois. Hattula, an employee of PDM Contractors, had been linked to the initial investigation of Gacy after Robert Piest's disappearance; this was after the same employee who had informed the investigators of Gregory Godzik's disappearance informed them of Hattula's death. Moreover, this employee had stated that Hattula was known to have conflicts with Gacy.  Gacy had himself informed several of his employees the youth had drowned after Hattula's body was recovered from the Pecatonica River. Des Plaines authorities had contacted colleagues in Freeport during their investigation into Gacy, but were told the youth had fallen to his death from a bridge.  At the time of Hattula's death, Gacy had become engaged and his fiancée had moved into his home, which leaves a possibility that Gacy had disposed of Hattula's body in the Pecatonica River as opposed to burying the youth in his crawl space. However; Hattula's death had been ruled as accidental.Gacy stated that after he had assaulted and then released Jeffrey Rignall in March 1978, he had begun to throw his murder victims into the Des Plaines River. He confessed to having disposed a total of five bodies in this manner. However, only four bodies were recovered from the river and conclusively confirmed to be victims of Gacy. Given the gap of over four months between the dates of the murders of the first and second victims known to have been disposed in the river, it is possible that this unknown victim may have been killed between June and November 1978.As a successful contractor, Gacy is also known to have both visited numerous states across America and visited Canada during the years he is known to have killed. When asked as to whether there were more victims, Gacy simply stated: "That's for you guys to find out."Detective Bill Dorsch has stated he has reason to believe there may be more victims buried elsewhere. In 1975, he claims that he saw a person he believes to be Gacy digging upon the property of the apartment building he then resided at within the 6100 block of West Miami Avenue in Chicago:  Gacy is known to have been the caretaker of this property in 1975. When confronted by Dorsch as to his actions, Gacy stated he was performing work that he was too busy to do during the day. Another resident says she also has reason to believe there may be additional victims buried at that location, stating Gacy had dug a number of large trenches around the property where fresh plants would later be planted.In March 2012, Cook County Sheriff's officials submitted a request to excavate the grounds of this property. However, the Cook County State's Attorney denied this request, stating a lack of probable cause as the reason the submission was denied;  adding that there had been a search of the property conducted in 1998. However, the sheriff's office had noted that in 1998, a radar survey conducted had noted a total of 14 areas of interest within the property grounds, yet only 2 of these 14 anomalies had been excavated on that occasion. Moreover, Detective Dorsch, who had informed investigators of the possibility of Gacy having buried victims' bodies at West Miami Avenue, had provided police with a letter from the radar company who had conducted the 1998 search of the property which stated the initial search of the grounds was incomplete.
Inspiration for the formation of Missing Child Recovery Act of 1984In 1984, Sam Amirante, one of Gacy's two defense attorneys at his 1980 trial, authored the Missing Child Recovery Act of 1984. Amirante has since stated that the primary inspiration for his feeling the need to instigate these legislations was the fact that at the time of the Gacy murders, there had been a 72-hour period which police in Illinois had to allow to elapse before initiating a search for a missing child. {[Amirante & Broderick 2011, p. 395]}  The Missing Child Recovery Act of 1984 authored by Amirante removed this 72-hour waiting period and thus any missing child report received in Illinois from 1984 onwards immediately triggered a statewide police search rather than waiting for 72 hours to elapse before doing so. Other states across America subsequently adopted similar procedures and sensibilities, as a result of which a national network aimed at locating missing children was gradually formed. This national network has since developed into the Child Abduction Emergency—commonly known today as an Amber Alert. 
Potential accomplicesOne of the first things Gacy told investigators after his arrest was that he had not acted alone in several of the murders: he questioned whether individuals he referred to as "my associates" had also been arrested.  When questioned as to whether these individuals had participated directly or indirectly in the killings, Gacy replied "Directly."Gacy specifically named two employees of PDM Contractors as being the individuals he had referred to as being involved in several of the murders.  In the 1980s, he also informed Robert Ressler that "two or three" employees had assisted him in several murders.  Ressler replied that he did indeed believe there were unexplained avenues to the case and stated he believed Gacy had killed more than 33 victims. Gacy neither confirmed or denied Ressler's suspicions.Moreover, on one occasion during his surveillance, two of the surveillance officers followed Gacy to a bar Gacy had driven to meet two of his employees. At the bar, the surveillance officers overheard a hushed conversation between one of the employees and Gacy in which the youth asked Gacy the question: "And what? Buried like the other five?" In addition, Jeffrey Rignall, who had been assaulted and tortured by Gacy in March 1978, was adamant that at one point during his abuse and torture, a young man with brown hair watched his abuse as he kneeled in front of him.  When this youth realized Rignall had regained consciousness, he was again chloroformed into unconsciousness. Rignall had also informed police that as Gacy had raped and assaulted him, lights in the room in which he had been manacled were switched on and off.In 2012, two Chicago lawyers named Steven Becker and Robert Stephenson  publicly stated that, 
having reviewed archived records relating to Gacy's business travels for both PDM Contractors and PE Systems, it is likely that Gacy may have been assisted by one or more accomplices in a minimum of three murders. SunTimes.com.  In each case, Becker and Stephenson state that official documents attest to the fact Gacy was in another state at the time the youths in question disappeared. In one case, that of 18-year-old Robert Gilroy, investigators found that on September 12, 1977—three days prior to Gilroy's disappearance—Gacy had flown to Pittsburgh and did not return to Chicago until the day after the youth had disappeared. In a second case, that of 21-year-old Russell Nelson, Nelson's traveling companion gave differing accounts of the youth's disappearance to both Nelson's family and investigators. Nelson was apparently abducted from a crowd who had gathered outside a Chicago bar; yet investigators contend this could not have happened without his traveling companion noticing. Nelson's traveling companion later gave Nelson's mother differing accounts of Nelson's disappearance. Later, this youth offered Nelson's two brothers a job with Gacy's construction company. In a third case, travel records indicate Gacy was at a scheduled job site in Michigan at 6 a.m. on September 26, 1977—the day following the disappearance of a 19-year-old youth named John Mowery. Mowery was last seen leaving his mother's house at 10 p.m. on September 25.  His roommate was an employee of PDM Contractors who had formerly lived with Gacy and had moved into Mowery's apartment less than one week prior to the youth's disappearance. Two witnesses have stated that this roommate had recommended to Mowery that he meet "a man who is going out of town" two days prior to the youth's disappearance.Gacy had repeatedly claimed in interviews following his arrest and conviction that he was not present in Chicago when a total of 16 of the identified victims had disappeared. In one interview, he had stated that at the time of his arrest, a total of four PDM Employees were also considered suspects in the disappearances of the missing individuals investigators had linked to Gacy—all of whom he stated were in possession of keys to his house.Criminal defense attorneys investigating the possibility Gacy had not acted alone in several of the murders have stated there is "overwhelming evidence Gacy worked with an accomplice." 
Media 
Film

The made-for-TV film To Catch a Killer, starring Brian Dennehy as John Wayne Gacy, was released in 1992. The film is largely based on the investigation of Gacy, following the disappearance of Robert Piest, by Des Plaines Police and their efforts to arrest him before the scheduled civil suit hearing on December 22.
A feature film, Gacy, was released in 2003. This film cast Mark Holton in the role of John Gacy and largely focuses upon Gacy's life after he moved to Norwood Park in 1971 up until his arrest in 1978.
The made-for-TV film Dear Mr. Gacy was released in 2010, starring William Forsythe as John Wayne Gacy. The film is based upon the book The Last Victim, written by Jason Moss.  The film focuses upon the correspondence between Moss and Gacy before Gacy invited Moss to visit him on death row in 1994.


Books

Buried Dreams: Inside the Mind of Serial Killer John Wayne Gacy, written by Tim Cahill (ISBN 1-85702-084-7).
Johnny and Me: The True Story of John Wayne Gacy, written by Barry Boschelli (ISBN 1-4343-2184-3). 
Killer Clown: the John Wayne Gacy Murders, written by Terry Sullivan and Peter T. Maiken (ISBN 0-7860-1422-9).
The Last Victim: A True-Life Journey into the Mind of the Serial Killer, written by Jason Moss and Jeffrey Kottler, Ph.D (ISBN 0-7535-0398-0).
The Man Who Killed Boys, written by Clifford L. Linedecker (ISBN 0-312-95228-7).
John Wayne Gacy: Defending A Monster, written by Sam L. Amirante and Danny Broderick (ISBN 1-616-08248-8).
29 Below, written by Jeffrey Rignall and Ron Wilder (ISBN B0006XG56Y).


Television

The Investigation Discovery channel have broadcast a documentary focusing upon the Gacy murders in the forensics program, Most Evil. The series is presented by Michael Stone, a forensic psychiatrist.
The Biography Channel have broadcast a 45-minute documentary focusing upon the crimes of John Gacy.

 
References
 
Cited works and further reading

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


External links 

John Wayne Gacy at CrimeLibrary.com
FBI file on John Wayne Gacy
Artwork by John Wayne Gacy
People v. John Wayne Gacy "Cook County Clerk of Court" records and archives
Audio interview of Sam Amirante and Danny Broderick, authors of John Wayne Gacy: Defending a Monster
Chicago Sun-Times news article exploring the possibility Gacy had a minimum of one accomplice
John Wayne Gacy's Other Victims: A website detailing the ongoing investigation by Sheriff Tom Dart and Detective Bill Dorsch into the possibility Gacy had committed other murders

 
DEFAULTSORT
























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Frank R. Stockton

Frank Richard Stockton (April 5, 1834 – April 20, 1902) was an American writer and humorist, best known today for a series of innovative children's fairy tales that were widely popular during the last decades of the 19th century. 
LifeBorn in Philadelphia, Stockton was the son of a prominent Methodist minister who discouraged him from a writing career. After he married Mary Ann Edwards Tuttle, the couple moved to Nutley, New Jersey. For years he supported himself as a wood engraver until his father's death in 1860; in 1867, he moved back to Philadelphia to write for a newspaper founded by his brother. His first fairy tale, "Ting-a-ling," was published that year in The Riverside Magazine; his first book collection appeared in 1870.He died in 1902 and is buried at The Woodlands in Philadelphia.
WritingsStockton avoided the didactic moralizing common to children's stories of the time, instead using clever humor to poke at greed, violence, abuse of power and other human foibles, describing his fantastic characters' adventures in a charming, matter-of-fact way in stories like "The Griffin and the Minor Canon" (1885) and "The Bee-Man of Orn" (1887), which was published in 1964 in an edition illustrated by Maurice Sendak.  "The Griffin and the Minor Canon" won a Lewis Carroll Shelf Award in 1963.His most famous fable is "The Lady, or the Tiger?" (1882), about a man sentenced to an unusual punishment for having a romance with a king's beloved daughter. Taken to the public arena, he is faced with two doors, behind one of which is a hungry tiger that will devour him. Behind the other is a beautiful lady-in-waiting, whom he will have to marry, if he finds her. While the crowd waits anxiously for his decision, he sees the princess among the spectators, who points him to the door on the right. The lover starts to open the door and ... the story ends abruptly there. Did the princess save her love by pointing to the door leading to the lady-in-waiting, or did she prefer to see her lover die rather than see him marry someone else? That discussion hook has made the story a staple in English classes in American schools, especially since Stockton was careful never to hint at what he thought the ending would be (according to Hiram Collins Haydn in The Thesaurus of Book Digests, ISBN 0-517-00122-5). He also wrote a sequel to the story, "The Discourager of Hesitancy".
Further reading

Jack Zipes, editor, Fairy Tales of Frank Stockton. Penguin Books. 1990. ISBN 0-451-52479-9. With a short critical afterword by Jack Zipes.



The Bee-Man of Orn and Other Fanciful Tales,    public domain audiobook on Librivox.org.



The Bee-Man of Orn and Other Fanciful Tales, public domain ebook on Gutenberg.org.


References  
DEFAULTSORT




 
 
 
 
 
 
	Colfax Avenue
 
 Colfax Avenue is the main street that runs east–west through the Denver-Aurora metropolitan area in Colorado. As U.S. Highway 40, it was one of two principal highways serving Denver before the Interstate Highway System was constructed. In the local street system, it lies 15 blocks north of the zero point (Ellsworth Avenue, one block south of 1st Avenue).  For that reason it would normally be known as "15th Avenue". However, the street was named for the 19th-century politician Schuyler Colfax, as was the town of Colfax, California. On the east it passes through North Aurora, then East Denver, and on the west, through West Denver, then just below Edgewater, and through Northeast and North Lakewood, and finally ends in the southern part of Golden. Colfax Avenue cuts through Original Aurora, the city's historic core, and skirts the southern edge of downtown Denver. Because of the dense, mixed-use character of the development along Colfax Avenue, the Regional Transportation District bus route 15 - East Colfax has the highest ridership in the RTD system.  In 2006, the first Colorado Colfax Marathon was held, traversing the length of Colfax Avenue through the three cities.Playboy magazine once called Colfax "the longest, wickedest street in America." However, such activities are actually isolated to short stretches of the   length of the street. Periodically, Colfax undergoes redevelopment by the municipalities along its course that bring in new housing, trendy businesses and restaurants. Some say that these new developments detract from the character of Colfax, while others worry that they cause gentrification and bring increased traffic to the area.  
History

East Colfax
To understand where East Colfax is today, one must look back more than 100 years to the beginnings of Denver and its main thoroughfare.  Colfax Avenue became the major route into town from the east, and was the address to have for the wealthy and elite class. East Colfax was lined with trees and wide promenades, a beautiful boulevard on the outskirts of town where the Denverites who had made their fortunes could build grandiose mansions.The slow and steady downfall began after the Panic of 1893.  The once lavish and expensive homes along East Colfax and in Capitol Hill were no longer easy to maintain and pay for.  Many owners of the single-family mansions were forced to rent out rooms in their homes to temporary workers and those with lesser income.  In addition, the housing market no longer supported huge mansions on a large lot. As the economy of Denver slumped after the Silver Crash, construction in Capitol Hill concentrated on apartments.  Three buildings still in existence and that are examples of the architecture of this time are The Colonnade, Alta Court, and the Hamilton.  This cultural and demographic shift, from single-family mansions toward boarding houses and rental property for the transient middle class, marked the first significant watershed moment in the history of East Colfax.East Colfax and Capitol Hill, Denver remained a solid middle-class neighborhood until the next demographic change occurred.  After World War II, the mentality of many urban dwellers shifted.  Mortgage lenders preferred new construction and there was a massive "white flight" to the suburbs.  Families and the established middle class left Capitol Hill in a mass diaspora, selling off the family home to a developer interested in putting up a high-rise in its place or leaving the home abandoned.   The demographics of people left behind were an underclass of transients and renters.Also, the zoning along East Colfax has been badly planned for 50 years.  In the 1950s East Colfax was rezoned B4, and the planners encouraged separation of uses and dependence on the automobile.  Property owners along East Colfax found it much more rewarding to tear down an existing historic building and put up a new building in its place, rather than renovating.  Planners and building officials encouraged this, for this was a time when old was considered ugly and new buildings meant progress.In addition the zoning code from the 1950s, a 2:1 floor-area ratio (FAR) was adopted for East Colfax. These ratios determine the square footage of the building in relation to the lot size.  Builders in the 1950s who tore down historic buildings along East Colfax for the purpose of developing a brand new property were required to abide by the car-friendly codes and provide for automobile use.As the feasibility study, East Colfax Avenue: An Opportunity and a Model for Development Action, claims about the streetscape of East Colfax, "[East Colfax is designed to] encourage development of smaller parcels that lack frontage definition, have unevenly deep setback patterns and leave a large quantity of undeveloped space."  This FAR almost single-handedly contributed to the architectural demise of East Colfax.Phil Goodstein, a Denver historian, analyzes the effect of the FAR in his book, The Ghosts of Denver: Capitol Hill. "Now the businesses were set back from the sidewalk with a parking lot between the store and the street.  Every block, it seemed, became a parking lot while customers found it necessary to drive from one store to the next.  Pedestrians had to dodge cars in the middle of the block... In light of this unpleasant walking atmosphere and Denver's increasing addiction to the automobile, the number of people on the street declined.  With this, the neighborhood became less safe." It was a steady downward spiral with many factors leading to what East Colfax is today, including the lack of interest in historic buildings and the myopic visions of the 1950s planners.Another monumental watershed moment in the history of East Colfax Avenue was the completion of Interstate 70.  No longer did incoming tourists drive down the thoroughfare on their way into downtown.   The tourist dollar was effectively wiped out as a revenue source for East Colfax after this decade.  So began another downward spiral.  With no tourists to spend money along East Colfax the businesses suffered, as did the demand to go to Capitol Hill.

A factor in the increase in urban poor along Colfax has been linked to Denver Urban Renewal Authority's plans for urban renewal in Downtown Denver.  In the now-discredited belief that tearing down historic buildings and replacing them with modern architecture and high-rises would benefit cities, DURA bulldozed the bulk of Larimer Street in downtown. The urban poor that had been housed in Larimer Street's single room occupancy buildings were now displaced to Colfax.Since grand Victorian mansions could be purchased for next to nothing, the state bought them up to house the recently freed mentally ill.  The 1960s were a time of great social upheaval and civil rights activism.  The functional, yet mentally ill, who were once forced to remain locked up were now de-institutionalized and living in the rundown mansions on Capitol Hill.  The mentally ill wandered East Colfax in droves, creating an atmosphere and a reality that only solidified the public's perception and known fact that East Colfax is a dangerous place.
West Colfax
West Colfax Avenue began as a trail blazed during the Colorado Gold Rush, being a well-traveled direct route to the gold fields in the mountains.  Historic media and other sources confirm its existence at least as far back as the spring of 1859, and it immediately became a major thoroughfare of goods, people and transportation service to and from the Colorado mountains.  Soon it took on its original name, South Golden Road, as the southern road from Denver to Golden.Originally West Colfax was configured with two major differences than how it exists today.  It did not proceed past today's intersection with Wide Acres Road, as originally Wide Acres and today's South Golden (or Old Golden) roads were the continuation of the thoroughfare into Golden.  Also, the road's original route took it through the bed of present-day Sloan's Lake, then a convenient swale for road travel.  Stagecoach driver Bill Turner, who drove the route for the Central Overland California and Pike's Peak Express, told the Colorado Transcript in 1909 how and when this changed: The road for many years traveled over open prairie with various farms along the way.  With the arrival of a tramway line running along West 13th Avenue, landowner William A.H. Loveland and others laid out the new city of Lakewood between Golden and Denver.  The road, which soon became known as Colfax, became Lakewood's main thoroughfare.  Schuyler Colfax himself had actually once traveled this portion of the road named after him, when he was traveling by stagecoach with presidential candidate Ulysses S. Grant during a campaign getaway in 1868.  In the meantime of the late 19th Century, the eastern end of West Colfax became home to numerous Jewish people of the Denver area.  In 1898, Dr. Charles David Spivak, a noted Russian immigrant, physician and genealogist, established the Jewish Consumptives Relief Society to treat tuberculosis victims on a   campus in today's 6400 block of the road.  This sanitorium treated victims of the White Plague who were too poor to pay or whose cases were too desperate to cure.  The Golden Hill Cemetery was established at the western end of the road, divided into mainstream and the hill sections, the hill being the final resting place of victims who could not be cured.  The hill section, as well as the JCRS campus, are now listed on the National Register of Historic Places.Around 1914 West Colfax was paved with cement and designated a state highway, and it continued evolving into a major commercial thoroughfare of the region.  During Prohibition it began showing signs of more colorful notoriety when scofflaw roadhouses such as Twilight Gardens operated along the thoroughfare.  In 1937 the Works Progress Administration completely paved and modernized the highway, and built a new western route which took it over the hill and across ranch land to the entrance of Mt. Vernon Canyon, its present route.  Around this time Colfax was designated U.S. Highway 40.  From there on, commercial development boomed, including numerous motels, automobile dealerships, restaurants and more.  After World War II it was a classic neon-lined highway for natives and travelers of its era; among its landmarks was Davies Chuck Wagon Diner, brought there in 1957 by restaurateur rancher Lyman Davies.  The diner is also listed on the National Register of Historic Places.  In 1956, two shopping malls, Westland and the JCRS Center, were built along Colfax, introducing major department stores and groceries to the area.  At its far west end, at the base of the mountains, the Magic Mountain theme park was built, among the first of its kind in the world.  The theme park, like many of its era, collapsed, but was resurrected in the 1970s as Heritage Square, which still exists  .After the construction of nearby West 6th Avenue and Interstate 70, West Colfax Avenue through Denver's West Colfax Neighborhood, Northeast Lakewood, and Edgewater slowly declined and gained the seedy crime reputation and reality of its eastern counterpart. Since the 1970s, West Colfax Avenue through west Denver, Northeast Lakewood, Edgewater has had a high reputation and population of Mexican Americans as well as other Latino immigrants. During the 1990s, Lakewood began what has become a series of urban renewal and beautification efforts along the thoroughfare, from streetscaping to encouraging new proliferation of neon lighting to capitalize on its colorful past.  Westland was rebuilt, and the JCRS Center also modified, but not so far as to eliminate the highly popular Casa Bonita restaurant which joined it in 1974.  On the west end, the Stevinson family, who had originally built automobile dealerships there in the 1960s, built the new Denver West Village shopping center in 1997.  In 2002 the Colorado Mills shopping center was built and opened across Colfax from there, the largest commercial development yet built on Colfax.In the late 1990s the entirety of Colfax Avenue was designated a Colorado Heritage Corridor by the state government.
Historic landmarks
These places along Colfax Avenue have been listed on the National Register of Historic Places:

Basilica of the Immaculate Conception
Civic Center Historic District
Denver Mint
West Side Court Building
East High School
Davies' Chuck Wagon Diner
Jewish Consumptives' Relief Society
Hill Section, Golden Hill Cemetery


Current status

In attempts at clean up, Capitol Hill United Neighborhoods (CHUN) asked the property owners along East Colfax between Pearl and Sherman if they could apply for a local Historic District status for the connected blocks.  The Cathedral Basilica of the Immaculate Conception, is on the corner of Colfax and Logan Street and is one of the buildings that would be involved in this designation.  According to spokespeople at CHUN, local property owners, perhaps fearing the restrictions that Local Historic District designation might place on them, chose not to pursue Historic District status.All of these factors created a climate for depressed real estate values, and weak infrastructure.  The downfall of East Colfax was a slow and steady downward spiral of neglect, perception and poor governmental choices.  More recently, preservationists and developers have renovated sections of East Colfax between Downing Street and Park Avenue.Blueprint Denver has been a driving force toward the clean up of East Colfax.  Blueprint Denver is the growth plan for the 21st century and addresses zoning changes along East Colfax for more mixed-use, high density, pedestrian friendly development and renovation, while at the same addressing transportation issues for the Avenue. The planning and zoning issues that have plagued East Colfax for decades will be addressed and rewritten in an attempt to streamline the process for better urban design in the Capitol Hill business district. Denver has made serious levels of commitment to the improvement of East Colfax.
In popular cultureJack Kerouac's Beat Generation novel On the Road, some of which takes place in Denver, contains several references to Colfax.  The protagonist, Sal Paradise, at one point keeps an apartment there and drinks in its bars.  When the characters Dean Moriarty, Marylou and Ed Dunkel leave Denver, Kerouac writes that they "roared east along Colfax and out to the Kansas plains" — this was before the construction of Interstate 70.In the "Erection Day" episode of South Park, Jimmy tries to buy a hooker at Colfax Point, a reference to sections of the avenue noted for prostitution. The "Casa Bonita" episode of South Park features a visit to Casa Bonita, a Mexican-themed restaurant and entertainment complex located on west Colfax in Northeast Lakewood.  In the South Park episode "My Future Self n' Me", a secretive business is shown to be located at 3451 Colfax Avenue; although this address seems to be featured prominently in the episode, in reality, nothing unusual appears to be at that address on either West or East Colfax.  In the ninth season episode "Bloody Mary," one of Randy Marsh's Alcoholics Anonymous classmates exclaims "No more blowing guys on Colfax Avenue for a pint of vodka for this cowboy!"Five Iron Frenzy, a ska-punk band consisting of Denver natives, has a song called "Where the Zero Meets the Fifteen".  The songs lyrics describe how an experience at Colfax and Broadway made the singer feel as though he would be unsuccessful in his continuing attempts to save the world.  The title refers to two bus routes that cross at this intersection; in the song, the narrator is waiting at a bus stop.In the movie About Schmidt, Jack Nicholson's character drives his RV along a stretch of East Colfax near Ogden Street.  The Royal Host Motel and the Ogden Theater are visible.In the movie Things to Do in Denver When You're Dead, Jimmy "The Saint" Tosnia picks up a prostitute along East Colfax, in front of the Bluebird Theater.The Denver band Slim Cessna's Auto Club mentions Colfax in the song "Champagne Like a Lady" while comparing a girl to a Colfax hooker
References 

 


External links

Main Street, USA from the Denver Westword
Eat, Drink and Be Merry on East Colfax
Definitive guide to Colfax Avenue









 
 
	Alcibiades
 
 
Alcibiades, son of Clinias, from the deme of Scambonidae ( ;  Greek:  , transliterated Alkibiádēs Kleiníou Skambōnidēs; c. 450–404 BC), was a prominent Athenian  , orator, and general. He was the last famous member of his mother's aristocratic family, the Alcmaeonidae, which fell from prominence after the Peloponnesian War. He played a major role in the second half of that conflict as a strategic advisor, military commander, and politician.During the course of the Peloponnesian War, Alcibiades changed his political allegiance on several occasions. In his native Athens in the early 410s BC, he advocated an aggressive foreign policy, and was a prominent proponent of the Sicilian Expedition, but fled to Sparta after his political enemies brought charges of sacrilege against him. In Sparta, he served as a strategic adviser, proposing or supervising several major campaigns against Athens. In Sparta too, however, Alcibiades soon made powerful enemies and was forced to defect to Persia. There he served as an adviser to the satrap Tissaphernes until his Athenian political allies brought about his recall. He then served as an Athenian General (Strategos) for several years, but his enemies eventually succeeded in exiling him a second time.The Sicilian Expedition was Alcibiades' idea, and scholars have argued that, had that expedition been under Alcibiades' command instead of Nicias', the expedition might not have met its eventual disastrous fate. A. Vlachos, Thucydides' Bias, 59 &c.  In the years that he served Sparta, Alcibiades played a significant role in Athens' undoing; the capture of Decelea and the revolts of several critical Athenian subjects occurred either at his suggestion or under his supervision. Once restored to his native city, however, he played a crucial role in a string of Athenian victories that eventually brought Sparta to seek a peace with Athens. He favored unconventional tactics, frequently winning cities over by treachery or negotiation rather than by siege. P.B. Kern, Ancient Siege Warfare, 151.  Alcibiades' military and political talents frequently proved valuable to whichever state currently held his allegiance, but his propensity for making powerful enemies ensured that he never remained in one place for long; and, by the end of the war he had helped rekindle in the early 410s, his days of political relevance were a bygone memory.
Early years
Alcibiades was born in ancient Athens, the son of Cleinias and Deinomache. His mother was the daughter of Megacles, and could trace her family back to Eurysaces and the Telamonian Ajax. Plato, Alcibiades 1, 121a.  Alcibiades thereby, through his mother, belonged to the powerful and controversial family of the Alcmaeonidae; the renowned Pericles and his brother Ariphron were Deinomache's cousins, as her father and their mother were siblings. C.A. Cox, Household Interests, 144.  His maternal grandfather, also named Alcibiades, was a friend of Cleisthenes, the famous constitutional reformer of the late 6th century BC.    After the death of Cleinias at the Battle of Coronea (447 BC), Pericles and Ariphron became his guardians. N. Denyer, Commentary of Plato's Alcibiades, 88–89.  According to Plutarch, Alcibiades had several famous teachers, including Socrates, and was well trained in the art of Rhetoric.  He was noted, however, for his unruly behavior, which was mentioned by ancient Greek and Latin writers on several occasions. Alcibiades took part in the Battle of Potidaea in 432 BC, where Socrates was said to have saved his life Plato, Symposium, 220e.  and again at the Battle of Delium in 424 BC.  Alcibiades had a particularly close relationship with Socrates, whom he admired and respected. I. Sykoutris, Introduction to Symposium, 159–180.  Plato, Symposium, 215a–222b.  According to Plutarch, Alcibiades "feared and reverenced Socrates alone, and despised the rest of his lovers". Plutarch, Alcibiades, 6. Alcibiades was married to Hipparete, the daughter of Hipponicus, a wealthy Athenian. According to Plutarch, Hipparete loved her husband, but she attempted to divorce him because he consorted with courtesans. She lived with him until her death and gave birth to two children, a daughter and a son, Alcibiades the Younger. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 8. 
Political career until 412 BC
Rise to prominenceAlcibiades first rose to prominence when he began advocating aggressive Athenian action after the signing of the Peace of Nicias. That treaty, an uneasy truce between Sparta and Athens signed midway through the Peloponnesian War, came at the end of seven years of fighting during which neither side had gained a decisive advantage. Historians Arnold W. Gomme and Raphael Sealey believe, and Thucydides reports, Thucydides, "The History of the Peloponnesian Wars", 5.43.  that Alcibiades was offended that the Spartans had negotiated that treaty through Nicias and Laches, overlooking him on account of his youth. A.W. Gomme, A Historical Commentary on Thucydides, 339.  R. Sealey, A History of the Greek City States, 353. Disputes over the interpretation of the treaty led the Spartans to dispatch ambassadors to Athens with full powers to arrange all unsettled matters. The Athenians initially received these ambassadors well, but Alcibiades met with them in secret before they were to speak to the ecclesia (the Athenian Assembly) and told them that the Assembly was haughty and had great ambitions. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 14.  He urged them to renounce their diplomatic authority to represent Sparta, and instead allow him to assist them through his influence in Athenian politics.  The representatives agreed and, impressed with Alcibiades, they alienated themselves from Nicias, who genuinely wanted to reach an agreement with the Spartans.  The next day, during the Assembly, Alcibiades asked them what powers Sparta had granted them to negotiate and they replied, as agreed, that they had not come with full and independent powers. This was in direct contradiction to what they had said the day before, and Alcibiades seized on this opportunity to denounce their character, cast suspicion on their aims, and destroy their credibility. This ploy increased Alcibiades' standing while embarrassing Nicias, and Alcibiades was subsequently appointed General. He took advantage of his increasing power to orchestrate the creation of an alliance between Argos, Mantinea, Elis, and other states in the Peloponnese, threatening Sparta's dominance in the region. According to Gomme, "it was a grandiose scheme for an Athenian general at the head of a mainly Peloponnesian army to march through the Peloponnese cocking a snook at Sparta when her reputation was at its lowest". A.W. Gomme, A Historical Commentary on Thucydides, 70.  This alliance, however, would ultimately be defeated at the Battle of Mantinea. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 15. Somewhere in the years 416–415 BC, a complex struggle took place between Hyperbolos on one side and Nicias and Alcibiades on the other. Hyperbolos tried to bring about the ostracism of one of this pair, but Nicias and Alcibiades combined their influence to induce the people to expel Hyperbolos instead. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 13.  This incident reveals that Nicias and Alcibiades each commanded a personal following, whose votes were determined by the wishes of the leaders. Alcibiades was not one of the Generals involved in the capture of Melos in 416–415 BC, but Plutarch describes him as a supporter of the decree by which the grown men of Melos were killed and the women and children enslaved. Plutarch, Alcibiades, XVI.  The orator Andocides alleges that Alcibiades had a child by one of these enslaved women. Andocides, Against Alcibiades, 22. 
Sicilian Expedition 
In 415 BC, delegates from the Sicilian city of Segesta ( ) arrived at Athens to plead for the support of the Athenians in their war against Selinus. During the debates on the undertaking, Nicias was vehemently opposed to Athenian intervention, explaining that the campaign would be very costly and attacking the character and motives of Alcibiades, who had emerged as the supporter of the expedition. On the other hand, Alcibiades argued that a campaign in this new theatre would bring riches to the city and expand the empire, just as the Persian Wars had. In his speech Alcibiades predicted (over-optimistically, in the opinion of most historians) that the Athenians would be able to recruit allies in the region and impose their rule on Syracuse, the most powerful city of Sicily. Platias-Koliopoulos, Thucydides on Strategy, 237–46.  In spite of Alcibiades' enthusiastic advocacy for the plan, it was Nicias, not he, who turned a modest undertaking into a massive campaign and made the conquest of Sicily seem possible and safe.  It was at his suggestion that the size of the fleet was significantly increased from 60 ships  to "140 galleys, 5,100 men at arms, and about 1300 archers, slingers, and light armed men".  Philosopher Leo Strauss underscores that the Sicilian expedition surpassed everything undertaken by Pericles. Almost certainly Nicias' intention was to shock the assembly with his high estimate of the forces required, but, instead of dissuading his fellow citizens, his analysis made them all the more eager. L. Strauss, The City and Man, 104.   Against his wishes Nicias was appointed General along with Alcibiades and Lamachus, all three of whom were given full powers to do whatever was in the best interests of Athens while in Sicily. Thucydides,  . One night during preparations for the expedition, the hermai, heads of the god Hermes on a plinth with a phallus, were mutilated throughout Athens. This was a religious scandal and was seen as a bad omen for the mission. Plutarch explains that Androcles, a political leader, used false witnesses who accused Alcibiades and his friends of mutilating the statues, and of profaning the Eleusinian Mysteries. Later his opponents, chief among them being Androcles and Thessalus, Cimon's son, enlisted orators to argue that Alcibiades should set sail as planned and stand trial on his return from the campaign. Alcibiades was suspicious of their intentions, and asked to be allowed to stand trial immediately, under penalty of death, in order to clear his name. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 19.  This request was denied, and the fleet set sail soon after, with the charges unresolved. Thucydides,  . 

"Men do not rest content with parrying the attacks of a superior, but often strike the first blow to prevent the attack being made. And we cannot fix the exact point at which our empire shall stop; we have reached a position in which we must not be content with retaining but must scheme to extend it, for, if we cease to rule others, we are in danger of being ruled ourselves. Nor can you look at inaction from the same point of view as others, unless you are prepared to change your habits and make them like theirs." 
Alcibiades' Oration before the Sicilian expedition as recorded by Thucydides, (VI, 18) ; Thucydides disclaims verbal accuracy. 
As Alcibiades had suspected, his absence emboldened his enemies, and they began to accuse him of other sacrilegious actions and comments and even alleged that these actions were connected with a plot against the democracy. Thucydides,  .  According to Thucydides, the Athenians were always in fear and took everything suspiciously. Thucydides,  .  When the fleet arrived in Catana, it found the state trireme Salaminia waiting to bring Alcibiades and the others indicted for mutilating the hermai or profaning the Eleusinian Mysteries back to Athens to stand trial.  Alcibiades told the heralds that he would follow them back to Athens in his ship, but in Thurii he escaped with his crew; in Athens he was convicted in absentia and condemned to death. His property was confiscated and a reward of one talent was promised to whoever succeeded in killing any who had fled.  Meanwhile the Athenian force in Sicily, after a few early victories, moved against Messina, where the Generals expected their secret allies within the city to betray it to them. Alcibiades, however, foreseeing that he would be outlawed, gave information to the friends of the Syracusans in Messina, who succeeded in preventing the admission of the Athenians. Thucydides,    With the death of Lamachus in battle some time later, command of the Sicilian Expedition fell into the hands of Nicias, whom modern scholars have judged to be an inadequate military leader. 
Defection to SpartaAfter his disappearance at Thurii, Alcibiades quickly contacted the Spartans, "promising to render them aid and service greater than all the harm he had previously done them as an enemy" if they would offer him sanctuary. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 23.  The Spartans granted this request and received him among them. In the debate at Sparta over whether to send a force to relieve Syracuse, Alcibiades spoke and instilled fear of Athenian ambition into the Spartan ephors by informing them that the Athenians hoped to conquer Sicily, Italy, and even Carthage. Thucydides,  .  Yale historian Donald Kagan believes that Alcibiades knowingly exaggerated the plans of the Athenians to convince the Spartans of the benefit they stood to gain from his help. Kagan asserts that Alcibiades had not yet acquired his "legendary" reputation, and the Spartans saw him as "a defeated and hunted man" whose policies "produced strategic failures" and brought "no decisive result". If accurate, this assessment underscores one of Alcibiades' greatest talents, his highly persuasive oratory. D. Kagan, The Peloponnesian War, 282–3.  After making the threat seem imminent, Alcibiades advised the Spartans to send troops and most importantly, a Spartan commander to discipline and aid the Syracusans. 

"Our party was that of the whole people, our creed being to do our part in preserving the form of government under which the city enjoyed the utmost greatness and freedom, and which we had found existing. As for democracy, the men of sense among us knew what it was, and I perhaps as well as any, as I have the more cause to complain of it; but there is nothing new to be said of a patent absurdity — meanwhile we did not think it safe to alter it under the pressure of your hostility." 
Alcibiades' Speech to the Spartans as recorded by Thucydides, (VI, 89]) ; Thucydides disclaims verbal accuracy. 
Alcibiades served as a military adviser to Sparta and helped the Spartans secure several crucial successes. He advised them to build a permanent fort at Decelea, just over ten miles (16 km) from Athens and within sight of the city. Thucydides,  .  By doing this, the Spartans cut the Athenians off entirely from their homes and crops and the silver mines of Sunium.  This was part of Alcibiades'plan to renew the war with Athens in Attica. The move was devastating to Athens and forced the citizens to live within the long walls of the city year round, making them entirely dependent on their seaborne trade for food. Seeing Athens thus beleaguered on a second front, members of the Delian League began to contemplate revolt. In the wake of Athens' disastrous defeat in Sicily, Alcibiades sailed to Ionia with a Spartan fleet and succeeded in persuading several critical cities to revolt. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 24.  Thucydides,  . In spite of these valuable contributions to the Spartan cause, Alcibiades fell out of favor with the Spartan government at around this time, ruled by Agis II.    Leotychides, the son born by Agis' wife Timaia shortly after this, was believed by many to be Alcibiades' son. Plutarch, Lysander, 22.  Plutarch, Agesilaus, III.  Alcibiades' influence was further reduced after the retirement of Endius, the ephor who was on good terms with him. P.J. Rhodes, A History of the Classical Greek World, 144.  It is alleged that Astiochus, a Spartan Admiral, was sent orders to kill him, but Alcibiades received warning of this order and defected to the Persian satrap Tissaphernes, who had been supporting the Peloponnesian forces financially in 412 BC. Thucydides,   
In Asia Minor
On his arrival in the local Persian court, Alcibiades won the trust of the powerful satrap and made several policy suggestions which were well received. According to Thucydides, Alcibiades immediately began to do all he could with Tissaphernes to injure the Peloponnesian cause. At his urging, the satrap reduced the payments he was making to the Peloponnesian fleet and began delivering them irregularly.  Alcibiades next advised Tissaphernes to bribe the Generals of the cities to gain valuable intelligence on their activities. Lastly, and most importantly, he told the satrap to be in no hurry to bring the Persian fleet into the conflict, as the longer the war dragged out the more exhausted the combatants would become. This would allow the Persians to more easily conquer the region in the aftermath of the fighting. Alcibiades tried to convince the satrap that it was in Persia's interest to wear both Athens and Sparta out at first, "and after docking the Athenian power as much as he could, forthwith to rid the country of the Peloponnesians". Thucydides,    Although Alcibiades' advice benefited the Persians, it was merely a means to an end; Thucydides tells us that his real motive was to use his alleged influence with the Persians to effect his restoration to Athens. Thucydides,   
Recall to Athens
Negotiations with the Athenian oligarchsAlcibiades seemed to assume that the "radical democracy" would never agree to his recall to Athens. T. Buckley, Aspects of Greek History, 411.  Therefore, he exchanged messages with the Athenian leaders at Samos and suggested that if they could install an oligarchy friendly to him he would return to Athens and bring with him Persian money and possibly the Persian fleet of 147 triremes.  Alcibiades set about winning over the most influential military officers, and achieved his goal by offering them a threefold plan: the Athenian constitution was to be changed, the recall of Alcibiades was to be voted, and Alcibiades was to win over Tissaphernes and the King of Persia to the Athenian side. Most of the officers in the Athenian fleet accepted the plan and welcomed the prospect of a narrower constitution, which would allow them a greater share in determining policy. According to Thucydides, only one of the Athenian Generals at Samos, Phrynichus, opposed the plan and argued that Alcibiades cared no more for the proposed oligarchy than for the traditional democracy. R. Sealey, A History of the Greek City States, 359.  The involvement in the plot of another General, Thrasybulus, remains unclear. These officers of the Athenian fleet formed a group of conspirators, but were met with opposition from the majority of the soldiers and sailors; these were eventually calmed down "by the advantageous prospect of the pay from the king". Thucydides,  .  The members of the group assembled and prepared to send Pisander, one of their number, on an embassy to Athens to treat for the restoration of Alcibiades and the abolition of the democracy in the city, and thus to make Tissaphernes the friend of the Athenians. Thucydides,  . Phrynichus, fearing that Alcibiades if restored would avenge himself upon him for his opposition, sent a secret letter to the Spartan Admiral, Astyochus, to tell him that Alcibiades was ruining their cause by making Tissaphernes the friend of the Athenians, and containing an express revelation of the rest of the intrigue. Astyochus went up to Alcibiades and Tissaphernes at Magnesia and communicated to them Phrynichus's letter. Alcibiades responded in kind, sending to the authorities at Samos a letter against Phrynichus, stating what he had done, and requiring that he should be put to death. Thucydides,  .  Phrynichus in desperation wrote again to Astyochus, offering him a chance to destroy the Athenian fleet at Samos. This also Astyochus revealed to Alcibiades who informed the officers at Samos that they had been betrayed by Phrynichus. Alcibiades however gained no credit, because Phrynichus had anticipated Alcibiades' letter and, before the accusations could arrive, told the army that he had received information of an enemy plan to attack the camp and that they should fortify Samos as quickly as possible. Thucydides,  . Despite these events, Pisander and the other envoys of the conspirators arrived at Athens and made a speech before the people. Pisander won the argument, putting Alcibiades and his promises at the center. The Ecclesia deposed Phrynichus and elected Pisander and ten other envoys to negotiate with Tissaphernes and Alcibiades. Thucydides,  . At this point, Alcibiades' scheme encountered a great obstacle. Tissaphernes would not make an agreement on any terms, wanting to follow his policy of neutrality. D. Kagan, The Fall of the Athenian Empire, 136–8.  As Kagan points out, Tissaphernes was a prudent leader and had recognized the advantages of wearing each side out without direct Persian involvement.  Alcibiades realized this and, by presenting the Athenians with stiffer and stiffer demands on Tissaphernes' behalf, attempted to convince them that he had persuaded Tissaphernes to support them, but that they had not conceded enough to him. Although the envoys were angered at the audacity of the Persian demands, they nevertheless departed with the impression that Alcibiades could have brought about an agreement among the powers if he had chosen to do so. Thucydides, The Peloponnesian War,  .  This   at the court of Tissaphernes, however, put an end to the negotiations between the conspirators and Alcibiades.  The group was convinced that Alcibiades could not deliver his side of the bargain without demanding exorbitantly high concessions of them and they accordingly abandoned their plans to restore him to Athens. 
Reinstatement as an Athenian General 
In spite of the failure of the negotiations, the conspirators succeeded in overthrowing the democracy and imposing the oligarchic government of the Four Hundred, among the leaders of which were Phrynichus and Pisander. At Samos, however, a similar coup instigated by the conspirators did not go forward so smoothly. Samian democrats learned of the conspiracy and notified four prominent Athenians: the generals Leon and Diomedon, the trierarch Thrasybulus, and Thrasyllus, at that time a hoplite in the ranks. With the support of these men and the Athenian soldiers in general, the Samian democrats were able to defeat the 300 Samian oligarchs who attempted to seize power there. Thucydides,  .  Further, the Athenian troops at Samos formed themselves into a political assembly, deposed their generals, and elected new ones, including Thrasybulus and Thrasyllus. The army, stating that they had not revolted from the city but that the city had revolted from them, resolved to stand by the democracy while continuing to prosecute the war against Sparta. After a time, Thrasybulus persuaded the assembled troops to vote Alcibiades' recall, a policy that he had supported since before the coup. Then he sailed to retrieve Alcibiades and returned with him to Samos. The aim of this policy was to win away Persian support from the Spartans, as it was still believed that Alcibiades had great influence with Tissaphernes. Thucydides,  .  Plutarch claims that the army sent for Alcibiades so as to use his help in putting down the tyrants in Athens. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 26.  Kagan argues that this reinstatement was a disappointment to Alcibiades, who had hoped for a glorious return to Athens itself but found himself only restored to the rebellious fleet, where the immunity from prosecution he had been granted "protected him for the time being but not from a reckoning in the future"; furthermore, the recall, which Alcibiades had hoped to bring about through his own prestige and perceived influence, was achieved through the patronage of Thrasybulus. Kagan, The Peloponnesian War, 389. At his first speech to the assembled troops, Alcibiades complained bitterly about the circumstances of his exile, but the greatest part of the speech consisted of boasting about his influence with Tissaphernes. The primary motives of his speech were to make the oligarchs at Athens afraid of him and to increase his credit with the army at Samos. Upon hearing his speech the troops immediately elected him General alongside Thrasybulus and the others. In fact, he roused them so much that they proposed to sail at once for Piraeus and attack the oligarchs in Athens. Thucydides,  .  It was primarily Alcibiades, along with Thrasybulus, who calmed the people and showed them the folly of this proposal, which would have sparked civil war and led to the immediate defeat of Athens.  Shortly after Alcibiades' reinstatement as an Athenian general, the government of the Four Hundred was overthrown and replaced by a broader oligarchy, which would eventually give way to democracy. Presently Alcibiades sailed to Tissaphernes with a detachment of ships. According to Plutarch, the supposed purpose of this mission was to stop the Persian fleet from coming to the aid of the Peloponnesians.  Thucydides is in agreement with Plutarch that the Persian fleet was at Aspendus and that Alcibiades told the troops he would bring the fleet to their side or prevent it from coming at all, but Thucydides further speculates that the real reason was to flaunt his new position to Tissaphernes and try to gain some real influence over him.  According to the historian, Alcibiades had long known that Tissaphernes never meant to bring the fleet at all. Thucydides,  . 
Battles of Abydos and Cyzicus

For more details on this topic, see Battle of Abydos and Battle of Cyzicus
Alcibiades was recalled by the "intermediate regime" of The Five Thousand, the government which succeeded the Four Hundred in 411, but it is most likely that he waited until 407 BC to actually return to the city. Cartwright-Warner, A Historical Commentary on Thucydides, 301.  Plutarch tells us that, although his recall had already been passed on motion of Critias, a political ally of his, Alcibiades was resolved to come back with glory. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 27.  While this was certainly his goal, it was again a means to an end, that end being avoiding prosecution upon his return to Athens.The next significant part he would play in the war would occur at the Battle of Abydos. Alcibiades had remained behind at Samos with a small force while Thrasybulus and Thrasyllus led the greater part of the fleet to the Hellespont. During this period, Alcibiades succeeded in raising money from Caria and the neighboring area, with which he was able to pay the rowers and gain their favor.  After the Athenian victory at Cynossema, both fleets summoned all their ships from around the Aegean to join them for what might be a decisive next engagement.
While Alcibiades was still en route, the two fleets clashed at Abydos, where the Peloponnesians had set up their main naval base. The battle was evenly matched, and raged for a long time, but the balance tipped towards the Athenians when Alcibiades sailed into the Hellespont with eighteen triremes.  Xenophon, Hellenica, 1.1.5.  The Persian satrap Pharnabazus, who had replaced Tissaphernes as the sponsor of the Peloponnesian fleet, moved his land army to the shore to defend the ships and sailors who had beached their ships. Only the support of the Persian land army and the coming of night saved the Peloponnesian fleet from complete destruction. Shortly after the battle, Tissaphernes had arrived in the Hellespont and Alcibiades left the fleet at Sestos to meet him, bringing gifts and hoping to once again try to win over the Persian governor. Evidently Alcibiades had gravely misjudged his standing with the satrap, and he was arrested on arrival.  Within a month he would escape and resume command. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 28.  It was now obvious, however, that he had no influence with the Persians; from now on his authority would depend on what he actually could accomplish rather than on what he promised to do. Kagan, The Peloponnesian War, 410. After an interlude of several months in which the Peloponnesians constructed new ships and the Athenians besieged cities and raised money throughout the Aegean, the next major sea battle took place the spring of 410 BC at Cyzicus. Alcibiades had been forced to flee from Sestos to Cardia to protect his small fleet from the rebuilt Peloponnesian navy, but as soon as the Athenian fleet was reunited there its commanders led it to Cyzicus, where the Athenians had intelligence indicating that Pharnabazus and Mindarus, the Peloponnesian fleet commander, were together plotting their next move. Concealed by storm and darkness, the combined Athenian force reached the vicinity without being spotted by the Peloponnesians.  Here the Athenians devised a plot to draw the enemy into battle. According to Diodorus Siculus, Alcibiades advanced with a small squadron in order to draw the Spartans out to battle, and, after he successfully deceived Mindarus with this ploy, the squadrons of Thrasybulus and Theramenes came to join him, cutting off the Spartans' retreat.  Diodorus, XIII, 50–1. The Spartan fleet suffered losses in the flight and reached the shore with the Athenians in close pursuit. Alcibiades' troops, leading the Athenian pursuit, landed and attempted to pull the Spartan ships back out to sea. The Peloponnesians fought to prevent their ships from being towed away, and Pharnabazus's troops came up to support them. Xenophon, Hellenica, 1.1.17–23.  Thrasybulus landed his own force to temporarily relieve pressure on Alcibiades, and meanwhile ordered Theramenes to join up with Athenian land forces nearby and bring them to reinforce the sailors and marines on the beach. The Spartans and Persians, overwhelmed by the arrival of multiple forces from several directions, were defeated and driven off, and the Athenians captured all the Spartan ships which were not destroyed.   A letter dispatched to Sparta by Hippocrates, vice-admiral under Mindarus, was intercepted and taken to Athens; it ran as follows: "The ships are lost. Mindarus is dead. The men are starving. We know not what to do".  A short time later Sparta petitioned for peace, but their appeals were ultimately rejected by the Athenians. Diodorus, Library, 52–3. 
Further military successes
After their victory, Alcibiades and Thrasybulus began the siege of Chalcedon in 409 BC with about 190 ships.  Although unable to attain a decisive victory or induce the city to surrender, Alcibiades was able to win a small tactical land battle outside of the city gates and Theramenes concluded an agreement with the Chalcedonians. Diodorus, Library, xiii, 66.3  Afterwards they concluded a temporary alliance with Pharnabazus which secured some much needed immediate cash for the army, but despite this Alcibiades was still forced to depart in search for more booty to pay the soldiers and oarsmen of the fleet.In pursuit of these funds he traveled to the Thracian Chersonese and attacked Selymbria. He plotted with a pro-Athenian party within the city and offered the Selymbrians reasonable terms and imposed strict discipline to see that they were observed. He did their city no injury whatsoever, but merely took a sum of money from it, set a garrison in it and left. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 30  Epigraphical evidence indicates the Selymbrians surrendered hostages until the treaty was ratified in Athens.  His performance is judged as skillful by historians, since it saved time, resources, and lives and still fully achieved his goal.  From here Alcibiades joined in the siege of Byzantium along with Theramenes and Thrasyllus. A portion of the citizens of the city, demoralized and hungry, decided to surrender the city to Alcibiades for similar terms as the Selymbrians had received. On the designated night the defenders left their posts, and the Athenians attacked the Peloponnesian garrison in the city and their boats in the harbor. The portion of the citizenry that remained loyal to the Peloponnesians fought so savagely that Alcibiades issued a statement in the midst of the fighting which guaranteed their safety and this persuaded the remaining citizens to turn against the Peloponnesian garrison, which was nearly totally destroyed. Diodorus, Library, xiii, 67.1 
Return to Athens, Dismissal and Death
Return to AthensIt was in the aftermath of these successes that Alcibiades resolved to finally return to Athens in the spring of 407 BC. Even in the wake of his recent victories, Alcibiades was exceedingly careful in his return, mindful of the changes in government, the charges still technically hanging over him, and the great injury he had done to Athens. Thus Alcibiades, instead of going straight home, first went to Samos to pick up 20 ships and proceeded with them to the Ceramic Gulf where he collected 100 talents. He finally sailed to Gytheion to make inquiries, partly about the reported preparations of the Spartans there, and partly about the feelings in Athens about his return.  His inquiries assured him that the city was kindly disposed towards him and that his closest friends urged him to return. Therefore he finally sailed into Piraeus where the crowd had gathered, desiring to see the famous Alcibiades.  He entered the harbor full of fear till he saw his cousin and others of his friends and acquaintance, who invited him to land. Upon arriving on shore he was greeted with a hero's welcome. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 32.  Nevertheless, some saw an evil omen in the fact that he had returned to Athens on the very day when the ceremony of the Plynteria (the feast where the old statue of Athena would get cleansed) was being celebrated. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 34.  This was regarded as the unluckiest day of the year to undertake anything of importance.  His enemies took note of this and kept it in mind for a future occasion. All the criminal proceedings against him were canceled and the charges of blasphemy were officially withdrawn. Alcibiades was able to assert his piety and to raise Athenian morale by leading the solemn procession to Eleusis (for the celebration of the Eleusinian Mysteries) by land for the first time since the Spartans had occupied Decelea.  The procession had been replaced by a journey by sea, but this year Alcibiades used a detachment of soldiers to escort the traditional procession.  His property was restored and the ecclesia elected him supreme commander of land and sea (strategos autokrator). Plutarch, Alcibiades, 33 
Defeat at Notium 
In 406 BC Alcibiades set out from Athens with 1,500 hoplites and a hundred ships. He failed to take Andros and then he went on to Samos. Later he moved to Notium, closer to the enemy at Ephesus. A. Andrewes, The Spartan Resurgence, 490  In the meanwhile Tissaphernes had been replaced by Cyrus the Younger (son of Darius II of Persia) who decided to financially support the Peloponnesians. This new revenue started to attract Athenian deserters to the Spartan navy. Additionally the Spartans had replaced Mindarus with Lysander, a very capable Admiral. These factors caused the rapid growth of the Peloponnesian fleet at the expense of the Athenian. In search of funds and needing to force another decisive battle, Alcibiades left Notium and sailed to help Thrasybulus in the siege of Phocaea.  Alcibiades was aware the Spartan fleet was nearby, so he left nearly eighty ships to watch them under the command of his personal helmsman Antiochus, who was given express orders not to attack. Antiochus disobeyed this single order and endeavored to draw Lysander into a fight by imitating the tactics used at Cyzicus. The situation at Notium, however, was radically different than that at Cyzicus; the Athenians possessed no element of surprise, and Lysander had been well informed about their fleet by deserters.  Antiochus's ship was sunk, and he was killed by a sudden Spartan attack; the remaining ships of the decoy force were then chased headlong back toward Notium, where the main Athenian force was caught unprepared by the sudden arrival of the whole Spartan fleet. In the ensuing fighting, Lysander gained an entire victory. Alcibiades soon returned and desperately tried to undo the defeat at Notium by scoring another victory, but Lysander could not be compelled to attack the fleet again. Responsibility for the defeat ultimately fell on Alcibiades, and his enemies used the opportunity to attack him and have him removed from command, although some modern scholars believe that Alcibiades was unfairly blamed for Antiochus's mistake. G. Cawkwell, Thucydides and the Peloponnesian War, 143  Diodorus reports that, in addition to his mistake at Notium, Alcibiades was discharged on account of false accusations brought against him by his enemies. Diodorus, Library, xiii, 74.4  According to Anthony Andrewes, professor of ancient history, the extravagant hopes that his successes of the previous summer had created were a decisive element in his downfall.  Consequently Alcibiades condemned himself to exile.  Never again returning to Athens, he sailed north to the castles in the Thracian Chersonese, which he had secured during his time in the Hellespont. The implications of the defeat were severe for Athens. Although the defeat had been minor, it occasioned the removal of not only Alcibiades but also his allies like Thrasybulus, Theramenes and Critias.  These were likely the most capable commanders Athens had at the time and their removal would help lead to the Athenian surrender only two years later after their complete defeat at Aegospotami. 
Death
With one exception, Alcibiades' role in the war ended with his command. Prior to the Battle of Aegospotami, in the last attested fact of his career, B. Perrin, The Death of Alcibiades , 25–37.  Alcibiades recognized that the Athenians were anchored in a tactically disadvantageous spot and advised them to move to Sestus where they could benefit from a harbor and a city. Xenophon, Hellenica, 2.1.25.  Diodorus, however, does not mention this advice, arguing instead that Alcibiades offered the Generals Thracian aid in exchange for a share in the command.  In any case, the Generals of the Athenians, "considering that in case of defeat the blame would attach to them and that in case of success all men would attribute it to Alcibiades", asked him to leave and not come near the camp ever again.  Diodorus, Library, xiii, 105.  Days later the fleet would be annihilated by Lysander.After the Battle of Aegospotami, Alcibiades crossed the Hellespont and took refuge in Phrygia, with the object of securing the aid of Artaxerxes against Sparta.Much about Alcibiades' death is now uncertain, as there are conflicting accounts. According to the oldest of these, the Spartans and specifically Lysander were responsible. Isocrates, Concerning the Team of Horses, 16.40   Though many of his details cannot be independently corroborated, Plutarch's version is this:  Lysander sent an envoy to Pharnabazus who then dispatched his brother to Phrygia where Alcibiades was living with his mistress, Timandra.  In 404 BC, as he was about to set out for the Persian court, his residence was surrounded and set on fire. Seeing no chance of escape he rushed out on his assassins, dagger in hand, and was killed by a shower of arrows. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 39.   According to Aristotle, the site of Alcibiades’ death was Elaphus, a mountain in Phrygia. Aristotle, History of Animals, 578b27; cf. John & William Langhorne, Plutarch's Lives (1819), vol. 2, p. 172, n. 99. 
Assessments
Political careerIn ancient Greece, Alcibiades was a polarizing figure. According to Thucydides, Alcibiades, being "exceedingly ambitious", proposed the expedition in Sicily in order "to gain in wealth and reputation by means of his successes". Alcibiades is not held responsible by Thucydides for the destruction of Athens, since "his habits gave offence to every one, and caused the Athenians to commit affairs to other hands, and thus before long to ruin the city". Thucydides, VI, 15.  Plutarch regards him as "the least scrupulous and most entirely careless of human beings". Plutarch, The Comparison of Alcibiades with Coriolanus, 6  On the other hand, Diodorus argues that he was "in spirit brilliant and intent upon great enterprises". Diodorus, Library, xiii, 68.5.  Sharon Press of Brown University points out that Xenophon emphasizes Alcibiades' service to the state, rather than the harm he was charged with causing it. S. Press, Was Alcibiades a Good General?  Xenophon, Hellenica, 1.4. 18.  Demosthenes defends Alcibiades's achievements, saying that he had taken arms in the cause of democracy, displaying his patriotism, not by gifts of money or by speeches, but by personal service. Demosthenes, Against Meidias, 144–5.  For Demosthenes and other orators, Alcibiades epitomized the figure of the great man during the glorious days of the Athenian democracy and became a rhetorical symbol. D. Gribble, Alcibiades and Athens, 32–3.  One of Isocrates' speeches, delivered by Alcibiades the Younger, argues that the statesman deserved the Athenians' gratitude for the service he had given them. Isocrates, Concerning the Team of Horses, 15.  Lysias, on the other hand, argued in one of his orations that the Athenians should regard Alcibiades as an enemy because of the general tenor of his life, as "he repays with injury the open assistance of any of his friends". Lysias, Against Alcibiades 1, 1.  Lysias, Against Alcibiades 2, 10.  In the Constitution of the Athenians, Aristotle does not include Alcibiades in the list of the best Athenian politicians, but in Posterior Analytics he argues that traits of a proud man like Alcibiades are "equanimity amid the vicissitudes of life and impatience of dishonor". Aristotle, Constitution of the Athenians,  .  Aristotle, Posterior Analytics, ii, 13.  Alcibiades excited in his contemporaries a fear for the safety of the political order. D. Gribble, Alcibiades and Athens, 41.  Therefore, Andocides said of him that "instead of holding that he ought himself to conform with the laws of the state, he expects you to conform with his own way of life". Andocides, Against Alcibiades, 19.  Central to the depiction of the Athenian statesman is Cornelius Nepos' famous phrase that Alcibiades "surpassed all the Athenians in grandeur and magnificence of living". Cornelius Nepos, Alcibiades, XI. Even today, Alcibiades divides scholars. For Malcolm F. McGregor, former head of the Department of Classics in the University of British Columbia, Alcibiades was rather a shrewd gambler than a mere opportunist. M.F. McGregor, The Genius of Alkibiades, 27–50.  Evangelos P. Fotiadis, a prominent Greek philologist, asserts that Alcibiades was "a first class diplomat" and had "huge skills". Nevertheless his spiritual powers were not counterbalanced with his magnificent mind and he had the hard luck to lead a people susceptible to demagoguery.  K. Paparrigopoulos, a major modern Greek historian, underlines his "spiritual virtues" and compares him with Themistocles, but he then asserts that all these gifts created a "traitor, an audacious and impious man". Κ. Paparrigopoulos, History of the Greek Nation, Αβ, 264–8.  Walter Ellis believes that his actions were outrageous, but they were performed with panache.  For his part, David Gribble argues that Alcibiades' actions against his city were misunderstood and believes that "the tension which led to Alcibiades' split with the city was between purely personal and civic values". D. Gribble, Alcibiades and Athens, 55 &c.  Russell Meiggs, a British ancient historian, asserts that the Athenian statesman was absolutely unscrupulous despite his great charm and brilliant abilities. According to Meiggs his actions were dictated by selfish motives and his feud with Cleon and his successors undermined Athens. The same scholar underscores the fact that "his example of restless and undisciplined ambition strengthened the charge brought against Socrates".  Even more critically, Athanasios G. Platias and Constantinos Koliopoulos, professors of strategic studies and international politics, state that Alcibiades' own arguments "should be sufficient to do away with the notion that Alcibiades was a great statesman, as some people still believe". A.G. Platias and C. Koliopoulos, Thucydides on Strategy, 240.  Writing from a different perspective, psychologist Anna C. Salter cites Alcibiades as exhibiting "all the classic features of psychopathy."   A similar assessment is made by Hervey Cleckley at the end of chapter 5 in his The Mask of Sanity.
Military achievements

Despite his critical comments, Thucydides admits in a short digression that "publicly his conduct of the war was as good as could be desired".  Diodorus and Demosthenes regard him as a great general.   According to Fotiadis, Alcibiades was an invincible general and, wherever he went, victory followed him; had he led the army in Sicily, the Athenians would have avoided disaster and, had his countrymen followed his advice at Aegospotami, Lysander would have lost and Athens would have ruled Greece.  On the other hand, Paparrigopoulos believes that the Sicilian Expedition, prompted by Alcibiades, was a strategic mistake. Κ. Paparrigopoulos, History of the Greek Nation, Αβ, 272.  In agreement with Paparrigopoulos, Platias and Koliopoulos underscore the fact that the Sicilian expedition was a strategic blunder of the first magnitude, resulting from a "frivolous attitude and an unbelievable underestimation of the enemy".  For his part, Angelos Vlachos, a Greek Academician, underlines the constant interest of Athens for Sicily from the beginning of the war.  According to Vlachos the expedition had nothing of the extravagant or adventurous and constituted a rational strategic decision based on traditional Athenian aspirations. A. Vlachos, Thucydides' Bias, 206.  Vlachos asserts that Alcibiades had already conceived a broader plan: the conquest of the whole West. A. Vlachos, Thucydides' Bias, 202–3.  He intended to conquer Carthage and Libya, then to attack Italy and, after winning these, to seize Italy and Peloponnesus. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 17.  The initial decision of the ecclesia provided however for a reasonable military force, which later became unreasonably large and costly because of Nicias' demands.  Kagan criticizes Alcibiades for failing to recognize that the large size of the Athenian expedition undermined the diplomatic scheme on which his strategy rested. D. Kagan, The Fall of the Athenian Empire, 419–20. Kagan believes that while Alcibiades was a commander of considerable ability, he was no military genius, and his confidence and ambitions went far beyond his skills. He thus was capable of important errors and serious miscalculations. Kagan argues that at Notium, Alcibiades committed a serious error in leaving the fleet in the hands of an inexperienced officer, and that most of the credit for the brilliant victory at Cyzicus must be assigned to Thrasybulus.  In this judgement, Kagan agrees with Cornelius Nepos, who said that the Athenians' extravagant opinion of Alcibiades' abilities and valor was his chief misfortune. Cornelius Nepos, Alcibiades, VII. Press argues that "though Alcibiades can be considered a good General on the basis of his performance in the Hellespont, he would not be considered so on the basis of his performance in Sicily", but "the strengths of Alcibiades' performance as a General outweigh his faults".  Professors David McCann and Barry Strauss attempt a comparison between Alcibiades and Douglas MacArthur, pointing out that "both men stood out as military leaders to whom a mystique attached itself". D. McCann, B. Strauss, War and Democracy, xxv. 
Skill in oratoryPlutarch asserts that "Alcibiades was a most able speaker in addition to his other gifts", while Theophrastus argues that Alcibiades was the most capable of discovering and understanding what was required in a given case. Nevertheless, he would often stumble in the midst of his speech, but then he would resume and proceed with all the caution in the world. Plutarch, Alcibiades, 10.  Even the lisp he had, which was noticed by Aristophanes, made his talk persuasive and full of charm. Aristophanes, Wasps, 44.  Plutarch, Alcibiades, 1.  Eupolis says that he was "prince of talkers, but in speaking most incapable";  which is to say, more eloquent in his private discourses than when orating before the ecclesia. For his part, Demosthenes underscores the fact that Alcibiades was regarded as "the ablest speaker of the day".  Paparrigopoulos does not accept Demosthenes's opinion, but acknowledges that the Athenian statesman could sufficiently support his case.  Kagan acknowledges his rhetorical power, whilst Thomas Habinek, professor of Classics at the University of Southern California, believes that the orator Alcibiades seemed to be whatever his audience needed on any given occasion. D. Kagan, The Fall of the Athenian Empire, 178.  T. Habinek, Ancient Rhetoric and Oratory, 23–4.  According to Habinek, in the field of oratory, the people responded to Alcibiades' affection with affection of their own. Therefore, the orator was "the institution of the city talking to — and loving — itself".  According to Aristophanes, Athens "yearns for him, and hates him too, but wants him back". Aristophanes, Frogs, 1425. 
References in Comedy, Philosophy, Art and Literature 
Alcibiades has not been spared by ancient comedy and stories attest to an epic confrontation between Alcibiades and Eupolis resembling that between Aristophanes and Cleon.  He also appears as a character in several Socratic dialogues (Symposium, Protagoras, Alcibiades I and II, as well as the eponymous dialogues by Aeschines Socraticus and Antisthenes). Purportedly based on his own personal experience, Antisthenes described Alcibiades' extraordinary physical strength, courage, and beauty, saying, "If Achilles did not look like this, he was not really handsome."   In his trial, Socrates must rebut the attempt to hold him guilty for the crimes of his former students, including Alcibiades.  Hence, he declares in Apology: "I have never been anyone's teacher". Plato, Apology, 33a  Aristophanes mocked his heavy lisp in the satirical play, The Wasps, "Look, Thothiath, Theowuth ith twanthformed. He'th a waven!" He is portrayed as one of Cleon's close friends.Long after his death, Alcibiades continues to appear in art, both in Medieval and Renaissance works, and in several significant works of modern literature as well.  He still fascinates the modern world, doing so most notably as the main character in historical novels of authors like Anna Bowman Dodd, Gertrude Atherton, Rosemary Sutcliff, Daniel Chavarria, Steven Pressfield and Peter Green.  He is also a central character in Paul Levinson's time travel novel The Plot To Save Socrates, in Kurt R. A. Giambastiani's time travel novel Unraveling Time, in Erik Satie's Socrate, a work for voice and small orchestra (the text is composed of excerpts of Victor Cousin's translation of works by Plato), and in Joel Richards' Nebula award-nominated short story The Gods Abandon Alcibiades.  Alcibiades also figures in the satirical Picture This by Joseph Heller and in William Shakespeare's Timon of Athens.Alcibiades is mentioned in observance II of law 44 " Disarm and infuriate with the mirror effect " in Robert Greene's book The 48 Laws of Power. In it the author writes about Alcibiades ability to mimic the people he is in the presence of such as the Spartans and then the people of Persia.In Harry Turtledove's 2002 alternate history story, The Daimon, the point of the departure is that Alcibiades commands the Sicilian Expedition to a decisive victory before returning to Athens.  Uniting the Greek city-states, the conquest of the Persian Empire proceeds under the Athenian, Alcibiades, rather than under the Macedonian, Alexander the Great, roughly 80 years later.
Notes  Timeline of Alcibiades' life (c. 450–404 BC) 
 
 
   
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
Citations 
References
Primary sources 

Andocides, Against Alcibiades. See original text in Perseus program
 
Aristophanes, Wasps. See original text in Perseus program
 
Aristotle, History of Animals (translated in English by Wentworth Thompson)
 
Translation by G. R. G. Mure
 
Demosthenes, Against Meidias. See original text in Perseus program
Diodorus Siculus, Library, 13th Book. See original text in Perseus program.
Isocrates, Busiris. See original text in Perseus program
Isocrates, Concerning the Team of Horses. See original text in Perseus program
 
Lysias, Against Alcibiades 2. See original text in Perseus program
Plato, Alcibiades. See original text in  Perseus program.  Translated in English by Sanderson Beck.
 
 
 
Translated in English by John Dryden
 
Translated in English by Arthur H. Clough (New York: Collier Press, 1909), Aubrey Stewart-George Long and John Dryden.
 
 
Translated into English by Aubrey Stewart-George Long and John Dryden.
Thucydides, History of the Peloponnesian War, V-VIII. See original text in Perseus program.
 
 
Secondary sources 

 
 
   In Greek.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Paparrigopoulos, Konstantinos (-Pavlos Karolidis) (1925), History of the Hellenic Nation (Volume Ab). Eleftheroudakis (in Greek).
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   In Greek.
Vlachos, Angelos (1974). Thucydides' Bias. Estia (in Greek).
 
 
Further reading 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Hughes-Hallett, Lucy.  Heroes:  A History of Hero Worship.  Alfred A. Knopf, New York, New York, 2004.  ISBN 1-4000-4399-9.
 
Pressfield, Steven.  Tides of War:  A Novel of Alcibiades and the Peloponnesian War.  Doubleday, New York, New York, 2000.  ISBN 0-385-49252-9.
 
 
 
 
External links 

Biographical
 
 
 
 
 
 
Texts and analyses
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
   
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Wilhelm Röntgen
 
 
Wilhelm Conrad Röntgen ( ; 27 March 1845 – 10 February 1923) was a German physicist, who, on 8 November 1895, produced and detected electromagnetic radiation in a wavelength range today known as X-rays or Röntgen rays, an achievement that earned him the first Nobel Prize in Physics in 1901. Novelline, Robert. Squire's Fundamentals of Radiology. Harvard University Press. 5th edition. 1997. ISBN 0-674-83339-2 p. 1.  In honor of his accomplishments, IUPAC named element 111, Roentgenium, a very radioactive element with multiple unstable isotopes, after him.
Biography
Röntgen was born in a traditional Catholic family in Lennep, Germany as the only child of a merchant and manufacturer of cloth. His mother was Charlotte Constanze Frowein of Amsterdam . In March 1848, the family moved to Apeldoorn and Wilhelm was raised in the Netherlands. He received his early education at the boarding school, Institute of Martinus Herman van Doorn, in Apeldoorn. From 1861 to 1863, he attended the ambachtsschool in Utrecht. He was expelled for refusing to reveal the identity of a classmate guilty of drawing an unflattering portrait of one of the school's teachers. Not only was he expelled, he subsequently found that he could not gain admittance into any other Dutch or German gymnasium. In 1865, he tried to attend the University of Utrecht without having the necessary credentials required for a regular student. Upon hearing that he could enter the Federal Polytechnic Institute in Zurich (today known as the ETH Zurich), he passed its examinations, and began studies there as a student of mechanical engineering. In 1869, he graduated with a Ph.D. from the University of Zurich; once there, he became a favorite student of Professor August Kundt, whom he followed to the University of Strassburg in 1873. 

Career 
In 1874 Röntgen became a lecturer at the University of Strassburg. In 1875 he became a professor at the Academy of Agriculture at Hohenheim, Württemberg. He returned to Strassburg as a professor of physics in 1876, and in 1879, he was appointed to the chair of physics at the University of Giessen. In 1888, he obtained the physics chair at the University of Würzburg, and in 1900 at the University of Munich, by special request of the Bavarian government. Röntgen had family in Iowa in the United States and at one time planned to emigrate.  Although he accepted an appointment at Columbia University in New York City and had actually purchased transatlantic tickets, the outbreak of World War I changed his plans and he remained in Munich for the rest of his career.
During 1895 Röntgen was investigating the external effects from the various types of vacuum tube equipment — apparatuses from Heinrich Hertz, Johann Hittorf, William Crookes, Nikola Tesla and Philipp von Lenard — when an electrical discharge is passed through them.[7]  In early November, he was repeating an experiment with one of Lenard's tubes in which a thin aluminium window had been added to permit the cathode rays to exit the tube but a cardboard covering was added to protect the aluminium from damage by the strong electrostatic field that is necessary to produce the cathode rays. He knew the cardboard covering prevented light from escaping, yet Röntgen observed that the invisible cathode rays caused a fluorescent effect on a small cardboard screen painted with barium platinocyanide when it was placed close to the aluminium window. It occurred to Röntgen that the Hittorf-Crookes tube, which had a much thicker glass wall than the Lenard tube, might also cause this fluorescent effect.In the late afternoon of 8 November 1895, Röntgen determined to test his idea. He carefully constructed a black cardboard covering similar to the one he had used on the Lenard tube. He covered the Hittorf-Crookes tube with the cardboard and attached electrodes to a Ruhmkorff coil to generate an electrostatic charge. Before setting up the barium platinocyanide screen to test his idea, Röntgen darkened the room to test the opacity of his cardboard cover. As he passed the Ruhmkorff coil charge through the tube, he determined that the cover was light-tight and turned to prepare the next step of the experiment. It was at this point that Röntgen noticed a faint shimmering from a bench a few feet away from the tube. To be sure, he tried several more discharges and saw the same shimmering each time. Striking a match, he discovered the shimmering had come from the location of the barium platinocyanide screen he had been intending to use next.Röntgen speculated that a new kind of ray might be responsible. 8 November was a Friday, so he took advantage of the weekend to repeat his experiments and make his first notes. In the following weeks he ate and slept in his laboratory as he investigated many properties of the new rays he temporarily termed "X-rays", using the mathematical designation for something unknown. Although the new rays would eventually come to bear his name in many languages as "Röntgen Rays" (and the associated X-ray radiograms as "Röntgenograms"),
he always preferred the term X-rays,Nearly two weeks after his discovery, he took the very first picture using  X-rays of his wife's hand, Anna Bertha. When she saw her skeleton she exclaimed "I have seen my death!"   The idea that Röntgen noticed the shimmering of the barium platinocyanide screen simply through good fortune misrepresents his investigative powers; he had planned to use the screen in the next step of his experiment and would therefore have made the discovery a few moments later regardless.At one point while he was investigating the ability of various materials to stop the rays, Röntgen brought a small piece of lead into position while a discharge was occurring. Röntgen thus saw the first radiographic image, his own flickering ghostly skeleton on the barium platinocyanide screen. He later reported that it was at this point that he determined to continue his experiments in secrecy, because he feared for his professional reputation if his observations were in error.Röntgen's original paper, "On A New Kind Of Rays" (Über eine neue Art von Strahlen), was published on 28 December 1895. On 5 January 1896, an Austrian newspaper reported Röntgen's discovery of a new type of radiation. Röntgen was awarded an honorary Doctor of Medicine degree from the University of Würzburg after his discovery. He published a total of three papers on X-rays between 1895 and 1897. Today, Röntgen is considered the father of diagnostic radiology, the medical specialty which uses imaging to diagnose disease.
Personal life
Röntgen was married to Anna Bertha Ludwig (m. 1872, d. 1919) and had one child, Josephine Bertha Ludwig. Adopted at age 6, in 1887, she was the daughter of Anna's brother. 
Röntgen died on 10 February 1923 from carcinoma of the intestine.  It is not believed his carcinoma was a result of his work with ionizing radiation because of the brief time he spent on those investigations, and because he was one of the few pioneers in the field who used protective lead shields routinely.  Röntgen did not take patents out on his discoveries, and donated the money for his Nobel prize to the University of Würzburg. With the inflation following World War I, Röntgen fell into bankruptcy later in life, spending his final years at his country home at Weilheim, near Munich.  In keeping with his will, all his personal and scientific correspondence were destroyed upon his death. 
Honours and awardsIn 1901 Röntgen was awarded the very first Nobel Prize in Physics. The award was officially "in recognition of the extraordinary services he has rendered by the discovery of the remarkable rays subsequently named after him". Röntgen donated the monetary reward from his Nobel Prize to his university. Like Pierre Curie, Röntgen refused to take out patents related to his discovery, as he wanted mankind as a whole to benefit from practical applications of the same (personal statement). He did not even want the rays to be named after him. 

Rumford Medal (1896)
Matteucci Medal (1896)
Elliott Cresson Medal (1897)
Nobel Prize for Physics (1901)
In November 2004 IUPAC named element number 111 Roentgenium (Rg) in his honour. IUPAP also adopted the name in November 2011.


LegacyToday, in Remscheid-Lennep, 40 kilometers east of Düsseldorf, the house in which Roentgen was born in 1845 is the Deutsches Röntgen-Museum. In many languages, Röntgen's name (or a local linguistic derivative) is used to refer to radiology and its products instead of the term "X-ray", which Röntgen himself coined, for example Japanese "rentogen", the Lithuanian "rentgeno", the Hebrew "rentgen" (רנטגן), the Serbo-Croatian "rentgen", and Turkish "röntgen".
See also

German inventors and discoverers


References 
External links 
 

Biography at the official Nobel site
Annotated bibliography for Wilhelm Rontgen from the Alsos Digital Library
Wilhelm Conrad Röntgen Biography
The Cathode Ray Tube site
First X-ray Photogram
The American Roentgen Ray Society
Deutsches Röntgen-Museum (German Röntgen Museum, Remscheid-Lennep)
WC Roentgen – Medcyclopedia
Röntgen Rays:  Memoirs by Röntgen, Stokes, and J.J. Thomson (circa 1899)
Some places and memories related to Wilhelm Conrad Roentgen on Himetop – The History of Medicine Topographical Database
The New Marvel in Photography, an article on and interview with Röntgen, in McClure's magazine, Vol. 6, No. 5, April, 1896, from Project Gutenberg
 
    
DEFAULTSORT











 











  

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Claudette Colbert
 Claudette Colbert ( ; September 13, 1903 – July 30, 1996) was a French-born  American actress of stage and film.Raised in New York City, Colbert began her career in Broadway productions during the 1920s, progressing to film with the advent of talking pictures. She established a successful film career with Paramount Pictures, and is recognized as one of the leading female exponents of screwball comedy. Colbert was the highest paid actress in American cinema during late 1930s, and later became a freelance performer. She won the Academy Award for Best Actress for her comedic performance in It Happened One Night (1934), and also received Academy Award nominations for her dramatic roles in Private Worlds (1935) and Since You Went Away (1944).Colbert's film career declined in the 1950s, and she retired from film in 1961. She returned to the theater, with the occasional brief appearance on television. Her career spanned more than six decades. Late in life she moved to Barbados, where she died at the age of 92, following a series of strokes.Colbert received theatre awards from the Sarah Siddons Society, a lifetime-achievement award at the Kennedy Center Honors, and, in 1999, the American Film Institute placed her at number twelve on their "AFI's 100 Years... 100 Stars" list of the "50 Greatest American Screen Legends". 
Early lifeÉmilie Chauchoin     was born in Saint-Mandé, Seine, France,  to Georges Claude, a banker, and Jeanne Marie Loew Chauchoin.    Quirk, Claudette Colbert, p. 5.  Despite being christened "Emilie", she was called "Lily" as nickname because she had a cousin, the daughter of her mother's sister, of the same name. After some financial reversals, her family emigrated to New York City in 1911. Her mother was born in Channel Islands and was raised in there.    Her mother was a fluent English speaker so Colbert could quickly learn English.  Colbert studied at Washington Irving High School where her speech teacher, Alice Rossetter, encouraged her to audition for a play she had written. Colbert made her stage debut at the Provincetown Playhouse in The Widow's Veil at the age of 15. She attended the Art Students League of New York, intending to become a fashion designer, but appeared on the Broadway stage in a small role in The Wild Westcotts (1923). She had been using the name Claudette instead of nickname Lily since high school, and for her stage name she added her maternal grandmother's maiden name, Colbert. 
Career

From Broadway to Hollywood
After signing a five-year contract with the producer Al Woods, Colbert played ingenue roles on Broadway from 1925 through 1929. During her early years on stage, she fought against being typecast as a maid, and received critical acclaim on Broadway in the production of The Barker (1927), playing a carnival snake charmer. She later reprised this role for the play's run in London's West End.    Colbert was noticed by the theatrical producer Leland Hayward, who suggested her for a role in Frank Capra's film For the Love of Mike (1927), now believed to be lost.  The film, Colbert's only silent film role, was a box office failure. Colbert continued her stage career, but ultimately signed a contract with Paramount Pictures in 1928. Her first sound film was The Hole in the Wall (1929), co-starring Edward G. Robinson. During production of her second sound film, The Lady Lies (also in 1929), Colbert was appearing nightly in the play See Naples and Die. Her then two plays, Eugene O'Neill's Dynamo and See Naples and Die (1929), were unsuccessful. Her earliest films were produced in New York. In 1930 she was cast in The Big Pond, which was filmed in both English and French, and Colbert's fluency in both languages. She appeared opposite Maurice Chevalier, who commented of her, "She was lovely, brunette, talented and a delicious comedienne, and her English was perfect." Shipman, The Great Movie Stars, p. 113.  While these films were popular with audiences, one of her films from this period, Young Man of Manhattan, her only collaboration with her first husband, Norman Foster, received negative notices. The magazine Picturegoer criticized Foster's performance and noted him as one of Colbert's weakest leading men, writing, "He did not seem to get any sincerity into his love scenes."  She also appeared in Mysterious Mr. Parkes, which was a French-language version of Slightly Scarlet for the European market, although it was also screened in the United States.She co-starred with Fredric March in Manslaughter (1930), and received good reviews for her performance as a rich girl, jailed for vehicular manslaughter.  The New York Times wrote that she is capable of excellent acting.  She was briefly paired with March, and they made four films together, including Dorothy Arzner's Honor Among Lovers (1931). She sang in her role opposite Maurice Chevalier in the Ernst Lubitsch musical The Smiling Lieutenant (1931), and was admired by critics for her ability to shrewdly play character role opposite the Miriam Hopkins. Colbert was cast as a femme fatale in Cecil B. DeMille's films where she wears fetishistic costumes which lose another layer of clothing.  In the 1932 historical epic, The Sign of the Cross, she was cast opposite Fredric March as the Roman empress Poppaea. For an instant, glimpses of her bare breasts and nipples were visible in a scene where her character was bathing in asses' milk,  a scene that came to be regarded as an example of Hollywood decadence prior to the enforcement of the Production Code.   In 1933, Colbert renegotiated her contract with Paramount to allow her to appear in films for other studios. In Cleopatra (1934), she played the title role opposite Warren William.  Thereafter, Colbert did not wish to be portrayed as overtly sexual and later refused such roles. 
Breakthrough Colbert was reluctant to appear as the "runaway heiress", Ellie Andrews, in the Frank Capra romantic comedy, It Happened One Night (1934), opposite Clark Gable and released by Columbia Pictures. Behind schedule after several actresses had refused the role, the studio accepted Colbert's demand that she be paid $50,000 and that filming was to be completed within four weeks to allow her to take a planned vacation. Through the filming, Colbert felt that the script was weak,  and Capra claimed, Colbert "had many little tantrums, motivated by her antipathy toward me," however "she was wonderful in the part." After filming was completed, Colbert complained to her friend, "I just finished the worst picture in the world."    Capra fretted that the film was released to indifferent reviews and initially only did so-so business.  Then, after it was released to the secondary movie houses, word-of-mouth began to spread and tickets sales became brisk. It turned out to be a major hit, easily Columbia's biggest hit to date.  The film contained at least one scene that is often cited as representative of the screwball film genre and which became well known, Kael, p. 285.    being a resounding box-office success. In 1935, after her Academy Award nomination, Colbert decided not to attend the presentation, feeling confident that she would not win the award, and instead, planned to take a cross-country railroad trip. After she was named the winner, studio chief Harry Cohn sent someone to "drag her off" the train, which had not yet left the station, and take her to the ceremony. Colbert arrived wearing a two-piece traveling suit which she had the Paramount Pictures costume designer, Travis Banton, make for her trip. Colbert's success allowed her to renegotiate her contract, raising her salary. In 1935 and 1936, she was listed in the annual "Quigley Poll of the Top Ten Money Making Stars", which was compiled from the votes of movie exhibitors throughout the U.S. for the stars who had generated the most revenue in their theaters over the previous year.    She received a second Academy Award nomination for her role in the hospital drama, Private Worlds (1935).In 1936, Colbert signed a new contract with Paramount Pictures, which required her to make seven films over a two-year period, and this contract made her Hollywood's highest paid actress. Shipman, The Great Movie Stars, p. 115.  This was followed by a contract renewal in 1938, after which she was reported to be the highest paid performer in Hollywood with a salary of $426,924.  Colbert was a stickler for regarding the way she appeared on screen. She believed that her face was difficult to light and photograph, and she was obsessed with not showing right side of her face, to the camera, because of a small bump that resulted from a childhood broken nose.  She refused to be filmed from right side of her face, and it often necessitated redesigning movie sets.  She learned about lighting and cinematography, and refused to begin filming until she was satisfied that she would be shown to her best advantage. One example of Colbert's determination to control the way she was photographed occurred during the filming of Tovarich in 1937, when one of her favored cameramen was dismissed by the director, Anatole Litvak. After seeing the rushes filmed by the replacement, Colbert refused to continue. She insisted on hiring her own cameraman, and offered to waive her salary if the film went over budget as a result.  Drums Along the Mohawk (1939) with Henry Fonda was Colbert's first color film. However, she distrusted the relatively new Technicolor process and feared that she would not photograph well, preferring thereafter to be filmed in black and white. At the peak of her popularity in the late 1930s, Colbert earned $150,000 a film.  During this time she began acting for CBS' popular Lux Radio Theater, making 22 appearances between 1935 and 1954. 
Continued successIn 1940, Colbert refused a seven-year contract that would have paid her $200,000 a year, as she had found that she could command a fee of $150,000 per film as a freelance artist. With her brother as her manager, Colbert was able to secure roles in prestigious films, and this period marked the height of her earning ability.  During filming of So Proudly We Hail! (1943), a rift occurred between Colbert and co-starr Paulette Goddard. Asked which of her costars she preferred, Goddard had replied, "Veronica (Lake), I think.". Goddard further commented that Colbert "flipped" and "was at Paulette's eyes at every moment," and said that they continued their feud throughout the duration of filming. Impressed by her performance in this film, but aware of Colbert's sensitivity, David O. Selznick approached her to play the lead role in Since You Went Away (1944). She was initially reluctant to appear as mother of teenaged children, but Selznick admired her marketability.  The director, John Cromwell, later noted that Colbert was very professional, but Selznick expressed frustration with some of her demands. He wrote in a memo to Colbert's agent that they had rebuilt several sets "because of her refusal to have the right side of her face photographed, on top of which we have to pay her not only a fabulous salary, but also give her two days off a month, which works out to $5000 every four weeks for doing absolutely nothing, and now she's demanding three.... Tell her there's a war on and we all have to make some sacrifices."  Released in June 1944, the film became a substantial success and grossed almost $5 million in the United States. The critic James Agee praised aspects of the film, but particularly Colbert's performance.  Colbert received her third Academy Award nomination for Best Actress.In 1945, Colbert ended her association with Paramount Studios, and continued to free-lance in such films as Guest Wife (1945), with Don Ameche. RKO Studios hired her to appear opposite John Wayne in Without Reservations (1946), with a storyline and setting intentionally inspired by It Happened One Night.  Without Reservations grossed $3 million in the U.S.,  and the overall popularity of Colbert's films during 1946 led to her making a final appearance in the "Quigley Poll of the Top Ten Money Making Stars".  She achieved her last great success opposite Fred MacMurray in the comedy The Egg and I (1947). The film was one of the year's biggest hits, and was later acknowledged as the 12th most profitable American film of the 1940s.  Her subsequent films failed to capitalize on her renewed success, with the exception of the suspense film Sleep, My Love (1948) with Robert Cummings.
DeclineShe was signed to appear in State of the Union with Gary Cooper, who was replaced by Spencer Tracy. Two days before filming began, Colbert advised the director Frank Capra that she was unable to work beyond 5 p.m. each day, citing "doctor's orders". Capra refused to accommodate her terms and cast Katharine Hepburn in the role. In 1949, she was signed to appear in All About Eve. Producer Joseph L. Mankiewicz was enthusiastic about Colbert, feeling that she best represented the style of the older actress he envisioned for the part. Before production started, Colbert severely injured her back, while filming a scene for Three Came Home. Although 20th Century Fox postponed the production of All About Eve for two months while she convalesced, she was still not fit enough to take the role and was replaced by Bette Davis. In later life, Colbert said, "I just never had the luck to play bitches." Her films of this period received mixed reception. The RKO comedy Bride for Sale, in which Colbert was part of a love triangle that included George Brent and Robert Young, was well reviewed and modestly successful. The Secret Fury (1950), also for RKO, was a mystery melodrama that was widely panned. In the early 1950s, Colbert traveled to Europe and began making fewer films. She appeared in the French film Royal Affairs in Versailles, one of only two films she made in her native country, and a success at the local box-office.  Colbert had a supporting role rather than top billing in the film, which also featured a number of well known French cinema performers. In 1954, after a successful appearance in a television version of The Royal Family, she began acting in various teleplays. From 1954 to 1960, she appeared in the television adaptations of Blithe Spirit in 1956 and The Bells of St. Mary's in 1959. She also guest starred on Robert Montgomery Presents, Playhouse 90, and Zane Grey Theater.In 1958, she returned to Broadway in The Marriage-Go-Round, for which she was nominated for a Best Actress Tony Award.In 1961 she returned to the screen in Parrish (1961) for Warner Brothers. Colbert, playing the supporting role of mother, received little attention, and the film was not a commercial success. The press occasionally referred to upcoming projects that did not exist, so Colbert instructed her agent to stop his attempts to generate interest in her as a film actress. After that, she had made no more films because there have been no offers." Shipman, The Great Movie Stars, p. 117. Her occasional acting ventures were limited to theater and included performances on Broadway and in London in The Irregular Verb to Love (1963); The Kingfisher (1978) in which she co-starred with Rex Harrison, and Frederick Lonsdale's Aren't We All? (1985) also with Rex Harrison.In 1987, Colbert appeared in a supporting role in the television miniseries The Two Mrs. Grenvilles. The production was a ratings success and was nominated for several awards. Colbert won a Golden Globe and received a nomination for an Emmy Award. This marked her final performance on television movie, however she continued to act in theater.
Personal lifeIn 1928, Colbert married Norman Foster, an actor and director, who appeared with Colbert in the Broadway show The Barker. She and her first husband lived apart, never sharing a home together in Hollywood,  supposedly because Colbert's mother disliked Foster and would not allow him into their home.  Colbert and Foster divorced in 1935.In December of that year, Colbert married Dr. Joel Pressman, a surgeon at UCLA.  The marriage lasted 33 years, until Pressman's death of liver cancer in 1968.Colbert had one brother, Charles (1898–1971), who used the surname Wendling and served as her agent and business manager for a time.  He is credited with negotiating some of her more lucrative contracts in the late 1930s and early 1940s. For years, Colbert divided her time between her apartment in Manhattan and her summer home in Speightstown, Barbados. After suffering a series of strokes in 1993, she took up permanent residence at her home in Barbados, where she died on July 30, 1996, at age 92.  Colbert is buried in the Parish of St. Peter Cemetery in Barbados.  Colbert's only surviving relative was a niece, Coco, her brother's daughter.   The bulk of Colbert's estate, estimated at $3.5 million, was left to a friend, Helen O'Hagan, a retired director of corporate relations at Saks Fifth Avenue, whom Colbert had met in 1961 on the set of the her last film.   O'Hagan cared for Colbert following her 1993 strokes. 
Reception
Colbert established one of the most successful film careers of any actress of her generation, and was considered a dependable and bankable star. Her status was reflected in her earnings as one of the best paid performers of the 1930s and 1940s. Colbert once commented that she had sacrificed for the sake of her career.  In discussing Colbert's career, her contemporaries confirmed her drive. Irene Dunne commented that she had lacked Colbert's "terrifying ambition" and noted that if Colbert "finished work on a film on a Saturday, she would be looking for a new project by Monday". Hedda Hopper wrote that Colbert placed her career "ahead of everything save possibly her marriage", and described her as the "smartest and canniest" of Hollywood actresses, with a strong sense of what was best for her, and a "deep rooted desire to be in shape, efficient and under control". Other actors noted Colbert's comic timing; David Niven related in his biography that Gary Cooper was "terrified" at the prospect of working with Colbert in his first comedy, Bluebeard's Eighth Wife, because he considered Colbert to be an expert in the genre. The film gave Niven one of his first significant parts, and he wrote that Colbert took a nurturing role towards him and "was the soul of fun and a most generous performer," although he noted that her insistence that she be filmed only from her left side created difficulties for the cameramen.  Her fastidious attitude in this regard became well known, with Doris Day quoted as saying, "God wasted half a face on Claudette". During her heyday, film technicians described the right side of her face as "the dark side of the moon."  In a 1930s interview Constance Bennett replied to questions about her own demands, with the comment that Colbert's idiosyncrasies were far more excessive, but Bennett acknowledged that it was an integral part of Colbert's success.  Colbert was generally respected for her professionalism, with the New York Times stating that she was known for giving "110 percent" to any project she worked on, and she was highly regarded for learning the technical aspects of studio lighting and cinematography that allowed her to maintain a distinctive film image.  In her biography, Myrna Loy stated that Colbert, along with Joan Crawford, "knew more about lighting than the experts did." Kotsilibas-Davis and Loy, p. 119. Modern critics and film historians claimed that Colbert demonstrated versatility throughout her career, and played characters that ranged from vamps to housewives, and that encompassed screwball comedy and drama.  Pauline Kael wrote that Colbert was widely admired by American audiences from the time of mid-1930s. Colbert found it difficult to make the transition to playing more mature characters as she approached middle-age. Shipman, Movie Talk, p. 126.  "I'm a very good comedienne," Colbert said. "But I was always fighting that image, too".  Praised for her sense of style and awareness of fashion, Colbert ensured throughout her career that she was impeccably groomed and costumed. For the 1946 melodrama, Tomorrow is Forever, Jean Louis was hired to create eighteen changes of wardrobe for her. When Colbert received a Kennedy Center Honor, her fashion sense was referred to with a quotation from Jeanie Basinger in The International Dictionary of Films and Filmmakers: "[Her] glamour is the sort that women attain for themselves by using their intelligence to create a timeless personal style."    The writer A. Scott Berg described Colbert as one of Paramount Studio's greatest assets, as she had "proved deft in all genres" and had "helped define femininity for her generation with her chic manner." Berg, p. 190. She is cited as a leading female exponent of screwball comedy, along with such actresses as Jean Arthur, Irene Dunne, Carole Lombard, Myrna Loy and Rosalind Russell. In her comedy films, she invariably played shrewd and self-reliant women, but unlike many of her contemporaries, Colbert rarely engaged in physical comedy.  Her characters were more likely to be observers and commentators. 
Filmography
 
Awards and honors
Colbert was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actress for three films, It Happened One Night (1935), Private Worlds (1936), and Since You Went Away (1945), winning for It Happened One Night. In addition, she won a Golden Globe Award for Best Supporting Actress in a Series, Mini-series, or Motion Picture Made for Television for her role in The Two Mrs. Grenvilles (1988), and was nominated for an Emmy Award for the same.In 1980, Colbert was awarded the Sarah Siddons Award for her theatre work.  In 1984, Colbert was awarded the Gala Tribute award by the Film Society of Lincoln Center.  The same year, a building at the old Kaufman Astoria Studios in New York, where she had made ten films in early career, was renamed in her honor.  In 1985, Colbert was awarded a Drama Desk Special Award. In 1989, Colbert received Kennedy Center Honors for lifetime achievement.  In 1990, Colbert was honored with the San Sebastián International Film Festival Donostia Lifetime Achievement Award. For her contribution to the motion picture industry, Claudette Colbert has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame at 6812 Hollywood Blvd. 
References 
 
Bibliography 

Anderson, Christopher (1997). An Affair to Remember, The Remarkable Love Story of Katharine Hepburn and Spencer Tracy. William Morrow and Co. Inc. ISBN 0-688-15311-9
Berg, A. Scott (1989). Goldwyn. Sphere Books. ISBN 0-7474-0593-X
Chandler, Charlotte (2006). The Girl Who Walked Home Alone, Bette Davis, A Personal Biography. Simon & Schuster. ISBN 0-7432-6208-5
Chaneles, Sol (1974). The Movie Makers. Octopus Books. ISBN 0-7064-0387-8
DiBattista, Maria (2001). Fast Talking Dames. Yale University Press. ISBN 0-300-09903-7
Edmonds, I. G. and Mimura, Reiko (1980). The Oscar Directors. Tantivy Press. ISBN 0-498-02444-X
Edwards, Anne (1988). The DeMilles, An American Family. William Collins, Sons & Co. ISBN 0-00-215241-X
Finler, Joel W. (1989). The Hollywood Story: Everything You Always Wanted to Know About the American Film Industry But Didn't Know Where to Look. Pyramid Books. ISBN 1-85510-009-6
Harris, Warren G. (2002). Clark Gable, A Biography. Aurum Press. ISBN 1-85410-904-9
Haver, Ronald (1980). David O. Selznick's Hollywood. Bonanza Books, New York. ISBN 0-517-47665-7
Hirschnor, Joel (1983). Rating the Movie Stars for Home Video, TV and Cable. Publications International Limited. ISBN 0-88176-152-4
Jewell, Richard B. and Harbin, Vernon (1982). The RKO Story, Octopus Books. ISBN 0-7064-1285-0
Kael, Pauline (1984). 5001 Nights at the Movies. Zenith Books. ISBN 0-09-933550-6
Karney, Robyn (1984). The Movie Stars Story, An Illustrated Guide to 500 of the World's Most Famous Stars of the Cinema. Octopus Books. ISBN 0-7064-2092-6
Kotsilibas-Davis and Loy, Myrna (1988). Being and Becoming. Donald I. Fine Inc. ISBN 1-55611-101-0
Niven, David (1976). Bring on the Empty Horses. Putnam. ISBN 0-399-11542-0
Quirk, Lawrence J. (1974). Claudette Colbert An Illustrated Biography. Crown Publishers. ISBN 0-517-55678-2
Shipman, David (1970). The Great Movie Stars: The Golden Years. Bonanza Books, New York. Library of Congress Catalogue Card Number 78-133803
Shipman, David (1988). Movie Talk. St. Martin's Press. ISBN 0-312-03403-2
Springer, John (1978). They Had Faces Then, Annabella to Zorina, the Superstars, Stars and Starlets of the 1930s. ISBN 0-8065-0657-1
 
External links 
 

 
 
 
 
Claudette Colbert at Virtual History

 
  
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Norma Shearer
 Edith Norma Shearer (August 10, 1902 – June 12, 1983) was a Canadian actress. Shearer was one of the most popular actresses in North America from the mid-1920s through the 1930s.  Her early films cast her as the girl-next-door, but for most of the Pre-Code film era (beginning with the 1930 film The Divorcee, for which she won an Oscar for Best Actress), she played sexually liberated women in sophisticated contemporary comedies. Later she appeared in historical and period films.Unlike many of her MGM contemporaries, Shearer's fame declined steeply after retirement. By the time of her death in 1983, she was largely remembered at best for her "noble" roles in The Women, Marie Antoinette, and Romeo and Juliet. Shearer's legacy began to be re-evaluated in the 1990s with the publication of two biographies and the TCM and VHS release of her films, many of them unseen since the implementation of the Production Code some sixty years before. Focus shifted to her pre-Code "divorcee" persona and Shearer was rediscovered as "the exemplar of sophisticated [1930's] woman-hood... exploring love and sex with an honesty that would be considered frank by modern standards". Simultaneously, Shearer's ten-year collaboration with portrait photographer George Hurrell and her lasting contribution to fashion through the designs of Adrian were also recognized. Shearer is widely celebrated by some as one of cinema's feminist pioneers: "the first American film actress to make it chic and acceptable to be single and not a virgin on screen".  In March 2008, two of her most famous pre-code films, The Divorcee and A Free Soul, were released on DVD.
Early lifeShearer's childhood was spent in Montreal and was one of privilege due to the success of her father's construction business. However, the marriage between her parents was not a happy one. Andrew Shearer was prone to manic depression and "moved like a shadow or a ghost around the house,"  while her mother Edith was attractive, flamboyant and stylish, prompting gossip that she was a heroin addict and unfaithful to her husband. Neither rumor was ever proven, but Edith proved to be bored with her marriage very early on and focused her energy on Norma, who she decided would one day become a famous concert pianist.Shearer was interested in music as well, but after seeing a vaudeville show for her ninth birthday, announced her intention to become an actress. Edith offered support but, as Shearer entered adolescence, became secretly fearful that her daughter's physical flaws would jeopardize her chances. Fortunately, Shearer herself "had no illusions about the image I saw in the mirror." She acknowledged her "dumpy figure, with shoulders too broad, legs too sturdy, hands too blunt", and was also acutely aware of her small eyes that appeared crossed due to a cast in her right eye. But by her own admission, she was "ferociously ambitious, even as a young girl" and planned to overcome her deficiencies through careful camouflage, sheer determination and charm. The childhood and adolescence that Shearer once described as "a pleasant dream" ended in 1918, when her older sister, Athole, suffered her first serious mental breakdown and her father's company collapsed. Forced to move into a small, dreary house in a "modest" Montreal suburb, the sudden plunge into poverty only strengthened Shearer's determined attitude: "At an early age, I formed a philosophy about failure. Perhaps an endeavor, like my father's business, could fail, but that didn't mean Father had failed." Edith Shearer thought otherwise. Within weeks, she had left her husband and moved into a cheap boarding house with her two daughters. A few months later, encouraged by her brother, who believed his niece should try her luck in "the picture business", then operating largely on the East Coast, Edith sold her daughter's piano and bought three train tickets for New York. Also in her pocket was a letter of introduction for Norma, acquired from a local theatre owner, to Florenz Ziegfeld, who was currently preparing a new season of his famous Follies. 
Career

Early careerIn January 1920, the three Shearer women arrived in New York, each of them dressed up for the occasion. "I had my hair in little curls," Shearer remembered, "and I felt very ambitious and proud."  Her heart sank, however, when she saw their rented apartment: "There was one double bed, a cot with no mattress and a stove with one gas jet. The communal bathroom was at the end of a long dimly lit hallway. Athole and I took turns sleeping with mother in the bed, but sleep was impossible anyway—the elevated trains rattled right past our window every few minutes."The introduction to Ziegfeld proved equally disastrous. He turned Shearer down flat, reportedly calling her a "dog", and criticized her crossed eyes and stubby legs. She continued doing the rounds with her determination undimmed: "I learned that Universal Pictures was looking for eight pretty girls to serve as extras. Athole and I showed up and found fifty girls ahead of us. An assistant casting director walked up and down looking us over. He passed up the first three and picked the fourth. The fifth and sixth were unattractive, but the seventh would do, and so on, down the line until seven had been selected—and he was still some ten feet ahead of us. I did some quick thinking. I coughed loudly and, when the man looked in the direction of the cough, I stood on my tiptoes and smiled right at him. Recognizing the awkward ruse to which I'd resorted, he laughed openly and walked over to me and said, 'You win, Sis. You're Number Eight.'" Other extra parts followed, including one in Way Down East, helmed by director D. W. Griffith. Taking advantage of a break in filming and standing shrewdly near a powerful arc light, Shearer introduced herself to Griffith and began to confide her hopes for stardom. "The Master looked down at me, studied my upturned face in the glare of the arc, and shook his eagle head. Eyes no good, he said. A cast in one and far too blue; blue eyes always looked blank in close-up. You'll never make it, he declared, and turned solemnly away."Still undeterred, Shearer risked some of her savings on a consultation with Dr. William Bates, a pioneer in the treatment of incorrectly aligned eyes and defective vision. He wrote out a series of muscle-strengthening exercises that, after many years of daily practice, would successfully conceal Norma's cast for long periods of time on the screen. She spent hours in front of the mirror, exercising her eyes and striking poses that concealed or improved the physical flaws noted by Ziegfeld or Griffith. At night, she sat in the galleries of Broadway theatres, studying the entrances of Ina Claire, Lynn Fontanne, and Katharine Cornell.In desperate need of money, Shearer resorted to some modeling work, which proved successful. On her modeling career, she commented: "I could smile at a cake of laundry soap as if it were dinner at the Ritz. I posed with a strand of imitation pearls. I posed in dust-cap and house dress with a famous mop, for dental paste and for soft drink, holding my mouth in a whistling pose until it all but froze that way." She became the new model for Springfield Tires, was bestowed with the title "Miss Lotta Miles" and depicted seated inside the rim of a tire, smiling down at traffic from a large floodlit billboard. Years later, MGM rival Joan Crawford would disparagingly refer to Shearer as "Miss Lotta Miles".Finally, a year after her arrival in New York, she received a break in film: fourth billing in a B-movie titled The Stealers (1921). More silent films followed, which brought her to the attention of producer Hal Roach, out from Hollywood searching for new talent. Early in 1923, after a successful meeting, Roach made Shearer an offer on behalf of Louis B. Mayer Pictures, run by mogul Louis B. Mayer. After three years of hardship, she found herself signing a contract for $250 a week for six months, with options for renewal and a test for a leading role in a major film called The Wanters.
HollywoodShearer left New York in the spring of 1923. Accompanied by her mother, she felt "dangerously sure of herself"  as her train neared Los Angeles. Still not welcomed an hour after her arrival, she realized that there would be no star treatment from her new studio. Dispirited, she allowed Edith to hail them a taxi.The next morning, Shearer went to the Mayer Company on Mission Road to meet with the vice-president, Irving Thalberg. Shearer was momentarily thrown by their confused introduction, but soon found herself "impressed by his air of dispassionate strength, his calm self-possession and the almost black, impenetrable eyes set in a pale olive face." 
The actressShearer was less impressed, however, with her first screen test: "The custom then was to use flat lighting—to throw a great deal of light from all directions, in order to kill all shadows that might be caused by wrinkles or blemishes. But the strong lights placed on either side of my face made my blue eyes look almost white, and by nearly eliminating my nose, made me seem cross-eyed. The result was hideous." The day after the test had been screened for Mayer and Thalberg, cameraman Ernest Palmer found Shearer frantic and trembling in the hallway. Speaking with her, he was struck by her "fierce, almost raging disappointment" and, after viewing the test himself, agreed that she had been "poorly handled." Under Palmer's own supervision, a second test was made and judged a success by the studio brass. The lead in The Wanters seemed hers, until the film's director objected, finding her "unphotogenic". Again, Shearer was to be disappointed, relegated to a minor role.She accepted her next role in Pleasure Mad, knowing "it was well understood that if I didn't deliver in this picture, I was through." After only a few days of shooting, things were not looking good. Shearer was struggling. Finally, the film's director complained to Mayer that he could get nothing out of the young actress, and when summoned to Mayer's office, she fully expected the axe to fall: "But to my surprise, Mr. Mayer's manner was paternal. 'There seems to be a problem,' he said, 'tell me about it.' I told him that the director had shouted at me and frightened me. Nobody had warned me that Mayer was a better actor than any of us, and I was unprepared for what happened next. He staged an alarming outburst, screaming at me, calling me a fool and a coward, accusing me of throwing away my career because I couldn't get on with a director. It worked. I became tearful, but obstinate. 'I'll show you!' I said to him. 'You'll see!' Delighted, Mayer resumed the paternal act. ‘That's what I wanted to hear,’ he said, smiling."  Returning to the set, Shearer plunged into an emotional scene. "I took that scene lock, stock, and barrel, fur, fins and feathers," she remembered, earning her the respect of her director and her studio. As a reward, Thalberg cast her in six films in eight months.It was an apprenticeship that would serve Shearer well. By the time Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer was formed in 1924 and she was cast in the studio's first official production, He Who Gets Slapped, she had become one of MGM's biggest box-office attractions. In 1925, she signed a new contract paying her $1,000 a week, rising to $5,000 over the next five years. Soon after, she bought a house for herself and Edith, right under the Hollywood Sign, at 2004 Vine Street.
Irving ThalbergHaving become a star, Shearer's new challenge was to remain one. There were many other talented actresses at the studio and she realized she would have to fight hard to stay ahead of the pack. Seeing that sensational newcomer Greta Garbo was one of a kind, she went to Thalberg and "demanded recognition as one of another kind". It was just one of the many visits she paid to his office, always to plead for better material, better parts. Thalberg would listen patiently, then invariably advise Norma to keep toeing the line, that MGM knew best, and that the movies she complained about had made her a popular actress. Occasionally Shearer would burst into tears, but this seemed to make "no more impression than rain on a raincoat."  Privately, Thalberg was very impressed by Shearer. In a story conference, when her name was suggested to him for the part of a girl threatened with rape, Thalberg shook his head and, with a wry smile, said, "She looks too well able to take care of herself." Shearer, for her part, found herself increasingly attracted to her boss. "Something was understood between us, an indefinite feeling that neither of us could analyse." Thalberg's appeal was not primarily sexual. What attracted Shearer was his commanding presence and steely grace; the impression he gave that wherever he sat was always the head of the table. In spite of his youth, Thalberg became a father figure to the 23-year-old actress.At the end of a working day in July 1925, Shearer received a phone call from Thalberg's secretary, asking if she would like to accompany Thalberg to the premiere of Chaplin's The Gold Rush. That night, they made their first appearance as a couple. A few weeks later, Shearer went to Montreal to visit her father. While there, she had a reunion with an old school friend, who remembered: "At the end of lunch, over coffee, Norma leant in across the table. 'I'm madly in love', she whispered. 'Who with?' I asked. 'With Irving Thalberg,' she replied, smiling. I asked how Thalberg felt. 'I hope to marry him,' Norma said, and then, with the flash of the assurance I remembered so well, 'I believe I will.'"  "It is impossible to get anything major accomplished without stepping on some toes. Enemies are inevitable when one is a ‘doer’." — Norma Shearer Over the next two years, both Shearer and Irving would see other people, but Hollywood insiders knew it was something of a charade – she was just waiting for him to propose. Louise Brooks remembered: "I held a dinner party sometime in 1926. All the place cards at the dinner table were books. In front of Thalberg's place was Dreiser's Genius and in front of Norma's place I put The Difficulty of Getting Married. It was so funny because Irving walked right in and saw Genius and sat right down, but Norma kept walking around. She wouldn't sit down in front of The Difficulty of Getting Married – no way!" By 1927, Shearer had made a total of thirteen silent films for MGM. Each had been produced for under $200,000 and had, without fail, been a substantial box office hit, often making a $200,000+ profit for the studio.  She was rewarded for this consistent success by being cast in Ernst Lubitsch's The Student Prince in Old Heidelberg, her first prestige production, with a budget of over $1,000,000. While she was finishing The Student Prince, Shearer received a call summoning her to Thalberg's office. She entered to find Thalberg sitting at his desk before a tray of diamond engagement rings. He granted her the option to choose her own ring; she picked out the biggest. After weeks of rumors, provoked by wearing the ring, it was announced in August 1927 that they were to wed.  On September 29, 1927, they were married in the Hollywood wedding of the year. Shearer had two children with Thalberg, Irving Junior (1930–1988) and Katherine (1935–2006). Before they were married, Shearer converted to Judaism so that she could marry Thalberg. 
Early talkiesOne week after the marriage, The Jazz Singer was released. The first feature-length motion picture with sound, it effectively changed the cinematic landscape overnight and signaled the end of the silent motion picture era. It also spelled the end of many silent careers, and Shearer was determined hers would not be one of them. Her brother, Douglas Shearer, was instrumental in the development of sound at MGM, and every care was taken to prepare her for the microphone.Her first talkie, The Trial of Mary Dugan (1929), turned out to be a tremendous success. Shearer's "medium pitched, fluent, flexible Canadian accent, not quite American but not at all foreign"  was critically applauded, and thereafter widely imitated by other actresses, nervous about succeeding in talkies. Despite the popularity of her subsequent early talking films, The Last of Mrs. Cheyney and Their Own Desire (both 1929), Shearer feared the public would soon tire of her "good girl" image, and took the advice of friend and co-star Ramón Novarro to visit an unknown photographer named George Hurrell.  There she took a series of sensual portraits which convinced her husband that she could play the lead in MGM's racy new film, The Divorcee (1930).
Pre-CodeShearer won an Academy Award for Best Actress for her role in The Divorcee,  and a series of highly successful pre-Code films followed, including Let Us Be Gay (1930), Strangers May Kiss (1931), A Free Soul (1931), Private Lives (1931) and Riptide (1934). All of these were box-office hits, placing Shearer in competition with Joan Crawford and Greta Garbo as MGM's top actress through the remainder of the decade. Shearer's marriage to Thalberg gave her a degree of power in Hollywood that was resented by rivals such as Crawford, who complained that Shearer would always be offered the best roles and best conditions: "How can I compete with Norma when she's sleeping with the boss." Shearer mixed pre-Code films with period dramas and theatrical adaptations. Smilin' Through (1932), which co-starred Fredric March, was one of the most successful films of its year. An adaptation of Eugene O'Neill's four-hour experimental Strange Interlude (1932), which also starred Clark Gable, was critically panned but managed to turn a profit at the box office. 
The Queen of MGMThe enforcement of the Production Code in 1934 forced Shearer to drop her celebrated "free soul" image and move exclusively into period dramas and "prestige" pictures. Of these, The Barretts of Wimpole Street (1934) would prove her most successful at the box office, making a profit of $668,000. In that movie, she played the part made famous by Katharine Cornell. Shearer also took on another play popularized by Cornell in Romeo and Juliet (1936) (her first film of the 30s to lose money) and Marie Antoinette (1938) (a budget of almost $2,500,000 was too great for the studio to expect a profit), though their elaborate sets and costumes helped make the films immensely popular with audiences.Shearer was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actress on six occasions, winning only for The Divorcee in 1930. She was nominated the same year for Their Own Desire, for A Free Soul in 1931, The Barretts of Wimpole Street in 1934, Romeo and Juliet in 1936, and Marie Antoinette in 1938. Marion Davies later recalled that Shearer came to a party at San Simeon in her Marie Antoinette costume, which required removing the door so she could enter, and four chairs so she could sit at the table.In 1939, she attempted an unusual role in the dark comedy Idiot's Delight, adapted from the 1936 Robert E. Sherwood play. It was the last of Shearer's three films with Clark Gable, after A Free Soul (1931) and Strange Interlude (1932). The Women (1939) followed, with an entirely female cast of more than 130 speaking roles.Shearer was also one of the many actresses considered for the role of Scarlett O'Hara in Gone With The Wind (1939). However, Shearer expressed no interest, joking, "Scarlett is a thankless role. The one I'd really like to play is Rhett (Butler)!" Critics praised the suspenseful atmosphere in her next film, Escape (1940), where she played the lover of a Nazi general who helps an American free his mother from a concentration camp. With increasing interest in the war in Europe, the film performed well at the box office, but Shearer made errors in judgment, passing up roles in the highly successful films Now, Voyager and Mrs. Miniver, in order to star in We Were Dancing and Her Cardboard Lover (1942), which both failed at the box office. In 1942, Shearer unofficially retired from acting.
Retirement and deathAfter Thalberg's death, Shearer retained a lawyer to ensure that Thalberg's percentages of films he had worked on were still paid to his estate, which was contested by MGM. When she took the story to gossip columnist Louella Parsons, the studio was forced to give in and granted all the profits from MGM movies made and released from 1924 to 1938, meaning the estate eventually received over $1.5 million in percentage payments. Nevertheless, Shearer's contract was renewed for six films at $150,000 each.  During this time, she embarked on romances with the then married actor George Raft,  Mickey Rooney, and James Stewart.   Raft, (who separated from his wife soon after they were married) stated publicly that he wanted to marry Shearer, with whom he had a long romance. However, his wife's refusal to allow a divorce eventually caused Shearer to end the affair.  Following her retirement in 1942, she married Martin Arrougé (March 23, 1914 – August 8, 1999), a former ski instructor twelve years her junior.  Although often attending public events in her later life, Shearer withdrew from the glamor side of Hollywood and preferred anonymity, with her secretary stating in 1960: "Miss Shearer does not want any publicity. She doesn't talk to anyone. But I can tell you that she has refused many requests to appear in motion pictures and TV shows."  They were still married at the time of her death on June 12, 1983 (from pneumonia and Alzheimer's disease) at the age of 80, although in her declining years she repeatedly called Martin "Irving".  She spent her last days at the Motion Picture Country Home in Woodland Hills, California.
LegacyIn 1957, Shearer was awarded The George Eastman Award, given by George Eastman House for distinguished contribution to the art of film.Shearer has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame at 6636 Hollywood Boulevard. She is entombed in the Great Mausoleum at Forest Lawn Memorial Park in Glendale, California, in a crypt marked Norma Shearer Arrouge, along with her first husband, Irving Thalberg. Her friend Jean Harlow is in the crypt next door. Thalberg's crypt was engraved "My Sweetheart Forever" by Shearer. On June 30, 2008, Canada Post issued a postage stamp in its "Canadians in Hollywood" series to honour Norma Shearer, along with others for Raymond Burr, Marie Dressler, and Chief Dan George. 
Filmography 
References 
Sources

 
 
 
Jack Jacobs and Myron Braum:; The Films of Norma Shearer, A. S. Barnes and Company, South Brunswick and New York 1976 ISBN 0-498-01552-1
 


External links 

 
 
Photographs of Norma Shearer

  
 
DEFAULTSORT






















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	John Canaparius
John Canaparius ( ) was a Benedictine monk at the Aventine monastery in Rome. It had long been assumed that in the year 999 he wrote the first Vita sancti Adalberti episcopi Pragensis, or "Life of St. Adalbert of Prague" just two years after Adalbert's death.Adalbert was sent by Pope Gregory V to convert the pagan Old Prussians to Christianity and had come to Prussia, apparently taking the route along the Vistula River to reach the Baltic Sea at „urbem Gyddanzyc“.,  which is identified with the later Gdańsk (Danzig). Then a small trading and fishing settlement with wooden buildings, it was anyway recorded by Canaparius as „urbs“, city. It is, however, now assumed by Johannes Fried, that the 'Vita' was not written by Canaparius, but was written down in Liège, with the oldest traceable version having been at the imperial Adalbert shrine at Aachen. It was only recently recovered at the Marienstift, and is used to reconstruct the archetype of the 'Vita'.  Bishop Notger of Liège, a hagiographer himself, apparently had knowledge of the earlier handwritten Vita from Aachen. The imperial court at Aachen had in 997 assembled immediately upon receiving word of Adalbert's death and had thereupon planning the upcoming events.Another famous biographer of Adalbert was St. Bruno of Querfurt who wrote his hagiography in 1001-1004.Nikolaus von Jeroschin translated the Vita Sancti Adalberti into Middle High German in the 14th century.
Editions in Latin 

Monumenta Germaniae Historica, Scriptores (in folio) Bd. 4, S. 581-595;
Johannes Canaparius, S. Adalberti Pragensis episcopi et martyris vita prior, hrsg. von Jadwiga Karwasińska, Monumenta Poloniae historica, Seria nova 4/2, Warschau 1969;


Literature

Johannes Fried, Gnesen – Aachen – Rom. Otto III. und der Kult des hl. Adalbert. Beobachtungen zum älteren Adalbertsleben, in: Michael BORGOLTE (Hg.), Polen und Deutschland vor 1000 Jahren. Die Berliner Tagung über den „Akt von Gnesen“, Berlin 2002, S. 235 ff.


External links

Thesis of Fried  
Besprechung des gedruckten Aufsatzes von 2002  

DEFAULTSORT



 
 
 
	A. E. Waite
 Arthur Edward Waite (October 2, 1857 – May 19, 1942) was a scholarly mystic who wrote extensively on occult and esoteric matters, and was the co-creator of the Rider-Waite Tarot deck. As his biographer, R.A. Gilbert described him, "Waite's name has survived because he was the first to attempt a systematic study of the history of western occultism—viewed as a spiritual tradition rather than as aspects of proto-science or as the pathology of religion." 
Early lifeWaite was born in the United States.   Waite's father, Capt. Charles F. Waite, died when he was very young, and his widowed mother, Emma Lovell, returned to her home country of England, where he was then raised.   As they were not well off, Waite was educated at a small private school in North London.  When he was 13, he was then educated at St. Charles' College.  When he left school to become a clerk he wrote verse in his spare time. The death of his sister, Frederika Waite, in 1874 soon attracted him into psychical research.  At 21, he began to read regularly in the Library of the British Museum, studying many branches of esotericism.When Waite was almost 30, he married Ada Lakeman (also called "Lucasta") and they had one daughter, Sybil.   Some time after Lucasta's death in 1924, Waite married Mary Broadbent Schofield. He spent most of his life in or near London, connected to various publishing houses, and editing a magazine The Unknown World.

Career
Golden DawnWaite joined the Hermetic Order of the Golden Dawn in January 1891 after being introduced by E.W. Berridge.  He became a Freemason in 1901,   and entered the Societas Rosicruciana in Anglia in 1902. The Golden Dawn was torn by internal feuding until Waite's departure in 1914; later he formed the Fellowship of the Rosy Cross,  not to be confused with the Societas Rosicruciana.  By that time there existed some half-dozen offshoots from the original Golden Dawn, and as a whole it never recovered. Aleister Crowley, Waite's foe, referred to him as a villainous "Arthwate" in his novel Moonchild and referred to him in his magazine Equinox. Lovecraft has a villainous wizard in his short story "The Thing on the Doorstep" called Ephraim Waite; according to Robert M. Price this character was based on Waite. 
Author and scholarWaite was a prolific author with many of his works being well received in academic circles. He wrote occult texts on subjects including divination, esotericism, Rosicrucianism, Freemasonry, and ceremonial magic, Kabbalism and alchemy; he also translated and reissued several important mystical and alchemical works. His works on the Holy Grail, influenced by his friendship with Arthur Machen, were particularly notable.   A number of his volumes remain in print, The Book of Ceremonial Magic (1911), The Holy Kabbalah (1929), A New Encyclopedia of Freemasonry (1921), and his edited translation of Eliphas Levi's Transcendental Magic, its Doctrine and Ritual (1896) among others by Levi, having seen reprints in recent years.
Tarot deckWaite is best known as the co-creator of the popular and widely used Rider-Waite Tarot deck and author of its companion volume, the Key to the Tarot, republished in expanded form the following year, 1911, as the Pictorial Key to the Tarot, a guide to Tarot reading.   The Rider-Waite-Smith tarot was notable for being one of the first tarot decks to illustrate all 78 cards fully, in addition to the 22 major arcana cards. Golden Dawn member Pamela Colman Smith illustrated the cards for Waite, and the deck was first published in 1909. It remains in publication today.
Other works

Waite, Edward, Inner and Outer Order Initiations of the Holy Order of the Golden Dawn, Canada: Burnaby, 2005. ISBN 0-9735931-7-2.
Waite, Arthur Edward, The Brotherhood of the Rosy Cross: Being Records of the House of the Holy Spirit in its Inward and Outward History, London: William Rider & Son Ltd., 1924.
Waite, Arthur Edward, Israfel: Letters, Visions and Poems, London: Allen, 1886.
Waite, Arthur Edward, A New Encyclopaedia of Freemasonry (Ars Magna Latomorum) and of Cognate Instituted Mysteries: Their Rites, Literature, and History, New York: Wings Books, 1994. ISBN 	0517191482.
Waite, Arthur Edward, Theories As to the Authorship of the Rosicrucian Manifestoes, Whitefish, MT: Kessinger Publishing, 2005. ISBN 1-4253-3290-0.
Waite, Arthur Edward, The Hidden Church of the Holy Grail: Its Legends and Symbolism Considered in Their Affinity with Certain Mysteries of Initiation and Other Traces of a Secret Tradition in Christian Times, Amsterdam, the Netherlands: Fredonia Books, 2002. ISBN 1-58963-905-7.


References 
Sources

 


External links 
 

Short Biography
"The Masonic Career of A.E. Waite", AQC Vol 99 1986
Genealogy and links
Works by Arthur Edward Waite at Internet Archive (scanned books original editions color illustrated)
Works by Arthur Edward Waite at sacred-texts.com (plain text and HTML)
 
Bibliography of A.E. Waite
  
DEFAULTSORT








 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Sylvester Stallone
 
 
Michael Sylvester Gardenzio Stallone ( ; born July 6, 1946), known as Sylvester Stallone and Sly Stallone,  is an American actor, filmmaker, screenwriter, film director and occasional painter.  Stallone is well known for his Hollywood action roles. Two notable characters he has portrayed are the boxer Rocky Balboa and soldier John Rambo. Stallone's film Rocky was inducted into the National Film Registry as well as having its film props placed in the Smithsonian Museum. Stallone's use of the front entrance to the Philadelphia Museum of Art in the Rocky series led the area to be nicknamed the Rocky Steps. Philadelphia has a statue of his Rocky character placed permanently near the museum. It was announced on December 7, 2010 that Stallone was voted into boxing's Hall of Fame. 
Early lifeSylvester Stallone was born Michael Sylvester Gardenzio Stallone   in New York City, the elder son of Frank Stallone, Sr., a hairdresser, and Jackie Stallone (born Jacqueline Labofish), an astrologer, former dancer, and promoter of women's wrestling. His younger brother is actor and musician Frank Stallone. Stallone's father was born in Gioia del Colle, Apulia, Italy, and emigrated to the United States as a child.  Stallone's mother is of half Russian Jewish and half French descent.    Complications his mother suffered during labor forced her obstetricians to use two pairs of forceps during his birth; misuse of these accidentally severed a nerve and caused paralysis in parts of Stallone's face.  Stated on Inside the Actors Studio, 1999  As a result, the lower left side of his face is paralyzed - including parts of his lip, tongue, and chin - an accident which has given Stallone his snarling look and slightly slurred speech.  Stallone was baptized Catholic.  His father, a beautician, moved the family to Washington, D.C., where he opened a beauty school. His mother opened a women's gymnasium called Barbella's in 1954.  His parents divorced when he was nine, and he eventually lived with his mother.  He attended Notre Dame Academy and Lincoln High School in Philadelphia.     He attended Charlotte Hall Military Academy prior to attending Miami Dade College and the University of Miami. CHMA Alumni 
Hollywood careerWhen Stallone was nearly broke in New York, barely $50 to his name, he sold the script to Paradise Alley for $100. As told to Tony Robbins 
Italian Stallion and ScoreStallone had his first starring role in the soft core pornography feature film The Party at Kitty and Stud's (1970). He was paid US $200 for two days' work. 
  Stallone: "I was broke and basically sleeping in the Port Authority bus station for three weeks straight. I read in a trade paper about this film [The Party at Kitty and Studs, 1970] that was paying $100 a dayfor a $100 a day I would wreak havoc. Instead of doing something desperate, I worked for two days for $200 and got myself out of the bus station."  Stallone later explained that he had done the film out of desperation after being evicted from his apartment and finding himself homeless for several days. He has also said that he slept three weeks in the New York City Port Authority bus station prior to seeing a casting notice for the film.  In the actor's words, "it was either do that movie or rob someone, because I was at the end – the very end – of my rope".  The film was released several years later as Italian Stallion, in order to cash in on Stallone's new found fame (the new title was taken from Stallone's nickname since Rocky and a line from the film).Stallone also starred in the erotic off-Broadway stage play Score which ran for 23 performances at the Martinique Theatre from October 28 – November 15, 1971 and was later made into a film by Radley Metzger.
Early film roles, 1970–1975In 1970, Stallone appeared in the film No Place to Hide, which was re-cut and retitled Rebel, the second version featuring Stallone as its star. After the style of Woody Allen's What's Up, Tiger Lily?, this film, in 1990, was re-edited from outtakes from the original movie and newly shot matching footage, then redubbed into an award-winning parody of itself titled A Man Called... Rainbo.  Again starring Stallone, this self-parody was directed by David Casci and produced by Jeffrey Hilton. A Man Called...Rainbo won Silver Awards at the Chicago International Film Festival and Worldfest – Houston, and was featured on Entertainment Tonight along with its credited star, Sylvester Stallone. It received a Thumbs-Up on Siskel & Ebert, and was recommended by Michael Medved on the popular movie review show, Sneak Previews.Stallone's other first few film roles were minor, and included brief uncredited appearances in Woody Allen's Bananas (1971) as a subway thug, in the psychological thriller Klute (1971) as an extra dancing in a club, and in the Jack Lemmon film The Prisoner of Second Avenue (1975) as a youth. In the Lemmon film, Jack Lemmon's character chases, tackles and mugs Stallone, thinking that Stallone's character is a pickpocket. He had his second starring role in The Lords of Flatbush, in 1974.  In 1975, he played supporting roles in Farewell, My Lovely; Capone; and Death Race 2000. He made guest appearances on the TV series Police Story and Kojak.
Success with Rocky, 1976
Stallone gained worldwide fame with his starring role in the smash hit Rocky (1976).  On March 24, 1975, Stallone saw the Muhammad Ali–Chuck Wepner fight, which inspired the foundation idea of Rocky. That night Stallone went home, and after three days,  20 straight hours  he had written the script for Rocky. After that, he tried to sell the script with the intention of playing the lead role.  Robert Chartoff and Irwin Winkler in particular liked the script.  Stallone was offered increasingly larger fees to sell the script and allow a different actor to star in the film, but he turned the offers down until the studio agreed to let Stallone himself play the role.   Rocky was nominated for ten Academy Awards, including Best Actor and Best Original Screenplay nominations for Stallone. The film went on to win the Academy Awards for Best Picture, Best Directing and Best Film Editing. 
Rocky, Rambo, and new film roles, 1978–1989Following the success of Rocky, Stallone made his directorial debut and starred in the 1978 film Paradise Alley, a family drama in which he played one of three brothers who enter the world of wrestling. That same year he starred in Norman Jewison's F.I.S.T., a social drama in which he plays a warehouse worker, very loosely modeled on James Hoffa, who becomes involved in the labor union leadership.In 1979 he wrote, directed and starred in the sequel to his 1976 hit: Rocky II (replacing John G. Avildsen, who won an Academy Award for directing the first film), which also became a major success,  grossing $200 million.
In 1981 he starred alongside Michael Caine in Escape to Victory, a sports drama in which he plays a prisoner of war involved in a Nazi propaganda soccer game. That same year he starred in the thriller Nighthawks, in which he plays a New York city cop who plays a cat and mouse game with a foreign terrorist, played by Rutger Hauer.Stallone launched another major franchise success, starring as Vietnam veteran John Rambo, a former Green Beret, in the action-war film First Blood (1982).  The first installment of Rambo was both a critical and box office success. Critics praised Stallone's performance, saying he made Rambo seem human, as opposed to the way he is portrayed in the book of the same name. Two Rambo sequels, Rambo: First Blood Part II (1985) and Rambo III (1988), followed. Although box office hits, they met with much less critical praise than the original.  He also continued his box office success with the Rocky franchise and wrote, directed, and starred in two more sequels to the series: Rocky III (1982) and Rocky IV (1985). Stallone has portrayed these two characters in a total of ten films. In preparation for these roles, Stallone embarked upon a vigorous training regimen which often meant six days a week in the gym and further sit ups in the evenings. Stallone claims to have gotten his body fat percentage down to his all time low of 2.8% for Rocky III. 
Training and exercise for RamboSylvester Stallone met former Mr Olympia Franco Columbu to develop the appearance for Rocky II and Rambo 2 films, just as if he were preparing for the Mr. Olympia competition. That meant two workouts a day, six days a week. It was during this time period that Stallone's work cultivated a strong overseas following. He also attempted, albeit unsuccessfully, roles in different genres. In 1984 he co-wrote and starred in the comedy film Rhinestone where he played a wannabe country music singer and in 1987 he starred in the drama film Over the Top where he played a struggling trucker who, after the death of his wife, tries to make amends with his son who he left behind years earlier. His son does not think too highly of him until he sees him compete in a nation-wide arm wrestling competition. For the Rhinestone soundtrack, he performed a song. These films did not do well at the box office and were poorly received by critics. It was around 1985 that Stallone was signed to a remake of the 1939 James Cagney classic Angels With Dirty Faces. The film would form part of his multi-picture deal with Cannon Pictures and was to co-star Christopher Reeve and be directed by Menahem Golan. The re-making of such a beloved classic was met with disapproval by Variety Magazine and horror by top critic Roger Ebert and so Cannon opted to make Cobra instead. Cobra (1986) and the buddy cop action film Tango and Cash (1989) alongside Kurt Russell did solid business domestically but overseas they did blockbuster business grossing over $100 million in foreign markets and over $160 million worldwide.
1990–2002
With the then-recent success of Lock Up  and Tango and Cash at the start of the 1990s, Stallone starred in the fifth installment of the Rocky franchise, Rocky V, which was considered a box office disappointment and was also disliked by fans as an unworthy entry in the series. After starring in the critical and commercial disasters Oscar (1991) and Stop! Or My Mom Will Shoot (1992) during the early 90s, he made a comeback in 1993 with the hit Cliffhanger, which was a success in the U.S., grossing $84 million, but even more successful worldwide, grossing $171 million, for a total over US$255 million. Later that year, he starred with Wesley Snipes in the futuristic action film Demolition Man, which grossed in excess of $158 million worldwide. His string of hits continued with 1994's The Specialist (over $170 million worldwide gross).In 1995, he played the comic book-based title character Judge Dredd, which was taken from the British comic book 2000 AD in the film of the same name. His overseas box office appeal saved the domestic box office disappointment of Judge Dredd, which cost almost $100 million and barely made its budget back, with a worldwide tally of $113 million. He also appeared in the thriller Assassins (1995), with Julianne Moore and Antonio Banderas. In 1996, he starred in the disaster film Daylight, which was not very successful in the US, but grossed $126 million overseas. That same year, Stallone, along with an all-star cast of celebrities, appeared in the Trey Parker and Matt Stone short comedy film Your Studio and You commissioned by the Seagram Company for a party celebrating their acquisition of Universal Studios and the MCA Corporation. Stallone speaks in his Rocky Balboa voice with subtitles translating what he is saying. At one point, Stallone starts yelling about how can they use his Balboa character, that he left it in the past; the narrator calms him with a wine cooler and calling him, "brainiac." In response, Stallone says, "Thank you very much." He then looks at the wine cooler and exclaims, "Stupid cheap studio!" Following his breakthrough performance in Rocky, critic Roger Ebert had stated that Stallone could become the next Marlon Brando, though he never recaptured the critical acclaim achieved with Rocky. Stallone did go on to receive much acclaim for his role in the low-budget crime drama Cop Land (1997), in which he starred alongside Robert De Niro and Ray Liotta, but the film was only a minor success at the box office.  His performance led him to win the Stockholm International Film Festival Best Actor Award. In 1998 he did voice-over work for the computer-animated film Antz, which was a big hit domestically.In 2000, Stallone starred in the thriller Get Carter – a remake of the 1971 British Michael Caine film of the same name—but the film was poorly received by both critics and audiences. Stallone's career declined considerably after his subsequent films Driven (2001), Avenging Angelo (2002) and D-Tox (2002) also underachieved expectations to do well at the box office and were poorly received by critics.
2003–2005In 2003, he played a villainous role in the third installment of the Spy Kids trilogy Spy Kids 3-D: Game Over which was a huge box office success (almost $200 million worldwide). Stallone also had a cameo appearance in the 2003 French film Taxi 3 as a passenger.Following several poorly reviewed box office flops, Stallone started to regain prominence for his supporting role in the neo-noir crime drama Shade (2003) which was only released in a limited fashion but was praised by critics.  He was also attached to star and direct a film tentatively titled Rampart Scandal, which was to be about the murder of rappers Tupac Shakur and The Notorious B.I.G. and the surrounding Los Angeles Police Department corruption scandal.  It was later titled Notorious but was shelved. In 2005, he was the co-presenter, alongside Sugar Ray Leonard, of the NBC Reality television boxing series The Contender. That same year he also made a guest appearance in two episodes of the television series Las Vegas. In 2005, Stallone also inducted wrestling icon Hulk Hogan, who appeared in Rocky III as a wrestler named Thunderlips, into the WWE Hall of Fame; Stallone was also the person who offered Hogan the cameo in Rocky III. 
Revisiting Rocky and Rambo, 2006–2008
After a three year hiatus from films, Stallone made a comeback in 2006 with the sixth installment of his successful Rocky series, Rocky Balboa, which was a critical and commercial hit. After the critical and box office failure of the previous installment Rocky V, Stallone had decided to write, direct and star in a sixth installment which would be a more appropriate climax to the series. The total domestic box office came to $70.3 million (and $155.7 million worldwide).  The budget of the movie was only $24 million. His performance in Rocky Balboa has been praised and garnered mostly positive reviews. Stallone's fourth installment of his other successful movie franchise, Rambo, with the sequel being titled simply Rambo. The film opened in 2,751 theaters on January 25, 2008, grossing $6,490,000 on its opening day and $18,200,000 over its opening weekend. Its box office was $113,244,290 worldwide with a budget of  $50 million.Asked in February 2008 which of the icons he would rather be remembered for, Stallone said "it's a tough one, but Rocky is my first baby, so Rocky." 
Other film work
Stallone's debut as a director came in 1978 with Paradise Alley, which he also wrote and starred in. In addition, he directed Staying Alive, the sequel to Saturday Night Fever, along with Rocky II, Rocky III, Rocky IV, Rocky Balboa, and Rambo. In August 2005, Stallone released his book Sly Moves which claimed to be a guide to fitness and nutrition as well as a candid insight into his life and works from his own perspective. The book also contained many photographs of Stallone throughout the years as well as pictures of him performing exercises. In addition to writing all six Rocky films, Stallone also wrote Cobra, Driven, and Rambo. He has co-written several other films, such as F.I.S.T., Rhinestone, Over the Top, and the first three Rambo films. His last major success as a co-writer came with 1993's Cliffhanger. In addition, Stallone has continued to express his passion in directing a film on Edgar Allan Poe's life, a script he has been preparing for years. In July 2009, he appeared in a cameo in the Bollywood movie Kambakkht Ishq where he played himself.  Stallone also provided the voice of a lion in Kevin James's comedy Zookeeper. Stallone has also mentioned that he would like to adapt a Nelson DeMille novel, The Lion's Game and James Byron Huggin's novel Hunter, which Stallone had the film rights for several years and originally planned to use the plot from Hunter for Rambo V. In 2009, Stallone expressed interest in starring in a remake of Charles Bronson's 1974 movie Death Wish. 
2010 onwardsThe Expendables was Stallone's big success of 2010. The movie, which was filmed during summer/winter 2009, was released on August 13, 2010. Stallone wrote, directed and starred in the movie. Joining him in the film were fellow action stars Jason Statham, Jet Li, and Dolph Lundgren, as well as Terry Crews, Mickey Rourke, Randy Couture, Eric Roberts, and Stone Cold Steve Austin, and cameos by fellow '80s action icons Bruce Willis and Arnold Schwarzenegger.  The movie took $34,825,135 in its opening weekend, going straight in at No.1 in the US box office. The figure marked the biggest opening weekend in Stallone's 35 year career.  In summer 2010, Brazilian company O2 Filmes released a statement saying it was still owed more than $2 million US for its work on the film.  The sequel to The Expendables, The Expendables 2, was released August 17, 2012 to a superior critical reception of 67% on Rotten Tomatoes,  as opposed to the original's 41%. Stallone stars in the action film Bullet to the Head, directed by Walter Hill, based upon Alexis Nolent's French graphic novel Du Plomb Dans La Tete.  In 2013, he will be starring in the action thriller film The Tomb along with Arnold Schwarzenegger and Jim Caviezel. Stallone expressed interest in making a remake of the Spanish film No Rest for the Wicked and to star in a fifth Rambo film. 
Tobacco promotionIn 1983, Stallone entered into an agreement with Associated Film Promotions, Inc. representing their client, cigarette manufacturer Brown & Williamson Corp., to use or place B&W products in five of his feature films. Re: agreements between Stallone and Associated Film Promotions Legacy Tobacco Documents Library   In exchange, Stallone was paid a total of $500,000, disbursed as $250,000 up front and $50,000 "payable at the inception of production of each participating film." In the initial correspondences Stallone guaranteed that he would "use Brown and Williamson tobacco products in no less than five feature films"  but later, to be consistent with the character of Rocky Balboa, it was decided that "other leads will have product usage" in Rocky IV.  In 2002 documentation of the agreement was made publicly available through the Legacy Tobacco Documents Library at the University of California, San Francisco. 
Personal life
Stallone has been married three times. At age 28, on December 28, 1974, he married Sasha Czack. The couple had two sons, Sage Moonblood (May 5, 1976 - July 13, 2012) and Seargeoh (b. 1979). His younger son was diagnosed with autism at an early age. The couple divorced on February 14, 1985. He married model and actress Brigitte Nielsen, on December 15, 1985, in Beverly Hills, California. Stallone and Nielsen's marriage, which lasted two years, and their subsequent divorce, were highly publicized by the tabloid press.    In May 1997, Stallone married Jennifer Flavin, with whom he has three daughters.
In 2007, customs officials in Australia discovered 48 vials of the synthetic human growth hormone Jintropin in his luggage.  After Stallone's request that his acting and life experiences be accepted in exchange for his remaining credits, he was granted a Bachelors of Fine Arts (BFA) degree by the President of the University of Miami in 1999. His 48 year old half-sister, Toni Ann Filiti, died of lung cancer, six weeks after the death of his son, Sage. She succumbed to lung cancer on Sunday, August 26, 2012. She died at their mother Jackie Stallone's Santa Monica home after choosing to leave UCLA hospital.Stallone stopped going to church as his acting career progressed but later rediscovered his childhood faith when his daughter was born ill in 1996, and is now an active Catholic. 
InjuriesKnown for physically demanding roles, and his willingness to do a majority of his own stunts, Stallone has suffered numerous injuries during his acting career. For a scene in Rocky IV, he told Dolph Lundgren  "Punch me as hard as you can in the chest." "Next thing I know, I was in intensive care at St. John’s Hospital for four days. It’s stupid!"  While filming a fight scene with actor Steve Austin in The Expendables, he broke his neck, which required the insertion of a metal plate. 
Upcoming Projects

Film  Note 
Grudge Match  Boxing 
The Expendables 3  Next Year 
The Hunter  Next Year 
Rambo: Last Stand   
No Rest for the Wicked   
Death Wish   

FilmographyAlso see Sylvester Stallone filmography.

Year Film Credited as Role Notes 
Director Producer Writer Actor 
1970 The Party at Kitty and Stud's      Stud  
No Place to Hide      Jerry Savage   
1971  Bananas      Subway Thug No.1  Uncredited 
Klute      Discothèque Patron Uncredited 
1974  The Lords of Flatbush       Stanley Rosiello  Writer (additional dialogue) 
1975  The Prisoner of Second Avenue      Youth in Park   
Capone      Frank Nitti   
Death Race 2000      Machine Gun Joe Viterbo   
Mandingo      Young Man in Crowd  Uncredited (Scenes deleted) 
Farewell, My Lovely      Jonnie   
Police Story      Caddo  TV series (1 episode) 
Kojak      Detective Rick Daly 
1976  Cannonball      Mafioso  Uncredited 
Rocky       Rocky Balboa  Writer 
1978  F.I.S.T.       Johnny D. Kovak  Screenplay 
Paradise Alley        Cosmo Carboni  Director and Writer 
1979  Rocky II        Rocky Balboa  Director and Writer 
1981  Nighthawks      Det. Sgt. Deke DaSilva   
Escape to Victory      Captain Robert Hatch   
1982  Rocky III        Rocky Balboa  Director and Writer 
First Blood       Rambo  Screenplay 
1983  Staying Alive         Man on Street  Cameo; Uncredited, Director, Producer and Writer 
1984  Rhinestone       Nick Martinelli  Screenplay 
1985  Rambo: First Blood Part II       Rambo  Screenplay 
1985  Rocky IV        Rocky Balboa  Director and Writer 
1986  Cobra       Lieutenant Marion 'Cobra' Cobretti  Screenplay 
1987  Over the Top       Lincoln Hawk  Screenplay 
1988  Rambo III       Rambo  Writer 
1989  Lock Up      Frank Leone   
Tango & Cash      Raymond 'Ray' Tango   
1990  Rocky V       Rocky Balboa  Writer 
1991  Oscar      Angelo 'Snaps' Provolone   
1992  Stop! Or My Mom Will Shoot      Sgt. Joe Bomowski   
1993  Cliffhanger       Gabe Walker  Screenplay 
Demolition Man      John Spartan   
1994  The Specialist      Ray Quick   
1995 Judge Dredd      Judge Joseph Dredd   
Assassins      Robert Rath   
Your Studio and You      Himself   
1996  Daylight      Kit Latura   
1997  The Good Life      Boss  not released 
Men in Black      Alien on TV Monitors  Cameo; uncredited 
Cop Land      Sheriff Freddy Heflin   
1998  Antz      Weaver  Voice 
1999  D-Tox      Jake Malloy  Released in direct-to-video entitled Eye See You in 2002 
2000  Get Carter      Jack Carter   
2001  Driven        Joe Tanto  Producer and Screenplay 
2002  Liberty's Kids      Paul Revere  TV series (1 episode) 
Avenging Angelo      Frankie Delano   
2003  Taxi 3      Passenger to Airport  Cameo; Uncredited 
Spy Kids 3-D: Game Over      The Toymaker   
2004  Shade      Dean 'The Dean' Stevens   
2005  Las Vegas      Frank the Repairman  TV Series (2 episodes) 
2006  Rocky Balboa        Rocky Balboa  Director and Writer 
2008  Rambo        Rambo  Director and Writer 
2009  Kambakkht Ishq      Himself  Cameo 
2010  The Expendables        Barney Ross  Director and Writer 
2011 Zookeeper      Joe the Lion  Voice
 
2012  The Expendables 2       Barney Ross  Writer 
2013 Bullet to the Head      Jimmy Bobo   
The Tomb      Ray Breslin   
Homefront        

References 
External links 
 

 
 

 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT






















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Michael Caine
 
 
 
 
Sir Michael Caine, CBE (born Maurice Joseph Micklewhite on 14 March 1933) is an English actor and author. Renowned for his distinctive Cockney accent, Caine has appeared in over one hundred films and is one of Britain's most recognisable actors. He made his breakthrough in the 1960s with starring roles in a number of British films, including, Zulu (1964), The Ipcress File (1965), Alfie (1966), The Italian Job (1969), and Battle of Britain (1969). His most notable roles in the 1970s included, Get Carter (1971), The Man Who Would Be King (1975), and A Bridge Too Far (1978). He achieved critical success in the 1980s, with Educating Rita (1983) earning him the BAFTA and Golden Globe Award for Best Actor, and in 1986 he received an Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor for his performance in Hannah and Her Sisters.Caine played a British con-man in Dirty Rotten Scoundrels (1988), and Ebenezer Scrooge in The Muppet Christmas Carol (1992). He received his second Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor for The Cider House Rules (1999). Caine played Nigel Powers in the 2002 parody Austin Powers in Goldmember, and more recently portrayed Alfred Pennyworth, the butler in Christopher Nolan's the Dark Knight trilogy. He also appeared as supporting characters in Nolan's 2006 film The Prestige, 2010 film Inception and Pixar's 2011 spy film Cars 2. Caine is one of only two actors nominated for an Academy Award for acting in every decade from the 1960s to 2000s (the other one being Jack Nicholson). In 2000, Caine was knighted by Queen Elizabeth II in recognition of his contribution to cinema.
Early lifeCaine was born in St Olave's Hospital, Rotherhithe, Southwark,  the son of Ellen Frances Marie (née Burchell; 1900-1989), a cook and charwoman, and Maurice Joseph Micklewhite, a fish market porter.    His father was of English, Irish, and, reportedly, Irish Traveller, ancestry.   ;     Caine was brought up in his mother's Protestant religion (his father was Catholic). Caine grew up in Southwark, South London, and during the Second World War, he was evacuated to North Runcton near King's Lynn in Norfolk.  After the war, when his father was demobilised, the family was rehoused by the council in Marshall Gardens at the Elephant and Castle in a pre-fabricated house made in Canada,  as much of London's housing stock had been damaged during the Blitz in 1940-41. The prefabs, as they were known, were intended to be temporary homes while London was rebuilt, but we ended up living there for eighteen years and for us, after a cramped flat with an outside toilet, it was luxury.  In 1944, he passed his eleven plus exam, winning a scholarship to Hackney Downs Grocers' School. For an account of his evacuation and early school years, as sent to Jerry Pam—another Hackney Downs pupil whom he met in the 1950s, who was 6 years his senior, and who has become his publicist for "over 50 years"—see "MC" [Michael Caine], "A Message from Evacuee Maurice Micklewhite", The Clove's Lines: The Newsletter of The Clove Club: The Old Boys of Hackney Downs School 3.2 (March 2009): 16.  After a year there he moved to Wilson's Grammar School in Camberwell (now Wilson's School in Wallington, South London), which he left at sixteen after gaining a School Certificate in six subjects. He then worked briefly as a filing clerk and messenger for a film company in Victoria Street and the film producer Jay Lewis in Wardour Street.    From 1952, when he was called up to do his national service, until 1954, he served in the British Army's Royal Fusiliers, first at the BAOR HQ in Iserlohn, Germany and then on active service during the Korean War. Caine has said he would like to see the return of national service to help combat youth violence, stating: "I'm just saying, put them in the Army for six months. You're there to learn how to defend your country. You belong to the country. Then when you come out, you have a sense of belonging rather than a sense of violence." 
Career

1950sCaine's acting career began at the age of 20 in Horsham, Sussex when he responded to an advertisement in The Stage for an assistant stage manager who would also perform small walk-on parts for the Horsham-based Westminster Repertory Company who were performed at the Carfax Electric Theatre.  Adopting the stage name "Michael Scott", In July 1953 he was cast as the drunkard Hindley in the Company's production of Wuthering Heights.  He moved to the Lowestoft Repertory Company in Suffolk for a year when he was 22. It was here that he met his first wife. 
He has described the first nine years of his career as "really, really brutal." When his career took him to London in 1954 after his provincial apprenticeship, his agent informed him that there was already a Michael Scott performing as an actor in London and that he had to come up with a new name immediately. Speaking to his agent from a telephone box in Leicester Square, London, he looked around for inspiration, noted that The Caine Mutiny was being shown at the Odeon Cinema in 1954, and decided to change his name to "Michael Caine". (Humphrey Bogart was his "screen idol" and he would later play the part originally intended for Bogart in John Huston's The Man Who Would Be King. ) He has joked in interviews that had he looked the other way, he would have ended up as "Michael One Hundred and One Dalmatians".  (This quip is obviously tongue-in-cheek as the film One Hundred and One Dalmatians was not made until seven years later in 1961 and thus the title would not have been seen by him on a Leicester Square cinema marquee in 1954.)  In 1959, he was Peter O'Toole's understudy in Lindsay Anderson's West End staging of Willis Hall's The Long and the Short and the Tall. He took over the role when O'Toole left to make Lawrence of Arabia (1960) and went on to a four-month tour of Britain and Ireland.  Michael Caine's first film role was as one of the privates in George Baker's platoon in the 1956 film A Hill in Korea.  The stars of the film were George Baker, Stanley Baker, Harry Andrews and Michael Medwin, with Stephen Boyd and Ronald Lewis, and Robert Shaw also had a small part.
1960sA big break came for Caine when he was cast as Meff in James Saunders' Cockney comedy Next Time I'll Sing To You, when this play was presented at the New Arts Theatre in London on 23 January 1963.   Scenes from the play's performance were featured in the April 1963 issue of Theatre World magazine. When this play moved to the Criterion in Piccadilly with Michael Codron directing, he was visited backstage by Stanley Baker, one of the four stars in Caine's first film, A Hill In Korea, who told him about the part of a Cockney corporal in his upcoming film Zulu, a film Baker was producing and starring in. Baker told Caine to meet the director, Cy Endfield, who informed him that he already had given the part that Baker had tipped Caine for to James Booth, a fellow Cockney who was Caine's friend, because he looked more Cockney than Caine did. Endfield then told the 6'2" Caine that he did not look like a Cockney but like an officer, and offered him a screen test for the role of a snobbish, upper class officer after Caine assured him that he could do a posh accent. Caine believes Enfield offered him, a Cockney, the role of an aristocrat as, being American, he did not have the endemic British class prejudice. Though he tested poorly, Endfield gave him the part that would make him a film star. Location shooting for Zulu took place 14 weeks in Natal, South Africa in 1963.    According to his 2011 autobiography The Elephant to Hollywood, Caine had been signed to a seven-year contract by Joseph E. Levine, whose Embassy Films was distributing Zulu. After the return of the cast to England and the completion of the film, Levine released him from the contract, telling him, "I know you're not, but you gotta face the fact that you look like a queer on screen." Levine gave his contract to his Zulu co-star James Booth. Subsequently, Caine's agent got him cast in the BBC production Hamlet at Elsinore (1964) as Horatio in support of Christopher Plummer's Hamlet. Horatio was the only classical role Caine, who had never received dramatic training, would ever play.Caine wrote, "...I decided that if my on-screen appearance was going to be an issue, then I would use it to bring out all Horatio's ambiguous sexuality." After dozens of minor TV roles, Caine finally entered the public eye as the upper class British Army officer Gonville Bromhead in Zulu. This proved paradoxical, as Caine was to become notable for using a regional accent, rather than the Received Pronunciation hitherto considered proper for film actors. At the time, Caine's working class Cockney, just as with the Beatles' Liverpudlian accents, stood out to American and British audiences alike.Zulu was closely followed by two of his best-known roles: the spy Harry Palmer in The Ipcress File (1965), and the womanising title character in Alfie (1966). He went on to play Palmer in a further four films, Funeral in Berlin (1966), Billion Dollar Brain (1967), Bullet to Beijing (1995) and Midnight in Saint Petersburg (1995). Caine made his first film in the United States in 1966, after an invitation from Shirley MacLaine to play opposite her in Gambit. During the first two weeks, whilst staying at the Beverly Hills Hotel, he met long term friends John Wayne and agent "Swifty" Lazar. 
1970sAfter working on The Italian Job with Noël Coward, and a solid role as RAF fighter pilot Squadron Leader Canfield in the all-star cast of Battle of Britain (both 1969), Caine played the lead in Get Carter (1971), a British gangster film. Caine was busy with successes including Sleuth (1972) opposite Laurence Olivier, and The Man Who Would Be King (1975) co-starring Sean Connery and directed by John Huston (which he has stated will be the film he wishes to be remembered for after his death). In 1976 he appeared in the screen adaptation by Tom Mankiewicz of the Jack Higgins novel The Eagle Has Landed as Oberst (Colonel) Kurt Steiner, the commander of a Luftwaffe paratroop brigade disguised as Polish paratroopers, whose mission was to kidnap or kill the then-British Prime Minister Winston Churchill, alongside co-stars Donald Sutherland, Robert Duvall, Jenny Agutter and Donald Pleasence. Subsequently in 1978, he starred in The Silver Bears, an adaptation of Paul Erdman's (1974) novel of the same name. Caine also was part of an all-star cast in A Bridge Too Far (1977).
1980sBy the end of the decade, he had moved to the United States, but his choice of roles was often criticised he admitted to and has since made many self-deprecating comments about taking parts, strictly for the money, in numerous films he knew to be bad, despite working with Hollywood's highly regarded directors such as Irwin Allen, Richard Fleischer, Michael Ritchie and Oliver Stone. Caine was averaging two films a year, but these included such failures as the BAFTA Award-nominated The Magus (1968), the Academy Award-nominated The Swarm (1978), Ashanti (1979) (which he claimed were the worst three films of all the other worst films he ever made), Beyond the Poseidon Adventure (1979), The Island (1980), The Hand (1981) and a reunion with his Sleuth co-star Laurence Olivier in The Jigsaw Man (1982).
 
Although Caine also took better roles, including a BAFTA-winning turn in Educating Rita (1983), and an Oscar-winning one in Hannah and Her Sisters (1986) and a Golden Globe-nominated one in Dirty Rotten Scoundrels (1988), he continued to appear in notorious duds like the thinly veiled skin flick Blame It on Rio, the Dick Clement and Ian Le Frenais comedy Water and the critical-commercial flop Jaws: The Revenge (1987) (in which he had mixed feelings about the production and the final cut) and Bullseye! (1990); his appearing in so many films that did not meet with critical or box office acclaim made him the butt of numerous jokes on the subject. Of the former, Caine famously said (primarily about Jaws: The Revenge) "I have never seen the film, but by all accounts it was terrible. However I have seen the house that it built, and it is terrific."  All these film failures later became cult films among his fans today. His other successful films (critically and/or financially) were the 1978 Academy Award-winning California Suite, the 1980 Golden Globe-nominated slasher film Dressed to Kill, the 1981 war film Escape to Victory, the 1982 film Deathtrap, and the 1986 Academy Award-nominated Mona Lisa. He also starred in Without a Clue, portraying Sherlock Holmes and also acted as Chief Insp. Frederick Abberline in the 1988 TV series 'Jack the Ripper'.
1990sThe 1990s were a lean time for Caine, as he found good parts harder to come by. A high point came when he played Ebenezer Scrooge in the critically acclaimed The Muppet Christmas Carol (1992). He played the beleaguered stage director Lloyd Dallas in the film adaptation of Noises Off (1992). He also played a villain in the Steven Seagal film On Deadly Ground (1994). He was in two straight to video Harry Palmer sequels and a few television films. However, Caine's reputation as a pop icon was still intact, thanks to his roles in films such as The Italian Job and Get Carter. His performance in 1998's Little Voice was seen as something of a return to form, and won him a Golden Globe Award. Better parts followed, including The Cider House Rules (1999), for which he won his second Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor. 
2000sIn the 2000s, Caine appeared in Miss Congeniality (2000), Last Orders (2001), The Quiet American (2002), for which he was Oscar-nominated, and others that helped rehabilitate his reputation. Several of Caine's classic films have been remade, including The Italian Job, Get Carter, Alfie and Sleuth. In the 2007 remake of Sleuth, Caine took over the role Laurence Olivier played in the 1972 version and Jude Law played Caine's original role. Caine also starred in Austin Powers in Goldmember (2002) as Austin's father and in 2003 he co-starred with Robert Duvall in Secondhand Lions. In 2005, he was cast as Bruce Wayne's butler Alfred Pennyworth in the first production of the new Batman film series. In 2006, he appeared in the films Children of Men and The Prestige. In 2007 he appeared in Flawless, while in 2008 and 2012 he reprised his role as Alfred in Christopher Nolan's critically acclaimed Batman sequels, The Dark Knight and The Dark Knight Rises as well as starring in the British drama Is Anybody There?, which explores the final days of life.It was reported by Empire magazine that Caine had said that Harry Brown (released on 13 November 2009) would be his last lead role.  Caine later declared (in the Daily Mirror) that he had been misquoted by the magazine. 
2010sCaine appeared in Christopher Nolan's science fiction thriller Inception as Prof. Stephen Miles, Cobb's (Leonardo DiCaprio) mentor and father-in-law.  He voiced Finn McMissile in Pixar's 2011 film Cars 2 and also voiced a supporting role in the animation, Gnomeo and Juliet. He also starred in the 2012 film Journey 2: The Mysterious Island, as Josh Hutcherson's character's grandfather; the film also featured Dwayne Johnson and Vanessa Hudgens. Caine reprised his role as Alfred Pennyworth in the Batman sequel, The Dark Knight Rises, which was released in July 2012. Filming of his scenes took place at Wollaton Hall, Wollaton, Nottinghamshire, England.

Awards and honoursCaine has been Oscar-nominated six times, winning his first Academy Award for the 1986 film Hannah and Her Sisters, and his second in 1999 for The Cider House Rules, in both cases as a supporting actor. His performance in Educating Rita in 1983 earned him the BAFTA and Golden Globe Award for Best Actor.He was appointed Commander of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) in the 1992 Queen's Birthday Honours,  and in the 2000 New Year Honours he was knighted as Sir Maurice Micklewhite CBE.   In 2000 he received a BAFTA Academy Fellowship Award.  On 5 January 2011, Caine was made a Commander of the Ordre des Arts et des Lettres by France's culture minister, Frédéric Mitterrand. In 2008, he was awarded the prize for Outstanding Contribution to Showbusiness at the Variety Club Awards.   
In popular cultureCaine is a popular subject for impressionists and mimics, having a voice and manner of speaking that are distinctive, yet fairly easy to imitate. Most Caine impressions include the catchphrase "Not a lot of people know that." Peter Sellers initiated this when he appeared on BBC1's Parkinson show on 28 October 1972 and said: "Not many people know that. This is my Michael Caine impression. You see, Mike's always quoting from the Guinness Book of Records. At the drop of a hat he'll trot one out. 'Did you know that it takes a man in a tweed suit five and a half seconds to fall from the top of Big Ben to the ground?' Now there's not many people who know that!". The line had been used earlier in Spike Milligan's script for The Last Goon Show of All, performed on 5 October 1972.  In 1983, Caine was given the line to say as an in-joke in the film Educating Rita. The British comedy sketch show, Harry Enfield's Television Programme, included a series of sketches in which Paul Whitehouse played a character called Michael Paine; an amalgam of previous Michael Caine impressions, who in a reference to the The Ipcress File wears oversized, thick-rimmed glasses and a trench coat. He introduces himself with the line, "My name is Michael Paine, and I am a nosy neighbour" and in a spoof of the stakeout at the beginning of The Ipcress File, recounts to the camera the 'suspiciously' mundane behaviour of his neighbours, before saying, "Not a lot of people know that I know that". Caine himself parodied the phenomenon in an interview with Michael Parkinson, imitating others' impressions of him and including the catchphrase. A parody of Michael Caine also appears in the animated series Ugly Americans, in the episode "The Dork Knight", which also parodies the film The Dark Knight. In the episode, Caine appears as himself, portrayed in the light of his Alfred Pennyworth interpretation, and constantly annoys the protagonists with endless anecdotes of his career.The Trip, starring Rob Brydon and Steve Coogan, featured improvised scenes in which the two leads argue over who can do the better Michael Caine impression. Among the lines they repeat in their attempts to outdo each other are, "You were only supposed to blow the bloody doors off!" and, "She was only sixteen" - from The Italian Job and Get Carter respectively.
Personal lifeCaine lives in Leatherhead, Surrey, and is patron to the Leatherhead Drama Festival.  He has also lived in North Stoke, Oxfordshire, Clewer near Windsor, Berkshire, Lowestoft in Suffolk and Chelsea Harbour in London. In addition, Caine owns an apartment at the Apogee in Miami Beach, Florida. He still keeps a small flat near where he grew up in South East London.  Caine has published two volumes of memoirs, What's It All About? in 1992 and The Elephant to Hollywood in 2010. He was married to actress Patricia Haines from 1955 to 1958. They had a daughter, Dominique (who was named after the heroine of the novel The Fountainhead by Ayn Rand).  He dated Bianca Jagger in 1968. Caine has been married to actress and model Shakira Baksh since 8 January 1973. They met after Caine saw her appearing in a Maxwell House coffee commercial and a friend gave him her telephone number. They have a daughter, Natasha Haleema.  Some time after his mother died, Caine and his younger brother, Stanley, learned they had an elder half-brother, named David. He suffered from severe epilepsy and had been kept in Cane Hill Mental Hospital his entire life. Although their mother regularly visited her first son in the hospital, even her husband did not know the child existed. David died in 1992. Trivia books written by Caine include Not Many People Know That!, And Not Many People Know This Either!, Michael Caine's Moving Picture Show and Not A Lot of People Know This is 1988. Proceeds from the books went to the National Playing Fields Association (now Fields In Trust) of which Caine was a prominent supporter.Caine was called up for national service in the British Army in 1951 when he was aged 18 and was deployed to South Korea to help in the aftermath of the North Korean invasion. He served as part of the Royal Fusiliers. He said he had gone into it feeling sympathetic to communism, coming as he did from a poor family. But he has said the experience left him permanently repelled. Caine is a frequent collaborator with director Christopher Nolan, having appeared in five of the filmmaker's eight films: Batman Begins, The Prestige, The Dark Knight, Inception, and The Dark Knight Rises.
PoliticsCaine has often spoken publicly about his political views. He left Britain in February 1979, citing the 82% tax levied on top earners by the Labour government of the time, but returned to Britain eight years later after taxes had been lowered:  In 2009, Caine openly criticised the Labour government's proposed new 50% tax on top earners:  Caine also stated in 2009 that he was likely to vote for the Conservatives again: "I'll probably vote Conservative. I mean, we're in a terrible state whichever way you look at it, socially, financially and politically, so just give the other guy a chance. I don't know what Cameron's going to do, but in the end you vote out of desperation. You just have to have someone new and see what happens."  Following the launch of his film Harry Brown, Caine called for the reintroduction of national service in the UK to give young people "a sense of belonging rather than a sense of violence". During the run up to the 2010 General Election, Caine publicly endorsed the Conservative Party, despite claiming to have supported New Labour in 1997.  He appeared with David Cameron for the Conservative leader's launch of a civilian non-compulsory 'National Service' for teenagers. 
Musical careerCaine is a fan of chill-out music and has compiled a mix CD called Cained, which was released in 2007 by UMTV.  According to Michael Caine, he met Elton John and was discussing musical tastes, when Caine claimed that he had been creating chillout mix tapes as an amateur for years.  Also in music, Caine provided vocal samples for the band Madness for their 1984 hit "Michael Caine" as his daughter was a fan. He has sung in film roles as well, including for the musical film, The Muppet Christmas Carol.
Filmography, awards, and nominations 
References 
External links 
 

 
 
 
  in 2010
 
"The Films of Michael Caine" compilation of film clips, 4 minutes
PLAY DIRTY/Caine Special on Location in Spain
Martyn Palmer, "Double act: Michael Caine and Jude Law (lunch and discussion)", The Times, 17 November 2007
Charlie Rose video interview 3 February 2003
IGN.com interview 18 March 2003
200 years of Michael Caine's family tree
 
  
DEFAULTSORT
























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Rafael Sabatini
 
 
 
Rafael Sabatini (29 April 1875 – 13 February 1950) was an Italian/English writer of novels of romance and adventure.
Life
Rafael Sabatini was born in Iesi, Italy, to an English mother (Anna Trafford) and Italian father. His parents were opera singers who became teachers. At a young age, Rafael was exposed to many languages, living with his grandfather in England, attending school in Portugal and, as a teenager, in Switzerland. By the time he was seventeen, when he returned to England to live permanently, he was the master of five languages. He quickly added a sixth language – English – to his linguistic collection. He consciously chose to write in his adopted language, because, he said, "all the best stories are written in English." After a brief stint in the business world, Sabatini went to work as a writer. He wrote short stories in the 1890s, and his first novel came out in 1902. In 1905 he married Ruth Goad Dixon, the daughter of a Liverpool merchant. It took Sabatini roughly a quarter of a century of hard work before he attained success with Scaramouche in 1921. The novel, a historical romantic set during the French Revolution, became an international best-seller. It was followed by the equally successful Captain Blood in 1922. All of his earlier books were rushed into reprints, the most popular of which was The Sea Hawk from 1915. Sabatini was a prolific writer; he produced a new book approximately every year, and maintained a great deal of popularity with the reading public through the decades that followed.His only son, Rafael-Angelo (nicknamed Binkie), was killed in a car crash on 1 April 1927. In 1931, he and his wife Ruth divorced. Later that year he moved from London to Hay-on-Wye. In 1935 he married the sculptor Christine Goad, his former sister-in-law. They suffered further tragedy when Christine's son, Lancelot, was killed in a flying accident. On the day he received his RAF wings, he flew his aeroplane over their house, but the plane went out of control and crashed in flames before their eyes.By the 1940s, illness forced the writer to slow his prolific method of composition. However, he did write several additional works even during that time. He died on 13 February 1950 in Switzerland. He is buried at Adelboden, Switzerland. On his headstone his wife had written, "He was born with a gift of laughter and a sense that the world was mad", the first line of Scaramouche. He is best known for his worldwide best-sellers:

The Sea Hawk (1915), a tale of the Spanish Armada and the pirates of the Barbary Coast;
Scaramouche (1921), a tale of the French Revolution in which a fugitive hides out in a commedia dell'arte troupe and later becomes a fencing master (Sabatini wrote a sequel ten years later);
Captain Blood (1922), in which the title character is admiral of a fleet of pirate ships (Sabatini also wrote two sequels comprising short stories); and
Bellarion the Fortunate (1926), about a cunning young man who finds himself immersed in the politics of fifteenth-century Italy.

Several of his novels were adapted into films during the silent era, and the first three of these books were made into notable films in the sound era, in 1940, 1952, and 1935 respectively. His third novel was made into a famous "lost" film, Bardelys the Magnificent, directed in 1926 by King Vidor with John Gilbert in the lead, and long viewable only in a fragment excerpted in Vidor's silent comedy Show People. A few intact reels have recently been discovered in Europe. The fully restored version premiered on TCM on 11 January 2010.  Two silent adaptations of Sabatini novels which do survive intact are Rex Ingram's Scaramouche (1923) starring Ramón Novarro, and The Sea Hawk (1924) directed by Frank Lloyd and starring Milton Sills. The 1940 film of the same name, with Errol Flynn, is not a remake - but a wholly new story which just used the title. A 1924 silent version of Captain Blood, starring J. Warren Kerrigan, is partly lost, surviving only in an incomplete copy in the Library of Congress. The Black Swan was filmed in 1942 starring Tyrone Power and Maureen O'Hara. In all, Sabatini produced thirty-one novels, eight short story collections, six non-fiction books, numerous uncollected short stories, and a play.
Works
Series
Scaramouche

Scaramouche (1921)
Scaramouche the King-Maker (1931)


Captain Blood

Captain Blood (1922) (also known as Captain Blood: His Odyssey)
Captain Blood Returns (also known as The Chronicles of Captain Blood ,1931)
The Fortunes of Captain Blood (1936)
N.B. Captain Blood Returns and The Fortunes of Captain Blood are not sequels, but collections of short stories set entirely within the timeframe of the original novel.


Novels

The Lovers of Yvonne (also known as The Suitors of Yvonne , 1902)
The Tavern Knight (1904)
Bardelys the Magnificent (1905)
The Trampling of the Lilies (1906)
Love-At-Arms: Being a narrative excerpted from the chronicles of Urbino during the dominion of the High and Mighty Messer Guidobaldo da Montefeltro (1907)
The Shame of Motley (1908)
St. Martin's Summer (1909)
Mistress Wilding (also known as Anthony Wilding, 1910)
The Lion's Skin (1911)
The Strolling Saint (1913)
The Gates of Doom (1914)
The Sea Hawk (1915)
The Snare (1917)
Scaramouche (1921)
Fortune's Fool (1923)
The Carolinian (1924)
Bellarion the Fortunate (1926)
The Hounds of God (1928)
The Romantic Prince (1929)
The King's Minion (also known as The Minion, 1930)
The Black Swan (1932)
The Stalking Horse (1933)
Venetian Masque (1934)
Chivalry (1935)
Scaramis (1936)
The Lost King (1937)
The Sword of Islam (1939)
The Marquis of Carabas (also known as Master-At-Arms, 1940)
Columbus (1941)
King In Prussia (also known as The Birth of Mischief, 1944)
The Gamester (1949)
Saga of the Sea (1953)
The Treasure Ship (2004)


Collections
 

The Justice of the Duke (1912)
The Banner of the Bull (1915)
The Nuptials of Corbal (1927)
The Reaping (1929)
Turbulent Tales (1946)
 Sinner, Saint And Jester: A Trilogy in Romantic Adventure (omnibus, 1954)
In the Shadow of the Guillotine (Omnibus comprising Scaramouche, The Marquis of Carabas and The Lost King ,1955)
A Fair Head of Angling Stories (1989)
The Fortunes of Casanova and Other Stories  (1994, stories originally published 1907–21 & 1934)
 The Outlaws of Falkensteig (2000, stories originally published 1900-2)
The Camisade: And Other Stories of the French Revolution (2001, stories originally published 1900–16)


Plays


The Tyrant: An Episode in the Career of Cesare Borgia, a Play in Four Acts (1925)


Anthologies edited


A Century of Sea Stories (1935)
A Century of Historical Stories (1936)


Nonfiction

The Life of Cesare Borgia (1912)
Torquemada and the Spanish Inquisition (1913)
The Historical Nights' Entertainment (1917)
Heroic Lives (1934)


External links 
 

Rafael Sabatini.com
 
Works by Rafael Sabatini at Project Gutenberg of Australia
Works by Rafael Sabatini at Internet Archive. Scanned, illustrated original editions.
Rafael Sabatini Dustjacket Gallery
Sabatini Timeline, a chronology of events in Sabatini's works

 
 
DEFAULTSORT










 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Tony Williams (drummer)
 
 
Anthony Tillmon "Tony" Williams (December 12, 1945 – February 23, 1997) was an American jazz drummer.Widely regarded as one of the most important and influential jazz drummers to come to prominence in the 1960s, Williams first gained fame in the band of trumpeter Miles Davis, and was a pioneer of jazz fusion. 
BiographyWilliams was born in Chicago and grew up in Boston. He was of African, Portuguese, and Chinese descent.   He began studies with drummer Alan Dawson at an early age, and began playing professionally at the age of 13 with saxophonist Sam Rivers. Saxophonist Jackie McLean hired Williams at 16. At 17 Williams found considerable fame with Miles Davis, joining a group that was later dubbed Davis's Second Great Quintet.  Williams was a vital element of the group, called by Davis in his autobiography "...the center that the group's sound revolved around."  His inventive playing helped redefine the role of jazz rhythm section through the use of polyrhythms and metric modulation (transitioning between mathematically related tempos and/or time signatures).Williams was an integral participant in the early-mid 60's avant-garde movement, playing on such classics as Jackie McLean's One Step Beyond, Grachan Moncur III's Evolution and Some Other Stuff, Sam River's Fuchsia Swing Song, Andrew Hill's Point of Departure, and Eric Dolphy's Out to Lunch. His first album as a leader, 1964's Life Time, was also in the avant-garde vein. Many of these progressive albums are considered amongst the greatest jazz recordings of all time.In 1969, he formed a trio, The Tony Williams Lifetime, with John McLaughlin on guitar, and Larry Young on organ. Jack Bruce joined on bass later. Lifetime was a pioneering band of the fusion movement, a combination of rock, R&B, and jazz. Their first album, Emergency!, was largely rejected by the jazz community at the time of its release. Today, Emergency! is considered by many to be a fusion classic.After McLaughlin's departure, and several more albums, Lifetime disbanded. In 1975, Williams put together a band he called "The New Tony Williams Lifetime," featuring bassist Tony Newton, pianist Alan Pasqua, and English guitarist Allan Holdsworth, which recorded two albums for Columbia Records, Believe It and Million Dollar Legs.In mid-1976, Williams was a part of a reunion of sorts with his old Miles Davis band compatriots, pianist/keyboardist Herbie Hancock, bassist Ron Carter, and tenor saxophonist Wayne Shorter. Miles was in the midst of a six-year hiatus and was replaced by Freddie Hubbard. The record was later released as V.S.O.P. and was highly instrumental in increasing the popularity of acoustic jazz. The group went on to tour and record for several years, releasing a series of live albums under the name "V.S.O.P." or "The V.S.O.P. Quintet." (The CD reissues of these albums are sold under Herbie Hancock's name – making things a bit confusing since the original V.S.O.P. album, which alone was a Hancock album, is not currently available on CD.)In 1979, Williams, guitarist John McLaughlin and bassist Jaco Pastorius united for a one-time performance at the Havana Jazz Festival. This trio came to be known as the Trio of Doom, and a recording of their performance was released in 2007. It opens with a powerful drum improvisation by Williams, followed by Mclaughlin's "Dark Prince" and Jaco's "Continuum," Tony's original composition "Para Oriente" and Mclaughlin's "Are You the One?"With the group Fuse One, he released two albums in 1980 and 1982.     In 1985, Williams recorded an album for Blue Note Records entitled Foreign Intrigue, which featured the playing of pianist Mulgrew Miller and trumpeter Wallace Roney. Later that year he formed a quintet with Miller, Roney, saxophonist Bill Pierce, and bassist Charnett Moffett (later Ira Coleman). This band played Williams' compositions almost exclusively (the Lennon–McCartney song "Blackbird," the standard "Poinciana," and the Freddie Hubbard blues "Birdlike" being the exceptions) and toured and recorded throughout the remainder of the 1980s and into the early 1990s. This rhythm section also recorded as a trio.Williams also played drums for the band Public Image Limited, fronted by former Sex Pistols singer John Lydon, on their 1986 release album/cassette/compact disc (the album title varied depending on the format). He played on the songs "FFF," "Rise" (a modest hit), and "Home." Bill Laswell (see below) co-wrote those three songs with Lydon. The other drummer on that album was Ginger Baker, who had played in Cream with Jack Bruce, later the bass player with the Tony Williams Lifetime.Williams lived and taught in the San Francisco Bay Area until his death from a heart attack following routine gall bladder surgery. One of his final recordings was The Last Wave by the trio known as Arcana, a release organized by prolific bass guitarist Bill Laswell.
TechniqueTony played traditional grip as well as other American and European grips.
Discography
As leader

1964: Life Time (Blue Note)
1965: Spring (Blue Note)
1969: Emergency! (Polydor)
1970: Turn It Over (Verve)
1971: Ego (Polydor)
1972: The Old Bum's Rush (Polydor)
1975: Believe It (Columbia)
1975, 1976 The Collection (Columbia)
1976: Million Dollar Legs (Columbia)
1979: The Joy of Flying (Columbia)
1980: Play Or Die (P.S. Productions) – with Tom Grant and Patrick O'Hearn   
1982: Third Plane (Carrere) – with Ron Carter and Herbie Hancock
1985: Foreign Intrigue (Blue Note)
1986: Civilization (Blue Note)
1986, 1988: Angel Street (Blue Note)
1989: Native Heart (Blue Note)
1991: The Story of Neptune (Blue Note)
1992: Tokyo Live (Blue Note)
1993: Unmasked (Atlantic)
1996: Wilderness (Ark 21)
1996: Young at Heart (Columbia)


As sideman
With Geri Allen

Twenty One (1994)

With Arcana

The Last Wave (1995)
Arc of the Testimony (1997)

With Chet Baker

You Can't Go Home Again (1972)
The Best Thing for You (1977)
Chet Baker / Wolfgang Lackerschmid (1979)

With George Cables

Phantom of the City (1985)

With Ron Carter

Third Plane (1978)
Etudes (1982)

With Stanley Clarke

Stanley Clarke (1974)

With Miles Davis

Seven Steps to Heaven (1963)
Miles Davis in Europe (1963)
Four & More (1964)
My Funny Valentine (1964)
Miles in Tokyo (1964)
Miles in Berlin (1964)
E.S.P. (1965)
The Complete Live at the Plugged Nickel (1965)
Miles Smiles (1966)
Directions (1967, 1968)
Sorcerer (1967)
Nefertiti (1967)
Water Babies (1967, 1968)
Circle in the Round (1967, 1968)
Miles in the Sky (1968)
The Complete Miles Davis–Gil Evans Studio Recordings – four takes of 'Falling Water' (1968)
Filles de Kilimanjaro (1968)
In a Silent Way (1969)

With Eric Dolphy

Out to Lunch (1964)

With Kenny Dorham

Una Mas (1963)

With Gil Evans

The Gil Evans Orchestra Plays the Music of Jimi Hendrix – track 8, 'Little Wing' (1975)

With Tommy Flanagan

The Trio (1983)

With Hal Galper

Now Hear This (1977)

With Stan Getz

Captain Marvel (1972)

With Dexter Gordon

Round Midnight (1986)

With Herbie Hancock

My Point of View (1963)
Empyrean Isles (1964)
Maiden Voyage (1965)
V.S.O.P. (1976)
V.S.O.P.: The Quintet (1977)
V.S.O.P.: Tempest in the Colosseum (1977)
Herbie Hancock Trio (1977)
Sunlight (1978)
V.S.O.P.: Live Under the Sky (1979)
Herbie Hancock Trio (1982)
Mr. Hands (1982)
Quartet (1982)
Town Hall Concert (1985)
Future2Future

With Herbie Hancock, Wayne Shorter, Ron Carter and Wallace Roney

A Tribute to Miles (1992)

With Jonas Hellborg and the Soldier String Quartet

The Word (1991)

With Joe Henderson

Relaxin' at Camarillo (1979)

With Andrew Hill

Point of Departure (1964)

With Terumasa Hino

May Dance (1977)

With Allan Holdsworth

Atavachron – track 5 (1986)

With Michael Mantler

Movies (1977)

With Ray Manzarek

The Golden Scarab (1973)

With Branford Marsalis

Renaissance (1987)

With Wynton Marsalis

Wynton Marsalis (1981)

With John McLaughlin

Johnny McLaughlin: Electric Guitarist (1978)

With Jackie McLean

Vertigo (1962–3)
One Step Beyond (1963)
New Wine In Old Bottles (1978)

With Marcus Miller

The Sun Don't Lie (1990–92)

With Mulgrew Miller

The Countdown (1988)

With Grachan Moncur III

Evolution (Blue Note, 1963)
Some Other Stuff (Blue Note, 1964)

With Jaco Pastorius and John McLaughlin

Trio of Doom (1979)

With Michel Petrucciani

Marvellous (1994)

With Public Image Limited

Album (1985)

With Don Pullen

New Beginnings (Blue Note, 1988)

With Sam Rivers

Fuchsia Swing Song (Blue Note, 1964)

With Sonny Rollins

Easy Living (1977)
Don't Stop the Carnival (1978)
No Problem (1981)

With Wallace Roney

Verses (1987)

With Travis Shook

Travis Shook (1993)

With Wayne Shorter

The Soothsayer (1965)

With McCoy Tyner

Supertrios (1977)
Counterpoints (1978)

With Sadao Watanabe

I'm Old Fashioned (1976)

With Weather Report

Mr. Gone  (1978)


References  
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Christoph Hartknoch
Christoph Hartknoch (1644–1687) was a Prussian historian and educator.
Biography
Hartknoch was born in Jablonken (Jabłonka) near Ortelsburg (Szczytno) in the Duchy of Prussia. In 1650 the family moved to Passenheim (Pasym)  and there witnessed the brutality and horrors of the Polish Tatar attacks, fighting for the Kingdom of Poland, in southern Prussia. His life was saved by his teacher, who shoved him out the window. Numerous villages in the region were destroyed, but Hartknoch made it to the ducal capital of Königsberg (Królewiec).In Königsberg Hartknoch started studying theology at a Protestant institute. Soon after his parents died and he had to take on jobs. He became a private teacher in Kowno (Kaunas) and then a rector in the Protestant school in Wilno (Vilnius). He soon returned to Königsberg where books and records interested him in history. 
In 1679 Hartknoch published a book about Prussian history, first in Latin and then in German (Alt- und Neues Preussen), as well as Preussische Kirchen-Historia, a history of the church in Prussia. The works are accompanied by descriptions and illustrations of people, history, and culture, as well as copper etching illustrations of towns. He received ethnographical information from the priest Matthäus Prätorius.Hartknoch's work in the Polish–Lithuanian Commonwealth, Kaunas, and Vilnius awoke his interest in their history. He wrote a comprehensive work on the Commonwealth spanning 300 years, the first of its kind.In 1677 the mostly Protestant city Toruń (Thorn) invited Hartknoch to become director at its gymnasium, where he worked for ten years. Wearied through years of Tatar attacks and resulting poverty, Hartknoch died and was buried there in 1687 at the age of 43.Hartknoch's extensive scientific body of works contributed greatly to knowledge of Prussia, Pomerania, Samogitia, Courland, and Poland.
Nicolaus Copernicus portraitIn his book covering the history of Prussia, Hartknoch features an illustration of Nicolaus Copernicus. Hartknoch wrote: Von den Städten und Schlössern. Der berühmte Mathematicus Nicolaus Copernicus (About the cities and castles. The famous mathematician Nicolaus Copernicus). The book was written later in Hartknoch's life, when he was director at the Gymnasium of Thorn. 
Work 

Respublica Polonica duobus libris illustrata. Frankfurt, Leipzig, 1678
Selectae dissertationes historicae de variis rebus Prussicis. 1679
Altes und Neues Preussen (literally 'Old and New Prussia'). Frankfurt, Königsberg, 1684
Preussische Kirchen-Historia (History of the Prussian Church ). Frankfurt, Danzig, 1686


Notes 

 
 

 
DEFAULTSORT






 
 
	Ross J. Anderson
 
 Ross John Anderson, FRS, (born 1956) is a researcher, writer, and industry consultant in security engineering.  
He is Professor in Security Engineering at the University of Cambridge Computer Laboratory,  where he is engaged in the Security Group.
EducationIn 1978, Anderson graduated with a Bachelor of Arts in mathematics and natural science from Trinity College, Cambridge, and subsequently received a qualification in computer engineering. He worked in the avionics and banking industry before moving in 1992 back to the University of Cambridge, to work on his doctorate under the supervision of Roger Needham and start his career as an academic researcher. Curriculum Vitae – Ross Anderson, May 2007  He received his PhD in 1995, and became a lecturer in the same year. ANDERSON, Prof. Ross John, Who's Who 2008, A & C Black, 2008; online edn, Oxford University Press, Dec 2007.  He lives near Sandy, Bedfordshire.
ResearchAnderson's research interests             are in computer security. In cryptography, he designed with Eli Biham the BEAR, LION and Tiger cryptographic primitives, and coauthored with Biham and Lars Knudsen the block cipher Serpent, one of the finalists in the AES competition. He has also discovered weaknesses in the FISH cipher and designed the stream cipher Pike.In 1998, Anderson founded the Foundation for Information Policy Research, a think tank and lobbying group on information-technology policy.Anderson is also a founder of the UK-Crypto mailing list and the economics of security research domain. He is well-known among Cambridge academics as an outspoken defender of academic freedoms, intellectual property, and other matters of university politics. He is engaged in the Campaign for Cambridge Freedoms and has been an elected member of Cambridge University Council since 2002. Election to the Council: Notices 
2 December 2002 and 7 November 2006, Cambridge University Reporter  In January 2004, the student newspaper Varsity declared Anderson to be Cambridge University’s “most powerful person”. In 2002, he became an outspoken critic of trusted computing proposals, in particular Microsoft’s Palladium operating system vision. Anderson's TCPA FAQ has been characterized by IBM TC researcher David Safford as "full of technical errors" and of "presenting speculation as fact." For years Anderson has been arguing that by their nature large databases will never be free of abuse by breaches of security. He has said that if a large system is designed for ease of access it becomes insecure; if made watertight it becomes impossible to use. This is sometimes known as Anderson's Rule. Anderson is the author of Security Engineering, published by Wiley in 2001, ISBN 0-471-38922-6.   He was the founder and editor of Computer and Communications Security Reviews.
References  
DEFAULTSORT









 
 
	Emmett Tyrrell
Robert Emmett Tyrrell, Jr. (born December 14, 1943 in Chicago, Illinois) is an American conservative magazine editor, New York Times bestselling author, and columnist. He is the founder and editor-in-chief of The American Spectator. He writes under the byline R. Emmett Tyrrell, Jr. but is known socially as Bob Tyrrell. Tyrrell is a 1961 graduate of Fenwick High School in Oak Park, Illinois, where he was on the swim team.  He then went to Indiana University where he was a manager for the notable coach James "Doc" Counsilman. While at Indiana University, he was a member of Phi Kappa Psi, living in a chapter house where Steve Tesich resided. In 2000, government investigations of The American Spectator caused Tyrrell to sell the magazine to venture capitalist George Gilder. In 2003, Gilder, having a series of financial and legal setbacks, resold the magazine to Tyrrell and the American Alternative Foundation, the organization under which the magazine was originally incorporated, for a dollar. 
The Arkansas Project
Tyrrell was one of those behind the Arkansas Project, financed by Richard Mellon Scaife, to improve the Spectators investigative journalism. He has explained the Project's purposes and accomplishments in his 2007 book, "The Clinton Crack-Up".  Arkansas Project Led to Turmoil and Rifts Washington Post May 2, 1999  Other books by Tyrrell include Madame Hillary: The Dark Road to the White House (2003).
Personal Life
In 1972, Tyrrell married his first wife, Judy Mathews Tyrrell, by whom he had three children, including Anne E. Tyrrell, a company spokesperson for Blackwater, the privately held military contracting company.  They divorced in 1988 and Tyrrell was married for a second time in 1998.  Dispite being divorced and re-married, Tyrrell claims to be a practicing Catholic .
References 
External links

Tyrrell's weekly column at The American Spectator
Emmett Tyrrell Features at Creators Syndicate
Profile
Healing the Poll Wounds - Commentary in Washington Times
Recent syndicated columns found at Townhall.com.
Podcasts of Tyrrell's recent articles
Booknotes interview with Tyrell on The Conservative Crack-Up, June 7, 1992.
C-SPAN Q&A interview with Tyrrell, May 6, 2007
In Depth interview with Tyrrell, February 6, 2011
 

 
DEFAULTSORT








 
	John Milnor
 
 John Willard Milnor (born February 20, 1931) is an American mathematician known for his work in differential topology, K-theory and dynamical systems. Milnor is a distinguished professor at Stony Brook University.
LifeMilnor was born in Orange, New Jersey. As an undergraduate at Princeton University he was named a Putnam Fellow in 1949 and 1950 and also proved the Fary–Milnor theorem. He continued on to graduate school at Princeton and wrote his thesis, entitled "Isotopy of Links", which concerned link groups (a generalization of the classical knot group) and their associated link structure. His advisor was Ralph Fox. Upon completing his doctorate he went on to work at Princeton. His students have included Tadatoshi Akiba, Jon Folkman, John Mather, Laurent C. Siebenmann, and Michael Spivak. His wife, Dusa McDuff, is a professor of mathematics at Barnard College.
WorkHis most celebrated single result is his proof in 1956 of the existence of 7-dimensional spheres with nonstandard differential structure. Later with Michel Kervaire, he showed that the 7-sphere has 15 differentiable structures (28 if one considers orientation). An n-sphere with nonstandard differential structure is called an exotic sphere, a term coined by Milnor. Egbert Brieskorn found simple algebraic equations for 28 complex hypersurfaces in complex 5-space such that their intersection with a small sphere of dimension 9 around a singular point is diffeomorphic to these exotic spheres. Subsequently Milnor worked on the topology of isolated singular points of complex hypersurfaces in general, developing the theory of the Milnor fibration whose fibre has the homotopy type of a bouquet of μ spheres where μ is known as the Milnor number. Milnor's 1968 book on his theory inspired the growth of a huge and rich research area which continues to develop to this day.In 1961 Milnor disproved the Hauptvermutung by exhibiting two simplicial complexes which are homeomorphic but combinatorially distinct.In 1962 Milnor was awarded the Fields Medal for his work in differential topology. He later went on to win the National Medal of Science (1967), the Leroy P Steele Prize for Seminal Contribution to Research (1982), the Wolf Prize in Mathematics (1989), the Leroy P Steele Prize for Mathematical Exposition (2004), and the Leroy P Steele Prize for Lifetime Achievement (2011).  He was an editor of the Annals of Mathematics for a number of years after 1962. He has written a number of books which are remarkable for their easy, clear and precise style.  In 1991 a symposium was held at Stony Brook University in celebration of his 60th birthday. Milnor was awarded the 2011 Abel Prize , for his "pioneering discoveries in topology, geometry and algebra."    Reacting to the award, Milnor told the New Scientist "It feels very good,", adding that, "One is always surprised by a call at 6 o'clock in the morning." 
Publications

Books
  
 
 
 
 
  
 
   



Journal articles
 
 
 
 
 
 
Lecture notes
 


See also 

Fary–Milnor theorem
Milnor conjecture in algebraic K-theory
Milnor conjecture in knot theory
Milnor conjecture concerning manifolds with nonnegative Ricci curvature
Milnor fibration
Milnor map
Milnor–Thurston kneading theory
Orbit portrait
 
References 
External links

 
 
Home page at SUNYSB
Photo
Exotic spheres home page
The Abel Prize 2011 - video
 

 
 
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT

















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	René Thom
 
René Frédéric Thom ( ; September 2, 1923 – October 25, 2002) was a French mathematician. He made his reputation as a topologist, moving on to aspects of what would be called singularity theory; he became world-famous among the wider academic community and the educated general public for one aspect of this latter interest, his work as founder of catastrophe theory (later developed by Erik Christopher Zeeman). He received the Fields Medal in 1958.
BiographyRené Thom was born in Montbéliard, Doubs. He was educated at the Lycée Saint-Louis and the École Normale Supérieure, both in Paris.  He received his PhD in 1951 from the University of Paris.  His thesis, titled Espaces fibrés en sphères et carrés de Steenrod (Sphere bundles and Steenrod squares), was written under the direction of Henri Cartan. The foundations of cobordism theory, for which he received the Fields Medal at Edinburgh in 1958, were already present in his thesis.  After a fellowship in the United States,  he went on to teach at the Universities of Grenoble (1953–1954) and Strasbourg (1954–1963), where he was appointed Professor in 1957.  In 1964, he moved to the Institut des Hautes Études Scientifiques, in Bures-sur-Yvette. He was awarded the Grand Prix Scientifique de la Ville de Paris in 1974, and became a Member of the Academie des Sciences of Paris in 1976.While René Thom is most known to the public for his development of catastrophe theory between 1968 and 1972, his earlier work was on differential topology. In the early 1950s it concerned what are now called Thom spaces, characteristic classes, cobordism theory, and the Thom transversality theorem. Another example of this line of work is the Thom conjecture, versions of which have been investigated using gauge theory. From  the mid 50's he moved into singularity theory, of which catastrophe theory is just one aspect, and in a series of deep (and at the time obscure) papers between 1960 and 1969 developed the theory of stratified sets and stratified maps, proving a basic stratified isotopy theorem describing the local conical structure of  Whitney stratified sets, now known as the Thom-Mather isotopy theorem. Much of his work on stratified sets was developed so as to understand the notion of topologically stable maps, and to eventually prove the result that the set of topologically stable mappings between two smooth manifolds is a dense set. Thom's lectures on the stability of differentiable mappings, given at Bonn in 1960, were written up by Harold Levine and published in the proceedings of a year long symposium on singularities at Liverpool University during 1969-70, edited by Terry Wall. The proof of the density of topologically stable mappings was completed by John Mather in 1970, based on the ideas developed by Thom in the previous ten years. A coherent detailed account was published in 1976 by C. Gibson, K. Wirthmuller, E. Looijenga and A. du Plessis. During the last twenty years of his life Thom's published work was mainly in philosophy and epistemology, and he undertook a reevaluation of Aristotle's writings on science.Beyond Thom's contributions in algebraic topology, his influence on the modern study of differentiable mappings, through the intensive study of generic properties, can hardly be exaggerated.
See also


Dold–Thom theorem
Quelques propriétés globales des variétés differentiables
Thom isomorphism
Pontryagin-Thom construction
Thom–Porteous formula


Bibliography

"Espaces fibrés en sphères et carrés de Steenrod", Annales Scientifiques de l'École Normale Supérieure (3) 69, (1952), 109–182.
 
"Ensembles et morphismes stratifiés", Bulletin of the American Mathematical Society 75 (1969), 240–284.
"Semio Physics: A Sketch", Addison Wesley, (1990),   ISBN 0-201-50060-4
Structural Stability and Morphogenesis, W. A. Benjamin, (1972),  ISBN 0-201-40685-3.


References

David Aubin, "Forms of Explanations in the Catastrophe Theory of René Thom: Topology, Morphogenesis, and Structuralism," in Growing Explanations: Historical Perspective on the Sciences of Complexity, ed. M. N. Wise, Durham: Duke University Press, 2004, 95-130.
Brian J. Reilly, “René Thom,” in The Columbia History of Twentieth-Century French Thought. ed. Lawrence D. Kritzman. New York: Columbia University Press, 2006. pp. 663–666.
Martin Weil, French Mathematician René Thom Dies, Washington Post, November 17 (2002), p. C10


External links

 
 
Washington Post Online edition (free registration)
Meeting René THOM
   
DEFAULTSORT













 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Bert Geer Phillips
 
Bert Geer Phillips (15 July 1868 – 16 June 1956) was an American artist and a founding member of the Taos Society of Artists. He was the first artist to permanently settle in Taos, New Mexico (1898) and is considered to be the founder of the Taos art colony.  He is known for his paintings of Native Americans, New Mexico, and the American Southwest. He was also a benefactor of the Western artist Harold Dow Bugbee, who became curator of the Panhandle-Plains Historical Museum in Canyon, Texas in 1951.
Early life and educationPhillips was born in Hudson, New York in 1868. During his childhood he was influenced by tales of the exploits of American frontiersman Kit Carson and other tales of Western adventure involving American Indians, such as those in James Fenimore Cooper's Leatherstocking Tales. In his recollections of childhood, he noted that he could always be found with paintbrush in hand. He was one of the first to enroll when George McKinstry opened an art studio in Hudson. Phillips left home at age sixteen, moving to New York City where he attended the Art Students League of New York and the National Academy of Design. In 1894 he traveled to Europe, briefly staying in London before moving to Paris, where he studied at the Académie Julian. While at the Académie he became friends with Ernest Blumenschein and Joseph Henry Sharp. 
Artistic career
Phillips returned to New York in 1896, where together with Ernest Blumenschein he leased a studio. In the Spring of 1898, Phillips accompanied Blumenschein on a journey to the American West. Their first stop was Denver, Colorado, where they bought art and camping supplies, a wagon, horses, and a revolver. Thus equipped, they set out with the intention of reaching Mexico. In northern New Mexico, one of their wagon wheels broke due to the roughness of the terrain. Blumenschein rode out on horseback to nearby Taos, New Mexico to have the wheel repaired, while Phillips waited with the wagon. After Blumenschein returned with the repaired wheel three days later, they continued on to Taos, where they sold their horse and equipage, set up a studio, and began to paint. Phillips decided to stay in Taos when Blumenschein returned to New York a few months later. He and a friend caused a skirmish during a religious ceremony on Taos Plaza when they refused to remove their hats; during the skirmish the sheriff was killed. The incident increased tensions between the town's Hispanic and Anglo residents.  Phillips wrote in a letter to Blumenschein, "I began to feel as if this was the real 'border life', and only wish old Kit Carson was here with us." Phillips married Rose Martin, the sister of the famous local doctor Thomas "Doc" Martin,  in 1899. He conceived the idea of starting an art colony in Taos, which he discussed in correspondence with Blumenschein. In 1915, his dream became reality with the formation of the Taos Society of Artists, of which Phillips was a founding member together with his friends Ernest Blumenschein, Joseph Henry Sharp, and three other artists.  The Society was founded in the dining room of Phillips' in-laws, Doc and Helen Martin, who was herself a batik artist.  In addition to being instrumental in the formation of the Society, Phillips also spent more years in Taos than any other member. 
See also

Oscar E. Berninghaus
E. Irving Couse
W. Herbert Dunton


Notes 
References

Schimmel, Julie; White, Robert R. Bert Geer Phillips and the Taos Art Colony. Univ of New Mexico Press; 1st edition (June 1994). ISBN 0-8263-1444-9


Further reading

Whaley, Bill; Stiny, Andy. "Reconsidering Art in Taos; Bert Phillips" in Taos Horse Fly, February 17, 2009.


External links 

Taos Painters: Bert Geer Phillips (1868-1956)
Koshare Indian Museum: Bert Geer Phillips (1868-1956)
AskArt: Bert Geer Phillips (1868 - 1956)



Paintings
Indian Fishing
Nar-Ah-Kig-Gee-Ah Tzur (Kit Carson's Apache Scout)
Wild Plum Blossoms and Taos Mountain

 
 
DEFAULTSORT









	Lars Ahlfors
 
Lars Valerian Ahlfors (18 April 1907 – 11 October 1996) was a Finnish mathematician, remembered for his work in the field of Riemann surfaces and his text on complex analysis. 
BackgroundAhlfors was born in Helsinki, Finland. His mother, Sievä Helander, died at his birth. His father, Axel Ahlfors, was a Professor of Engineering at the Helsinki University of Technology. The Ahlfors family was Swedish-speaking, so he first attended a private school where all classes were taught in Swedish. Ahlfors studied at University of Helsinki from 1924, graduating in 1928 having studied under Ernst Lindelöf and Rolf Nevanlinna. He assisted Nevanlinna in 1929 with his work on Denjoy's conjecture on the number of asymptotic values of an entire function. He completed his doctorate from the University of Helsinki in 1930.
CareerAhlfors worked as an associate professor at the University of Helsinki from 1933 to 1936. In 1936 he was one of the first two people to be awarded the Fields Medal. In 1935 Ahlfors visited Harvard University. He returned to Finland in 1938 to take up a professorship at the University of Helsinki. The outbreak of war led to problems although Ahlfors was unfit for military service. He was offered a post at the Swiss Federal Institute of Technology at Zurich in 1944 and finally managed to travel there in March 1945. He did not enjoy his time in Switzerland, so in 1946 he jumped at a chance to leave, returning to work at Harvard where he remained until he retired in 1977; he was William Caspar Graustein Professor of Mathematics from 1964. Ahlfors was a visiting scholar at the Institute for Advanced Study in 1962 and again in 1966.  He was awarded the Wihuri Prize in 1968 and the Wolf Prize in Mathematics in 1981.His book Complex Analysis (1953) is the classic text on the subject and is almost certainly referenced in any more recent text which makes heavy use of complex analysis. Ahlfors wrote several other significant books, including Riemann surfaces (1960) and Conformal invariants (1973).
He made decisive contributions to meromorphic curves, value distribution theory, Riemann surfaces, conformal geometry, quasiconformal mappings and other areas during his career.
Personal lifeIn 1933, he married Erna Lehnert, an Austrian who with her parents had first settled in Sweden and then in Finland. The couple had three daughters.
See also


Ahlfors finiteness theorem
Ahlfors measure conjecture


Bibliography

Complex Analysis: an Introduction to the Theory of Analytic Functions of One Complex Variable (1953, 1966, 1979) (ISBN 0-07-000657-1)
Contributions to the Theory of Riemann Surfaces: Annals of Mathematics Studies (1953) (ISBN 0-691-07939-0)
 


References 
External links

 
Ahlfors entry on Harvard University Mathematics department web site.
Papers of Lars Valerian Ahlfors : an inventory (Harvard University Archives)
Lars Valerian Ahlfors The MacTutor History of Mathematics page about Ahlfors
The Mathematics of Lars Valerian Ahlfors, Notices of the American Mathematical Society; vol. 45, no. 2 (February 1998).
Lars Valerian Ahlfors (1907–1996), Notices of the American Mathematical Society; vol. 45, no. 2 (February 1998).
 

 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT














 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Charles Laughton
 
 
  Charles Laughton (1 July 1899 – 15 December 1962) was an English-born American stage and film actor and director.Laughton was trained in London at the Royal Academy of Dramatic Art (RADA) and first appeared professionally on the stage in 1926. He played a wide range of classical and modern parts, making a big impact in Shakespeare at the Old Vic. His film career took him to Hollywood, but he also collaborated with Alexander Korda on some of the most notable British films of the era, including The Private Life of Henry VIII.Among Laughton's biggest film-hits were The Barretts of Wimpole Street, Mutiny on the Bounty, Ruggles of Red Gap, Jamaica Inn, The Hunchback of Notre Dame and The Big Clock. In his later career, he took up stage directing, notably in the Caine Mutiny Court Martial, and George Bernard Shaw's Don Juan in Hell, in which he also starred. In 1927, he was cast in a play with his future wife Elsa Lanchester, with whom he lived and worked until his death. They had no children.
Early life and careerLaughton was born in Scarborough, North Riding of Yorkshire, the son of Robert Laughton and his wife Elizabeth (née Conlon), Yorkshire hotel keepers.  His mother was a devout Roman Catholic of Irish descent, and he attended Stonyhurst College, the pre-eminent English Jesuit school.  He fought in World War I (during which he was gassed), serving first with the 2/1st Battalion of the Huntingdonshire Cyclist Battalion,  and later with the 7th Battalion of the Northamptonshire Regiment.He started work in the family hotel business, while participating in amateur theatricals in Scarborough. Finally allowed by his family to become a drama student at RADA in 1925, Laughton made his first professional stage appearance on 28 April 1926 at the Barnes Theatre, as Osip in the comedy The Government Inspector, in which he also appeared at London's Gaiety Theatre in May. Despite not having the looks for a romantic lead, he impressed audiences with his talent and played classical roles in two plays by Chekhov, The Cherry Orchard and The Three Sisters. Laughton played the lead role of Harry Hegan in the world premiere of Sean O'Casey's The Silver Tassie in 1928 in London. He played the title roles in Arnold Bennett's Mr Prohack (Elsa Lanchester was also in the cast) and in Mr Pickwick. He played Tony Perelli in Edgar Wallace's On the Spot and William Marble in Payment Deferred. He took the last role across the Atlantic and made his United States debut on 24 September 1931, at the Lyceum Theatre. He returned to London for the 1933–34 Old Vic season and was engaged in four Shakespeare roles (as Macbeth and Henry VIII, Angelo in Measure for Measure and Prospero in The Tempest) and also as Lopakhin in The Cherry Orchard, Canon Chasuble in The Importance of Being Earnest, and Tattle in Love for Love. In 1936, he went to Paris and on 9 May appeared at the Comédie-Française as Sganarelle in the second act of Molière's Le Médecin malgré lui, the first English actor to appear at that theatre, where he acted the part in French and received an ovation. Laughton commenced his film career in Britain while still acting on the London stage. He took small roles in three short silent comedies starring his wife Elsa Lanchester, Daydreams, Blue Bottles and The Tonic (all 1928) which had been specially written for her by H.G. Wells. He made a brief appearance as a disgruntled diner in another silent film Piccadilly with Anna May Wong in 1929. He appeared with Lanchester again in a "film revue", featuring assorted British variety acts, called Comets (1930) in which they sang a duet, "The Ballad of Frankie and Johnnie". He made two other early British talkies: Wolves with Dorothy Gish (1930) from a play set in a whaling camp in the frozen north, and Down River (1931), in which he played a drug smuggler.His New York stage debut in 1931 immediately led to film offers and Laughton's first Hollywood film was The Old Dark House (1932) with Boris Karloff, in which he played a bluff Yorkshire businessman marooned during a storm with other travellers in a creepy remote Welsh manor. He then played a demented submarine commander in Devil and the Deep with Tallulah Bankhead, Gary Cooper and Cary Grant, and followed this with his best-remembered film role of that year as Nero in Cecil B. DeMille's The Sign of the Cross. Laughton turned out other memorable performances during that first Hollywood trip, repeating his stage role as a murderer in Payment Deferred, playing H.G. Wells' mad vivisectionist Dr. Moreau in Island of Lost Souls, and the meek raspberry-blowing clerk in the brief segment of If I Had a Million, directed by Ernst Lubitsch. He appeared in six Hollywood films in 1932. His association with director Alexander Korda began in 1933 with The Private Life of Henry VIII (loosely based on the life of King Henry VIII), for which Laughton won an Academy Award. He also continued to act occasionally on stage, including a U.S. production of The Life of Galileo by (and with) Bertolt Brecht.  
Film career
1933–1943 
Laughton soon gave up the stage in preference for a film career and returned to Hollywood where his next film was White Woman (1933) in which he co-starred with Carole Lombard as a Cockney river trader in the Malayan jungle. Then came The Barretts of Wimpole Street (1934) as Norma Shearer's character's malevolent father (although Laughton was only three years older than Shearer); Les Misérables (1935) as Inspector Javert; one of his most famous screen roles in Mutiny on the Bounty (1935) as Captain William Bligh, co-starring with Clark Gable as Fletcher Christian; and Ruggles of Red Gap (1935) as the very English butler transported to early 1900s America. He signed to play Micawber in David Copperfield (1934), but after a few days shooting asked to be released from the part and was replaced by W.C. Fields.  Back in the UK, and again with Korda, he played the title role in Rembrandt (1936). In 1937, also for Korda, he starred in an ill-fated film version of the classic novel, I, Claudius, by Robert Graves, which was abandoned during filming owing to the injuries suffered by co-star Merle Oberon in a car crash. After I, Claudius, he and the ex-patriate German film producer Erich Pommer founded the production company Mayflower Pictures in the UK, which produced three films starring Laughton: Vessel of Wrath (US Title The Beachcomber) (1938), based on a story by W. Somerset Maugham, in which his wife, Elsa Lanchester, co-starred; St. Martin's Lane (US Title Sidewalks of London), about London street entertainers, which featured Vivien Leigh and Rex Harrison; and Jamaica Inn, with Maureen O'Hara and Robert Newton, about Cornish smugglers, based on Daphne du Maurier's novel, and the last film Alfred Hitchcock directed in Britain before moving to Hollywood in the late 1930s. The films produced were not successful enough, and the company was saved from bankruptcy only when RKO Pictures offered Laughton the title role (Quasimodo) in The Hunchback of Notre Dame (1939), with Jamaica Inn co-star O'Hara. Laughton and Pommer had plans to make further films, but the outbreak of World War II, which implied the loss of many foreign markets, meant the end of the company. Laughton's early success in The Private Life of Henry VIII established him as one of the leading interpreters of the costume and historical drama parts for which he is best remembered (Nero, Henry VIII, Mr. Barrett, Inspector Javert, Captain Bligh, Rembrandt, Quasimodo and others); he was also type-cast for arrogant, unscrupulous characters.  He largely moved away from historical parts when he played an Italian vineyard owner in California in They Knew What They Wanted (1940); a South Seas patriarch in The Tuttles of Tahiti (1942); and an American admiral during World War II in Stand by for Action (1942). He played a Victorian butler in Forever and a Day (1943) and an Australian bar-owner in The Man from Down Under (1943). Simon Callow's 1987 biography quotes a number of contemporary reviews of Laughton's performances in these films. James Agate, reviewing Forever and a Day, wrote: "Is there no-one at RKO to tell Charles Laughton when he is being plain bad?" On the other hand, Bosley Crowther of the New York Times declared that Forever and a Day boasted "superb performances". C.A. Lejeune, wrote Callow, was "shocked" by the poor quality of Laughton's recent work: "One of the most painful screen phenomena of latter years", she wrote in The Observer, "has been the decline and fall of Charles Laughton." On the other hand, David Shipman, in his book The Great Movie Stars: The Golden Years, said "Laughton was a total actor. His range was wide". 
1943–1962Laughton played a cowardly schoolmaster in occupied France in This Land is Mine (1943), by Jean Renoir, in which he engaged himself most actively;  in fact, while Renoir was still working on an early script, Laughton would talk about Alphonse Daudet's story "The Last Lesson", which suggested to Renoir a relevant scene for the film.  Laughton played a henpecked husband who eventually murders his wife in The Suspect (1944), directed by Robert Siodmak, who would become a good friend.  He played sympathetically an impoverished composer-pianist in Tales of Manhattan (1942) and starred in an updated version of Oscar Wilde's The Canterville Ghost in 1944.Laughton appeared in two comedies with Deanna Durbin, It Started with Eve (1941) and Because of Him (1946). He portrayed a bloodthirsty pirate in Captain Kidd (1945) and a malevolent judge in The Paradine Case (1948). Laughton played a megalomaniac press tycoon in The Big Clock (1948). He had supporting roles as a Nazi in pre-war Paris in Arch of Triumph (1948), as a bishop in The Girl from Manhattan (1948), as a seedy go-between in The Bribe (1949), and as a kindly widower in The Blue Veil (1951). He played a Bible-reading pastor in the multi-story A Miracle Can Happen (1947), but his piece wound up being cut and replaced with another featuring Dorothy Lamour, and in this form the film was retitled as On Our Merry Way. However, an original print of A Miracle Can Happen was sent abroad for dubbing before the Laughton sequence was deleted, and in this form it was shown in Spain as Una Encuesta Llamada Milagro.

Laughton made his first colour film in Paris as Inspector Maigret in The Man on the Eiffel Tower (1949) and, wrote the Monthly Film Bulletin, "appeared to overact" alongside Boris Karloff as a mad French nobleman in a version of Robert Louis Stevenson's The Strange Door in 1951. He played a tramp in O. Henry's Full House (1952). He became a pirate again, buffoon style this time, in Abbott and Costello Meet Captain Kidd (1952). Laughton made a guest appearance on the Colgate Comedy Hour (featuring Abbott and Costello), in which he delivered the Gettysburg Address. In 1953 he played Herod Antipas in Salome and repeated his role as Henry VIII in Young Bess (1953). He returned to Britain to star in Hobson's Choice (1954), directed by David Lean. Laughton received Academy Award and Golden Globe nominations for his role in Witness for the Prosecution (1957). He played a British admiral in Under Ten Flags (1960) and worked with Laurence Olivier in Spartacus (1960). His final film was Advise and Consent (1962), for which he received favourable comments for his performance as a Southern US Senator (for which accent he studied recordings of Mississippi Senator John Stennis). Laughton worked on the film, which was directed by Otto Preminger, while he was dying from metastatic renal cell carcinoma (kidney cancer). 
The Night of the HunterIn 1955, Laughton directed The Night of the Hunter, starring Robert Mitchum, Shelley Winters and Lillian Gish. The film has been cited among critics as one of the best of the 1950s,    and has been selected by the United States National Film Registry for preservation in the Library of Congress. At the time of its original release, however, it was a critical and box-office failure, and Laughton never directed again. The documentary Charles Laughton Directs The Night of the Hunter by Robert Gitt (2002) features preserved rushes and outtakes with Laughton's audible off-camera direction. 
TheatreLaughton made his London stage debut in Gogol's The Government Inspector (1926). He appeared in many West End plays in the following few years and his earliest successes on the stage were as Hercule Poirot in Alibi (1928); he was the first actor to portray the Belgian detective in this stage adaptation of The Murder of Roger Ackroyd, and as William Marble in Payment Deferred, making his Lyceum Theatre (New York) debut in 1931.  In 1926, he played the role of the criminal Ficsur in the original London production of Ferenc Molnár's Liliom (The play became a musical in 1945 by Rodgers and Hammerstein as Carousel, where Ficsur became Jigger Craigin, but Laughton never appeared in the musical version). While Laughton is most remembered for his film career, he continued to work in the theatre, as when, after the success of The Private Life of Henry VIII he appeared at the Old Vic Theatre in 1933 as  Macbeth, Lopakin in The Cherry Orchard, Prospero in The Tempest and Angelo in Measure for Measure. In the U.S., Laughton worked with Bertolt Brecht on a new English version of Brecht's play Galileo. Laughton played the title role at the play's premiere in Los Angeles on 30 July 1947 and later that year in New York. This staging was directed by Joseph Losey. The processes by which Laughton painstakingly, over many weeks, created his Galileo—and incidentally, edited and translated the play along with Brecht—are detailed in an essay by Brecht, "Building Up A Part: Laughton's Galileo."  Laughton had one of his most notable successes in the theatre by directing and playing the Devil in Don Juan in Hell beginning in 1950. The piece is actually the third act sequence from George Bernard Shaw's play Man and Superman, frequently cut from productions to reduce its playing time, consisting of a philosophical debate between Don Juan and the Devil with contributions from Doña Ana and the statue of Ana's father. Laughton conceived the piece as a staged reading and cast Charles Boyer, Cedric Hardwicke and Agnes Moorehead (billed as "The First Drama Quartette") in the other roles. Boyer won a special Tony Award for his performance.  He directed several plays on Broadway. His most notable box-office success as a director came in 1954, with The Caine Mutiny Court-Martial, a full-length stage dramatisation by Herman Wouk of the court-martial scene in Wouk's novel The Caine Mutiny. The play, starring Henry Fonda as defence attorney Barney Greenwald, opened the same year as the film starring Humphrey Bogart as Captain Queeg and José Ferrer as Greenwald based on the original novel, but did not affect that film's box-office performance. Laughton also directed a staged reading in 1953 of Stephen Vincent Benét's John Brown's Body, a full-length poem about the American Civil War and its aftermath. The production starred Tyrone Power, Raymond Massey (re-creating his film characterisations of Abraham Lincoln and John Brown), and Judith Anderson. Laughton did not appear himself in either production, but John Brown's Body was recorded complete by Columbia Masterworks.  Laughton returned to the London stage in May 1958 to direct and star in Jane Arden's The Party at the New Theatre which also had Elsa Lanchester and Albert Finney in the cast. He made his final appearances on stage as Nick Bottom in A Midsummer Night's Dream, and as King Lear at the Shakespeare Memorial Theatre in 1959, although failing health resulted in both performances being disappointing, according to some British critics. His performance as King Lear was lambasted by critics, including Kenneth Tynan, who wrote that Laughton's Nick Bottom "... behaves in a manner that has nothing to do with acting, although it perfectly hits off the demeanor of a rapscallion uncle dressed up to entertain the children at a Christmas party". Although he did not appear in any later plays, Laughton toured the U.S. with staged readings, including a successful appearance on the Stanford University campus in  1960.  
RecordingsLaughton's voice first appeared on 78-rpm records with the release of five British Regal Zonophone 10-inch discs entitled Voice of the Stars issued annually from 1934 to 1938. These featured short soundtrack snippets from the year's top films. He is heard on all five records in, respectively, The Private Life of Henry VIII, The Barretts of Wimpole Street, Mutiny on the Bounty, I, Claudius (curiously, since this film was unfinished and thus never released), and Vessel of Wrath. In 1937 he recorded Lincoln's Gettysburg Address on a 10-inch Columbia 78, having made a strong impression with it in Ruggles of Red Gap.He made several other spoken-word recordings, one of his most famous being his one-man album of Charles Dickens's Mr. Pickwick's Christmas, a twenty-minute version of the Christmas chapter from Dickens's The Pickwick Papers. It was first released by American Decca in 1944 as a four-record 78-rpm set, but was afterward transferred to LP. It frequently appeared on LP with a companion piece, Decca's 1941 adaptation of Dickens's A Christmas Carol, starring Ronald Colman as Scrooge. Both stories were released together on a Deutsche Grammophon CD for Christmas 2005.In 1943, Laughton recorded a reading of the Nativity story from St. Luke's Gospel, and this was released in 1995 on CD on a Nimbus Records collection entitled Prima Voce: The Spirit of Christmas Past. A Brunswick/American Decca LP entitled Readings from the Bible featured Laughton reading Garden of Eden, The Fiery Furnace, Noah's Ark, and David and Goliath. It was released in 1958. Laughton had previously included several Bible readings when he played the title role in the film Rembrandt. Laughton also narrated the story on the soundtrack album of the film that he directed, Night of the Hunter, accompanied by the film's score. This album has also been released on CD. Also, and derived from the film they made together, a complete radio show (18 June 1945) of The Canterville Ghost was broadcast which featured Laughton and Margaret O'Brien. It has been issued on a Pelican LP.  A two-LP Capitol Records album was released in 1962, the year of Laughton's death, entitled The Story Teller: A Session with Charles Laughton. Taken from Laughton's one-man stage shows, it culls together dramatic readings from several sources. Three of the excerpts are broadcast annually on a Minnesota Public Radio Thanksgiving program entitled Giving Thanks. The Story Teller won a Grammy in 1962 for Best Spoken Word Recording. However, although the album has yet to be released on compact disc, it can now be heard in its entirety online.
TelevisionLaughton was the fill-in host on 9 September 1956, when Elvis Presley made his first of three appearances on CBS's The Ed Sullivan Show, which garnered 72 million viewers (Ed Sullivan was recuperating from a car accident). That same year, Laughton hosted the first of two programmes devoted to classical music entitled "Festival of Music", and telecast on the NBC television anthology series Producers' Showcase. One of his last performances was on Checkmate, in which he played a missionary recently returned from China. He threw himself into the role, travelling to China for several months in order to better understand his character.  
Private life and deathIn 1927, Laughton began a relationship with Elsa Lanchester, at the time a cast mate in a stage play. The two were married in 1929, became American citizens in 1950, and remained together until Laughton's death. Over the years, they appeared together in several films, including Rembrandt (1936), Tales of Manhattan (1942) and The Big Clock (1948). Lanchester portrayed Anne of Cleves, Henry VIII's fourth wife, opposite Laughton in The Private Life of Henry VIII. They both received Academy Award nominations for their performances in Witness for the Prosecution (1957) — Laughton for Best Actor, and Lanchester for Best Supporting Actress—but neither won. Laughton and Lanchester had no children.   Laughton's bisexuality has been corroborated by several of his contemporaries and is generally accepted by Hollywood historians,     However, actress Maureen O'Hara, a friend and co-star of Laughton, claimed that Laughton told her that he and his wife never had children because of a botched abortion which Lanchester had early in her career while performing burlesque and that indeed his biggest regret was never having children of his own.  In her own autobiography, Lanchester acknowledged having had two abortions in her youth (one of the pregnancies purportedly by Laughton) although she didn't mention whether this had indeed left her incapable of becoming pregnant again. According to her biographer Charles Higham, the reason she didn't have children was that she didn't want any. 
DeathCharles Laughton died 15 December 1962, after a battle with renal cell carcinoma (kidney cancer), aged 63. He was cremated and the remains interred in a crypt in the Court of Remembrance courtyard at Forest Lawn - Hollywood Hills Cemetery in Los Angeles, California. 
Awards and nominationsLaughton won the New York Film Critics' Circle Awards for Mutiny on the Bounty and Ruggles of Red Gap in 1935.

Academy Awards
1933: Won Best Actor in a Leading Role, The Private Life of Henry VIII
1936: Nominated Best Actor in a Leading Role, Mutiny on the Bounty
1958: Nominated Best Actor in a Leading Role, Witness for the Prosecution


Filmography 
Theatre performances
Actor


1926: The Revizor, [written] by Nikolai Gogol
first appearance, debut on the London stage (aka The Government Inspector)
1928: Alibi, adapted from the novel The Murder of Roger Ackroyd by Agatha Christie
police drama; he is the first actor to play detective Hercule Poirot
1928: The Silver Tassie (premiere)
1931: Payment Deferred adapted from the novel by C. S. Forester
debut on the New York stage
1932: The Fatal Alibi adapted from the novel The Murder of Roger Ackroyd by Agatha Christie
police drama, Laughton is also the director (American version of Alibi)
1947: Galileo by Bertolt Brecht
1950: The Cherry Orchard by Anton Chekhov
1951 and 1952: Don Juan in Hell, the third act of Man and Superman by George Bernard Shaw
drama, Laughton is also the director
1956–1957: Major Barbara by George Bernard Shaw
comedy, Laughton is also the director
1959: King Lear by William Shakespeare
classic tragedy


Director



1932: The Fatal Alibi adapted from the novel The Murder of Roger Ackroyd by Agatha Christie
police drama, Laughton also acts in the play.
1951 and 1952: Don Juan in Hell (the third act of Man and Superman), by George Bernard Shaw
drama, Laughton also acts in the play.
1953: John Brown's Body, adapted by Laughton from Stephen Vincent Benét
with Judith Anderson
1956–1957: Major Barbara, by George Bernard Shaw
comedy, Laughton also acts in the play
1954–1955: The Caine Mutiny Court Martial, adapted from the novel by Herman Wouk
drama, with Henry Fonda, transferred in 1954 to the screen by Edward Dmytryk


Producer



1955: 3 for Tonight
musical revue, with Harry Belafonte


Footnotes
 
References


 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Tell Me a Story (1957) and The Fabulous Country (1962). Two literary anthologies selected by Charles Laughton. They contain pieces which were presented by him in his reading tours across America, with written introductions which give some insight about Laughton's thoughts. This selection presents texts from the Bible, Charles Dickens, Thomas Wolfe, Ray Bradbury, and James Thurber to name just a few.
Diverse authors, articles in The Stonyhurst magazine: Charles Laughton at Stonyhurst by David Knight (Volume LIV, No. 501, 2005), Charles Laughton. A Talent in Bloom (1899–1931), by Gloria Porta (Volume LIV, No. 502, 2006)


External links
 
 

Official website
 
 
 
 
Rooting for Laughton: Laughtonians of the world, unite! (Weblog)
Gay Greats



Call him Jack...Thank you for introducing me to Charles Laughton and to Life with a capital L!

 
  
 DEFAULTSORT





























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Theodosius II
 Theodosius II ( ;  10 April 401 – 28 July 450), commonly surnamed Theodosius the Younger,  or Theodosius the Calligrapher, was Byzantine Emperor from 408 to 450. He is mostly known for promulgating the Theodosian law code, and for the construction of the Theodosian Walls of Constantinople. He also presided over the outbreak of two great christological controversies, Nestorianism and Eutychianism.
Life 
Theodosius was born in 401 as the only son of Emperor Arcadius and his Frankish-born wife Aelia Eudoxia. Already in January AD 402 he was proclaimed co-Augustus by his father, thus becoming the youngest person ever to bear this title in Roman history.  In 408, his father died and the seven-year-old boy became Emperor of the Eastern half of the Roman Empire.Government was at first by the Praetorian Prefect Anthemius, under whose supervision the Theodosian land walls of Constantinople were constructed.In 414, Theodosius' older sister Pulcheria was proclaimed Augusta and assumed the regency. By 416 Theodosius was declared Augustus in his own right and the regency ended, but his sister remained a strong influence on him. In June 421, Theodosius married Aelia Eudocia, a woman of Greek origin.      The two had a daughter named Licinia Eudoxia.Theodosius' increasing interest in Christianity, fueled by the influence of Pulcheria, had him start a war against the Sassanids (421–422), who were persecuting Christians; the war ended in a draw, when the Romans were forced to accept peace as the Huns menaced Constantinople. 

In 423, the Western Emperor Honorius, Theodosius' uncle, died and the primicerius notariorum Joannes was proclaimed Emperor. Honorius' sister Galla Placidia and her young son Valentinian fled to Constantinople to seek Eastern assistance and after some deliberation in 424 Theodosius opened the war against Joannes. In May 425, Valentinian III was installed as Emperor of the West with the assistance of the magister officiorum Helion, with his mother acting as regent. To strengthen the ties between the two parts of the Empire, Theodosius' daughter Licinia Eudoxia was betrothed to Valentinian.
University and Law CodeIn 425, Theodosius founded the University of Constantinople with 31 chairs  (15 in Latin and 16 in Greek). Among subjects were law, philosophy, medicine, arithmetic, geometry, astronomy, music and rhetoric.In 429, Theodosius appointed a commission to collect all of the laws since the reign of Constantine I, and create a fully formalized system of law. This plan was left unfinished, but the work of a second commission that met in Constantinople, assigned to collect all of the general legislations and bring them up to date was completed, and their collection published as the Codex Theodosianus in 438. The law code of Theodosius II, summarizing edicts promulgated since Constantine, formed a basis for the law code of Emperor Justinian I in the following century.
Wars with the Huns, Vandals, and Persians 
The Eastern Empire was also plagued by short raiding attacks by the Huns. In 447 the Huns went through the Balkans, destroying among others the city of Serdica (Sofia) and reaching Athyra (Büyükçekmece) on the outskirts of Constantinople. Then, an agreement  was reached with the Eastern Roman Empire, negotiated by Anatolius. The Emperor chose to pay tribute, which amounted to 350 Roman pounds (ca. 114.5 kg) of gold until 435 and 700 Roman pounds after that.  When Roman Africa fell to the Vandals in 439, both Eastern and Western Emperors sent forces to Sicily, to launch an attack at the Vandals at Carthage, but this project failed. Seeing the Imperial borders without significant forces, the Huns and Sassanid Persia declared war. During 443 two Roman armies were defeated and destroyed by the Huns. In the subsequent peace agreement Roman tribute was tripled to 2,100 Roman pounds (ca. 687 kg) in gold after which the Huns withdrew into the interior of their empire. The war with Persia on the other hand proved indecisive, and a peace was arranged in 422 without changes to the status quo.
Theological disputesDuring a visit to Syria, Theodosius met the monk Nestorius, who was a renowned preacher. He appointed Nestorius Archbishop of Constantinople in 428. Nestorius quickly became involved in the disputes of two theological factions, which differed in their Christology. Nestorius tried to find a middle ground between those who, emphasizing the fact that in Christ God had been born as a man, insisted on calling the Virgin Mary Theotokos ("birth-giver of God"), and those who rejected that title because God, as an eternal being, could not have been born. Nestorius suggested the title Christotokos ("birth-giver of Christ") as a compromise, but it did not find acceptance with either faction. He was accused of separating Christ's divine and human natures, resulting in "two Christs", a heresy later called Nestorianism. Though initially supported by the emperor, Nestorius found a forceful opponent in Archbishop Cyril of Alexandria. At the request of Nestorius, the emperor called a council, which convened in Ephesus in 431. This council affirmed the title Theotokos and condemned Nestorius, who returned to his monastery in Syria and was eventually exiled to a remote monastery in Egypt.Almost twenty years later, the theological dispute broke out again, this time caused by the Constantinopolitan abbot Eutyches, whose Christology was understood by some to mingle Christ's divine and human nature into one. Eutyches was condemned by Archbishop Flavian of Constantinople but found a powerful friend in Cyril's successor Dioscurus of Alexandria. Another council was convoked in Ephesus in 449, later deemed a "robber synod" by Pope Leo I because of its tumultuous circumstances. This council restored Eutyches and deposed Flavian, who was mistreated and died shortly afterwards. Leo of Rome and many other bishops protested against the outcome, but the emperor supported it. Only after his death in 450 would the decisions be reversed at the Council of Chalcedon.
DeathTheodosius died in 450 as the result of a riding accident. In the ensuing power struggle, his sister Pulcheria, who had recently returned to court, won out against the eunuch Chrysaphius. She married the general Marcian, thereby making him Emperor.
Notes 
See also

House of Theodosius


References

S. Crogiez-Pétrequin, P. Jaillette, J.-M. Poinsotte (eds.), Codex Theodosianus V. Texte latin d'après l'édition de Mommsen. Traduction, introduction et notes, Brepols Publishers, 2009, ISBN 978-2-503-51722-3
Fergus Miller: A Greek Roman Empire: Power and Belief Under Theodosius II. University of California Press, Berkeley 2006.
Vasiliki Limberis, Divine Heiress: The Virgin Mary and the Creation of Christian Constantinople (London: Routledge, 1994) has a significant section about Theodosius II and his sister Pulcheria.
Hugh Elton, "Imperial politics at the court of Theodosius II," in Andrew Cain (ed), The Power of Religion in Late Antiquity: The Power of Religion in Late Antiquity (Aldershot, Ashgate, 2009), 133–142.


External links 

Reign of Theodosius II (chapter of J. B. Bury's History of the Later Roman Empire)
Theodosian Code: Sections concerning religious observances (English)
George Long, "Codex Theodosianus"
Nathan, Geoffrey, "Theodosius II (408–450 A.D.)", De Imperatoribus Romanis
This list of Roman laws of the fourth century shows laws passed by Theodosius II relating to Christianity.

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
 
  
  
 
DEFAULTSORT

 




 
 


 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Aye-aye
 
 The aye-aye (Daubentonia madagascariensis) is a lemur, a strepsirrhine primate native to Madagascar that combines rodent-like teeth and a special thin middle finger to fill the same ecological niche as a woodpecker. It is the world's largest nocturnal  primate, and is characterized by its unusual method of finding food; it taps on trees to find grubs, then gnaws holes in the wood using its forward slanting incisors to create a small hole in which it inserts its narrow middle finger to pull the grubs out. The only other animal species known to find food in this way is the striped possum.  From an ecological point of view the aye-aye fills the niche of a woodpecker, as it is capable of penetrating wood to extract the invertebrates within.  The aye-aye is the only extant member of the genus Daubentonia and family Daubentoniidae (although it is currently classified as Near Threatened by the IUCN); a second species, Daubentonia robusta, appears to have become extinct at some point within the last 1000 years. 
EtymologyThe aye-aye's binomial name, Daubentonia madagascariensis, honors the French naturalist Louis-Jean-Marie Daubenton and the island on which it is found, Madagascar.
Among some Malagasy, the aye-aye is imitatively called "hay-hay"  for a vocalization it is claimed to make.  It is supposedly from the European acceptance of this name that its common name was derived.   However, the aye-aye makes no such vocalization. The name was also hypothesized to be of European origin, with a European observer overhearing an exclamation of fear and surprise ("aiee!-aiee!") by Malagasy who encountered it.  However, the name exists in remote villages, so it is unlikely to be of European origins. Another hypothesis is that it derives from "heh heh," which is Malagasy for, "I don't know."  If correct, then the name might have originated from Malagasy people saying "heh heh" to Europeans to avoid saying the name of a feared, magical animal. 
Evolutionary history and taxonomyDue to its derived morphological features, the classification of the aye-aye has been debated since its discovery.  The possession of continually growing incisors (front teeth) parallels those of rodents, leading early naturalists to mistakenly classify the aye-aye within the mammalian order Rodentia  and as a squirrel, due to its toes, hair coloring, and tail. However, the aye-aye is also similar to felines in its head shape, eyes, ears and nostrils.     The aye-aye's classification with the order Primates has been just as uncertain.  It has been considered a highly derived member of the Indridae family, a basal branch of the strepsirrhine suborder, and of indeterminate relation to all living primates.   In 1931, Anthony and Coupin classified the aye-aye under infraorder Chiromyiformes, a sister group to the other strepsirrhines.  Colin Groves upheld this classification in 2005 because he was not entirely convinced the aye-aye formed a clade with the rest of the Malagasy lemurs,  despite molecular tests that had shown Daubentoniidae was basal to all Lemuriformes,  deriving from the same lemur ancestor that rafted to Madagascar during the Paleocene or Eocene.  In 2008, Russell Mittermeier, Colin Groves, and others ignored addressing higher-level taxonomy by defining lemurs as monophyletic and containing five living families, including Daubentoniidae. Further evidence indicating that the aye-aye belongs in the superfamily Lemuroidea can be inferred from the presence of a petrosal bullae encasing the ossicles of the ear. However, interestingly, the bones themselves may have some resemblance to those of rodents.  The aye-ayes are also similar to lemurs in their shorter back legs but different in that they do not have as profound opposable thumbs. Furthermore, aye-ayes have nearly identical teeth to those of other lemurs except for the presence of canines.  
Anatomy and morphologyYoung aye-ayes typically are a silver color on their front and in a stripe down their back. However, as the aye-ayes begin to reach maturity, their bodies will be completely covered in thick fur and are typically not one solid color. On the head and back, the ends of the hair are typically tipped with white while the rest of the body will ordinarily be a yellow and/or brown color. In length, a full-grown aye-aye is typically about three feet long with a tail as long as its body. Among the aye-aye's most signature trait are its fingers. The third finger, which is thinner than the others, is used for tapping and grooming, while the fourth finger, the longest, is used for pulling bugs out of trees.  
Behavior
Diet
The aye-aye commonly eats animal matter, nuts, insect larvae, fruits, nectar, seeds, and fungi, classifying it as an omnivore. Aye-ayes are particularly fond of cerambycid beetles. It picks fruit off trees as it moves through the canopy, often barely stopping to do so. An aye-aye not in its natural habitat will often steal coconuts, mangoes, sugar cane, lychees and eggs from villages and plantations. Some research suggests that aye-ayes prefer sap and vegetables to most insects, specifically insects such as grasshoppers, worms and larvae.  
Foraging
Aye-ayes tap on the trunks and branches of the trees they visit up to eight times per second, and listen to the echo produced to find hollow chambers inside. Once a chamber is found, they chew a hole into the wood and get grubs out of that hole with their narrow and bony middle fingers.    The aye-aye begins foraging anywhere between 30 minutes before and three hours after sunset. Up to 80% of the night is spent foraging in the canopy, separated by occasional rest periods. It climbs trees by making successive vertical leaps, much like a squirrel. Horizontal movement is more difficult, but the aye-aye rarely descends to jump to another tree, and can often cross up to   a night. Though foraging is mostly solitary, they will occasionally forage in groups. Individual movements within the group are coordinated using both sound (vocalisations) and scent signals. 
Social systemsThe aye-aye is classically considered 'solitary' as they have not been observed to groom each other.  However, recent research suggests it is more social than once thought. It usually sticks to foraging in its own personal home range, or territory. The home ranges of males often overlap, and the males can be very social with each other. Female home ranges never overlap, though a male's home range often overlaps that of several females. The male aye-ayes live in large areas up to  , while females have smaller living spaces that goes up to  . Regular scent marking with their cheeks and neck is how aye-ayes let others know of their presence and repel intruders from their territory.  Like many other prosimians, the female aye-aye is dominant to the male. They are not typically monogamous, and will often challenge each other for mates. Male aye-ayes are very aggressive in this way, and sometimes even pull other males away from a female during mating. Outside of mating, males and females interact only occasionally, usually while foraging.  The aye-aye is thought to be the only primate which uses echolocation to find its prey.  
Distribution and habitat
The aye-aye lives primarily on the east coast of Madagascar. Its natural habitat is rainforest or deciduous forest, but many live in cultivated areas due to deforesting. Rainforest aye-ayes, the most common, dwell in canopy areas, and are usually sighted upwards of 700 meters altitude. They sleep during the day in nests built in the forks of trees. 
ConservationThe aye-aye was thought to be extinct in 1933, but was rediscovered in 1957. Nine individuals were transported to Nosy Mangabe, an island near Maroantsetra off eastern Madagascar, in 1966.  Recent research shows the aye-aye is more widespread than was previously thought, but is still categorized as Near Threatened.  This is for four main reasons: the aye-aye is considered evil, the forests of Madagascar are being destroyed, the farmers will kill aye-ayes to protect their crops and for poaching. However, there is no simple solution to the two latter. Madagascar is a very impoverished nation, and without the farmland the Malagasy may not be able to survive, because while there is poverty there is also overpopulation. Moreover, the farmers cannot afford to lose crops to aye-ayes and many poachers kill and sell the aye-ayes simply to survive.   As many as 50 aye-ayes can be found in zoological facilities worldwide. 
Superstition 
The aye-aye is a near threatened species not only because its habitat is being destroyed, but also due to native superstition. Besides being a general nuisance in villages, ancient Malagasy legend said the Aye-aye was a symbol of death. Researchers in Madagascar report remarkable fearlessness in the aye-aye; some accounts tell of individual animals strolling nonchalantly in village streets or even walking right up to naturalists in the rainforest and sniffing their shoes. However, public contempt goes beyond this. The aye-aye is often viewed as a harbinger of evil and killed on sight. Others believe, if one points its narrowest finger at someone, they are marked for death. Some say the appearance of an aye-aye in a village predicts the death of a villager, and the only way to prevent this is to kill it. The Sakalava people go so far as to claim aye-ayes sneak into houses through the thatched roofs and murder the sleeping occupants by using their middle finger to puncture the victim's aorta. Incidents of aye-aye killings increase every year as its forest habitats are destroyed and it is forced to raid plantations and villages. Because of the superstition surrounding it, this often ends in death. 
 
Captive breedingThe conservation of this species has been aided by captive breeding, primarily at the Duke Lemur Center, in Durham, North Carolina. This center has been influential in keeping, researching and breeding aye-ayes and other lemurs. They have sent multiple teams to capture lemurs in Madagascar and have since created captive breeding groups for their lemurs. Specifically, they were responsible for the first aye-aye born into captivity, Blue Devil, and studied how he and the other aye-aye infants born at the center develop through infancy. They have also revolutionized the understanding of the aye-aye diet.  
References 
Literature cited 

  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  


External links

Primate Behavior: Aye-Aye
ARKive - images and movies of the aye-aye (Daubentonia madagascariensis)
Primate Info Net Daubentonia madagascariensis Factsheet
U.S. Fish & Wildlife Service Species Profile
 
 DEFAULTSORT




 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Yul Brynner
  
Yul Brynner ( , Yuliy Borisovich Bryner; July 11, 1920   October 10, 1985) Record of Yul Brynner, #108-18-2984. Social Security Administration. Born in 1920 according to the Social Security Death Index (although some sources indicate the year was 1915) Provo, Utah: MyFamily.com, Inc., 2006; Brynner's son, Rock Yul Brynner, has asserts that his father was born in 1920  was a Russian stage and film actor.  He was best known for his portrayal of Mongkut, king of Siam, in the Rodgers and Hammerstein musical The King and I, for which he won an Academy Award for Best Actor for the film version; he also played the role more than 4,500 times onstage. He is also remembered as Rameses II in the 1956 Cecil B. DeMille blockbuster The Ten Commandments, General Bounine in Anastasia and Chris Adams in The Magnificent Seven. Brynner was noted for his distinctive voice and for his shaven head, which he maintained as a personal trademark long after adopting it for his initial role in The King and I. He was also a photographer and the author of two books.
Early lifeYul Brynner was born Yuliy Borisovich Bryner in 1920. United States Declaration of Intent (Document No. 541593), Record Group 21: Records of District Courts of the United States, 1685 - 2004, filed June 4, 1943   He exaggerated his background and early life for the press, claiming that he was born Taidje Khan of part-Mongol parentage, on the Russian island of Sakhalin.  In reality, he was born at home in a four-storey residence at 15 Aleutskaya Street, Vladivostok, in the Far Eastern Republic (present-day Primorsky Krai, Russia).  He also occasionally referred to himself as Julius Briner,  Jules Bryner, or Youl Bryner.   A biography written by his son, Rock Brynner, in 1989 clarified these issues.His father, Boris Yuliyevich Bryner, was a mining engineer whose father, Jules Bryner, was Swiss, and whose mother, Natalya Iosifovna Kurkutova, was a native of Irkutsk and was partly of Buryat ancestry.  His mother, Marousia Dimitrievna (née Blagovidova), came from the intelligentsia and studied to be an actress and singer; she was the granddaughter of a doctor who had converted from Judaism to the Russian Orthodox Church.   He also had a strong personal connection to the Romani people, thanks to his close association with the Dmitrievitch family, with whom he performed in Paris night clubs in the 1930s. In 1977, he was named Honorary President of the International Romani Union, an office that he kept until his death.    
After Boris Bryner abandoned his family, his mother took Yul and his sister, Vera Bryner, to Harbin, Manchuria    (present day China), where they attended a school run by the YMCA. In 1934 she took them to Paris. By 1940, Brynner had returned to China and he emigrated from Dairen aboard the S.S. President Cleveland, arriving in the U.S. October 25, 1940.   During World War II, Brynner worked as a French-speaking radio announcer and commentator for the U.S. Office of War Information, broadcasting propaganda to occupied France. 
CareerYul Brynner began acting and modeling in his twenties and early in his career he was photographed nude by George Platt Lynes.  After his radio work during World War II Brynner moved into the nascent television industry, directing and acting in live productions in New York. In 1949 Brynner made his film debut in Port of New York, his only film with his natural head of hair.  His best-known role remains that of King Mongkut of Siam in the Broadway production of Rodgers and Hammerstein's musical The King and I which he played 4,525 times on stage over the span of his career. He appeared in the original production and later touring productions as well as a 1977 Broadway revival, London Production in 1979 and another Broadway revival in 1985. He also appeared in the film version for which he won an Academy Award as Best Actor and in a short-lived TV version (Anna and the King) on CBS in 1972. Brynner is one of only nine people who have won both a Tony Award and an Academy Award for the same role. His connection to the story and the role of King Mongkut is so deep he was mentioned in the song "One Night in Bangkok" from the 1984 musical Chess whose second act is set in Bangkok.In 1951  Brynner shaved his head for his role in The King and I.   Following the huge success of the Broadway production and subsequent film, Brynner continued to shave his head for the rest of his life though he would sometimes wear a wig for certain roles. Brynner's shaved head was very unusual at the time and his striking appearance helped to give him an iconic appeal.  Some fans shaved off their hair to emulate him,  and a shaved head was often referred to as the "Yul Brynner look".   Brynner made an immediate impact upon launching his mainstream film career in 1956 and quickly gained superstar status after appearing not only in The King and I that year but also in starring roles in The Ten Commandments with Charlton Heston which remains one of the top five highest grossing films in history when adjusted for inflation and Anastasia with Ingrid Bergman. Brynner, at 5'10", was reportedly concerned about being overshadowed by Heston's height and physical presence in The Ten Commandments and prepared his impressive physique seen in the film with an intensive weight-lifting program.  He later starred in films such as the epic Solomon and Sheba (1959), The Magnificent Seven (1960), Taras Bulba (1962) and Kings of the Sun (1963). He co-starred with Marlon Brando in Morituri (1965), Katharine Hepburn in The Madwoman of Chaillot (1969) and William Shatner in a film version of The Brothers Karamazov (1958). He played the titular role of The Ultimate Warrior (1975) and starred with Barbara Bouchet in Death Rage (1976). Among his final feature film appearances were in Michael Crichton's Westworld (1973) and its sequel Futureworld (1976). Brynner also appeared in drag (as a torch singer) in an unbilled role in the Peter Sellers comedy The Magic Christian (1969). 
Photographer, author, and musician
In addition to his work as a performer, Brynner was an active photographer and wrote two books. His daughter Victoria put together Yul Brynner: Photographer (ISBN 0-8109-3144-3) a collection of his photographs of family, friends, and fellow actors, as well as those he took while serving as a UN special consultant on refugees. Brynner wrote Bring Forth the Children: A Journey to the Forgotten People of Europe and the Middle East (1960) with photographs by himself and Magnum photographer Inge Morath and also The Yul Brynner Cookbook: Food Fit for the King and You (1983 ISBN 0-8128-2882-8).A student of music from childhood, Brynner was an accomplished guitarist and singer. In his early period in Europe he often played and sang gypsy songs in Parisian nightclubs with Aliosha Dimitrievitch. He sang some of those same songs in the film The Brothers Karamazov. In 1967 he and Dimitrievitch released a record album The Gypsy and I: Yul Brynner Sings Gypsy Songs (Vanguard VSD 79265).
Personal lifeBrynner was married four times, the first three ending in divorce. He fathered three children and adopted two.He and his first wife, actress Virginia Gilmore (1944–1960), had one child, Rock Yul Brynner, born on December 23, 1946. His father nicknamed him "Rock" when he was six in honor of boxer Rocky Graziano.Rock is a historian, novelist, and university history lecturer at Marist College in Poughkeepsie, New York and Western Connecticut State University in Danbury, Connecticut. In 2006, Rock wrote a book about his father and his family history titled Empire and Odyssey: The Brynners in Far East Russia and Beyond.
Rock regularly returns to Vladivostok, the city of his father's birth, for the "Pacific Meridian" Film Festival.His daughter Lark Brynner (born 1959) was born out of wedlock and raised by her mother, Frankie Tilden, who was 20 years old when her daughter was born. Brynner supported her financially. His second wife, from 1960 to 1967, Doris Kleiner, was a Chilean model whom he married on the set during shooting of The Magnificent Seven in 1960. They had one child, Victoria Brynner (born November 1962), whose godmother was Audrey Hepburn. His third wife, Jacqueline Thion de la Chaume    (1971–1981), was a French socialite, the widow of Philippe de Croisset (the victim of a car accident; he was the son of French playwright Francis de Croisset and a publishing executive). Brynner and Jacqueline adopted two Vietnamese children: Mia (1974), and Melody (1975). The first house that he ever owned was the Manoir de Cricqueboeuf, a sixteenth-century manor house that he and Jacqueline purchased. At the age of 63, he married his fourth wife, Kathy Lee, a 24-year-old ballerina from a small town in Malaysia whom he had met in a production of The King and I in which she had a small dancing role. They remained married for the last 2 years (1983–1985) of Brynner's life.  According to Marlene Dietrich's daughter Maria Riva (as she wrote in her memoir Marlene Dietrich, 1994), he had a passionate affair with the famous actress during the first production of The King and I.
CitizenshipBrynner, a Russian-born citizen, renounced his naturalized US citizenship in June 1965 at the US Embassy in Berne, Switzerland for tax reasons. He had lost his tax exemption as an American resident abroad by working too long in the U.S. and would have been bankrupted by his tax and penalty debt. 
DeathBrynner died of lung cancer on October 10, 1985 in New York City, the same day as his Battle of Neretva co-star Orson Welles.Knowing he was dying of cancer, Brynner starred in a run of farewell performances of his most famous role, The King and I, on Broadway from January 7 to June 30, 1985, with Mary Beth Peil as Anna Leonowens. His last performance marked the 4,633rd time he had played the role of the King. Throughout his life Brynner was often seen with a cigarette in his hand. In January 1985, nine months before his death, he gave an interview on Good Morning America, expressing his desire to make an anti-smoking commercial.  A clip from that interview was made into a public service announcement by the American Cancer Society and released after his death. It includes the warning "Now that I'm gone, I tell you don't smoke. Whatever you do, just don't smoke. If I could take back that smoking, we wouldn't be talking about any cancer. I'm convinced of that."  This advertisement is now featured in the Body Worlds exhibition.His remains are interred in France on the grounds of the Saint-Michel-de-Bois-Aubry Russian Orthodox monastery near Luzé between Tours and Poitiers.
Honors and awardsOn September 28th, 2012, an eight-foot-tall statue was inaugurated at Yul Brynner Park, in front of the home where he was born at Aleutskaya St. No. 15 in Vladivostok, Russia. Created by local sculptor Alexei Bokiy, the monument was carved in granite from China. The grounds for the park were donated by the city of Vladivostok, which also paid additional costs. Vladivostok Mayor Igor Pushkariov, U.S. Consul General Sylvia Curran, and Rock Brynner participated in the ceremony, along with hundreds of city residents.Brynner has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame at 6162 Hollywood Blvd.
OtherThe cottage at his childhood country home, at Sidimi near Vladivostok, is now a family museum.In 1952 he received the Tony Award for Best Featured Actor in a Musical for his portrayal of The King in The King and I (musical).He won the 1956 Academy Award for Best Actor for his portrayal of the King of Siam in The King and I and made the "Top 10 Stars of the Year" list in both 1957 and 1958.In 1985 he received a Special Tony Award honoring his 4,525 performances in The King and I. 
FilmographyFeatures:

Port of New York (1949)
The King and I (1956)
The Ten Commandments (1956)
Anastasia (1956)
The Brothers Karamazov (1958)
The Buccaneer (1958)
The Journey (1959)
The Sound and the Fury (1959)
Solomon and Sheba (1959)
Once More, with Feeling! (1960)
Testament of Orpheus (1960)
Surprise Package (1960)
The Magnificent Seven (1960)
Goodbye Again (1961)
Escape from Zahrain (1962)
Taras Bulba (1962)
Kings of the Sun (1963)
Flight from Ashiya (1964)
Invitation to a Gunfighter (1964)
Morituri (1965)
Cast a Giant Shadow (1966)
The Poppy Is Also a Flower (1966)
Return of the Seven (1966)
Triple Cross (1966)
The Double Man (1967)
The Long Duel (1967)
Villa Rides (1968)
The Picasso Summer (1969)
The File of the Golden Goose (1969)
Battle of Neretva (1969)
The Madwoman of Chaillot (1969)
The Magic Christian (1969)
Adiós, Sabata (1971)
The Light at the Edge of the World (1971)
Romance of a Horsethief (1971)
Catlow (1971)
Fuzz (1972)
Night Flight from Moscow (1973)
Westworld (1973)
The Ultimate Warrior (1975)
Death Rage (1976)
Futureworld (1976)
Short subjects:

On Location with Westworld (1973)
Lost to the Revolution (1980) (narrator)


Stage work

Twelfth Night (December 2–13, 1941) (Broadway)
The Moon Vine (February 11–27, 1943) (Broadway)
Lute Song (February 6 – June 8, 1946) (Broadway)
The King and I (March 29, 1951 – December 17, 1955) (Broadway and national tour)
Home Sweet Homer (January 4, 1976) (Broadway)
The King and I  (Revival) (May 2, 1977 – December 30, 1978) (Broadway and national tour)
The King and I (Revival) (January 7 – June 30, 1985) (Broadway)


References 
Further reading 

 
 
External links 

 
 
 
 
Yul Brynner: The Magnificent King

 
 
  
 DEFAULTSORT


















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Michael Ondaatje
  
 Philip Michael Ondaatje ( ; born September 12, 1943), OC, is a Sri Lankan-born Canadian novelist. He won the Booker Prize for his novel The English Patient, which was adapted into an Academy Award-winning film.
Early lifeOndaatje was born in Colombo, Sri Lanka (then Ceylon) in 1943 and moved to England in 1954. He attended Dulwich College.  After relocating to Canada in 1962, Ondaatje became a Canadian citizen. He studied for a time at Bishop's College School and Bishop's University in Lennoxville, Quebec, but moved to Toronto, where he received his BA from the University of Toronto and his MA from Queen's University, Kingston, Ontario. He then began teaching at the University of Western Ontario in London. In 1970, he settled in Toronto and, from 1971 to 1990, taught English literature at York University and Glendon College.
WorkOndaatje's work includes fiction, autobiography, poetry and film. He has published 13 books of poetry, and won the Governor General's Award for The Collected Works of Billy the Kid (1970) and There's a Trick With a Knife I'm Learning to Do: Poems 1973-1978 (1979). Anil's Ghost was the winner of the 2000 Giller Prize, the Prix Médicis, the Kiriyama Pacific Rim Book Prize, the 2001 Irish Times International Fiction Prize and Canada's Governor General's Award. The English Patient won the Booker Prize, the Canada Australia Prize, and the Governor General's Award and was later made into a motion picture, which won the Academy Award for Best Picture. In the Skin of a Lion, a fictional story about early immigrant settlers in Toronto, was the winner of the 1988 City of Toronto Book Award, finalist for the 1987 Ritz Paris Hemingway Award for best novel of the year in English, and winner of the first Canada Reads competition in 2002. Coming Through Slaughter, is a fictional story of New Orleans, Louisiana circa 1900 loosely based on the lives of jazz pioneer Buddy Bolden and photographer E. J. Bellocq. It was the winner of the 1976 Books in Canada First Novel Award. Divisadero won the 2007 Governor General's Award. Running in the Family (1982) is a semi-fictional memoir of his Sri Lankan childhood.
AdaptationsThe Collected Works of Billy the Kid, Coming Through Slaughter and Divisadero have been adapted for the stage and produced in theatrical productions across North America and Europe. Ondaatje's three films include a documentary on fellow poet B.P. Nichol, Sons of Captain Poetry, and The Clinton Special: A Film About The Farm Show, which chronicles a collaborative theatre experience led in 1971 by Paul Thompson of Theatre Passe Muraille. In 2002, Ondaatje published a non-fiction book, The Conversations: Walter Murch and the Art of Editing Film, which won special recognition at the 2003 American Cinema Editors Awards, as well as a Kraszna-Krausz Book Award for best book of the year on the moving image.
Personal lifeSince the 1960s, Ondaatje has been involved with Toronto's Coach House Books, supporting the independent small press by working as a poetry editor. Ondaatje and his wife, novelist and academic Linda Spalding, co-edit Brick, A Literary Journal, with Michael Redhill, Michael Helm, and Esta Spalding. In 1988,  Ondaatje was made an Officer of the Order of Canada (OC) and two years later a Foreign Honorary Member of the American Academy of Arts and Letters.  Ondaatje serves on the board of trustees of the Griffin Trust for Excellence in Poetry. Ondaatje has two children and is the brother of philanthropist, businessman and author Christopher Ondaatje.  Ondaatje's nephew David Ondaatje is a film director and screenwriter who made the 2009 film The Lodger. 
Books
Novels

1976: Coming Through Slaughter (also see "Other" section, 1980, below), Toronto: Anansi ISBN 0-393-08765-4 ; New York: W. W. Norton, 1977 Web page titled "Archive: Michael Ondaatje (1943- )" at the Poetry Foundation website, accessed 7 May 2008 
1987: In the Skin of a Lion, New York: Knopf,  ISBN 0-394-56363-8, ISBN 0-14-011309-6
1992: The English Patient, New York: Knopf,  ISBN 0-679-41678-1, ISBN 0-679-74520-3
2000: Anil's Ghost, New York: Knopf,  ISBN 0-375-41053-8
2007: Divisadero, ISBN 0-307-26635-4 ISBN 9780307266354
2011: The Cat's Table, ISBN 978-0-7710-6864-5, ISBN 0-7710-6864-6


Poetry collections

1962: Social Call, The Love Story, In Search of Happiness, all featured in The Mitre: Lennoxville: Bishop University Press 
1967: The Dainty Monsters, Toronto: Coach House Press 
1969: The Man with Seven Toes, Toronto: Coach House Press 
1970: The Collected Works of Billy the Kid: Left-handed Poems (also see "Other" section, 1973, below), Toronto: Anansi  ISBN 0-88784-018-3 ; New York: Berkeley, 1975
1973: Rat Jelly, Toronto: Coach House Press 
1978: Elimination Dance/La danse eliminatoire, Ilderton: Nairn Coldstream; revised edition, Brick, 1980 
1979: There's a Trick with a Knife I'm Learning to Do: Poems, 1963-1978, New York: W. W. Norton (New York, NY), 1979  ISBN 0-393-01191-7, ISBN 0-393-02100-X 
published as Rat Jelly, and Other Poems, 1963-1978, London, United Kingdom: Marion Boyars, 1980 
1984: Secular Love, Toronto: Coach House Press, ISBN 0-88910-288-0, ISBN 0-393-01991-8 ; New York: W. W. Norton, 1985 
1986: All along the Mazinaw: Two Poems (broadside), Milwaukee, Wisconsin: Woodland Pattern 
1986: Two Poems, Woodland Pattern, Milwaukee, Wisconsin 
1989: The Cinnamon Peeler: Selected Poems, London, United Kingdom: Pan; New York: Knopf, 1991 
1998: Handwriting, Toronto: McClelland & Stewart; New York: Knopf, 1999  ISBN 0-375-40559-3
2006: The Story, Toronto: House of Anansi, ISBN 0-88784-194-5 


Editor

1971: The Broken Ark, animal verse; Ottawa: Oberon; revised as A Book of Beasts, 1979  ISBN 0-88750-050-1
1977: Personal Fictions: Stories by Munro, Wiebe, Thomas, and Blaise, Toronto: Oxford University Press  ISBN 0-19-540277-4
1979: A Book of Beasts, animal verse; Ottawa: Oberon; revision of The Broken Ark, 1971 
1979: The Long Poem Anthology, Toronto: Coach House  ISBN 0-88910-177-9
1989: With Russell Banks and David Young, Brushes with Greatness: An Anthology of Chance Encounters with Greatness, Toronto: Coach House, 1989 
1989: Edited with Linda Spalding, The Brick Anthology, illustrated by David Bolduc, Toronto: Coach House Press 
1990: From Ink Lake: An Anthology of Canadian Short Stories; New York: Viking  ISBN 0-394-28138-1
1990: The Faber Book of Contemporary Canadian Short Stories; London, United Kingdom: Faber 
2000: Edited with Michael Redhill, Esta Spalding and Linda Spalding, Lost Classics, Toronto: Knopf Canada ISBN 0-676-97299-3 ; New York: Anchor, 2001
2002: Edited and wrote introduction, Mavis Gallant, Paris Stories, New York: New York Review Books 


Other

1970: Leonard Cohen (literary criticism), Toronto: McClelland & Stewart 
1973: The Collected Works of Billy the Kid (play; based on his poetry; see "Poetry" section, 1970, above), produced in Stratford, Ontario; produced in New York, 1974; produced in London, England, 1984 
1979: Claude Glass (literary criticism), Toronto: Coach House Press 
1980: Coming through Slaughter (play based on his novel; see "Novels" section, 1976, above), first produced in Toronto 
1982: Running in the Family, memoir, New York: W. W. Norton,  ISBN 0-393-01637-4, ISBN 0-7710-6884-0
1982: Tin Roof, British Columbia, Canada: Island,  ISBN 0-919479-10-3, ISBN 0-919479-93-6
1987: In the Skin of a Lion (based on his novel), New York: Knopf 
1994: Edited with B. P. Nichol and George Bowering, An H in the Heart: A Reader, Toronto: McClelland & Stewart 
1996: Wrote introduction, Anthony Minghella, adaptor, The English Patient: A Screenplay, New York: Hyperion Miramax 
2002: The Conversations: Walter Murch and the Art of Editing Film, New York: Knopf  ISBN 0-676-97474-0
2002: Films by Michael Ondaatje 
2004: Vintage Ondaatje,  ISBN 1-4000-7744-3


HonorsOn 2005, Ondaatje was honored with Sri Lanka Ratna by the former Sri Lankan President Chandrika Kumaratunga. Sri Lanka Ratna is the highest honor given by the Government of Sri Lanka for foreign nationals.
See also 

Ondaatje Letters
Colombo Chettys
Christopher Ondaatje
Kim Ondaatje
Pearl Ondaatje


Further reading

Comparative Cultural Studies and Michael Ondaatje's Writing. Ed. Steven Tötösy de Zepetnek. West Lafayette: Purdue University Press, 2005. ISBN 1-55753-378-4 
Barbour, Douglas. Michael Ondaatje. New York: Twayne, 1993. ISBN 0-8057-8290-7
Jewinski, Ed. Michael Ondaatje: Express Yourself Beautifully. Toronto: ECW, 1994. ISBN 1-55022-189-2
Tötösy de Zepetnek, Steven (斯蒂文·托托西演). 文学研究的合法化: 一种新实用主义 ·整体化和经主 义文学与文化研究方法 (Legitimizing the Study of Literature: A New Pragmatism and the Systemic Approach to Literature and Culture). Trans. Ma Jui-ch'i (马瑞琪翻). Beijing: Peking University Press, 1997. 111-34. ISBN 7-301-03482-2
Tötösy de Zepetnek, Steven. "Cultures, Peripheralities, and Comparative Literature." Comparative Literature: Theory, Method, Application. By Steven Tötösy de Zepetnek. Amsterdam: Rodopi, 1998. 150-65. ISBN 90-420-0534-3


Notes 
External links 

 
"I came from a tussle with the sea": An interview with Michael Ondaatje, in Gulf Coast: A Journal of Literature and Fine Arts (24.2)
Full text of The Dainty Monsters
"Adventures in the Skin Trade" PEN World Voices at LIVE from the New York Public Library. 4 May 2008 (Video, 1hr, 6 min)
Transcript of interview with Ramona Koval on The Book Show, ABC Radio National on Divisadero recorded in Montreal, April 2007.
Profile. Emory University
Order of Canada Citation
Michael Ondaatje's entry in The Canadian Encyclopedia
 
Salon Interview With Ondaatje November 1996

 
  
DEFAULTSORT



















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Rohinton Mistry
 Rohinton Mistry (born 3 July 1952) is an Indian-born Canadian writer in English. Residing in Brampton, Ontario, Canada, Mistry is of Indian origin, originally from Mumbai. He practises Zoroastrianism and belongs to the Parsi community. Mistry is a Neustadt International Prize for Literature laureate (2012). 
BiographyRohinton Mistry was born in 1952 in Mumbai, India.  He earned a BA  in Mathematics and Economics at the University of Mumbai. He emigrated to Canada with his wife in 1975, settling in Toronto where he studied at the University of Toronto and received a BA in English and Philosophy.  He worked in a bank for a while, before returning to studies, leading up to a degree in English and philosophy. While attending the University of Toronto he won two Hart House literary prizes (the first to win two), for stories which were published in the Hart House Review, and Canadian Fiction Magazines annual Contributor's Prize for 1985. Two years later, Penguin Books Canada published his collection of 11 short stories, Tales from Firozsha Baag. It was later published in the United States as Swimming Lessons and Other Stories from Firozsha Baag. Malieckal, Bindu (2000). "Rohinton Mistry". In Nelson, Emmanuel Sampath (Ed.), Asian American Novelists: A Bio-Bibliographical Critical Sourcebook, pp. 219-28. Greenwood Publishing Group. ISBN 0-313-30911-6.  The book consists of 11 short stories, all set within one apartment complex in modern-day Mumbai. This volume contains the oft-anthologized story, "Swimming Lessons."When his second book, the novel Such a Long Journey, was published in 1991, it won the Governor General's Award, the Commonwealth Writers Prize for Best Book, and the W.H. Smith/Books in Canada First Novel Award.  It was shortlisted for the prestigious Booker Prize and for the Trillium Award. It has been translated into German, Swedish, Norwegian, Danish and Japanese, and has been made into the 1998 film Such a Long Journey.His third book, and second novel, A Fine Balance (1995), won the second annual Giller Prize in 1995, and in 1996, the Los Angeles Times Book Prize for Fiction. It was selected for Oprah's Book Club  in November 2001 and sold hundreds of thousands of additional copies throughout North America as a result. It won the 1996 Commonwealth Writers Prize and was shortlisted for the 1996 Booker prize. In 2002, Mistry cancelled his United States book tour for his novel Family Matters (2002) because he and his wife were targeted by security agents at every airport he visited, apparently because Mistry appeared to be Muslim. Mistry reported that on his first flight of the tour, "we were greeted by a ticket agent who cheerfully told us we had been selected randomly for a special security check. Then it began to happen at every single stop, at every single airport. The random process took on a 100 percent certitude." His publisher issued a statement that said, "As a person of color [Mistry] was stopped repeatedly and rudely at each airport along the way—to the point where the humiliation ... had become unbearable." Family Matters is a consideration of the difficulties that come with aging, which Mistry returned to in 2008 with the short fiction The Scream (published as a separate volume, in support of World Literacy of Canada, with illustrations by Tony Urquhart).His books portray diverse facets of Indian socioeconomic life; as well as Parsi Zoroastrian life, customs, and religion. Many of his writings are markedly "Indo-nostalgic".His literary papers are housed at the Clara Thomas Archives at York University.
Bibliography

Tales from Firozsha Baag (1987), also published as Swimming Lessons and Other Stories from Firozsha Baag (1989)
Such a Long Journey (1991)
A Fine Balance (1995)
Family Matters (2002)
The Scream (2006)


Awards and recognition

1983: Hart House Literary Contest, "One Sunday"
1984: Hart House Literary Contest, "Auspicious Occasion"
1985: Annual Contributors' Prize, Canadian Fiction Magazine
1991: Man Booker Prize, shortlist, Such a Long Journey
1991: Governor General's Award, Such a Long Journey
1992: Commonwealth Writers Prize, Overall Winner Best Book, Such a Long Journey
1992: Books in Canada First Novel Award, Such a Long Journey
1995: Giller Prize, A Fine Balance
1996: Man Booker Prize, shortlist, A Fine Balance
1996: Commonwealth Writers Prize, Overall Winner Best Book, A Fine Balance
1997: Irish Times International Fiction Prize, shortlist, A Fine Balance
2002: James Tait Black Memorial Prize, shortlist, Family Matters
2002: Kiriyama Pacific Rim Book Prize, winner, Family Matters
2002: Man Booker Prize, shortlist, Family Matters
2002: Canada Reads, A Fine Balance
2012: Neustadt International Prize for Literature 


References 
External links

Rohinton Mistry biographical and critical information by James Proctor
Biography from the English Department at Emory University
Rohinton Mistry's entry in The Canadian Encyclopedia

 
   
 
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Timothy Findley
 
 Timothy Irving Frederick Findley, OC, O.Ont Timothy Findley's entry in The Canadian Encyclopedia.  (October 30, 1930 - June 21, 2002) was a Canadian novelist and playwright. "Timothy Findley: ‘The world of Tiffiness’". CBC News, June 21, 2002.  He was also informally known by the nickname Tiff or Tiffy, an acronym of his initials. 
Biography
One of three sons, Findley was born in Toronto, Ontario, to Allan Gilmour Findley, a stockbroker, and his wife, the former Margaret Maude Bull. His paternal grandfather was president of Massey-Harris, the farm-machinery company. He was raised in the upper class Rosedale district of the city,  attending boarding school at St. Andrew's College (although leaving during grade 10 for health reasons). He pursued a career in the arts, studying dance and acting, and had significant success as an actor before turning to writing. He was part of the original Stratford Festival company in the 1950s,  acting alongside Alec Guinness, and appeared in the first production of Thornton Wilder's The Matchmaker at the Edinburgh Festival.  He also played Peter Pupkin in Sunshine Sketches, the CBC Television adaptation of Stephen Leacock's Sunshine Sketches of a Little Town.Though Findley had declared his homosexuality as a teenager, he married actress/photographer Janet Reid in 1959, but the union lasted only three months and was dissolved by divorce or annulment two years later.  Eventually he became the domestic partner of writer Bill Whitehead, whom he met in 1962. Findley and Whitehead also collaborated on several documentary projects in the 1970s, including the television miniseries The National Dream and Dieppe 1942. Through Wilder, Findley became a close friend of actress Ruth Gordon, whose work as a screenwriter and playwright inspired Findley to consider writing as well.  After Findley published his first short story in the Tamarack Review, Gordon encouraged him to pursue writing more actively, and he eventually left acting in the 1960s. Findley's first two novels, The Last of the Crazy People (1967) and The Butterfly Plague (1969), were originally published in Britain and the United States after having been rejected by Canadian publishers.  Findley's third novel, The Wars, was published to great acclaim in 1977 and went on to win the Governor General's Award for English-language fiction.  It was adapted for film in 1981.  Timothy Findley received a Governor General's Award, the Canadian Authors Association Award, an ACTRA Award, the Order of Ontario, the Ontario Trillium Award, and in 1985 he was appointed an Officer of the Order of Canada.  He was a founding member and chair of the Writers' Union of Canada, and a president of the Canadian chapter of PEN International. His writing, typical of the Southern Ontario Gothic genre, was heavily influenced by Jungian psychology, and mental illness, gender and sexuality were frequent recurring themes in his work. His characters often carried dark personal secrets, and were often conflicted — sometimes to the point of psychosis — by these burdens.He publicly mentioned his homosexuality, passingly and perhaps for the first time, on a broadcast of the programme The Shulman File in the 1970s, taking flabbergasted host Morton Shulman completely by surprise.Findley and Whitehead resided at Stone Orchard, a farm near Cannington, Ontario, and in the south of France.  In 1996, Findley was honoured by the French government, who declared him a Chevalier de l'Ordre des arts et des lettres. Findley was also the author of several dramas for television and stage. Elizabeth Rex, his most successful play, premiered at the Stratford Festival of Canada to rave reviews and won a Governor General's award. Shadows, first performed in 2001, was his last completed work.  Findley was also an active mentor to a number of young Canadian writers, including Marnie Woodrow and Elizabeth Ruth.In the final years of Findley's life, declining health led him to move his Canadian residence to Stratford, Ontario, and Stone Orchard was purchased by Canadian dancer Rex Harrington. In 2002 he was inducted into Canada's Walk of Fame.Findley died on June 21, 2002, in Brignoles, France, not far from his house in Cotignac. 
Bibliography
Novels

The Last of the Crazy People (1967)
The Butterfly Plague (1969)
The Wars (1977) (translated into French as Guerres)
Famous Last Words (1981) (translated into French as Le Grand Elysium Hôtel)
Not Wanted on the Voyage (1984)
The Telling of Lies (1986) (Edgar Award, Best Paperback Original, 1989)
Headhunter (1993)
The Piano Man's Daughter (1995)
Pilgrim (1999)
Spadework (2001)


Novella

You Went Away (1996)


Short stories

Dinner Along the Amazon (1984)
Stones (1988)
Dust to Dust (1997)


Drama

Don't Let the Angels Fall (1969)
The Whiteoaks of Jalna (1972)
The Newcomers (1977)
Can You See Me Yet? (1977)
The Stillborn Lover (1993)
The Trials of Ezra Pound (2000)
Elizabeth Rex (2001)
Shadows (2001)


Memoirs

Inside Memory: Pages from a Writer's Workbook (1990)
From Stone Orchard (1998)
Journeyman: Travels of a Writer (2004)


References
 
External links

Order of Canada Citation
 

 
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Carol Shields
 
 
 
 Carol Ann Shields,   (née Warner; June 2, 1935 – July 16, 2003) was an American-born Canadian author. She is best known for her 1993 novel The Stone Diaries, which won the U.S. Pulitzer Prize for Fiction as well as the Governor General's Award in Canada.
BiographyShields was born in Oak Park, Illinois.  She studied at Hanover College Indiana,  where she became member of the Alpha Delta Pi sorority.  A United Nations scholarship encouraged Shields to spend a junior year abroad 1955–1956 at the University of Exeter in England.  Later, Shields did post-graduate work at the University of Ottawa, where she received an MA in 1975.In 1955, while on British Council sponsored study week in Scotland, she met a Canadian engineering student, Donald Hugh Shields. The couple married in 1957 and moved to Canada, where they had a son and four daughters.  Shields later became a Canadian citizen.In 1973, Shields became editorial assistant for the journal Canadian Slavonic Papers while living in Ottawa 1968–1978. In 1977, Shields was a sessional lecturer in the English Department at the University of Ottawa for a year. She later taught Creative Writing at the University of British Columbia while living in Vancouver 1978–80. In 1980, she and Don settled in Winnipeg, Manitoba, after Don was hired to teach in the University of Manitoba's Faculty of Engineering. Winnipeg was where she wrote her major books. From the fall of 1982 onward, Carol Shields taught in the English Department at the University of Manitoba, first as an Assistant Professor (1982–1992), then as an Associate Professor (1992–1995). Shields was made Full Professor of English in 1995, and, on retirement in 2000, she became Professor Emerita at the University of Manitoba.. In 1996, she became chancellor of the University of Winnipeg. In 2000, after Don's retirement, the couple moved to Victoria, British Columbia, where she died in 2003 of breast cancer at age 68.    Shields' eldest daughter Anne Giardini is also a writer. Giardini has contributed to the National Post as a columnist, and has published her first novel, The Sad Truth About Happiness. Anne's second novel, Advice for Italian Boys, was published in 2009.  Her youngest daughter Sara Cassidy has published young adult novels including SLICK 2010 and WINDFALL 2011.
CareerShields was the author of several novels and short story collections, including The Orange Fish (1989), Swann (1987), Various Miracles (1985), Happenstance (1980), and The Republic of Love (1992). She was the recipient of a Canada Council Major Award, two National Magazine Awards, the 1990 Marian Engel Award, the Canadian Author's Award, and a CBC short story award. She was appointed as an officer of the Order of Canada in 1998 and was elevated to companion of the Order in 2002. Shields was also a fellow of the Royal Society of Canada and a member of the Order of Manitoba.The Stone Diaries (1993) won the 1995 Pulitzer Prize for Fiction and the 1993 Governor General's Award, the only book to have ever received both awards. It won the U.S. National Book Critics Circle Award in 1994, and was nominated in 1993 for the Booker Prize.  The Stone Diaries was named one of the best books of the year by Publishers Weekly. It was also chosen as a "Notable Book" by The New York Times Book Review, which wrote "The Stone Diaries reminds us again why literature matters."Carol Shields won the 1998 Orange Prize for Fiction for her 1997 novel Larry's Party. Her last novel, Unless (2002), was nominated for the 2002 Giller Prize, the Governor General's Award, the Booker Prize and the 2003 Orange Prize for Fiction. It was awarded the Ethel Wilson Fiction Prize.Shields was also intensely interested in Jane Austen. She wrote the biography entitled Jane Austen, which won the $25,000 Charles Taylor Prize for literary non-fiction in April 2002, an award accepted by her daughter Meg on her behalf in Toronto, Ontario, on April 22, 2002.Her last novel, Unless, contains a passionate defense of female writers who write of 'domestic' subjects.Following her death, six of her short stories were adapted by Shaftesbury Films into the dramatic anthology series The Shields Stories.
Honours and awards

the Canadian Authors' Association Award for the Best Novel of 1976 (Small Ceremonies)
the Arthur Ellis Award for Best Canadian Mystery (Swann: A Mystery)
the Booker Prize Shortlist (The Stone Diaries)
the Governor General's Award (The Stone Diaries)
the National Book Critics Circle Award (The Stone Diaries)
the Pulitzer Prize (The Stone Diaries)
the Orange Prize (Larry's Party)
the Charles Taylor Prize for Literary Non-Fiction (Jane Austen)
nominations for the Giller Prize (Larry's Party and Unless)


Bibliography

Novels

Small Ceremonies, 1976 (winner of the Canadian Author's Association Award)
The Box Garden, 1977 (Later published in a joint edition with Small Ceremonies as Duet)
Happenstance, 1980
A Fairly Conventional Woman, 1982  (Later published as a joint edition with Happenstance as Hapenstance.
Swann: A Mystery, 1987 (UK title: Mary Swann)(Arthur Ellis Award for Best Canadian Mystery, 1988)
A Celibate Season, 1991 (with Blanche Howard)
The Republic of Love, 1992
The Stone Diaries, 1993 (winner of the Governor General's Award, National Book Critics Circle Award, and the Pulitzer Prize)
Larry's Party, 1997 (winner of the Orange Prize, and the Prix de Livre)
Unless, 2002 (winner of the Ethel Wilson Fiction Prize, shortlisted in 2002 Man/Booker Prize and ScotiaBank/Giller Prize, and shortlisted in 2003 Orange Prize)


Short stories

Words, 1985
Various Miracles, 1985
The Orange Fish, 1989
Dressing Up for the Carnival, 2000
Collected Stories. Toronto: Random House, 2004.


Poetry

Others. Ottawa: Borealis Press, 1972.
Intersect. Ottawa: Borealis Press, 1974.
Coming to Canada. Ottawa: Carleton University Press, 1992.


Plays

Departures and Arrivals, 1990
Thirteen Hands, 1993
Fashion Power Guilt and the Charity of Families, 1995 (with Catherine Shields)
Anniversary: A Comedy, 1998 (with Dave Williamson)
Women Waiting, 1983
Unless, 2005
Larry's Party - the Musical, 2000 (adapted by Richard Ouzounian with music by Marek Norman)
'Thirteen Hands and Other Plays. Toronto: Vintage, 2002.



Criticism

Susanna Moodie: Voice and Vision, 1976


Biography

Jane Austen. New York: Viking, 2001.


Anthologies

Dropped Threads: What We aren't Told. Toronto: Vintage, 2001. (edited with Marjorie Anderson)
Dropped Threads 2: More of What We aren't Told. Toronto: Vintage, 2003. (edited with Marjorie Anderson)


Movies

Swann 1996
The Republic of Love 2003


References 
External links 

The Carol Shields Literary Trust
"Carol Shields" in Canadian Writers: an examination of archival manuscripts, typescripts, correspondence, journals and notebooks at Library and Archives Canada
Carol Shields's entry in The Canadian Encyclopedia
CBC Obituary
Guardian Obituary
Observer Interview with Carol Shields
Profile in the Manitoba Author Publication Index
 
The Carol Shields Memorial Labyrinth

 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT




























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	William Grant Stairs
 
 William Grant Stairs (1 July 1863 – 9 June 1892) was a Canadian-British  explorer, soldier, and adventurer who had a leading role in two of the most controversial expeditions in the history of the colonisation of Africa.
EducationBorn in Halifax, Nova Scotia, the sixth child and third son of John Stairs and Mary Morrow, he attended school at Fort Massey Academy in Halifax, Merchiston Castle School in Edinburgh, Scotland, and the Royal Military College of Canada in Kingston, Ontario, Student # 52
CareerAfter graduating as a trained engineer, Stairs spent three years working for the New Zealand Trigonometrical Survey in northern New Zealand. In 1885, he accepted the offer of a commission in the British Royal Engineers and trained in Chatham, England. In 1891 he transferred to the Welsh Regiment.
Emin Pasha Relief Expedition 
Captain Stairs was appointed to the Emin Pasha Relief Expedition led by Henry Morton Stanley, at the time the most celebrated living explorer of Africa. Stairs sailed from London on 20 January 1887 and met Stanley in Suez on 6 February. Their expedition started from Banana at the mouth of the Congo River on 19 March and ended in Bagamoyo, Tanzania on 5 December 1889. Stairs was appointed second-in-command after Captain Barttelot was shot on 19 July 1888.

During the 5000 km journey across Africa through some of its most difficult country consisting of almost impenetrable rainforest and swamps, Stairs and colleagues suffered frequently from malaria and dysentery. Stairs had endurance, toughness and perseverance. He discovered one source of the Nile, the Semliki River, and became the first non-African to ever climb in the Ruwenzoris, reaching 10,677 ft before having to turn around. He was seriously wounded in the chest by a poisonous arrow during an attack by natives, many of whom assumed they were a slave-raiding party, and the expedition killed hundreds in return. Stairs recovered from his wound to continue the journey. In Dublin, Ireland there is a bronze plaque depicting this 13 August 1887 event on the statue of expedition Surgeon Major Thomas Heazle Parke who removed the arrow and sucked the poison from the wound.The expedition was lauded in Europe and North America for exploits seen as heroic. On his return to England Captain Stairs was named a Fellow of the Royal Geographical Society and the Royal Scottish Geographical Society in 1890. Then details emerged of the many Africans killed by the expedition. Stanley's own accounts revealed how he shot Africans who impeded the expedition's progress. The expedition also used brutality against its own porters. Stanley spent his remaining years defending himself and the expedition from criticism made principally in Britain of excessive force and mismanagement of the expedition's Rear Column commanded by Barttelot. 
The Stairs Expedition to Katanga 
In 1891 on Stanley's recommendation, Stairs was appointed by King Léopold II of Belgium to command a mission to take Katanga also known as Garanganze with or without the consent of its powerful king, Msiri. 
 
Leopold had used Stanley's services before and agreed with his use of force and understood Stairs to be in the same mould, and he had a reputation for carrying out orders completely and without hesitation.  The Stairs Expedition was a military mission of 400 men under the Congo Free State flag, armed with 200 rifles modern for their time.  (Msiri's men had muzzle-loading muskets). Stairs ran a well-organised expedition and won the loyalty of his officers and chiefs (Zanzibari supervisors). It was a smaller and lighter than his previous expedition, with only two other military officers. They were in a race against Cecil Rhodes' British South Africa Company expanding from the south, which had already sent two failed expeditions to Msiri. Stairs and Joseph Moloney, the expedition's British medical officer, were aware that they could potentially come into armed conflict with a British expedition, and agreed they would nevertheless discharge their duties to their employer, Leopold. The Stairs Expedition became notorious for the fate of Msiri. After three days of negotiations without progress, Stairs gave Msiri an ultimatum to sign the treaty the next day, 20 December 1891. When Msiri did not appear, he sent his second-in-command, Captain Bodson to arrest Msiri, who stood his ground. Bodson shot him dead, and a fight broke out.  The expedition took their wounded and Msiri's body back to their camp where Stairs was waiting, and there they cut off Msiri's head and hoisted it on a pole in plain view as a 'barbaric lesson' to his people. René de Pont-Jest: L'Expédition du Katanga, d'après les notes de voyage du marquis Christian de Bonchamps, in: Edouard Charton (editor): Le Tour du Monde magazine, also published bound in two volumes by Hachette, Paris (1893). Available online at www.collin.francois.free.fr/Le_tour_du_monde/  Some of the Garanganze were massacred by the expedition's askaris, and most of the rest fled into the bush. Stairs handed over Msiri's body to his two brothers and an adopted son, Makanda Bantu, whom Stairs installed as chief to replace Msiri, and who signed the treaty acknowledging Leopold as sovereign. The two brothers refused to do so until Stairs sent Moloney to threaten them with the same fate as Msiri. Oral histories of the Garanganze people say that the expedition kept Msiri's head – by some accounts in a can of kerosene – but it cursed and killed everyone who carried it and eventually, this included Stairs.  David Gordon: “Decentralized Despots or Contingent Chiefs: Comparing Colonial Chiefs in Northern Rhodesia and the Belgian Congo.” KwaZulu-Natal History and African Studies Seminar, University of Natal, Durban, 2000.  He was ill with malaria throughout January 1892. After being relieved by another expedition, the Stairs Expedition set out on the long return journey to Zanzibar. Stairs was frequently sick but by May 1891 had recovered. On a steamer down the lower Zambezi he had another attack of malaria which killed him on 9 June 1892. He is buried in the European Cemetery in Chinde, Mozambique at the mouth of the Zambezi River. Only 189 of the 400 men on the expedition made it back to Zanzibar, a year after they had left, most of the rest died and few deserted.  Katanga became part of the Congo Free State, which was annexed by Belgium in 1908 after an international outcry over the killings, brutality and slavery by Leopold's regime. In the early 20th century as Katanga's mining industries developed, some British in Northern Rhodesia, representing the losers in the scramble for Katanga, thought of Stairs as a mercenary and traitor to the British Empire. 
Commemoration
Captain Stairs is commemorated with identical 3 tablets (c. 1902) in the vestibule of Mackenzie Building at Royal Military College of Canada, St. George's Cathedral (Kingston, Ontario) and in Rochester Cathedral near Chatham, England.

"William Grant Stairs, Captain the Welsh Regiment. Born at Halifax Nova Scotia 1 July 1863. Lieutenant Royal Engineers 1885–91. Served on the staff of the Emin Pasha Relief Expedition 1887 under the leadership of H.M. Stanley and exhibited great courage and devotion to duty. Died of fever on the 9 June 1892 at Chinde on the Zambesi whilst in command of the Katanga Expedition sent out by the King of the Belgians."
A tablet at the Royal Military College of Canada Memorial Arch erected in 1932 "The Emin Pasha Relief Expedition 1887–1890 52 Captain W.G. Stairs"

A collection of artefacts from his African expeditions are at Fort Frederick (Kingston) and some his diaries are preserved in the Public Archives of Nova Scotia; others are lost. Stairs Island, Parry Sound, Ontario was named in his honour. 
References 
The memorial in St. George's Cathedral, Kingston, was destroyed in the fire in 1899, and has not been replaced.
Further reading

Based on Stairs' expedition diaries:
Hon. Roy MacLaren, African Exploits : The Diaries of William Stairs, 1887–1892, (1998)  McGill-Queen's University Press (ISBN 0-7735-1640-9) & Liverpool University Press (ISBN 0-85323-722-0)
Jane M. Konczacki, Victorian Explorer, (1997),  Nimbus Publishing (ISBN 1-55109-103-8).
Emin Pasha Relief Expedition
Daniel Liebowitz; Charles Pearson: The Last Expedition: Stanley's Mad Journey Through the Congo, 2005, ISBN 0-393-05903-0
Based on other Stairs Expedition member's journals:
Joseph Augustus Moloney, With Captain Stairs to Katanga, (1893) Sampson. Low, Marston & Company, London (ISBN 0955393655).
René de Pont-Jest: L'Expédition du Katanga, d'après les notes de voyage du marquis Christian de Bonchamps, published in: Edouard Charton (editor): Le Tour du Monde magazine (1892–3).
The following book provides background on the Stairs family of Halifax.
James Frost, Merchant Princes, Halifax's First Family of Finance, Ships and Steel, 2003, James Lorimer and Company.
Obituary: Captain William Grant Stairs Proceedings of the Royal Geographical Society and Monthly Record of Geography, New Monthly Series, Vol. 14, No. 7 (Jul., 1892), pp. 475–476   Published by: Blackwell Publishing on behalf of The Royal Geographical Society (with the Institute of British Geographers)


References

Primary sources 

Jephson, A. J. Mounteney : Diary, Edited by Dorothy Middleton, Hakluyt Society, 1969
Stanley, Henry Morton : In Darkest Africa, 1890


Secondary works

Daniel Liebowitz; Charles Pearson : The Last Expedition: Stanley's Mad Journey Through the Congo, 2005, ISBN 0-393-05903-0
Moorehead, Alan : The White Nile, London, 1960, 1971
Smith, Iain R. : The Emin Pasha Relief Expedition 1886–1890, Oxford University Press, 1972
Gould, Tony : In Limbo: The Story of Stanley's Rear Column, David & Charles 1980 ISBN 0-241-10125-5
  
 
DEFAULTSORT













 
	Max Born
 
 Max Born (11 December 1882 – 5 January 1970) was a German-British physicist and mathematician who was instrumental in the development of quantum mechanics. He also made contributions to solid-state physics and optics and supervised the work of a number of notable physicists in the 1920s and 30s. Born won the 1954 Nobel Prize in Physics (shared with Walther Bothe).
Early life and educationMax Born was born on 11 December 1882 in Breslau (now Wrocław, Poland), which at Born's birth was in the Prussian Province of Silesia in the German Empire, to a family of Jewish descent. He was one of two children born to Gustav Born, (b. 22 April 1850, Kempen, d. 6 July 1900, Breslau), an anatomist and embryologist, and Margarethe ('Gretchen') Kauffmann (b. 22 January 1856, Tannhausen, d. 29 August 1886, Breslau), from a Silesian family of industrialists. Gustav and Gretchen married on 7 May 1881. She died when Max was four years old, on 29 August 1886.Max had a sister  Käthe (b. 5 March 1884), and a half-brother Wolfgang (b. 21 October 1892) from his father's second marriage (m. 13 September 1891) with Bertha Lipstein. Initially educated at the König-Wilhelm-Gymnasium, Born went on to study at the University of Breslau followed by Heidelberg University and the University of Zurich. During study  for his Ph.D.  and Habilitation  at the University of Göttingen, he came into contact with many prominent scientists and mathematicians including Klein, Hilbert, Minkowski, Runge, Schwarzschild, and Voigt. In 1908-1909 he studied at Gonville and Caius College, Cambridge.When Born arrived in Göttingen in 1904, Klein, Hilbert, and Minkowski  were the high priests of mathematics and were known as the “mandarins.”  Very quickly after his arrival, Born formed close ties to the latter two men.  From the first class he took with Hilbert, Hilbert identified Born as having exceptional abilities and selected him as the lecture scribe, whose function was to write up the class notes  for the students' mathematics reading room at the University of Göttingen.  Being class scribe put Born into regular, invaluable contact with Hilbert, during which time Hilbert’s intellectual largesse benefited Born’s fertile mind.  Hilbert became Born's mentor and Hilbert eventually selected him to be the first to hold the unpaid, semi-official position of Hilbert’s assistant.  Born's introduction to Minkowski came through Born's stepmother, Bertha, as she knew Minkowski from dancing classes in Königsberg.  The introduction netted Born invitations to the Minkowski household for Sunday dinners.  In addition, while performing his duties as scribe and assistant, Born often saw Minkowski at Hilbert's house.  Born’s outstanding work on elasticity – a subject near and dear to Klein – became the core of his magna cum laude Ph.D. thesis, in spite of some of Born’s irrationalities in dealing with Klein. Born married Martha E. Hedwig, née Ehrenberg,  on 2 August 1913. She was of Jewish background on her father's side and Christian on her mother's side, and was a practicing Lutheran; Born converted from Judaism to the Lutheran faith in 1914. Though he converted to the Lutheran faith, however, he regarded religious professions and churches to be no importance to him. He was said to be a deist. The major reasons for his conversion was for his wife and to assimilate into German society.  The marriage produced three children, including G. V. R. Born. His daughter Irene was the mother of British-born Australian singer and actress Olivia Newton-John. Via marriage, he is related to jurists Victor Ehrenberg (his father-in-law) and Rudolf von Jhering (his wife's maternal grandfather), as well as Hans Ehrenberg, and is a great uncle of British alternative comedian Ben Elton.
CareerAfter Max's Habilitation in 1909, he settled in as a young academic at Göttingen as a Privatdozent (Associate Professor).   In Göttingen, Born stayed at a boarding house run by Sister Annie at Dahlmannstraße 17, known as El BoKaReBo.  The name was derived from the first letters of the last names of its boarders: “El” for Ella Philipson (a medical student), “Bo” for Born and Hans Bolza (a physics student), “Ka” for Theodore von Kármán (a Privatdozent), and “Re” for Albrecht Renner (a medical student). A frequent visitor to the boarding house was Paul Peter Ewald, a doctoral student of Arnold Sommerfeld on loan to David Hilbert at Göttingen as a special assistant for physics.   Richard Courant, a mathematician and Privatdozent, called these people the “in group.” From 1915 to 1919, except for a period in the German army, Born was extraordinarius professor of theoretical physics at the University of Berlin, where he formed a lifelong friendship with Albert Einstein. In 1919, he became ordinarius professor on the science faculty at the University of Frankfurt am Main. While there, the University of Göttingen was looking for a replacement for Peter Debye, and the Philosophy Faculty had Born at the top of their list.  In negotiating for the position with the education ministry, Born arranged for another chair at Göttingen and for his long-time friend and colleague James Franck to fill it.   In 1921, Born became ordinarius professor of theoretical physics and Director of the new Institute of Theoretical Physics at Göttingen.  While there, he formulated  the now-standard interpretation of the probability density function for ψ*ψ in the Schrödinger equation of quantum mechanics, published in July 1926  and for which he was awarded the Nobel Prize in Physics in 1954, some three decades later.For the 12 years Born and Franck were at Göttingen (1921–1933), Born had a collaborator with shared views on basic scientific concepts — a distinct advantage for teaching and his research on the developing quantum theory. The approach of close collaboration between theoretical physicists and experimental physicists was also shared by Born at Göttingen and Arnold Sommerfeld at the University of Munich, who was ordinarius professor of theoretical physics and Director of the Institute of Theoretical Physics — also a prime mover in the development of quantum theory.  Born and Sommerfeld not only shared their approach in using experimental physics to test and advance their theories, Sommerfeld, in 1922 when he was in the United States lecturing at the University of Wisconsin–Madison, sent his student Werner Heisenberg to be Born’s assistant.  Heisenberg again returned to Göttingen in 1923 and completed his Habilitation under Born in 1924 and became a Privatdozent at Göttingen – the year before Heisenberg and Born published their first papers on matrix mechanics.  In 1925, Born and Werner Heisenberg formulated the matrix mechanics representation of quantum mechanics. On 9 July, Heisenberg gave Born a paper to review and submit for publication.  In the paper, Heisenberg formulated quantum theory avoiding the concrete but unobservable representations of electron orbits by using parameters such as transition probabilities for quantum jumps, which necessitated using two indexes corresponding to the initial and final states.   When Born read the paper, he recognized the formulation as one which could be transcribed and extended to the systematic language of matrices,  which he had learned from his study under Jakob Rosanes  at Breslau University. Born, with the help of his assistant and former student Pascual Jordan, began immediately to make the transcription and extension, and they submitted their results for publication; the paper was received for publication just 60 days after Heisenberg’s paper.  A follow-on paper was submitted for publication before the end of the year by all three authors.  (A brief review of Born’s role in the development of the matrix mechanics formulation of quantum mechanics along with a discussion of the key formula involving the non-commutativity of the probability amplitudes can be found in an article by Jeremy Bernstein.   A detailed historical and technical account can be found in Mehra and Rechenberg’s book The Historical Development of Quantum Theory. Volume 3. The Formulation of Matrix Mechanics and Its Modifications 1925–1926. )Up until this time, matrices were seldom used by physicists; they were considered to belong to the realm of pure mathematics. Gustav Mie had used them in a paper on electrodynamics in 1912 and Born had used them in his work on the lattices theory of crystals in 1921.  While matrices were used in these cases, the algebra of matrices with their multiplication did not enter the picture as they did in the matrix formulation of quantum mechanics.  Born, however, had learned matrix algebra from Rosanes, as already noted, but Born had also learned Hilbert’s theory of integral equations and quadratic forms for an infinite number of variables as was apparent from a citation by Born of Hilbert’s work Grundzüge einer allgemeinen Theorie der Linearen Integralgleichungen published in 1912.    Jordan, too was well equipped for the task.  For a number of years, he had been an assistant to Richard Courant at Göttingen in the preparation of Courant and David Hilbert’s book Methoden der mathematischen Physik I, which was published in 1924.  This book, fortuitously, contained a great many of the mathematical tools necessary for the continued development of quantum mechanics. In 1926, John von Neumann became assistant to David Hilbert, and he would coin the term Hilbert space to describe the algebra and analysis which were used in the development of quantum mechanics.   In 1928, Albert Einstein nominated Heisenberg, Born, and Jordan for the Nobel Prize in Physics,  but it was not to be.  The announcement of the Nobel Prize in Physics for 1932 was delayed until November 1933.  It was at that time that it was announced Heisenberg  had won the Prize for 1932 “for the creation of quantum mechanics, the application of which has led to the discovery of the allotropic forms of hydrogen” Nobel Prize in Physics and 1933 – Nobel Prize Presentation Speech.  and Erwin Schrödinger and Paul Adrien Maurice Dirac shared the 1933 Prize "for the discovery of new productive forms of atomic theory".  One can rightly ask why Born was not awarded the Prize in 1932 along with Heisenberg – Bernstein gives some speculations on this matter.  One of them is related to Jordan joining the Nazi Party on 1 May 1933 and becoming a member of the paramilitary unit SA.  Hence, Jordan’s Party affiliations and Jordan’s links to Born may have affected Born’s chance at the Prize at that time.  Bernstein also notes that when Born won the Prize in 1954, Jordan was still alive, and the Prize was awarded for the statistical interpretation of quantum mechanics, attributable alone to Born. Heisenberg’s reaction to Born for Heisenberg himself receiving the Prize for 1932 and Born receiving the Prize in 1954 is also instructive in evaluating whether Born should have shared the Prize with Heisenberg.  On 25 November 1933 Born received a letter from Heisenberg in which he said he had been delayed in writing due to a “bad conscience” that he alone had received the Prize “for work done in Göttingen in collaboration — you, Jordan and I.”  Heisenberg went on to say that Born and Jordan’s contribution to quantum mechanics cannot be changed by “a wrong decision from the outside.”   In 1954, Heisenberg wrote an article honoring Max Planck for his insight in 1900.  In the article, Heisenberg credited Born and Jordan for the final mathematical formulation of matrix mechanics and Heisenberg went on to stress how great their contributions were to quantum mechanics, which were not “adequately acknowledged in the public eye.” Those who received their Ph.D. degrees under Born at Göttingen included Max Delbrück, Walter Elsasser, Friedrich Hund, Pascual Jordan, Maria Goeppert-Mayer, Lothar Wolfgang Nordheim, J. Robert Oppenheimer, and Victor Weisskopf. Sources for History of Quantum Physics   Born’s assistants at the University of Göttingen’s Institute for Theoretical Physics included Enrico Fermi, Werner Heisenberg, Gerhard Herzberg, Friedrich Hund, Pascual Jordan, Wolfgang Pauli, Léon Rosenfeld, Edward Teller, and Eugene Wigner.    Walter Heitler became an assistant to Born in 1928 and under Born completed his Habilitation in 1929.  Born not only recognized talent to work with him, but he let his “superstars stretch past him.”    His Ph.D. student Delbrück, and six of his assistants (Fermi, Heisenberg, Goeppert-Mayer, Herzberg, Pauli, Wigner) went on to win Nobel Prizes.In a letter to Born in 1926, Einstein made his famous remark regarding quantum mechanics, often paraphrased as "The Old One does not play dice."  In 1933 Born emigrated from Germany. He had strong and public pacifist opinions; moreover, though Born was a Lutheran, he was classified as a Jew by the Nazi racial laws due to his ancestry, and was thus stripped of his professorship. He took up a position as Stokes Lecturer at the University of Cambridge. From 1936 to 1953 he was Tait Professor of Natural Philosophy at the University of Edinburgh, where he promoted the teaching of mathematical physics. He became a British subject and a Fellow of the Royal Society of London in 1939.  Born had a dislike for nuclear weapons research, but he still acknowledged “it might be the only way out.”   Much of the theoretical power behind the development of the first atomic bomb was due to many of those surrounding him at Göttingen and working on atomic physics and quantum mechanics:  three of his Ph.D. students (Maria Goeppert-Mayer, Oppenheimer and Weisskopf),  three of his assistants (Fermi, Teller, and Wigner), the Director of the Second Institute for Experimental Physics (James Franck), and David Hilbert’s assistant (John von Neumann). Students, assistants, and colleagues of Born at Göttingen who worked on the Manhattan Project:

Maria Goeppert-Mayer – Worked on the Manhattan Project with Harold Urey at Columbia University on isotope separation.
Robert Oppenheimer – Director of Los Alamos Scientific Laboratory (LASL) - One of the four major sites of the Manhattan Engineering District.
Victor Weisskopf – Head of T-3 Group, Experiments, Efficiency Calculations, and    Radiation Hydrodynamics, LASL
Enrico Fermi – Director of Research, Met Lab of the University of Chicago - One of the four major sites of the Manhattan Engineering District.
Edward Teller – Head of T-1 Group, Hydrodynamics of Implosion and Super, LASL
Eugene Wigner – Director of Theoretical Studies, Met Lab
James Franck – Director of the Chemistry Division, Met Lab, and Chairman of the Committee on Political and Social Problems
John von Neumann – LASL consultant on implosion mechanism for the plutonium bomb. (Neumann was assistant to David Hilbert at Göttingen and was greatly influenced by both David Hilbert’s and Max Born’s work. Neumann applied the mathematics of Hilbert space to Born’s quantum mechanics, and, in 1932, his foundational book on the mathematical underpinnings of quantum mechanics, Mathematische Grundlagen der Quantenmechanik, was published.) 

Max and Hedwig Born retired to Bad Pyrmont (10 km south of Hamelin) in West Germany, in 1954. Biographical Sketch from the German Historical Museum
 Born was one of the 11 signatories to the Russell-Einstein Manifesto.Born died on 5 January 1970 in Göttingen, Germany. He is buried there in the same cemetery as Walther Nernst, Wilhelm Weber, Max von Laue, Max Planck, and David Hilbert.
Max Born Prize
In memory of his important contributions, the Max Born prize was created by the 
German Physical Society and the British Institute of Physics. It is awarded annually.
Published worksDuring his life, Born wrote several semi-popular and technical books. His volumes on topics like atomic physics and optics were very well received and are considered classics in their fields which are still in print. The following is a listing of his major works:

Über das Thomson'sche Atommodell Habilitations-Vortrag (FAM, 1909) - The Habilitation was done at the University of Göttingen, on 23 October 1909. 
Dynamik der Kristallgitter (Teubner, 1915)  Greenspan, 2005, p. 352.  - After its publication, the physicist Arnold Sommerfeld asked Born to write an article based on it for the 5th volume of the Mathematical Encyclopedia.  World War I delayed the start of work on this article, but it was taken up in 1919 and finished in 1922.  It was published as a revised edition under the title Atomic Theory of Solid States. 
Dynamical Theory of Crystal Lattices, with Kun Huang. (Oxford, Clarendon Press, 1954)  
Die Relativitätstheorie Einsteins und ihre physikalischen Grundlagen  (Springer, 1920) - Based on Born’s lectures at the University of Frankfurt am Main. 
Available in English under the title Einstein’s Theory of Relativity. 
Vorlesungen über Atommechanik (Springer, 1925)  
Mechanics of the Atom (George Bell & Sons, 1927) - Translated by J. W. Fisher and revised by D. R. Hartree. 
Problems of Atomic Dynamics (MIT Press, 1926) – A first account of matrix mechanics being developed in Germany, based on two series of lectures given at MIT, over three months, in late 1925 and early 1926.  
Elementare Quantenmechanik (Zweiter Band der Vorlesungen über Atommechanik), with Pascual Jordan. (Springer, 1930) - This was the first volume of what was intended as a two-volume work. This volume was limited to the work Born did with Jordan on matrix mechanics.  The second volume was to deal with Erwin Schrödinger’s wave mechanics.  However, the second volume was not even started by Born, as he believed his friend and colleague Hermann Weyl had written it before he could do so.  
Optik: Ein Lehrbuch der elektromagnetische Lichttheorie (Springer, 1933) - The book was released just as the Borns were emigrating to England.
Principles of Optics: Electromagnetic Theory of Propagation, Interference and Diffraction of Light,  with Emil Wolf. (Pergamon, 1959) - This book is not an English translation of Optik, but rather a substantially new book. Shortly after World War II, a number of scientists suggested that Born update and translate his work into English.  Since there had been many advances in optics in the intervening years, updating was warranted. In 1951, Emil Wolf began as Born’s private assistant on the book; it was eventually published in 1959 by Robert Maxwell's Pergamon Press  - the delay being due to the lengthy time needed  “to resolve all the financial and publishing tricks created by Maxwell.”  
Moderne Physik (1933) -- Based on seven lectures given at the Technischen Hochschule Berlin. Greenspan, 2005, p. 201. 
Atomic Physics (Blackie, London, 1935) - Authorized translation of Moderne Physik by John Dougall, with updates. 
The Restless Universe   (Blackie and Son Limited, 1935) - A popularized rendition of the workshop of nature. Born’s nephew, Otto Königsberger, whose successful career as an architect in Berlin was brought to an end when the Nazis took over, was temporarily brought to England to illustrate the book. 
Experiment and Theory in Physics (Cambridge University Press, 1943) – The address given King’s College, Newcastle upon Tyne, at the request of the Durham Philosophical Society and the Pure Science Society.  An expanded version of the lecture appeared in a 1956 Dover Publications edition. 
Natural Philosophy of Cause and Chance (Oxford University Press, 1949) – Based on Born’s 1948 Waynflete lectures, given at the College of St. Mary Magdalen, Oxford University.  A later edition (Dover, 1964)  included two appendices: “Symbol and Reality” and Born’s lecture given at the Nobel laureates 1964 meeting in Landau, Germany. 
A General Kinetic Theory of Liquids with H. S. Green (Cambridge University Press, 1949) -- The six papers in this book were reproduced with permission from the Proceedings of the Royal Society.
Physics in My Generation: A Selection of Papers (Pergamon, 1956)  
Physik im Wandel meiner Zeit (Vieweg, 1957)
Physik und Politik (VandenHoeck und Ruprecht, 1960)
Zur Begründung der Matrizenmechanik, with Werner Heisenberg and Pascual Jordan (Battenberg, 1962)  - Published in honor of Max Born’s 80th birthday.  This edition reprinted the authors’ articles on matrix mechanics published in Zeitscrift für Physik, Volumes 26 and 33-35, 1924-1926. 
My Life and My Views: A Nobel Prize Winner in Physics Writes Provocatively on a Wide Range of Subjects (Scribner, 1968) - Part II (pp. 63–206) is a translation of Verantwortung des Naturwissenschaftlers. 
Briefwechsel 1916-1955, kommentiert von Max Born with Hedwig Born and Albert Einstein (Nymphenburger, 1969)
The Born-Einstein Letters: Correspondence between Albert Einstein and Max and Hedwig Born from 1916–1955, with commentaries by Max Born (Macmillan, 1971). 
Mein Leben: Die Erinnerungen des Nobelpreisträgers (Munich: Nymphenburger, 1975).  Born's published memoirs.
My Life: Recollections of a Nobel Laureate (Scribner, 1978).  Translation of Mein Leben.
Born Nobel Prize Speech - 1954
Born Nobel Prize Lecture - 1954
Published papers (as listed on the Smithsonian/NASA Astrophysics Data System (ADS))
Published papers  (as listed on HistCite)
Published Books (based on the Library of Congress citations)
Published Works - Berlin-Brandenburgische Akademie der Wissenschaften Akademiebibliothek


Selected journal literatureWhile links have been provided in this article to journal publications by Born, a few of his papers are worth highlighting here along with citations to translations in English.Matrix Mechanics A trilogy of papers launched the matrix mechanics formulation of quantum mechanics: 

W. Heisenberg, Über quantentheoretische Umdeutung kinematischer und mechanischer Beziehungen, Zeitschrift für Physik, 33, 879-893, 1925 (received 29 July 1925).  [English translation in: B. L. van der Waerden, editor, Sources of Quantum Mechanics  (Dover Publications, 1968) ISBN 0-486-61881-1  (English title:  Quantum-Theoretical Re-interpretation of Kinematic and Mechanical Relations).]
M. Born and P. Jordan, Zur Quantenmechanik, Zeitschrift für Physik, 34, 858-888, 1925 (received 27 September 1925).  [English translation in: B. L. van der Waerden, editor, Sources of Quantum Mechanics   (Dover Publications, 1968) ISBN 0-486-61881-1 (English title: On Quantum Mechanics).]
M. Born, W. Heisenberg, and P. Jordan, Zur Quantenmechanik II, Zeitschrift für Physik, 35, 557-615, 1926 (received 16 November 1925).  [English translation in: B. L. van der Waerden, editor, Sources of Quantum Mechanics (Dover Publications, 1968) ISBN 0-486-61881-1]
Probability Density The now-standard interpretation of the probability density function for ψ*ψ in the Schrödinger equation of quantum mechanics was published by Born in the first of these two papers, and it is this for which he was awarded the Nobel Prize in Physics in 1954.  The second paper is a continuation and extension of the analysis provided in the first paper.

 
 


Awards and honors

1934 - Stokes Medal of Cambridge  Born Biographic Data 
1939 - Fellow of the Royal Society   
1945 - MacDougall-Brisbane Medal of the Royal Society of Edinburgh  
1945 - Gunning-Victoria Jubilee Prize of the Royal Society of Edinburgh   
1948 - Max Planck Medaille der Deutschen Physikalischen Gesellschaft  
1950 - Hughes Medal of the Royal Society of London  
1953 - Honorary citizen of the town of Göttingen  
1954 - Nobel Prize in Physics The award was for Born's fundamental research in quantum mechanics, especially for his statistical interpretation of the wavefunction. 
1954 - Nobel Prize Banquet Speech
1954 - Born Nobel Prize Lecture
1956 - Hugo Grotius Medal for International Law, Munich  
1959 - Grand Cross of Merit with Star of the Order of Merit of the German Federal Republic  
1982 - Ceremony at the University of Göttingen in the 100th Birth Year of Max Born and James Franck, Institute Directors 1921 - 1933. 
Max-Born Institut für Nichtlineare Optik und Kurzzeitspektroskopie im Forschungsverbund Berlin e.V. - Institute named in his honor.


See also

Born approximation
Born rigidity
Born–Haber cycle
Born–Infeld theory
Born-Oppenheimer approximation
Born's Rule
Cauchy-Born rule
List of Jewish Nobel laureates


Bibliography

Jeremy Bernstein Max Born and the Quantum Theory, Am. J. Phys. 73 (11) 999-1008 (2005). Department of Physics, Stevens Institute of Technology, Hoboken, New Jersey 07030. Received 14 April 2005; accepted 29 July 2005.
Max Born The statistical interpretation of quantum mechanics. Nobel Lecture – 11 December 1954.
Nancy Thorndike Greenspan, "The End of the Certain World: The Life and Science of Max Born" (Basic Books, 2005) ISBN 0-7382-0693-8.  Also published in Germany: Max Born - Baumeister der Quantenwelt. Eine Biographie (Spektrum Akademischer Verlag, 2005), ISBN 3-8274-1640-X.
Max Jammer The Conceptual Development of Quantum Mechanics (McGraw-Hill, 1966)
Christa Jungnickel and Russell McCormmach.  Intellectual Mastery of Nature.  Theoretical Physics from Ohm to Einstein, Volume 2: The Now Mighty Theoretical Physics, 1870 to 1925.  University of Chicago Press, Paper cover, 1990. ISBN 0-226-41585-6
Jagdish Mehra and Helmut Rechenberg The Historical Development of Quantum Theory. Volume 3. The Formulation of Matrix Mechanics and Its Modifications 1925–1926. (Springer, 2001) ISBN 0-387-95177-6
B. L. van der Waerden, editor, Sources of Quantum Mechanics  (Dover Publications, 1968) ISBN 0-486-61881-1
Kurt Gottfried, Born to Greatness?, Nature, Vol. 435, 739, 9 June 2005. [1]


References 
External links 

American Institute of Physics History Search: Max Born
Encyclopaedia Britannica, Max Born - full article
Annotated bibliography for Max Born from the Alsos Digital Library for Nuclear Issues
Freeview video of Gustav Born (son of Max) with conversation and film on Gustav's memories of his father by the Vega Science Trust
 
Max Born’s Life
 
Max Born information from Nobel Winners site
Nobel Laureate biography
Papers of Professor Max Born (1882-1970) Held at the Edinburgh University Library, Special Collections Division
Recollections of Max Born, by Emil Wolf, in  Astrophysics and Space Science, Volume 227, Numbers 1-2. (Biographical tribute)
Kuhn, Thomas S., John L. Heilbron, Paul Forman, and Lini Allen Sources for History of Quantum Physics (American Philosophical Society, 1967)
Oral History interview transcript with Max Born June 1960, 17 & 18 October 1962, American Institute of Physics, Niels Bohr Library and Archives

   
 
DEFAULTSORT





































  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Victoria Wood
 
 
Victoria Wood CBE (born 19 May 1953) is an English comedienne, actress, singer-songwriter, screenwriter and director. Wood has written and starred in sketches, plays, films and sitcoms, and her live comedy act is interspersed with her own compositions, which she accompanies on piano. 
 
  Much of her humour is grounded in everyday life, and includes references to popular British media and brand names of quintessentially British products. She is noted for her skills in observing culture, and in satirising social classes.   
 She started her career in 1974 by winning the ATV talent show New Faces. It wasn't until the 1980s that she began to establish herself as a comedy star, with the award-winning television series Victoria Wood As Seen On TV and became one of Britain's most popular stand-up comedians.  In 1998, she wrote and starred in the (again, award-winning) sitcom Dinnerladies.    In 2006, she won two BAFTA awards for her one-off drama for ITV1, Housewife, 49.   Wood frequently works with long-term collaborators Julie Walters, Duncan Preston and Celia Imrie. 
Career

Early yearsWood is the youngest daughter of Stanley Wood and Nellie Mape. She has three siblings: a brother, Chris, and two sisters, Penny and Rosalind.Wood was educated at Bury Grammar Girls' School  and began her showbusiness career while an undergraduate studying drama at the University of Birmingham, appearing on the TV talent show New Faces. This led to her appearance in a sketch show featuring the winners of that series, The Summer Show.  Her first big break was as a novelty act on the BBC's consumer affairs programme That's Life! in 1976. Wood had first met long-term collaborator Julie Walters in the early 1970s, when Wood applied for Manchester Polytechnic,  and coincidentally met up once more when they appeared together in the same theatre revue, In At The Death, in 1978 (for which Wood wrote a brief sketch). Its success led to the commissioning of Wood's first play, Talent (also 1978), starring Hazel Clyne (in a role which had been written for Walters), and which won Wood an award for 'Most Promising New Writer'. Peter Eckersley, the then-head of drama at Granada Television, saw Talent and immediately invited Wood to create a television adaptation. This time Julie Walters took the lead role which had been written for her, while Wood reprised her stage role.   
 
1980–88The success of the television version of Talent led to Wood writing the "follow-up", Nearly A Happy Ending. Shortly afterwards, a third play for Granada was written and made, Happy Since I Met You, again with Walters alongside Duncan Preston as the male lead. During 1980 she also wrote and starred in the stage play Good Fun. Recognising her talent, Eckersley offered Wood a sketch show, though Wood was unsure of the project; she only agreed to go ahead with the programme if Walters received equal billing. Eckersley came up with the obvious title Wood and Walters, ITV 50: What Did ITV Do For Me?, interview with Victoria Wood (September 2005).  and the dry run of the show (the pilot episode) was filmed. The programme was arranged to be made into a full series, and went on to co-star Duncan Preston and a cast of other supporting actors. However, in between the filming of the pilot and the series, Eckersley died. Wood cites Eckersley as giving her first big break, and feels that Wood and Walters suffered due to his death.  She was not impressed by Brian Armstrong, the emergency fill-in for Eckersley, and was of the opinion that he hired unsuitable supporting actors. Wood also appeared as a presenter in Yorkshire Television's schools television programme for hearing-impaired children, Insight, alongside Derek Griffiths, between 1980 and 1983. In 1982 and 1983 she appeared in BBC Radio's Just a Minute.Wood left Granada in 1984 for the BBC, who promised Wood more creative control over projects. Later that year, Wood's sketch show Victoria Wood As Seen On TV went into production. This time, Wood chose actors and actresses herself: her friend Julie Walters once again starred, as did Duncan Preston. Wood's friend Celia Imrie was also cast, as well as Susie Blake and Patricia Routledge. As Seen On TV was notable for featuring classic sketches such as Acorn Antiques, a spoof of low-budget soap opera and rumoured to be named after an antiques shop in her birthplace. Acorn Antiques is remembered for characters such as "Mrs Overall" (played by Walters), the deliberately bad camera angles and wobbling sets, as well as Celia Imrie's sarcastic tone as "Miss Babs". The sketches were seen as satirising the production values of the ITV soap opera Crossroads in the 1970s. Wood's most popular comic song,  "The Ballad of Barry and Freda (Let's Do It)" originated in this show. It tells the story of Freda (a woman eager for sex) and Barry (an introverted man terrified of sex), makes clever use of allusions to a multitude of risqué activities while avoiding all taboo words. 
There was a second series of Victoria Wood As Seen On TV in 1986, followed by a one-off 'special' in 1987.In 1988, she appeared in the BAFTA-winning An Audience With Victoria Wood for ITV. At the time of recording the show, Wood was six months pregnant.
1989–99During this period Wood began to move away from the sketch show format and into more self-contained works, often with a more bittersweet flavour. Victoria Wood (six parts, 1989)) featured Wood in several individual stories such as "We'd Quite Like To Apologise", set in an airport departure lounge, and "Over to Pam", set around a fictional talk show.  There was a brief return to sketches with the 1992 Christmas Day special Victoria Wood's All Day Breakfast.  The television film, Pat and Margaret (1994), starring Wood and Julie Walters as long-lost sisters with very different lifestyles, continued her return to stand-alone plays with a poignant undercurrent to the comedy.  
  In 1998, she wrote her first sitcom, Dinnerladies, which continued her now established milieu of mostly female, mostly middle-aged characters depicted vividly and amusingly, but with a counterpoint of sadder themes.  
 In 1994 there was also the one off BBC 80 minute programme Victoria Wood: Live in Your Own Home featuring Julie Walters and Duncan Preston.
2000–05December 2000 saw the Christmas sketch show special Victoria Wood with All The Trimmings,  starring her traditional troupe of actors and actresses as well as a string of special guest stars. However, it was during this period that Wood tended to move away from comedy, focusing on drama instead. She did continue to produce one-off specials, though, including Victoria Wood's Sketch Show Story (2002) and Victoria Wood's Big Fat Documentary (2005).  Wood wrote her first musical, Acorn Antiques: The Musical!, which opened in 2005 at the Theatre Royal, Haymarket, London, for a limited period, directed by Trevor Nunn. It starred most of the original cast, with Sally Ann Triplett playing Miss Berta (played in the series by Wood). Wood played Julie Walters' character Mrs. Overall for matinee performances. 
2006–10Wood wrote the 2006 one-off ITV serious drama Housewife, 49, an adaptation of the real diaries of Nella Last, and played the eponymous role of an introverted middle-aged character who discovers new confidence and friendships in Lancashire during World War II. Housewife, 49 was critically praised, and Wood won BAFTAs for both her acting and writing for this drama — a rare double. In November 2006, Wood directed a revival production of Acorn Antiques: The Musical! with a brand new cast. The musical opened at The Lowry in Salford in December and toured the United Kingdom from January to July 2007. In January 2007, she appeared as herself in a series of new adverts featuring famous people working for supermarket chain Asda. The adverts featured Wood working in the ASDA bakery and introduced a new catchphrase for the supermarket – "there's no place like ASDA".  Wood was also the subject of an episode of The South Bank Show in March 2007 and is the only woman to be the subject of two South Bank programmes (the previous occasion was in September 1996). Wood appeared in her own travel documentary show on BBC One called Victoria's Empire, in which she travelled around the world in search of the history, cultural impact and customs which the British Empire placed on the parts of the world it ruled. She departed Victoria Station, London for:

Programme One: Calcutta (India), Hong Kong and Borneo
Programme Two: Ghana, Jamaica and Newfoundland, Canada
Programme Three: New Zealand, Australia and Zambia, finishing at the Victoria Falls. 

In a tribute to Wood, the British television station UKTV Gold celebrated her works with a weekend marathon of programmes between 3 and 4 November 2007. The weekend focused on programmes such as Victoria Wood Live and Dinnerladies in addition to Victoria Wood As Seen On TV – this marked the first time it has been shown on British television since its last rerun in 1995.Wood returned to stand-up comedy with a special performance written for the celebratory show Happy Birthday BAFTA on 28 October 2007, alongside other household names. The programme was transmitted on ITV1 on Wednesday 7 November 2007.  On Boxing Day 2007 she appeared  as "Nana" in the Granada dramatisation of Noel Streatfeild's novel Ballet Shoes. In December 2007, while guesting on the radio programme Desert Island Discs, Wood said that she was about to begin writing a movie, described as a contemporary comedy about a middle-aged person, marking her first foray into film. On Thursday 12 June 2008, Wood was part of the celebrity guest panel on the series The Apprentice: You're Fired! on BBC Two.In June 2009, Wood appeared as a panelist on the first 2 episodes of the new series of I'm Sorry I Haven't a Clue.Wood returned to television comedy for a one-off Christmas comedy sketch-show special, her first in 9 years, titled Victoria Wood's Mid Life Christmas, transmitted on BBC One at 21:00 on Christmas Eve 2009.  The special, which reunited Wood with long-time collaborator Julie Walters, included a spoof of BBC period drama (Lark Rise to Candleford, Little Dorrit and Cranford) entitled Lark Pies to Cranchesterford, a spoof documentary following Acorn Antiques star Bo Beaumont (Walters) titled Beyond The Marigolds, highlights from the Mid Life Olympics 2009 (with Wood as the commentator), parodies of personal injury advertisements and a reprise of Wood's most famous song "The Ballad of Barry and Freda" ("Let's Do It"). Victoria Wood: Seen On TV, a 90-minute documentary looking back on Wood's career, was broadcast on BBC Two at 20:30 on 21 December, whilst a behind-the-scenes special programme about Midlife Christmas, Victoria Wood: What Larks!, was broadcast on BBC One at 23:00 on 30 December.
2011 onwardsOn New Year's Day 2011 Wood appeared in a BBC drama Eric and Ernie as Sadie Bartholomew, mother of Eric Morecambe  
  ..For the 2011 Manchester International Festival, Wood wrote and directed "That Day We Sang", a musical set in 1969 with flashbacks to 1929. It tells the story of a middle-aged couple who find love after meeting on a TV program about a choir they were both involved in 40 years previously. Although the characters are imaginary, the choir really did exist, singing with the Hallé Orchestra in the Manchester Free Trade Hall on a record which sold over a million copies. Apart from the pieces on the 1929 recording (Purcell's "Nymphs and Shepherds" and the Evening Benediction from Hansel and Gretel) the score for the musical was written by Wood herself.  
  In December 2011, she received the British Comedy Awards award for "Best Female TV Comic" beating competition such as Sarah Millican
Associated actorsWood is notable for frequently including the same actors in her shows. These actors have appeared in most of her work in the 1980s, 1990s and 2000s and include — most notably — Julie Walters, Celia Imrie and Duncan Preston. To a lesser extent, other associate actors include: Lill Roughley, Anne Reid and Susie Blake,.   
Awards and recognitionWood has received many awards in her long career. In 1997, she was appointed Officer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) in the Queen's Birthday Honours List .  Earlier in 1994, she was made an honorary Doctor of Letters by the University of Sunderland.  She was appointed Commander of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) in the 2008 Birthday Honours. Her work has also been laden with awards, both by the public and her professional contemporaries.In 2003, she was listed in The Observer as one of the 50 Funniest Acts in British Comedy.  In the 2005 Channel 4 poll The Comedian's Comedian, she was voted 27th out of the top 50 comedy acts ever by fellow comedians and comedy insiders. She was the highest-ranked woman on the list, beating French & Saunders (who paid tribute to her in their 'Lord of the Rings' spoof, where a map of middle earth shows a forest called 'Victoria Wood'), Joan Rivers and Joyce Grenfell. Her sketch show Victoria Wood As Seen On TV won BAFTA awards for its two series and Christmas Special.  In 2007, she was nominated  for and won  the BAFTA awards for "Best Actress" and for "Best Single Drama" for her role in the British war-time drama Housewife, 49, in which she plays the part of an ordinary housewife dominated by her moody husband. Wood's character eventually stands up to him and helps the WRVS (Women's Royal Voluntary Service) in their preparations for the British soldiers.Her popularity with the British public has been confirmed when she won 'Best Stand-Up' and 'Best Sketch Show' by Radio Times readers in 2001.  Wood was also voted 'Funniest Comedian' by the readers of Reader's Digest in 2005  and came 8th in ITV's poll of the public's 50 Greatest Stars, four places behind fellow co-star Julie Walters.
BAFTA Nominations

Wood has four wins from fourteen nominations ( she also has a special Bafta that she received at a Bafta tribute evening in 2005, taking her total to five )


Year Award Nominated work Result 
1986 Best Light Entertainment Performance Victoria Wood As Seen On TV   
1987 Best Light Entertainment Performance Victoria Wood As Seen On TV   
1988 Best Light Entertainment Performance Victoria Wood As Seen On TV   
1989 Best Light Entertainment Performance An Audience With Victoria Wood   
1990 Best Light Entertainment Performance Victoria Wood   
1995 Best Actress Pat and Margaret   
Best Single Drama Pat and Margaret   
Best Light Entertainment Performance Victoria Wood: Live in Your Own Home   
1999 Best Comedy Programme or Series Dinnerladies   
2000 Best Situation Comedy Dinnerladies   
2001 Best Comedy Programme or Series Victoria Wood with All The Trimmings   
2007 Best Actress Housewife 49   
Best Single Drama Housewife 49   
2011 Best Single Drama Eric and Ernie   

Victoria Wood As Seen On TV won the BAFTA for "Best Entertainment Programme" in 1986, 1987 and 1988, these awards went to the producer, Geoff Posner.
An Audience With Victoria Wood won the BAFTA for "Best Entertainment Programme" in 1989, this award went to David G. Hillier.


Personal lifeWood married magician Geoffrey Durham in March 1980. They separated in October 2002.   They have two children, Grace (born 1988) and Henry (born 1992). Although Wood fiercely maintains her privacy and that of her children, even originally refusing to publicly release the name of her son when he was born, Henry Durham appeared in a small cameo in her 2010 BBC Christmas Special.Wood is a Quaker  and a vegetarian, once remarking; "I'm all for killing animals and turning them into handbags. I just don't want to have to eat them." Wood lives in Highgate, North London.
Stand-Up videos

Sold Out (1991)
Live In Your Own Home (31 October 1994)
Live 1997 (27 October 1997)
At The Albert Hall – Live (25 November 2002)


References 
External links

 
In-depth look at her first TV play 'Talent'
 
Profile at Caroline's Comedy Base
Profile at TV Museum
Victoria Wood at BBC Comedy Guide
Return to drama (Manchester Evening News)
BBC Writers Room – Video and text interview with Victoria Wood about writing comedy
The Independent – The 5-Minute Interview: Victoria Wood, comedian and writer

 
  
DEFAULTSORT















 
 
	Judith Godrèche
 
Judith Godrèche (born Judith Goldreich on March 23, 1972) is a French actress and author, born in Paris. She has appeared in more than 30 films.
CareerGodrèche's early work included commercial modeling for a Japanese chocolate maker, as well as a teen magazine. Her first film appearance was as Claudia Cardinale's daughter in L'été prochain. At age 14 she obtained her first major role in Benoît Jacquot's Les Mendiants with Dominique Sanda.In 1989, Godrèche starred in Jacques Doillon's La Fille de 15 ans with Melvil Poupaud, which brought her fame. The following year, she turned to a full-time career in film. In 1990 she was nominated for the César Award for Most Promising Actress for her performance in Jacquot's La Désenchantée.In 1991, she was a member of the jury at the 41st Berlin International Film Festival.   In 1994 her novel Point de côté was published in France by Broché Publishers to good reviews.Godrèche was not well known to American audiences until Patrice Leconte's Ridicule was released in 1996. The film introduced her to Americans in the role of Mathilde de Bellegarde. In 1998 she starred with Leonardo DiCaprio and Jeremy Irons in The Man in the Iron Mask.Godrèche was nominated for a 2002 César Award for Best Supporting Actress for her performance in the surprise European hit, L'Auberge espagnole.In 2012, she began playing the continuing character of Claudette Von Jurgens in season 3 of Royal Pains. 
Personal lifeGodrèche had a relationship with Benoît Jacquot.  She later married Dany Boon, who is the father of her son Noé.  She now lives with Maurice Barthélemy, the father of her daughter Tess. 
Filmography

The Art of Love (2011) - Amélie
Potiche (2010)
Fais-moi plaisir! (2009) – Elisabeth
Home Sweet Home (2008) – Claire
J'veux pas que tu t'en ailles (2007, by Bernard Jeanjean) – Carla
Human Bomb (2006, by Maurice Barthélémy)
Papa (2004, by Maurice Barthélémy) – Maman
Tout pour plaire (2004, by Cécile Telerman) – Marie
Tu vas rire mais je te quitte (2004, by Philippe Harel) – Elise Vérone
Quicksand (2003, by John Mackenzie) – Lela Forin
France Boutique (2002, by Tonie Marshall) – Estelle
Parlez-moi d'amour (2002, by Sophie Marceau) – Justine
L'Auberge Espagnole (2001, by Cédric Klapisch) – Anne-Sophie
Entropy (1999, by Phil Joanou) – Stella
Bimboland (1998, by Ariel Zeitoun) – Cécile Bussy
The Man in the Iron Mask (1998, by Randall Wallace) – Christine Bellefort
Le Rouge et le Noir (1997, by Jean-Daniel Verhaege) – Mathilde de La Mole
Ridicule (1995, by Patrice Leconte) – Mathilde
Beaumarchais, l'insolent (1995, by Edouard Molinaro) – Marie-Antoinette
L'Aube à l'envers (1995 short, by Sophie Marceau)
Grande petite (1994, by Sophie Fillières) – Bénédicte
Une nouvelle vie (1993, by Olivier Assayas) – Lise
Tango (1993, by Patrice Leconte) – Madeleine
Emma Zunz (1992 TV, by Benoît Jacquot) – Emma Zunz
Paris s'éveille (1991, by Olivier Assayas) – Louise
Ferdydurke (1991, by Jerzy Skolimowski) – Zoo
La Désenchantée (1990, by Benoît Jacquot) – Beth
La Fille de quinze ans (1989, by Jacques Doillon) – Juliette
Sons (1989, by Alexandre Rockwell) – Florence Jr
Un été d'orages (1988, by Charlotte Brandström) – Laurence
La Méridienne (1988, by Jean-Francois Amiguet) – Stéphanie
Les Saisons du plaisir (1987, by Jean-Pierre Mocky) – Ophélie
Les Mendiants (1987, by Benoît Jacquot) – Catherine
L'été prochain (1985, by Nadine Trintignant) – Nickie


References 
External links 

 
 
 
 

 
 
 
DEFAULTSORT





 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Ken Starr
 
 
Kenneth Winston "Ken" Starr (born July 21, 1946) is an American lawyer and educational administrator who has also been a federal judge. He is best known for his investigation of figures during the Clinton administration.Starr served as a federal Court of Appeals judge and also at another time as Solicitor General.  He received the most publicity for his tenure as Independent Counsel while Bill Clinton was U.S. president. Starr was initially appointed to investigate the suicide death of deputy White House counsel Vince Foster and the Whitewater real estate investments of Bill Clinton. The three-judge panel charged with administering the Independent Counsel Act later expanded the inquiry into numerous areas including an extramarital affair that Bill Clinton had with Monica Lewinsky. After several years of investigation Starr filed the Starr Report which alleged that Bill Clinton had lied about existence of the affair during a sworn deposition. The allegation opened the door for the impeachment of Bill Clinton and the five-year suspension of Clinton's law license.Starr currently serves as the president of Baylor University in Waco, Texas, and serves on the board of trustees at the Baylor College of Medicine.
Early lifeKen Starr was born near Vernon, Texas, and was raised in Centerville. His father was a minister in the Churches of Christ who also worked as a barber. Starr attended Sam Houston High School in San Antonio and was a popular, straight‑A student. He was voted most likely to succeed by his classmates.  Black, Jane Kenneth Starr: On the trail of the President, BBC, 1998-11-09, accessed 2009-06-25 In 1970 Starr married Alice Mendell,    who was raised Jewish but converted to Christianity.    
EducationStarr first attended the Church of Christ-affiliated Harding University in Searcy, Arkansas, where he was an honor student, a member of the Young Democrats club,    and a vocal supporter of Vietnam protesters.    He later transferred to The George Washington University in Washington, D.C., where he received his bachelor of arts degree in 1968. During his time at The George Washington University, Starr was a member of Delta Phi Epsilon, a professional foreign service fraternity.    Starr worked for the Southwestern Company.    He later attended Brown University where he earned master's degree in 1969 and then went to Duke University School of Law, earning his J.D. in 1973. Starr was not drafted for military service during the Vietnam War, as he was classified 4‑F, because of a case of psoriasis.   
Legal careerAfter his graduation from Duke, Starr became first a law clerk for U.S. Circuit Judge David W. Dyer of the United States Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit (1973–1974), then for Chief Justice Warren Burger (1975–1977).He joined the Washington, D.C. office of the Los Angeles-based law firm Gibson, Dunn, & Crutcher in 1977 and was appointed counselor to U.S. Attorney General William French Smith in 1981.
Federal Judge and Solicitor GeneralStarr was nominated for a judgeship on United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit by President Ronald Reagan and served from 1983 to 1989. He was the United States Solicitor General from 1989 to 1993 under President George H. W. Bush.
Early 1990sWhen the Senate Ethics Committee needed someone to review Republican Senator Bob Packwood's diaries, the committee chose Starr. In 1990, Starr was the leading candidate for the U.S. Supreme Court nomination after William Brennan's retirement. He encountered strong resistance from the Department of Justice leadership, which feared that Starr might not be reliably conservative as a Supreme Court justice. President George H. W. Bush nominated David Souter instead of Starr.   
Starr also considered running for the United States Senate from Virginia in 1994 against incumbent Chuck Robb, but opted against opposing Oliver North for the Republican nomination.
Independent Counsel 
AppointmentIn August 1994 pursuant to the newly reenacted independent counsel law, Starr was appointed by a three-judge panel to continue the Whitewater investigation. He replaced Robert B. Fiske, a moderate Republican who had been appointed by Attorney General Janet Reno.    Although Starr and other independent counsels were later criticized as unaccountable and unstoppable, the statute gave the attorney general and the Special Division the authority to remove an independent counsel.Starr took the position part-time and remained active with his law firm, Kirkland & Ellis, as this was permitted by statute and was also the norm with previous independent counsel investigations . Starr bio on Kirkland site. See also Kirkland & Ellis LLP, accessed 2009-06-25.  As time went on, however, Starr was increasingly criticized for alleged conflicts of interest stemming from his continuing association with Kirkland & Ellis. Kirkland, like several other major law firms, was representing clients in litigation with the government, including tobacco companies and auto manufacturers. The firm itself was being sued by the Resolution Trust Company, a government agency involved in the Whitewater matter. Additionally, Starr's own actions were challenged because Starr had, on one occasion, talked with lawyers for Paula Jones, who was suing President Clinton over an alleged sexual assault. Starr had explained to them why he believed that sitting U.S. presidents are not immune to civil suit. 
Investigation of the death of Vince Foster 
On October 10, 1997, Starr's report on the death of deputy White House counsel Vince Foster, drafted largely by Starr's deputy Brett Kavanaugh, was released to the public by the Special Division. The report agrees with the findings of previous independent counsel Robert B. Fiske that Foster committed suicide at Fort Marcy Park, and that his suicide was caused primarily by undiagnosed and untreated depression. As CNN explained on February 28, 1997, "The [Starr] report refutes claims by conservative political organizations that Foster was the victim of a murder plot and coverup", but "despite those findings, right-wing political groups have continued to allege that there was more to the death and that the president and first lady tried to cover it up".    CNN also noted that organizations pushing the murder theory included the Pittsburgh Tribune-Review, owned by billionaire Richard Mellon Scaife, and Accuracy in Media, supported in part by Scaife's foundation.    Scaife's reporter on the Whitewater matter, Christopher Ruddy, was a frequent critic of Starr's handling of the case.   
Expansion of the investigationThe law conferred broad investigative powers on Starr and the other independent counsels named to investigate the administration, including the right to subpoena nearly anyone who might have information relevant to the particular investigation. Starr would later receive authority to conduct additional investigations, including the firing of White House Travel Office personnel, potential political abuse of confidential FBI files, Madison Guaranty, Rose Law Firm, Paula Jones law suit and, most notoriously, possible perjury and obstruction of justice to cover up President Clinton's sexual relationship with Monica Lewinsky. The Lewinsky portion of the investigation included the secret taping of conversations between Lewinsky and coworker Linda Tripp, requests by Starr to tape Lewinsky's conversations with Clinton, and requests by Starr to compel Secret Service agents to testify about what they might have seen while guarding Clinton. With the investigation of Clinton's possible adultery, critics of Starr believed that he had crossed a line and was acting more as a political hit man than as a prosecutor. Lacayo, Richard and Cohen, Adam Inside Starr and His Operation, Time, Feb 9, 1998  Froomkin, Dan Untangling Whitewater, Washington Post, accessed 2009-06-25 
Lewinsky scandal - Paula Jones lawsuit 
In his deposition for the Paula Jones lawsuit, Clinton denied having "sexual relations" with Monica Lewinsky. On the basis of the evidence provided by Linda Tripp, a blue dress with Clinton's semen, Ken Starr concluded that this sworn testimony was false and perjurious.During the deposition in the Jones case, Clinton was asked "Have you ever had sexual relations with Monica Lewinsky, as that term is defined in Deposition Exhibit 1, as modified by the Court?" The definition included contact with the genitalia, anus, groin, breast, inner thigh, or buttocks of a person with an intent to arouse or gratify the sexual desire of that person, any contact of the genitals or anus of another person, or contact of one's genitals or anus and any part of another person's body either directly or through clothing.          The judge ordered that Clinton be given an opportunity to review the agreed definition. Clinton flatly denied having sexual relations with Lewinsky.    Later, at the Starr grand jury, Clinton stated that he believed the definition of "sexual relations" agreed upon for the Jones deposition excluded his receiving oral sex.Starr's investigation eventually led to the impeachment of President Clinton, with whom Starr shared Time's Man of the Year designation for 1998. Despite his impeachment, the president was acquitted in the subsequent trial before the United States Senate as all 45 Democrats and a smattering of Republicans sided with him. 
Second thoughts on DOJ requestIn 2004 Starr expressed regret for ever having asked the Department of Justice to assign him to personally oversee the Lewinsky investigation, saying "the most fundamental thing that could have been done differently" would have been for somebody else to have investigated the matter.   
Political satireAs with many controversial figures, Kenneth Starr has been the subject of political satire. Both the book, And the Horse He Rode In On, by James Carville, and the stage play, Starr’s on Broadway, by Eric Zaccar, attempt to add a comedic, arguably negative light to Starr’s time as special prosecutor.
Post-Independent Counsel activitiesAfter five years as independent counsel, Starr resigned and returned to private practice as an appellate lawyer and a visiting professor at New York University and the George Mason University School of Law. Starr worked as a partner at Kirkland & Ellis, specializing in litigation. He was one of the lead attorneys in a class-action lawsuit filed by a coalition of liberal and conservative groups (including the American Civil Liberties Union and the National Rifle Association) against the regulations created by the Bipartisan Campaign Reform Act of 2002, known informally as McCain-Feingold Act. In the case, Starr argued that the law is an unconstitutional abridgement of free speech.On April 6, 2004, he was appointed dean of the Pepperdine University School of Law. He originally accepted a position at Pepperdine as the first dean of the newly created School of Public Policy in 1996; however, he withdrew from the appointment in 1998, several months after the Lewinsky controversy erupted. Critics charged that there was a conflict of interest due to substantial donations to Pepperdine from billionaire Richard Mellon Scaife, a Clinton critic who funded many media outlets attacking the president. (Scaife's money, however, supported the Foster-was-murdered theory, according to CNN, and Scaife defunded The American Spectator after it endorsed Starr's conclusion of suicide and mocked a Scaife-aided book. ) In 2004, some five years after President Clinton's impeachment, Starr was again offered a Pepperdine position at the School of Law and this time accepted it.
Death penalty casesIn 2005 Starr worked to overturn the death sentence of Robin Lovitt, who was on Virginia's Death Row for murdering a man during a robbery in 1998. Starr provided his services to Lovitt pro bono.  On October 3, 2005, the Supreme Court denied certiorari. (Lovitt was granted clemency and had his sentence commuted to life in prison without parole, on November 29, 2005, by Governor Mark Warner of Virginia.)On January 26, 2006, the defense team of convicted murderer Michael Morales (which included Starr) sent letters to California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger requesting clemency for Morales.      Letters purportedly from the jurors who determined Morales's death sentence were included in the package sent to Schwarzenegger.
Sarbanes–OxleyKen Starr announced that he would challenge the portion of the Sarbanes–Oxley Act that gives authority to the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (PCAOB).      
Morse v. Frederick 
On May 4, 2006, Starr announced that he would represent the school board of Juneau, Alaska, in its appeal to the United States Supreme Court in a case brought by a former student, Joseph Frederick. The former student unfurled a banner at a school sponsored event saying "Bong Hits 4 Jesus" as the Olympic torch was passing through Juneau, prior to arriving in Salt Lake City, Utah, for the 2002 Winter Olympics. The board decided to suspend the student. The student then sued and won at the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit, which stated that the board violated the student's first amendment right to free speech.    On August 28, 2006, Starr filed a writ of certiorari for a hearing with the Supreme Court.    On June 21, 2007, in an opinion authored by Chief Justice John G. Roberts, the Court ruled in favor of Starr's client, finding that "a principal may, consistent with the First Amendment, restrict student speech at a school event, when that speech is reasonably viewed as promoting illegal drug use".   
Blackwater Security Consulting v. Nordan (No. 06-857)Starr continues to represent Blackwater in a case involving the deaths of four unarmed civilians killed by Blackwater contractors in Fallujah, Iraq, in March 2004.   
California Proposition 8 post-election lawsuits 
On December 19, 2008, Proposition 8 supporters named Starr to represent them in post-election lawsuits to be heard by the Supreme Court of California. Opponents of the measure sought to overturn it as a violation of fundamental rights, while supporters sought to invalidate the 18,000 same-sex marriages performed in the state before Proposition 8 passed.    Oral arguments took place on March 5, 2009, in San Francisco.Starr argued that "Prop. 8 was a modest measure that left the rights of same-sex couples undisturbed under California's domestic-partner laws and other statutes banning discrimination based on sexual orientation", to the agreement of most of the judges.    The main issue that arose during the oral argument included the meaning of the word "inalienable", and to which extent this word goes when used in Article I of the Californian Constitution. Christopher Krueger of the attorney general's office said that inalienable rights may not be stripped away by the initiative process. Starr countered that "rights are important, but they don't go to structure...rights are ultimately defined by the people". The court ultimately held that the measure was valid and effective, but would not be applied retroactively to marriages performed prior to its enactment.
Defense of Jeffrey EpsteinIn 2007 Starr joined the legal team of Palm Beach millionaire Jeffrey Epstein, who was criminally accused of the statutory rape of numerous underaged high school students.  Epstein would later plea bargain to plead guilty to several charges of soliciting prostitutes and serve 13 months in a private wing of the Palm Beach jail.  [1]
President of Baylor UniversityStarr was Louise L. Morrison Professor of Constitutional Law at Pepperdine University, when on February 15, 2010, Baylor University announced that it would introduce Starr as its newest president.  Starr became Baylor's 14th president, replacing John Lilley who was ousted in mid‑2008 (interim presidents are not counted in the list of Baylor's presidents).    Starr was introduced as the new president on June 1, 2010. The official inauguration of Ken Starr as the 14th president of Baylor University was held Friday, September 17, 2010, where Stephen L. Carter was the keynote speaker. 
Within his first two weeks at the helm, Starr was immediately plunged into "leading the charge" to keep the university in the Big 12 Conference for athletics. 
Published works

 


See also 

George H. W. Bush Supreme Court candidates
List of law clerks of the Supreme Court of the United States


References 
Bibliography

Clinton, Bill (2005). My Life. Vintage. ISBN 1-4000-3003-X.
Conason, Joe and Lyons, Gene (2000). The Hunting of the President. Thomas Dunne Books. ISBN 0-312-27319-3.
Greenburg, Jan Crawford (2006). Supreme Conflict: The Inside Story of the Struggle for Control of the United States Supreme Court. Penguin Books, ISBN 978-1-59420-101-0 .
Schmidt, Susan and Weisskopf, Michael (2000). Truth at Any Cost: Ken Starr and the Unmaking of Bill Clinton. HarperCollins Publishers. ISBN 0-06-019485-5.


External links

Office of the President at Baylor University
Profile at the U.S. Department of Justice
 
Cases argued before the Supreme Court at Oyez.org
Lobbyist record (2001-2002) at OpenSecrets.org
Faculty profile at Pepperdine 
Starr, in New Role, Gives Hope to a Needy Death Row Inmate, Donna St. George, The Washington Post, March 14, 2005
2008 Interview with Kenneth Starr on hossli.com

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
  
DEFAULTSORT























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Marie de France
 
 

Marie de France ("Mary of France") was a medieval poet who was probably born in France and lived in England during the late 12th century. She lived and wrote at an undisclosed court, but was almost certainly at least known about at the royal court of King Henry II of England. Virtually nothing is known of her life; both her given name and its geographical specification come from her manuscripts, though one contemporary reference to her work and popularity remains.Marie de France wrote a form of Anglo-Norman French, and was evidently proficient in Latin and English as well. She is the author of the Lais of Marie de France. She translated Aesop's Fables from Middle English into Anglo-Norman French and wrote Espurgatoire seint Partiz, Legend of the Purgatory of St. Patrick, based upon a Latin text. Recently she has been (tentatively) identified as the author of a saint's life, The Life of Saint Audrey. Her Lais in particular were and still are widely read, and influenced the subsequent development of the romance genre.
Life and worksThe actual name of the author known to us as Marie de France is unknown; she has acquired this nom de plume from a line in one of her published works: "Marie ai num, si sui de France," which translates as "My name is Marie, and I am from France."  Some of the most commonly-proposed suggestions for the identity of this twelfth century poet are: Marie, Abbess of Shaftesbury and half-sister to Henry II, King of England; Marie, Abbess of Reading; Marie I of Boulogne;  Marie, Abbess of Barking;   and Marie de Meulan, wife of Hugh Talbot.   Four works, or collections of works, have been attributed to Marie de France. She is principally known for her authorship of The Lais of Marie de France, a collection of twelve narrative poems, mostly of a few hundred lines each. She claims in the preambles to most of these Breton lais that she has heard the stories they contain from Breton minstrels, and it is in the opening lines of the poem Guigemar that she first reveals her name to be Marie. One hundred and two "Ysopet" fables have also been attributed to her, in addition to a retelling of the Legend of the Purgatory of St. Patrick and recently, a saint's life called La Vie seinte Audree about Saint Audrey of Ely.Scholars have dated Marie's works to between about 1160 and 1215, these being the earliest and latest possible dates respectively. It is probable that the Lais were written in the late twelfth century; they are dedicated to a "noble king", usually assumed to be Henry II of England, or possibly his eldest son, Henry the Young King. Another of her works, the Fables, is dedicated to a "Count William", who may have been either William of Mandeville or William Marshall. However, it has also been suggested that Count William may refer to William Longsword. Longsword was a recognized illegitimate son of Henry II. If Marie was actually Henry II's half-sister, a dedication to his son, and therefore her nephew, might be understandable. It is likely that Marie de France was known at the court of King Henry II and his wife, Eleanor of Aquitaine. Burgess, Glyn S., and Busby, Keith, 1986.  A contemporary of Marie, the English poet Denis Piramus, mentions in his Life of Saint Edmund the King, written in around 1180, the lais of a Marie which were popular in aristocratic circles. She was first given the name Marie de France by the French scholar Claude Fauchet in 1551, in his Recueil de l'origine de la langue et poesie françoise, and this name has been used ever since. The presence of an Anglo-Norman dialect in her writings and the survival of many of her texts in England "suggest that she lived in England during her adult life," but that she was born in France, possibly in Brittany.    The signification of the phrase "si sui de France", however, is ambiguous and equivocal when applied to the 12th century. France was a word used to signify Paris and Île-de-France when used on the continent. Marie may possibly not have stated that she was from France if she was originally from a region governed by Henry II such as Brittany, Normandy, Anjou or Aquitaine, unless she had been thoroughly anglicized.It is even possible that when Marie says that she comes from France in the Fables, she means that she lives in Île-de-France and that this is where she is writing, perhaps on the borders of Normandy, with a broad readership and audience in mind. Hazell, Dinah, 2003. Rethinking Marie. Medieval Forum Volume 2.  Three of the five surviving manuscript copies of the Lais are written in continental French and British Library MS Harley 978, written in Anglo-Norman French in the mid-thirteenth century, may reflect the dialect of the copiest. 
Breton lais 
Breton lais were certainly in existence before Marie de France chose to recast the themes she heard from Breton minstrels into poetic narratives in Anglo-Norman verse, but she may have been the first to present a "new genre of the lai in narrative form."  The lais of Marie de France had a huge impact on the literary world.  They were considered a new type of literary technique derived from classical rhetoric and imbued with such detail that they became a new form of art. Marie may have filled her detailed poems with imagery so that her audience would easily remember them. Her lais range in length from 118 (Chevrefoil) to 1,184 lines (Eliduc),  frequently describe courtly love entangled in love triangles involving loss and adventure, and "often take up aspects of the merveilleux, and at times intrusions from the fairy world." Whalen, Logan E, p 62  The setting for Marie's lais is the Celtic world, embracing England, Wales, Ireland, Brittany and Normandy  Only five manuscripts containing some or all of Marie’s lais now exist, and the only one to include the general prologue and all twelve lais is British Library MS Harley 978. This may be contrasted with the twenty-five manuscripts with Marie's Fables, perhaps reflecting their relative popularity in the late Middle Ages. Nevertheless, Marie's lais have received much more critical attention in recent times.
LoveIn most of Marie de France’s Lais, love is associated with suffering and over half of them involve an adulterous relationship.   In Bisclavret and Equitan, the adulterous lovers are severely condemned but there is evidence that Marie approved of extramarital affairs under certain circumstances: "When the deceived partner has been cruel and merits deception and when the lovers are loyal to one another.”  In Marie's Lais, "love always involves suffering and frequently ends in grief, even when the love itself is approved.” Marie's lovers are usually isolated and relatively unconcerned with anything outside the immediate cause of their distress, whether it be a jealous husband or an envious society. However, "the means of overcoming this suffering is beautifully and subtly illustrated.” Burgess, Glyn S., and Busby, Keith, 1986, p 31.  "Marie concentrates on the individuality of her characters and is not very concerned with their integration into society. If society does not appreciate the lovers, then the lovers die or abandon society, and society is the poorer for it.” 
Defying Church traditionsMarie de France’s lais not only portray a gloomy outlook on love, they also defied the traditions of love within the Church at the time. She wrote about adulterous affairs, women of high stature who seduce other men, women seeking escape from a loveless marriage, often to an older man, which gave the idea that women can have sexual freedom. She wrote lais, many of which seemed to endorse sentiments that were contrary to the traditions of the Church, and especially the idea of virginal love and marriage. The lais also exhibit the idea of a stronger female role and power. In this, she may have inherited ideas and norms from the troubadour love songs that were common at the Angevin courts of England, Aquitaine, Anjou and Brittany; songs in which the heroine "is a contradictory symbol of power and inarticulacy; she is at once acutely vulnerable and emotionally overwhelming, irrelevant and central."  Marie's heroines are often the instigators of events, but events that often end in suffering.The heroines in Marie's Lais are often imprisoned. This imprisonment may take the form of actual incarceration by elderly husbands, as in Yonec, and in Guigemar where the lady who becomes Guigemar's lover is kept behind the walls of a castle which faces the sea, or "merely of close surveillance, as in Laustic, where the husband, who keeps a close watch on his wife when he is present, has her watched equally closely when he is away from home.”  Perhaps this reflects some experience within her own life.  The willingness to endorse such thoughts as adultery in the twelfth century is perhaps remarkable. “It certainly reminds us that people in the Middle Ages were aware of social injustices and did not just accept oppressive conditions as inevitable by the will of God”. In addition to her defying the construct of love exhibited by the contemporary Church, Marie also influenced a genre that continued to be popular for another three hundred years – the medieval romance. By the time Marie was writing her lais, France already had a deep-rooted tradition of the love-lyric, specifically in Provence. Marie's Lais represent, in many ways, a transitional genre between Provençal love-lyrics from an earlier time and the romance tradition that developed these themes. 
Love within the lais
LanvalThe lai of Lanval typifies the form of the lai, which relates only a (relatively) small period in the life of the hero or heroine, usually a time of crisis, unlike a true medieval romance, which is in effect a biography, spanning the hero's entire life.  Lanval is a poor knight at King Arthur's court – demonstrating, incidentally, that King Arthur's world was one that Marie was willing to embrace. Relaxing in a meadow one day, reflecting upon his destitution, Lanval is approached by two maidens who lead him to their mistress, who declares her love for him. Her Otherworldly nature is revealed not only by his passage to the Isle of Avalon with her in the closing phrases of the lai, but in the magically limitless riches she showers him with, although no one can see her when she is with him and he must never reveal her existence. Queen Guinevere tries to seduce Lanval one day, but when she is rebuffed, she hurls spiteful accusations back at Lanval which cause him to mention his lady and, unsurprisingly, the fairy queen fails to appear. He is left to face trial alone once more, until his final rescue.Marie may pose the question whether Lanval is guilty or not, Burgess, Glyn S., and Busby, Keith, 1986, p 28.  but although she does not provide explicit answers, Guinevere's desires are placed in a very unfavourable light: “Good girls are the ones who have submerged their own desire in order to create socially effective simulacra of the desires of men.”  The Queen is vilified because she went after the love that she desired, but it is not only she who suffers. The lai is also concerned with female power, in the form of the fairy queen who saves Lanval.  However, even the fairy queen does not play a completely feminist role. The fairy queen gives Lanval the means of “satisfying not only his needs for erotic satisfaction and sustenance appropriate to a nobleman, but allowing him to fulfill his chivalric spirit in generosity of a public, indeed kingly sort, giving hospitality, patronage, and rich gifts to all” 
Chevrefoil, Yonec and LausticIn Chevrefoil, we are shown a forbidden, passionate love. In this lai, "the choice of a Tristanian subject and the explicit statement at the beginning of the poem make the symbol of the intertwining plants one of the inevitable union of the lovers in death." "Chevrefoil, Yonec and Laustic all deal with the subject of extra-marital love, and they all incorporate one of Marie's recurring themes, that of an unmarried lover and an unhappily married lady; and in none of the three does Marie give an indication of disapproving of this state of affairs." 
Other laisIn Equitan, Bisclavret and Chevrefoil, greed is the cause of suffering. In Laustic and Chevrefoil, love ultimately fails to reach its goal. In Guigemar and Lanval, strength of love wins out in the end and a happy outcome is achieved. In Deus Amanz, Yonec, and Milun, the suffering is rewarded, though not happily. Eliduc sees the wife of the lover overcome by the sight of her rival lying on a slab and renounces her marriage, becomes a nun and Eliduc marries his sweetheart, miraculously revived; although he then becomes a monk himself and sends his new wife to becone a nun with the old. Marie de France gives no universal answers, but determines the outcome of each lai on its merits. 
Influence on LiteratureMarie’s stories exhibit a form of lyrical poetry that influenced the way that narrative poetry was subsequently composed, adding another dimension to the narration through her prologues and the epilogues, for example. She also developed three parts to a narrative lai: aventure (the ancient Breton deed or story); lai (Breton melodies); conte (recounting the story narrated by the lai). In the late-fourteenth century, at broadly the same time that Geoffrey Chaucer included The Franklin's Tale, itself a Breton lai, in his Canterbury Tales,  a poet named Thomas Chestre composed a Middle English romance based directly upon Marie de France's Lanval, a poem which, perhaps predictably, spanned much more now than a few weeks of the hero's life, a knight named Sir Launfal. In 1816, the English poet Matilda Betham wrote a long poem about Marie de France in octosyllabic couplets, The Lay of Marie.
See also

Tristan and Iseult


References 
Bibliography

Blain, Virginia, et al. "Marie de France," The Feminist Companion to Literature in English (Yale UP, 1990, 714).
Bloch, R. Howard. The Anonymous Marie de France. Chicago: U. of Chicago Press, 2003.
Brown, Mary Ellen, et al. Encyclopedia of Folklore and Literature. Santa Barbara: ABC-CLIO, 1998. Print.
Burgess, Glyn Sheridan, and Keith Busby, 1986. The Lais of Marie de France. Translated into Modern English prose with an introduction. Penguin Books Limited.
 
Butterfield, Ardis, 2009. England and France. In: Brown, Peter (Ed), 2009. A Companion to Medieval English Literature and Culture c.1350–c.1500. Wiley-Blackwell. Part IV: Encounters with Other Cultures, pp 199–214.
Calabrese, Michael, 2007. Controlling Space and Secrets in the Lais of Marie de France. In: Place, Space, and Landscape in Medieval Narrative. Knoxville: U of Tennessee P,  pp 79–106. Rpt. in Classical and Medieval Literature Criticism. Ed. Jelena O. Krstovic. Vol. 111. Detroit: Gale, 2009. Literature Resource Center. Web. 28 Sept. 2010.
Gallagher, Edward J., ed. and trans. The Lays of Marie de France, Translated, with Introduction and Commentary. Hackett: Indianapolis, 2010.
Kibler, William W. and Grover A. Zinn. Medieval France: An Encyclopedia. New York: Garland, 1995.
Kinoshita, Sharon, Peggy McCracken. Marie de France: A Critical Companion. Woodbridge, D.S.Brewer, 2012 (Gallica).
Kunitz, Stanley J., and Vineta Colby. European Authors 1000-1900 A Biographical Dictionary of European Literature. New York: The H.W. Wilson Company. 1967. 604–5. Print.
McCash, June Hall, La Vie seinte Audree, A Fourth Text by Marie de France. Speculum (July 2002): 744-777.
Mickel, Emanuel J. Jr. Marie de France. New York: Twayne, 1974. Print.
Watt, Diane, Medieval Women's Writing: Works by and for women in England, 1100-1500. Polity, 2007. ISBN 978-0-7456-3256-8.
 <


External links 
 
 

International Marie de France Society
Le Cygne, Journal of Anglo-Norman Studies published by the International Marie de France Society
 
 
Complete bibliography of her works, including secondary literature (Archives de littérature du Moyen Âge, Arlima)
 
Roles of Women in the Middle Ages

 
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Robert Redford
 
Charles Robert Redford, Jr. (born August 18, 1936),     better known as Robert Redford, is an American actor, film director, producer, businessman, environmentalist, philanthropist, and founder of the Sundance Film Festival. He has received two Oscars: one in 1981 for directing Ordinary People, and one for Lifetime Achievement in 2002. In 2010 he was awarded French Knighthood in the Legion d'Honneur. At the height of his fame in the 1970s and 1980s, he was often described as one of the world's most attractive men and remains one of the most popular movie stars. 
Early lifeRedford was born in Santa Monica, California. His mother, Martha W. (née Hart),  was born in Texas, to Archibald Hart and Sallie Pate Green, and his father, Charles Robert Redford, Sr. (November 19, 1914 – April 2, 1991),  was a milkman-turned-accountant from Pawtucket, Rhode Island, son of Charles Elijah Redford and Lena Taylor.     He has a step-brother, Stated on Inside the Actors Studio, 2005  William, from his father's re-marriage. Redford is of English, Irish, Scottish, and Scots-Irish ancestry (his surname originates in England).    Redford's family moved to Van Nuys, California while his father worked in El Segundo. Stated on Inside the Actors Studio, 2005  He attended Van Nuys High School, where he was classmates with baseball player Don Drysdale.  He has described himself as having been a "bad" student, finding inspiration outside the classroom, and being interested in art and sports.  He hit tennis balls with Pancho Gonzales at the Los Angeles Tennis Club to warm him up. After high school, he attended the University of Colorado for a year and a half,  where he was a member of the Kappa Sigma Fraternity.  While there, he worked at the restaurant/bar The Sink; a painting of his likeness is prominent in the bar's murals.  After being asked to leave the University of Colorado, he traveled in Europe, living in France, Spain, and Italy.  He later studied painting at the Pratt Institute in Brooklyn and took classes at the American Academy of Dramatic Arts in New York City. 
Career
TelevisionRedford's career — like that of almost all major stars who emerged in the 1950s — began in New York, where an actor could find work both in television and on stage.  Starting in 1959, he appeared as a guest star on numerous programs, including The Untouchables, Whispering Smith, Perry Mason, Alfred Hitchcock Presents, Route 66, Dr. Kildare, Playhouse 90, Tate, and The Twilight Zone, among others.  He earned an Emmy nomination as Best Supporting Actor for his performance in The Voice of Charlie Pont (ABC, 1962). One of his last television appearances was on October 7, 1963, on Breaking Point, an ABC medical drama about psychiatry.
TheaterRedford's Broadway debut was in a small role in Tall Story (1959), followed by parts in The Highest Tree (1959) and Sunday in New York (1961). His biggest Broadway success was as the stuffy newlywed husband of Elizabeth Ashley in Neil Simon's Barefoot in the Park (1963).
Film
While still largely an unknown, Redford made his screen debut in War Hunt (1962), co-starring with John Saxon in a film set during the last days of the Korean War.  This film also marked the debuts of director Sydney Pollack, with whom Redford would often collaborate in the near future, and actor Tom Skerritt. After his Broadway success, he was cast in larger feature roles in movies. He was cast alongside screen legend Alec Guinness in the war comedy Situation Hopeless ... But Not Serious, in which he played a soldier who has to spend years of his life hiding behind enemy lines. In Inside Daisy Clover (1965), which won him a Golden Globe for best new star, he played a bisexual movie star who marries starlet Natalie Wood, and rejoined her along with Charles Bronson for Pollack's This Property Is Condemned (1966) — again as her lover, though this time in a film which achieved even greater success. The same year saw his first teaming with Jane Fonda, in Arthur Penn's The Chase. This film marked the only time Redford would star with Marlon Brando. Fonda and Redford were paired again in the popular big screen version of Barefoot in the Park (1967)  and were again co-stars much later in Pollack's The Electric Horseman (1979).After this initial success, Redford became concerned about his blond male stereotype image  and turned down roles in Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf? and The Graduate.  Redford found the property he was looking for in George Roy Hill's Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid (1969), scripted by William Goldman, in which he was paired for the first time with Paul Newman.  The film was a huge success and made him a major bankable star,  cementing his screen image as an intelligent, reliable, sometimes sardonic good guy.Redford suffered through a few films that did not achieve box office success during this time, including Downhill Racer (1969); Tell Them Willie Boy Is Here (1969); Little Fauss and Big Halsy (1970), and The Hot Rock (1972). But his overall career was flourishing with the critical and box office hit Jeremiah Johnson (1972);  the political satire The Candidate (1972); the hugely popular period drama The Way We Were (1973); and the biggest hit of his career; the blockbuster crime caper The Sting (1973), which became one of the top 20 highest grossing movies of all time when adjusted for inflation and for which he was also nominated for an Oscar. Between 1974 and 1976, exhibitors voted Redford Hollywood's top box-office name.   His hits included The Great Gatsby (1974), The Great Waldo Pepper (1975), and Three Days of the Condor (1975). The popular and acclaimed All the President's Men (1976), directed by Alan J. Pakula and scripted once again by Goldman, was a landmark film for Redford. Not only was he the executive producer and co-star, but the film's serious subject matter — the Watergate scandal — and its attempt to create a realistic portrayal of journalism also reflected the actor's offscreen concerns for political causes. He also starred in a segment of the war film A Bridge Too Far (1977), the prison drama Brubaker (1980), playing a prison warden attempting to reform the system, and the fantasy baseball drama The Natural (1984).  Redford continued his involvement in mainstream Hollywood movies, though with a newfound focus on directing. The first film he directed, Ordinary People, which followed the disintegration of an upper class American family after the death of a son, was one of the most critically and publicly acclaimed films of the decade, winning a number of Oscars, including the Academy Award for best director for Redford himself. His followup directorial project, The Milagro Beanfield War (1987), failed to generate the same level of attention. Sydney Pollack's Out of Africa (1985), with Redford in the male lead role opposite Meryl Streep, became an enormous critical and box office success and won seven Oscars including Best Picture, proving to be Redford's biggest success of the decade and Redford and Pollack's most successful of their six movies together.  His next film, Legal Eagles (1986), was only a minor success at the box office.Redford continued as a major star throughout the 1990s and 2000s. He released his third film as a director, A River Runs Through It, in 1992, which was a return to mainstream success for Redford as a director and brought a young Brad Pitt to greater prominence. 1993 brought Redford one of his most popular and recognised roles when he starred as a millionaire businessman who tests people's morals through bribery in Indecent Proposal, which became one of the year's biggest hits. He co-starred with Michelle Pfeiffer in the newsroom romance Up Close & Personal (1996), and with Kristin Scott Thomas in The Horse Whisperer (1998), which he also directed.  Redford also continued work in films with political context, such as Havana (1990), playing Jack Weil, a professional gambler in 1959 Cuba during the Revolution, as well as Sneakers (1992), in which he co starred with the late River Phoenix among others.He appeared as a disgraced Army general sent to prison in the political thriller The Last Castle (2001), directed by Rod Lurie, someone else with a strong interest in politics. In the same year, Redford reteamed with Brad Pitt for Spy Game, another success for the pair but with Redford switching this time from director to actor. Redford, a leading environmental activist, narrated the IMAX documentary Sacred Planet (2004), a sweeping journey across the globe to some of its most exotic and endangered places. In The Clearing (2004), a thriller co-starring Helen Mirren, Redford was a successful businessman whose kidnapping unearths the secrets and inadequacies that led to his achieving the American Dream.Redford stepped back into producing with The Motorcycle Diaries (2004), a coming-of-age road film about a young medical student, Ernesto "Che" Guevera, and his friend Alberto Granado.  It also explored political and social issues of South America that influenced Guevara and shaped his future.  With five years spent in the film's making, Redford was credited by director Walter Salles for being instrumental in getting it made and released.Back in front of the camera, Redford received good notices for his role in director Lasse Hallstrom's An Unfinished Life (2005) as a cantankerous rancher who is forced to take in his estranged daughter-in-law (Jennifer Lopez) — whom he blames for his son's death — and the granddaughter he never knew he had when they fled an abusive relationship.  The film, which sat on the shelf for many months while its distributor Miramax was restructured, was generally dismissed as clichéd and overly sentimental. Meanwhile, Redford returned to familiar territory when he reteamed with Meryl Streep 22 years after they starred in Out of Africa, for his personal project Lions for Lambs (2007), which also starred fellow superstar Tom Cruise. After a great deal of hype, the film opened to mixed reviews and disappointing box office. Redford more recently signed on to direct and star in an update of The Candidate. Redford appears in the 2011 documentary Buck, where he discusses his experiences with title subject Buck Brannaman during the production of The Horse Whisperer in 1998.
Director
Redford had long harbored ambitions to work on both sides of the camera.  As early as 1969, Redford had served as the executive producer for Downhill Racer.  His first outing as director was in 1980's Ordinary People, a drama about the slow disintegration of an upper-middle class family, for which he won the Academy Award for Best Director.  Redford was credited with obtaining a powerful dramatic performance from Mary Tyler Moore, as well as superb work from Donald Sutherland and Timothy Hutton, who also won the Oscar for Best Supporting Actor.Redford did not direct again until The Milagro Beanfield War (1988), a well-crafted, though not commercially successful, screen version of John Nichols' acclaimed novel of the Southwest. The Milagro Beanfield War is the story of the people of Milagro, New Mexico (based on the real town of Truchas in northern New Mexico), overcoming big developers who set about to ruin their community and force them out because of tax increases.  Other directorial projects have included the period drama A River Runs Through It (1992), based on Norman Maclean's novella, and the exposé Quiz Show (1994), about the quiz show scandal of the late 1950s.  In the latter film, Redford worked from a screenplay by Paul Attanasio with noted cinematographer Michael Ballhaus and a strong cast that featured Paul Scofield, John Turturro, Rob Morrow, and Ralph Fiennes. Redford handpicked Morrow for his part in the film (Morrow's only high-profile feature film role to date), because he liked his work on Northern Exposure.  Redford also directed Matt Damon and Will Smith in The Legend of Bagger Vance (2000). In 2010, Redford released The Conspirator, a period drama revolving around the assassination of Abraham Lincoln. Despite a subject matter of personal interest to Redford, the film received mixed reviews and proved to be a flop at the box office.
Honors
Redford attended the University of Colorado in the 1950s and received an Honorary Degree in 1983.In 1995, he received an honorary Doctor of Humane Letters degree from Bard College. He was a 2002 Lifetime Achievement Award/Honorary Oscar recipient at the 74th Academy Awards. In 1996, he was awarded the National Medal of Arts. In December 2005, he received the Kennedy Center Honors for his contributions to American culture. The Honors recipients are recognized for their lifetime contributions to American culture through the performing arts: whether in dance, music, theater, opera, motion pictures or television. In 2008 he was awarded The Dorothy and Lillian Gish Prize, one of the richest prizes in the arts, given annually to "a man or woman who has made an outstanding contribution to the beauty of the world and to mankind's enjoyment and understanding of life." The University of Southern California (USC) School of Theater announced the first annual Robert Redford Award for Engaged Artists in 2009.  According to the school's web site, the award was created "to honor those who have distinguished themselves not only in the exemplary quality, skill and innovation of their work, but also in their public commitment to social responsibility, to increasing awareness of global issues and events, and to inspiring and empowering young people." Robert Redford received an honorary Doctor of Fine Arts from Brown University at the 240th Commencement exercises on May 25, 2008.   He also spoke during the ceremonies.On 14 October 2010, he was appointed Chevalier of the Légion d'honneur. 
SundanceWith the financial proceeds of his acting success, starting with his salaries from Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid and Downhill Racer, Redford bought an entire ski area on the east side of Mount Timpanogos northeast of Provo, Utah, called "Timp Haven", which was renamed "Sundance".  Redford's wife Lola was from Utah and they had built a home in the area in 1963. Portions of the movie Jeremiah Johnson (1972), a film which is both one of Redford's favorites and one that has heavily influenced him, were shot near the ski area. He founded the Sundance Film Festival, Sundance Institute, Sundance Cinemas, Sundance Catalog, and the Sundance Channel, all in and around Park City, Utah, 30 miles (48 km) north of the Sundance ski area.   The Sundance Film Festival caters to independent filmmakers in the United States and has received recognition from the industry as a place to open films. In 2008, Sundance exhibited 125 feature-length films from 34 countries, with more than 50,000 attendees.  The name Sundance comes from his Sundance Kid character.  In addition, Redford owns a celebrated restaurant called Zoom, located on Main Street in the former mining town of Park City.
 
 
Independent filmsSince founding the nonprofit Sundance Institute in Park City, in 1981, Redford has been deeply involved with independent film.  Through its various workshop programs and popular film festival, Sundance has provided much-needed support for independent filmmakers. In 1995, Redford signed a deal with Showtime to start a 24-hour cable television channel devoted to airing independent films. The Sundance Channel premiered on February 29, 1996.
Personal lifeOn August 9, 1958, in Las Vegas, Nevada, Redford married Lola Van Wagenen, who dropped out of college to marry him.  They had four children: Scott Anthony, David James "Jamie", Shauna, and Amy Redford. Son Jamie Redford is a writer/producer. Scott — their first child — was born September 1, 1959, and died of sudden infant death syndrome on November 17, 1959, at age 2½ months. His remains have been buried at Provo City Cemetery in Provo, Utah. Lola and Redford divorced in 1985. He has five grandchildren: Dylan and Lena Redford (of son Jamie), Mica and Conor Schlosser (of daughter Shauna) and Eden August (of daughter Amy). In July 2009, Redford married his longtime partner, Sibylle Szaggars, at the luxurious Louis C. Jacob Hotel in Hamburg, Germany. She had moved in with Redford in the 1990s and shares his Sundance, Utah, home.  In May 2011 Alfred A Knopf published Robert Redford: The Biography by Michael Feeney Callan, written over fifteen years with Redford's input, and drawn from his personal papers and diaries.
Political activity
Redford is politically liberal, and has supported environmentalism, Native American rights, and the arts. He has been noted as "an admirer of Edward Abbey, the late great anarchist voice of the desert Southwest."  Most of his federal political contributions have been to Democrats (61%) or advocacy groups (34.6%), such as the Political Action Committee of the Directors Guild of America. Robert Redford's Federal campaign contributions. Newsmeat.com  Redford has on occasion also supported Republicans, including Brent Cornell Morris in his unsuccessful 1990 race for Utah's 3rd congressional district seat.   Redford also supported Gary R. Herbert, another Republican and a friend, in Herbert's successful campaign to be elected Utah's Lieutenant Governor (he is currently the Governor of Utah). Redford is an avid environmentalist and is a trustee of the Natural Resources Defense Council.  Redford has been a vocal critic of Barack Obama for his lack of follow-through on environmental policies.  He wrote, "One reason I supported President Obama is because he said we must protect clean air, water and lands. But what good is it to say the right thing unless you act on it?" 
Filmography
Actor

Year  Title  Role Notes 
1960 Tall Story Basketball Player 
1962 The Twilight Zone Death 1 episode: "Nothing in the Dark" 
1962 War Hunt Private Roy Loomis  
1967 Clambake Azu  
1965 Inside Daisy Clover Wade Lewis Golden Globe Award for New Star of the Year – Actor  
1965 Situation Hopeless ... But Not Serious Captain Hank Wilson  
1966 This Property Is Condemned Owen Legate  
1966 The Chase Charlie 'Bubber' Reeves  
1967 Barefoot in the Park Paul Bratter  
1969 Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid The Sundance Kid BAFTA Award for Best Actor in a Leading Role  
1969 Tell Them Willie Boy Is Here Deputy Sheriff Christopher 'Coop' Cooper BAFTA Award for Best Actor in a Leading Role  
1969 Downhill Racer David Chappellet BAFTA Award for Best Actor in a Leading Role  
1970 Little Fauss and Big Halsy Halsy Knox  
1972 Jeremiah Johnson Jeremiah Johnson  
1972 The Candidate Bill McKay  
1972 The Hot Rock John Archibald Dortmunder  
1973 The Sting Johnny Hooker Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actor 
1973 The Way We Were Hubbell Gardiner  
1974 The Great Gatsby Jay Gatsby  
1975 Three Days of the Condor Joseph Turner/The Condor  
1975 The Great Waldo Pepper Waldo Pepper  
1976 All the President's Men Bob Woodward  
1977 A Bridge Too Far Major Julian Cook  
1979 The Electric Horseman Norman 'Sonny' Steele  
1980 Brubaker Henry Brubaker  
1984 The Natural Roy Hobbs  
1985 Out of Africa Denys Finch Hatton  
1986 Legal Eagles Tom Logan  
1990 Havana Jack Weil  
1992 Sneakers Martin "Marty" Bishop  
1992 Incident at Oglala Narrator  
1993 Indecent Proposal John Gage  
1993 La Classe américaine Steven  
1996 Up Close & Personal Warren Justice  
1998 The Horse Whisperer Tom Booker Also Producer/Director 
2001 Spy Game Nathan D. Muir  
2001 The Last Castle Lt. Gen. Eugene Irwin  
2004 The Clearing Wayne Hayes  
2005 An Unfinished Life Einar Gilkyson  
2007 Lions for Lambs Dr. Stephen Malley Also Producer/Director 
2012 The Company You Keep Jim Grant/Jason Sinai  Also Producer/Director 
TBD All Is Lost   

Director

Year Title Notes 
1980 Ordinary People Academy Award for Best Director Directors Guild of America Award for Outstanding Directing – Feature Film Golden Globe Award for Best Director 
1988 The Milagro Beanfield War Nominated — Political Film Society 
1992 A River Runs Through It Nominated — Golden Globe Award for Best Director 
1994 Quiz Show Nominated — Academy Award for Best Director Nominated — BAFTA Award for Best Film Nominated — Directors Guild of America Award for Outstanding Directing – Feature Film Nominated — Golden Globe Award for Best Director 
1998 The Horse Whisperer Nominated — Golden Globe Award for Best Director 
2000 The Legend of Bagger Vance  
2007 Lions for Lambs  
2010 The Conspirator  
2012 The Company You Keep  

Narrator

Year Title Notes 
1970 The Making of Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid documentary 
1971 The Language And The Music Of The Wolves project of The Natural History Magazine (TONSIL RECORDS) 
1974 Following the Tundra Wolf documentary 
1975 Broken Treaty at Battle Mountain documentary 
1977 The Predators documentary 
1983 The Sun Dagger documentary 
1988 Audubon Video: Grizzly and Man - Uneasy Truce documentary 
1986 Audubon Video: California Condor documentary 
1989 Changing Steps documentary 
1989 To Protect Mother Earth documentary 
1990 American Experience: Yosemite - The Fate of Heaven documentary 
1992 A River Runs Through It also Director/Producer 
1992 Incident At Oglala documentary 
1999 Mountain Climbing: Free Climb documentary 
1997 Wallace Stegner: A Writer's Life documentary 
1999 The Mystery of Chaco Canyon documentary 
2004 Sacred Planet  
2006 Charlotte's Web dubbing voice of Ike the horse 
2006 Cosmic Collisions documentary 
2006 Jean-Michel Cousteau: Ocean Adventures narrated two episodes 
2008 Fighting Goliath: Texas Coal Wars documentary 
2008 Grand Canyon Adventure: River at Risk documentary on the Colorado river 
2009 Saving The Bay documentary on the San Francisco Bay 
2010 Stories From The Gulf documentary project of NRDC 
2012 The Movement: One Man Joins An Uprising project of the Make A Hero organization 

References 

External links 
 

Movie, Museum Exhibits Shine New Light on US Civil War is an April 2011 radio and internet report on the Robert Redford movie "The Conspirator." The report aired on Voice of America and was written by VOA's Special English branch.
Redford interviewed about his life, independent film making and political activism. January 2010, 45 minute video and audio interview with transcript.
Cinema Retro covers Robert Redford at Trinity College in [[Dublin]]
 
Sundance Resort
The Sundance Institute
Robert Redford slideshow at AMCtv.com
Redford Teams up to Train Minority Filmmakers NY Daily News, May 15, 2009
Robert Redford: Through the Years — slideshow by Life magazine
Redford: The Biography by Michael Feeney Callan (Knopf, 2011)
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	James Francis Edward Stuart
 
 
James Francis Edward, Prince of Wales (James Francis Edward Stuart; the Chevalier de St George or "The Old Pretender" or "The Old Chevalier"; 10 June 1688 – 1 January 1766) was the son of the deposed James II of England (James VII of Scotland). As such, he claimed the English, Scottish and Irish thrones (as James III of England and Ireland and James VIII of Scotland) from the death of his father in 1701, when he was recognized as king of England, Scotland and Ireland by his cousin Louis XIV of France. Following his death in 1766 he was succeeded by his son Charles Edward Stuart in the Jacobite Succession. Had his father not been deposed, there would have been only two monarchs during his lifetime; his father and himself. In reality there were six; the last three Stuarts and the first three Hanoverians. Although the ruling, Protestant, Stuarts died out with his half-sister, Queen Anne, the very last remaining Stuarts were James and his sons, and their endeavours to regain their (putatively) rightful throne whilst remaining devoted to their Catholic faith is remembered in history as Jacobitism.
Birth and childhood 

From the moment of his birth, on 10 June 1688, at St. James's Palace, the prince was the subject of controversy.  He was born to the reigning king, James II of England (and VII of Scotland), and his Roman Catholic second wife, Mary of Modena, and as such was automatically Duke of Cornwall and Duke of Rothesay among other titles.The Wars of Religion were fresh in the minds of the populace, and many British feared a revived Catholic dominance of the government.  James II had two adult daughters from his first marriage, the future queens Princess Mary and Princess Anne, who had been raised as Protestants.  As long as there was a possibility of one of them succeeding him, his opponents saw his rule as only a temporary aberration.  When people began to fear that James's second wife, Mary, would produce a Catholic son and heir, a movement grew to replace him with his elder daughter Princess Mary and his son-in-law/nephew, William of Orange.When the young prince was born, rumours immediately began to spread that he was an impostor baby, smuggled into the royal birth chamber in a warming pan. The true child of James and Mary was allegedly stillborn.  On 10 December, within six months of his birth, Mary of Modena took baby James to France, worried about his safety, while his father continued to fight (unsuccessfully) to retain his crown.  James and his sister Louisa Maria, were brought up in France.  There, James was recognised by his cousin, King Louis XIV of France, as the rightful heir to the English and Scottish thrones and became the focus for the Jacobite movement. 
Struggle for the throne 
On his father's death in 1701, James declared himself King, as King James III of England and VIII of Scotland and was recognised as such by France, Spain, the Papal States and Modena. These states refused to recognise William III, Mary II or Queen Anne as legitimate sovereigns. As a result of his claiming his father's lost thrones, James was attainted for treason in London on 2 March 1702, and his titles were forfeited under English law. 
Jacobite risingHaving been delayed in France by an attack of measles, James attempted an invasion, trying to land at the Firth of Forth on 23 March 1708. His French ships were intercepted by the fleet of Admiral Sir George Byng. In spite of James' tearful pleas, the French admiral refused to let him go ashore, choosing to retreat rather than risk a naval battle.Had he renounced his Roman Catholic faith, James might have strengthened the existing support of Tory, pro-Restoration, forces in England,  but he refused to do so.  As a result, in 1714, a German-speaking Protestant became King of the recently created Kingdom of Great Britain — George I.In 1713, the War of the Spanish Succession ended indecisively.  Although the French forces and allies (of which Spain was one) were in complete control of Spain itself, they failed to retake the Spanish Crown's other European territories. Louis XIV of France accepted peace with Great Britain and her allies. He signed the Treaty of Utrecht, in 1713, that, amongst other conditions, required him to expel James from France.
The Fifteen
In the following year, the Jacobites started "The 'Fifteen" Jacobite rising in Scotland, aimed at putting "James III and VIII" on the throne. In 1715, James finally set foot on Scottish soil, following the indecisive Battle of Sheriffmuir, but was disappointed by the strength of support he found. Timid and clearly uncomfortable with crowds, James failed to establish himself as a credible leader. He soon fell ill with fever, his illness made more severe by the icy Scottish winter. Instead of going through with plans for a coronation at Scone, he returned to France, sailing from Montrose. He was not welcomed back, because his patron, Louis XIV, was dead and the government found him a political embarrassment.
Life as PretenderPope Clement XI offered James the Palazzo Muti in Rome as his residence, and he accepted. Innocent XIII, like his predecessor, showed much support. Thanks to the mediation of a close friend of his, Cardinal Filippo Antonio Gualterio, James was granted a life annuity of eight thousand Roman scudi. Such help enabled him to organise a Roman Jacobite court, where he lived in splendor yet continued to suffer from fits of melancholy and depression. As the years passed, young "Roving Jamie" grew increasingly feeble and despondent, taking on the appearance and behavior of a much older man. The nickname "Old Mr. Misfortunate" reflected both his sad demeanor and the disappointment of his hopes. Nevertheless, he remained well treated in Rome until the end of his life. The Pope's cousin, Francesco Maria Conti of Siena, was the Gentiluomo di camera (Chamberlain).
MarriageLouise Adélaïde d'Orléans (Mademoiselle d'Orléans), daughter of Philippe II, Duke of Orléans, was at one time suggested as a wife for James Francis Edward Stuart, but nothing came of it.On 3 September 1719, James Francis Edward Stuart married Maria Clementina Sobieska (1702–35), granddaughter of  King John III Sobieski of Poland (and sister of Maria Karolina Sobieska). The wedding was held in  the 
in the chapel of the Episcopal Palace in Montefiascone (near Viterbo).They had two sons:

Charles Edward Stuart (31 December 1720 – 31 January 1788), nicknamed "Bonnie Prince Charlie"
Henry Benedict Stuart (11 March 1725 – 13 July 1807), Cardinal of the Roman Catholic Church


Bonnie Prince CharlieFollowing James's failure, attention turned to his courageous and charismatic son Charles, "the Young Pretender", whose rebellion of 1745 came much closer to success than his father's.  With the failure of this second rebellion, however, the Stuart hopes of regaining the British throne were effectively destroyed. James and Charles later clashed repeatedly, and relations between them broke down completely when James played a role in the election of his son Henry as a Cardinal (the celibacy required meaning that Henry would not have any children and could not carry on the line of succession) infuriating Charles who had not been consulted.In 1759 the French government briefly considered a scheme to have James crowned King of Ireland, as part of their plans to Invade the British Isles but the offer was never formally made to James. Several separate plans also involved Charles being given control of a French-backed independent Ireland.
DeathJames died in Rome on 1 January 1766, and was buried in the crypt of St. Peter's Basilica at the Vatican. His burial is marked by the Monument to the Royal Stuarts.  Refusing to recognise James's eldest son Charles, from 14 January the Papacy instead accepted the Hanoverian dynasty as the legitimate rulers of Britain and Ireland. This led on to the slow reform of the anti-Catholic "Penal laws" in Britain and Ireland. In 1792 the Papacy specifically referred to George III as the King of Great Britain and Ireland, leading to a Protest from James's second son, Henry, who was then the Jacobite claimant.  James's 64 years, 3 months and 16 days as the Jacobite pretender to the thrones of England, Scotland and Ireland lasted longer than the reigns of any substituted monarch of those kingdoms or their successor states. To date, the longest serving British monarch is Queen Victoria, who reigned for 63 years, 7 months and 2 days. In order to surpass the record set by the titular James III, the current monarch Queen Elizabeth II would need to remain on the throne until at least May 23, 2016.
Titles and honours
Titles

10 June – 4 July 1688: His Royal Highness The Duke of Cornwall
4 July 1688     – 11 December 1688 : His Royal Highness The Prince of Wales
10 June 1688 - 14 March 1689: The Duke of Rothesay
11 December 1688/14 March 1689 (The dates of loss of his royal titles in England and Scotland, respectively)– 1 January 1766:      James Francis Edward Stuart
Jacobite, 11 December 1688 – 16 September 1701: His Royal Highness The Prince of Wales
Jacobite, 16 September 1701 – 1 January 1766: His Majesty The King
Jacobite, 14 March 1689 – 16 September 1701: The Duke of Rothesay
Jacobite, 16 September 1701 – 1 January 1766: His Grace The King

James's full titles before his father's deposition were: His Royal Highness The Prince James Francis Edward, Prince of Wales and Earl of Chester, Duke of Cornwall, Duke of Rothesay, Earl of Carrick, Baron of Renfrew, Lord of the Isles, Prince and Great Steward of Scotland
Honours


Jacobite, KG: Knight of the Garter, 1692–1766


ArmsAs Prince of Wales, James bore a coat of arms consisting of those of the kingdom, differenced by a label argent of three points. 
Ancestry 
  
 
See also

Monument to the Royal Stuarts
Touch Pieces The cure of Scrofula or the King's Evil
Correspondence with James the Pretender (High Treason) Act 1701 Parliament's response to his claim to the throne


Notes and sources 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT


















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	John Grisham
 
John Ray Grisham, Jr. (born February 8, 1955) John Grisham's Biography. Achievement.org. Retrieved on 2011-12-09.  is an American lawyer and author, best known for his popular legal thrillers.John Grisham graduated from Mississippi State University before attending the University of Mississippi School of Law in 1981 and practiced criminal law for about a decade. He also served in the House of Representatives in Mississippi from January 1984 to September 1990. The Encyclopedia of Arkansas History and Culture. Encyclopediaofarkansas.net. Retrieved on 2011-12-09. 
He began writing his first novel, A Time To Kill, in 1984, and it was published in June 1989.As of 2008, his books had sold over 250 million copies worldwide.  A Galaxy British Book Awards winner, Grisham is one of only three authors to sell two million copies on a first printing, the others being Tom Clancy and J.K. Rowling. Grisham's first best seller was The Firm. Released in 1991, it sold more than seven million copies.  The book was later adapted into a feature film in 1993, and a TV series in 2012 which "continues the story of attorney Mitchell McDeere and his family 10 years after the events of the film and novel."   Eight of his other novels have also been adapted into films: The Chamber, The Client, A Painted House, The Pelican Brief, Skipping Christmas, The Rainmaker, The Runaway Jury, and A Time to Kill. His books have been translated into 29 languages and published worldwide. John Grisham by Mark Flanagan. Contemporarylit.about.com (1955-02-08). Retrieved on 2011-12-09.  
Early life and educationJohn Grisham, the second oldest of five siblings, was born in Jonesboro, Arkansas, to Wanda Skidmore Grisham and John Grisham.  His father worked as a construction worker and a cotton farmer, while his mother was a homemaker.  When Grisham was four years old, his family started traveling around the South, until they finally settled in Southaven in DeSoto County, Mississippi.  As a child, Grisham wanted to be a baseball player. 
Despite the fact that Grisham's parents lacked formal education, his mother encouraged her son to read and prepare for college. He went to the Northwest Mississippi Community College in Senatobia, Mississippi and later attended Delta State University in Cleveland.  Grisham drifted so much during his time at the college that he changed colleges three times before completing a degree. 
He graduated from Mississippi State University in 1977, receiving a BS degree in accounting. He later enrolled in the University of Mississippi School of Law to become a tax lawyer, but his interest shifted to general civil litigation. He graduated in 1983 with a JD degree. 
Marriage and familyGrisham married Renee Jones on May 8, 1981, and the couple have two children together: Shea and Ty.  The "family splits their time between their Victorian home on a farm" outside Oxford, Mississippi, "and a home near Charlottesville, Virginia." In 2008, he and his wife bought a condominium at McCorkle Place in Chapel Hill, North Carolina.  He and his wife also teach in Sunday school in First Baptist Church of Oxford. 
  
Career
Before and during collegeGrisham started working for a nursery as a teenager, watering bushes for US$1.00 an hour. He was soon promoted to a fence crew for US$1.50 an hour. He wrote about the job: "there was no future in it." Grisham, John. "Boxers, Briefs and Books", The New York Times, 6 September 2010.  At 16, Grisham took a job with a plumbing contractor, but says he "never drew inspiration from that miserable work." Through a contact of his father, he managed to find work on a highway asphalt crew in Mississippi at the age of seventeen. It was during this time that an unfortunate incident got him "serious" about college. A fight had broken out among the crew on a Friday, with gunfire from which Grisham ran to the restroom to escape. He did not come out until after the police had "hauled away rednecks". He hitchhiked home and started thinking about college. His next work was in retail, as a salesclerk in a department store men's underwear section, which he described as "humiliating". He decided to quit, but stayed when he was offered a raise. He was given another raise after asking to be transferred to toys and then to appliances. A confrontation with a company spy posing as a customer convinced him to leave the store.  By this time, Grisham was halfway through college. Planning to become a tax lawyer, he was soon overcome by "the complexity and lunacy" of it. He decided to return to his hometown as a trial lawyer. 
Law and politicsGrisham practiced law for about a decade and also won election as a Democrat in the Mississippi House of Representatives from 1983 to 1990 at an annual salary of US$8,000.  Biography of John Grisham by Erin Collazo Miller. Bestsellers.about.com (1955-02-08). Retrieved on 2011-12-09.  Grisham represented the seventh district, which included DeSoto County.  By his second term at the Mississippi state legislature, he was the vice-chairman of the Apportionment and Elections Committee and a member of several other committees. Grisham's writing career blossomed with the success of his second book, The Firm, and he gave up practicing law, except for returning briefly in 1996 to fight for the family of a railroad worker who was killed on the job.  His official site states that "He was honoring a commitment made before he had retired from the law to become a full-time writer. Grisham successfully argued his clients' case, earning them a jury award of US$683,500 — the biggest verdict of his career." 
Writing careerGrisham said the big case came in 1984, but it was not his case. As he was hanging around the court, he overheard a 12-year-old girl telling the jury what had happened to her. Her story intrigued Grisham and he began watching the trial. He saw how the members of the jury cried as she told them about having been raped and beaten. It was then, Grisham later wrote in The New York Times, that a story was born.  Musing over "what would have happened if the girl's father had murdered her assailants", John Grisham's Biography. Jgrisham.com (1955-02-08). Retrieved on 2011-12-09.  Grisham took three years to complete his first book, A Time to Kill.Finding a publisher was not easy. The book was rejected by 28 publishers before Wynwood Press, an unknown publisher, agreed to give it a modest 5,000-copy printing. It was published in June 1989. John Grisham's Biography, Academy of Achievement  ''The Encyclopedia of Arkansas History and Culture''. Encyclopediaofarkansas.net. Retrieved on 2011-12-09.  The day after Grisham completed A Time to Kill, he began work on his second novel, the story of an ambitious young attorney "lured to an apparently perfect law firm that was not what it appeared."  The Firm remained on the The New York Times bestseller list for 47 weeks,  and became the bestselling novel of 1991. Beginning with A Painted House in 2001, the author broadened his focus from law to the more general rural South, but continued to write legal thrillers. He has also written sports fiction and comedy fiction.In 2005, Grisham received the Peggy V. Helmerich Distinguished Author Award.  The award is presented annually by the Tulsa Library Trust.In 2010, Grisham started writing the legal thrillers for the Young Adults group (13 to 18 years old). It featured Theodore Boone, a 13-year-old kid who gives his classmates legal advice from rescuing impounded dogs to helping their parents prevent their house from being repossessed. He said, "I'm hoping primarily to entertain and interest kids, but at the same time I'm quietly hoping that the books will inform them, in a subtle way, about law."   He also stated that it was his daughter, Shea, who inspired him to write the Theodore Boone series. "My daughter Shea is a teacher in North Carolina and when she got her fifth grade students to read the book, three or four of them came up afterwards and said they'd like to go into the legal profession."  
Named in libel suitOn September, 2007, former Pontotoc County, Oklahoma, District Attorney Bill Peterson, former Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation agent Gary Rogers, and criminalist Melvin Hett filed a civil suit for libel against Grisham and two other authors. They claimed that Grisham and the others critical of Peterson and his prosecution of murder cases conspired to commit libel and generate publicity for themselves by portraying the plaintiffs in a false light and intentionally inflicting emotional distress. Sean Murphy, "Judge dismisses libel suit against John Grisham", Huffington Post, 18 September 2008  Grisham was named due to his publication of the non-fiction book, The Innocent Man. He examined the faults in the investigation and trial of defendants in the murder of a cocktail waitress in Ada, Oklahoma, and the exoneration by DNA evidence more than 12 years later of wrongfully convicted defendants Ron Williamson and Dennis Fritz.  The judge dismissed the libel case on September 18, 2008, saying, "The wrongful convictions of Ron Williamson and Dennis Fritz must be discussed openly and with great vigor." 
John Grisham RoomThe Mississippi State University Libraries, Manuscript Division, maintains the John Grisham Room, an archive containing materials generated during the author's tenure as Mississippi State Representative and relating to his writings. Grisham's lifelong passion for baseball is expressed in his novel A Painted House and in his support of Little League activities in both Oxford, Mississippi, and Charlottesville, Virginia. He wrote the original screenplay for and produced the 2004 baseball movie Mickey, starring Harry Connick, Jr. The movie, Mickey, on IMDB.com  He remains a fan of Mississippi State University's baseball team and wrote about his ties to the university and the Left Field Lounge in the introduction for the book Dudy Noble Field: A Celebration of MSU Baseball.In an October 2006 interview on the Charlie Rose Show, Grisham stated that he usually takes only six months to write a book and that his favorite author is John le Carré.
Bibliography
Novels

A Time to Kill (1989) A Complete List of John Grisham's Books by Year. Bestsellers.about.com (2011-10-20). Retrieved on 2011-12-09. 
The Firm (1991) 
The Pelican Brief (1992) 
The Client (1993) 
The Chamber (1994) 
The Rainmaker (1995) 
The Runaway Jury (1996) 
The Partner (1997) 
The Street Lawyer (1998) 
The Testament (1999) 
The Brethren (2000) 
A Painted House †  (2001) 
Skipping Christmas †  (2001) 
The Summons (2002) 
The King of Torts (2003) 
Bleachers †  (2003) 
The Last Juror (2004) 
The Broker (2005) 
Playing for Pizza †  (2007) John Grisham Books. Jgrisham.com. Retrieved on 2011-12-09. 
The Appeal (2008) 
The Associate (2009) 
The Confession (2010) 
The Litigators (2011) 
Calico Joe †  (2012) 
The Racketeer (2012)


Theodore Boone Series

Theodore Boone: Kid Lawyer (2010) John Grisham at Fantastic Fiction 
Theodore Boone: The Abduction (2011) 
Theodore Boone: The Accused (2012) 

 †  Denotes books not in the legal genre.
Short stories

Ford County (2009) 


Non-fiction

The Wavedancer Benefit: A tribute to Frank Muller  (2002) (with Pat Conroy, Stephen King and Peter Straub)
The Innocent Man: Murder and Injustice in a Small Town (2006)


Adaptations

Feature films
The Firm (1993) John Grisham Movies. Jgrisham.com. Retrieved on 2011-12-09. 
The Pelican Brief (1993) 
The Client (1994) 
A Time to Kill (1996) 
The Chamber (1996) 
The Rainmaker (1997) 
The Gingerbread Man (1998)
A Painted House (2003) television film
Runaway Jury (2003) 
Christmas with the Kranks (2004) 



Television 
The Client (1995–1996) 1 season, 20 episodes
The Street Lawyer (2003) TV pilot
The Firm (2011–2012) 1 season, 22 episodes


See also

The Innocence Project
List of bestselling novels in the United States


References 
External links 

Official website
Official UK website
 
InnerVIEWS with Ernie Manouse: John Grisham (TV Interview)
 
Donald E. Wilkes, Jr., "Kafka (and Grisham) in Oklahoma", Flagpole Magazine, 7 February 2007, p. 9.

 
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT




















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Danielle Steel
 
Danielle Steel (born August 14, 1947) is an American novelist, currently the bestselling author alive and the fourth bestselling author of all time, with over 800 million copies sold.Based in California for most of her career, Steel has produced several books a year, often juggling up to five projects at once. All her novels have been bestsellers, including those issued in hardback.Her formula is fairly consistent, often involving rich families facing a crisis, threatened by dark elements such as jail, fraud, blackmail and suicide.Steel has also published children's fiction and poetry, as well as raising funds for the treatment of mental illness.Her books have been translated into 28 languages, with 22 adapted for television, including two that have received Golden Globe nominations. 
Early yearsSteel was born Danielle Fernandes Dominique Schuelein-Steel in New York City, the only child of Norma da Câmara Stone dos Reis and John Schulein-Steel. Her father was a German Jewish immigrant, a descendant of the founders of Löwenbräu beer. Her mother, born in Portugal, was the daughter of a diplomat.       Steel was raised Catholic and had wanted to be a nun during her early years.  She spent much of her childhood in France, 
   where from an early age she was included in her parents' dinner parties, giving her an opportunity to observe the habits and lives of the wealthy and famous.    Her parents divorced when she was eight, however, and she was raised primarily in New York City and Europe by her father, rarely seeing her mother. Steel started writing stories as a child, and by her late teens had begun writing poetry.    A graduate of the Lycée Français de New York, class of 1963,    she studied literature design and fashion design,  first at Parsons School of Design in 1963 and then at New York University from 1963–1967.   
Early careerIn 1965, when she was only 18, Steel married banker Claude-Eric Lazard.  While a young wife, and still attending New York University, Steel began writing, completing her first manuscript the following year, when she was nineteen.  After the birth of their daughter, Beatrix, in 1966, 
Steel worked for a public relations agency in New York called Supergirls for several years.  A magazine client was highly impressed with her freelance articles and encouraged her to focus on writing and suggested she write a book, which she did.  She later moved to San Francisco, and worked for Grey Advertising, as a copywriter.
Personal lifeAfter nine years of marriage and many years of separation, Steel and Lazard divorced. In 1972 her first novel, Going Home, was published. The novel contained many of the themes that her writing would become known for, including a focus on family issues and human relationships.While still married to Lazard, Steel met Danny Zugelder while interviewing an inmate in a prison near Lompoc, California, where Zugelder was also incarcerated. He moved in with Steel when he was paroled in June 1973, but returned to prison in early 1974 on robbery and rape charges. After receiving her divorce from Lazard in 1975, she married Zugelder in the prison canteen. She divorced him in 1978, but the relationship spawned Passion's Promise and Now and Forever, the two novels that launched her successful career. Steel married her third husband, William Toth, the day after her divorce from Zugelder was finalized. She was already 8  months pregnant with his child, Nicholas. With the success of her fourth book, The Promise, she became a participant in San Francisco high society while Toth, a former drug addict, was left out. They divorced in March 1981. Steel married for the fourth time in 1981, to vintner John Traina.    Traina subsequently adopted Steel's son Nick and gave him his family name. Together they had an additional five children, Samantha (April 14, 1982), Victoria (September 5, 1983), Vanessa (December 18, 1984), Maxx (February 10, 1986) and Zara (September 26, 1987).    Coincidentally, beginning with her marriage to Traina in 1981, Steel has been a near-permanent fixture on the New York Times hardcover and paperback bestsellers lists. In 1989, she was listed in the Guinness Book of World Records for having a book on the New York Times Bestseller List for the most consecutive weeks of any author—381 consecutive weeks at that time.  Since her first book was published, every one of her novels has hit bestseller lists in paperback, and each one released in hardback has also been a hardback bestseller.  During this time Steel also contributed to her first non-fiction work. Having a Baby was published in 1984 and featured a chapter by Steel about suffering through miscarriage.    The same year she also published a book of poetry, Love: Poems. Steel also ventured into children's fiction, penning a series of 10 illustrated books for young readers. These books, known as the "Max and Martha" series, aim to help children face real life problems: new baby, new school, loss of loved one, etc. In addition, Steel has authored the "Freddie" series. These four books address other real life situations: first night away from home, trip to the doctor, etc.     Determined to spend as much time as possible with her own children, Steel often wrote at night, making do with only four hours of sleep, so that she could be with her children during the day.    Steel is a prolific author, often releasing several books per year.  Each book takes 2½ years to complete,  so Steel has developed an ability to juggle up to five projects at once, researching one book while outlining another, then writing and editing additional books. 
Nicholas Traina 
In 1993 Steel sued a writer who intended to disclose in her book that her son Nick was adopted by her then-current husband John Traina, despite the fact that adoption records are sealed in California.  A San Francisco judge made a highly unusual ruling allowing the seal on Nick's adoption to be overturned, although he was still a minor. The order was confirmed by a California Appellate Judge, who ruled that because Steel was famous, her son's adoption did not have the same privacy right,  and the book was allowed to be published.   The son at the center of the lawsuits, Nicholas Traina, committed suicide in 1997 as a result of bipolar disorder.    Traina was the lead singer of San Francisco punk bands Link 80 and Knowledge. To honor his memory, Steel wrote the nonfiction book His Bright Light, about Nick's life and death. Proceeds of the book, which reached the New York Times Non-Fiction Bestseller List  were used to found the Nick Traina Foundation, which Steel runs, to fund organizations dedicated to treating mental illness.    To gain more recognition for children's mental illnesses, Steel has lobbied for legislation in Washington, and previously held a fundraiser every two years (known as The Star Ball) in San Francisco.   
1997–presentSteel married for a fifth time, to Silicon Valley financier Tom Perkins, but the marriage ended after four years in 2002.    Steel has said that her novel The Klone and I was inspired by a private joke between herself and Perkins.    In 2006, Perkins dedicated his novel Sex and the Single Zillionaire to Steel.After years of near-constant writing, in 2003 Steel opened an art gallery in San Francisco, Steel Gallery, which showed contemporary work and exhibited the paintings and sculptures of emerging artists. The gallery subsequently closed in 2007.    She continues to curate shows once or twice a year for the Andrea Schwartz Gallery in San Francisco.In 2002, Steel was decorated by the French government as an Officier of the Ordre des Arts et des Lettres, for her contributions to world culture.She has additionally received:

Induction into the California Hall of Fame, December 2009.



"Distinguished Service in Mental Health Award" (first time awarded to a non-physician) from New York Presbyterian Hospital, Department of Psychiatry and Columbia University Medical School and Cornell Medical College, May 2009.



"Outstanding Achievement Award" for work with adolescents from Larkin Street Youth Services in San Francisco, May 2003.



"Service to Youth Award" for improving the lives of mentally ill adolescents and children from the University of San Francisco Catholic Youth Organization and St. Mary's Medical Center, November 1999.



"Outstanding Achievement Award" in Mental Health from the California Psychiatric Association



"Distinguished Service Award" from the American Psychiatric Association

In 2006 Steel reached an agreement with Elizabeth Arden to launch a new perfume, Danielle by Danielle Steel.Steel's longtime residence was in San Francisco,  but she now spends most of her time at a second home in Paris.  Despite her public image and varied pursuits, Steel is known to be shy  and because of that and her desire to protect her children from the tabloids,  she rarely grants interviews or public appearances.    Her 55-room San Francisco home was built in 1913 as the mansion of sugar tycoon Adolph B. Spreckels. 
WritingSteel's novels have been translated into 28 languages and can be found in 47 countries across the globe.    The books, often described as "formulaic,"    tend to involve the characters in a crisis of some sort which threatens their relationship. Many of her characters are considered over-the-top, making her books seem less realistic.    The novels sometimes explore the world of the "rich and famous"  and frequently deal with serious life issues, like illness, death, loss, family crises, and relationships. Also,there are claims that her popular story lines are based from the events of her life like having two ex-cons ex-husbands and other events that she kept hidden from the public. Despite a reputation among critics for writing "fluff", Steel often delves into the less savory aspects of human nature, including incest, suicide, divorce, war, and even the Holocaust.  As time has progressed, Steel's writing has evolved. Her later heroines tend to be stronger and more authoritative, who, if they do not receive the level of respect and attention they desire from a man, move on to a new life.  In recent years Steel has also been willing to take more risks with her plots. Ransom focuses more on suspense than romance, and follows three sets of seemingly unconnected characters as their lives begin to intersect.    Toxic Bachelors departs from her usual style by telling the story through the eyes of the three title characters, men who are relationship phobic and ultimately discover their true loves. Steel has been criticized for making her books overly redundant and detailed,    explicitly telling the story to readers instead of showing it to them. This sometimes has the effect of making the readers feel like they are on the outside looking in rather than living the story.   To avoid comparisons to her previous novels, Steel does not write sequels.  Although many of her earliest books were released with initial print runs of 1 million copies, by 2004 her publisher had decreased the number of books initially printed to 650,000 due to the decline in people buying books. However, her fan base is still extremely strong with Steel's books selling out atop charts worldwide.     Twenty-two of her books have been adapted for television,  including two that have received Golden Globe nominations. One is Jewels, the story of the survival of a woman and her children in World War II Europe, and the family's eventual rebirth as one of the greatest jewelry houses in Europe.   Columbia Pictures was the first movie studio to offer for one of her novels, purchasing the rights to The Ghost in 1998.    Steel also reached an agreement with New Line Home Entertainment in 2005 to sell the film rights to 30 of her novels for DVDs.
Bibliography
Novels

Year  Title 
1973 Going Home 
1977 Passion's Promise 
1978 Now And Forever 
1978p The Promise 
1979 Golden Moments 
1979 Season of Passion 
1979 Summer's End 
1980 The Ring 
1981 Palomino 
1981 To Love Again 
1981 Remembrance 
1981 Loving 
1982 Once In A Lifetime 
1982 Crossings 
1983 A Perfect Stranger 
1983 Thurston House 
1983 Changes 
1984 Full Circle* 
1985 Family Album* 
1985 Secrets 
1986 Wanderlust* 
1987 Fine Things* 
1987 Kaleidoscope* 
1988 Zoya* 
1989 Star* 
1989 Daddy* 
1990 Message From Nam 
1991 Heartbeat* 
1991 No Greater Love 
1992 Jewels* 
1992 Mixed Blessings* 
1993 Vanished 
1994 Accident* 
1994 The Gift* 
1994 Wings 
1995 Lightning 
1995 Five Days In Paris* 
1996 Malice 
1996 Silent Honor* 
1997 The Ranch 
1997 Special Delivery* 
1997 The Ghost* 
1998 The Long Road Home* 
1998 The Klone and I* 
1998 His Bright Light 
1998 Mirror Image 
1999 Bittersweet* 
1999 Granny Dan 
1999 Irresistible Forces 
2000 The Wedding* 
2000 The House On Hope Street* 
2000 Journey 
2001 Lone Eagle 
2001 Leap Of Faith* 
2001 The Kiss* 
2002 The Cottage 
2002 Sunset in St. Tropez (novel) 
2002 Answered Prayers* 
2003 Dating Game 
2003 Johnny Angel* 
2003 Safe Harbour 
2004 Ransom 
2004 Second Chance 
2004 Echoes 
2005 Impossible 
2005 Miracle 
2005 Toxic Bachelors 
2006 The House* 
2006 Coming Out 
2006 H.R.H. 
2007 Sisters 
2007 Bungalow 2 
2007 Amazing Grace 
2008 Honor Thyself 
2008 Rogue 
2008 A Good Woman 
2009 One Day at a Time 
2009 Matters Of The Heart 
2009 Southern Lights 
2010 Big Girl 
2010 Family Ties 
2010 Legacy 
2011 44 Charles Street 
2011 Happy Birthday 
2011 Hotel Vendome 
2012 Betrayal 
2012 Friends Forever 


 * Denotes New York Times Number 1 Hardcover Fiction Bestseller 

Non-fiction

Love: Poems (1984)
Having a Baby (1984)
His Bright Light (1998)


Picture Books

The Happiest Hippo in the World (2009)


Children's books
Max & Martha series

Martha's New Daddy (1989)
Max and the Babysitter (1989)
Martha's Best Friend (1989)
Max's Daddy Goes to the Hospital (1989)
Max's New Baby (1989)
Martha's New School (1989)
Max Runs Away (1990)
Martha's New Puppy (1990)
Max and Grandma and Grampa Winky (1991)
Martha and Hilary and the Stranger (1991)


Freddie series

Freddie's Trip (1992)
Freddie's First Night Away (1992)
Freddie and the Doctor (1992)
Freddie's Accident (1992)


Filmography

The Promise (1979)
Now and Forever (1983)
Crossings (1986)
Kaleidoscope (1990)
Fine Things (1990)
Changes (1991)
Palomino (1991)
Daddy (1991)
Jewels (1992)
Secrets (1992)
Message from Nam (1993)
Star (1993) (TV)
Heartbeat (1993)
Family Album (1994)
A Perfect Stranger (1994)
Once in a Lifetime (1994)
Mixed Blessings (1995)
Zoya (1995)
Vanished (1995)
The Ring (1996)
Full Circle (1996)
Remembrance (1996)
No Greater Love (1996)
Safe Harbour (2007)
Hotel Vendome (2013) to be directed by Gary Fleder


See also 

List of bestselling novels in the United States
List of bestselling fiction authors


References 
External links

Official website
Official UK website
Personal website
Danielle Steel at Internet Book List
Danielle Steel at Random House Australia
An October 2000 review of His Bright Light by Dr. Jeffrey L. Geller on an American Psychiatric Association website
 
Steel Gallery
The Nick Traina Foundation
 

  
 
 DEFAULTSORT











 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Gertrude Stein
 
Gertrude Stein (February 3, 1874 – July 27, 1946) was a noted American art collector of seminal modernist paintings and an experimental writer of novels, poetry and plays, which eschewed the narrative, linear, and temporal conventions of 19th century literature.   She moved to Paris in 1903, making France her home for the remainder of her life. For some forty years, the Stein home on the Left Bank of Paris would become a renowned Saturday evening gathering place for expatriate American artists and writers, and others noteworthy in the world of vanguard arts and letters. Entre and membership in the Stein salon was a sought after validation signifying that Stein had recognized a talent worthy of inclusion into a rarefied group of gifted artists. Stein became combination mentor, critic, and guru to those who gathered around her. A self-defined "genius", she was described as an imposing figure with a commanding manner whose inordinate self-confidence could intimidate. Among her coterie she was referred to as “Le Stein” and with less laudatory deference as “The Presence.”  www.nybooks.com Kimmelman, Michael, “Missionaries,” The New York Review of Books , April 26, 2012     In 1933, Stein published the memoirs of her Paris years titled The Autobiography of Alice B. Toklas, which became a literary bestseller. The advent of this book elevated Stein from the relative obscurity of cult literary figure, into the light of mainstream attention. www.nytimes.com, Books, Mellow, James R., "The Stein Salon Was the First Museum of Modern Art," December 1, 1968, retrieved October 13, 2012 Near the end of her life Stein pronounced: "I always wanted to be historical from almost a baby on, I felt that way about it..."  
Early life
Gertrude Stein, the youngest of a family of five children, was born on February 3, 1874, in Allegheny, Pennsylvania (merged with Pittsburgh in 1907)  to upper-class German Jewish parents, Daniel and Amelia Stein. Stein’s father was a wealthy businessman with real estate holdings, and director of San Francisco street car lines, the  “Market Street Railway,” in an era when public transportation was a privately owned enterprise.  
When Stein was three years old she and her family moved to Vienna and then Paris. Accompanied by governesses and tutors, the Steins endeavored to imbue their children with the cultured sensibilities of European history and life. www.thecrimson.com, The Harvard Crimson, Albright, Alice P., "Gertrude Stein at Radcliffe: Most Brilliant Woman Student," February 18, 1959, retrieved October 15, 2012  After a four year sojourn abroad, they returned to America in 1878, settling in Oakland, California, where Stein attended First Hebrew Congregation of Oakland's Sabbath school. Rosenbaum (1987), p. 21. Her mother died in 1888 and her father in 1891. Michael Stein, the eldest brother, took over the family business holdings. He arranged for Gertrude and another sister, Bertha, to live with their mother's family in Baltimore after the deaths of their parents.  In 1892, she lived with her uncle David Bachrach.  Bachrach had married Fanny Keyser, sister of Gertrude's mother Amelia, in 1877.In Baltimore, Stein met Claribel Cone and Etta Cone, who held Saturday evening salons that she would later emulate in Paris. The Cones shared an appreciation for art and conversation about it and modeled a domestic division of labor that Stein would replicate in her relationship with Alice B. Toklas. 
Education
RadcliffeStein attended Radcliffe College, then an annex of Harvard University,  from 1893 to 1897 and was a student of psychologist William James. With James's supervision, Stein and another student, Leon Mendez Solomons, performed experiments on normal motor automatism, a phenomenon hypothesized to occur in people when their attention is divided between two simultaneous intelligent activities such as writing and speaking.These experiments yielded examples of writing that appeared to represent "stream of consciousness", a psychological theory often attributed to James, which became a term used to describe the style of modernist authors Virginia Woolf and James Joyce. In 1934, behavioral psychologist B.F. Skinner interpreted Stein's difficult poem Tender Buttons as an example of normal motor automatism.  In a letter Stein wrote during the 1930s, she explained that she never accepted the theory of automatic writing: "[T]here can be automatic movements, but not automatic writing. Writing for the normal person is too complicated an activity to be indulged in automatically." At Radcliffe, she began a lifelong friendship with Mabel Foote Weeks, whose correspondence traces much of the progression of Stein's life. In 1897, Stein spent the summer in Woods Hole, Massachusetts, studying embryology at the Marine Biological Laboratory.   
Johns HopkinsWilliam James became a committed mentor to Stein at Radcliffe, recognizing her intellectual potential, and declaring her his “most brilliant woman student.” It was James who encouraged Stein to enroll in medical school; although Stein professed she had no interest in either the theory or practice of medicine. She spent two years at Johns Hopkins Medical School, failing two courses and leaving without a degree. Ultimately, medical school had bored Stein, and she had spent many of her evenings not applying herself to her studies, but taking long walks and attending the opera.  www.poetryfoundation.com, Biography, "Gertrude Stein 1874-1846," retrieved October 16, 2012 Stein’s tenure at Johns Hopkins were years of challenge and stress. Men dominated the medical field, and the inclusion of women in the profession was not unreservedly, or unanimously welcomed. Stein writing of this period in her life (“Things As They Are,” 1903) often reveals a depressed young woman dealing with a paternalistic culture, struggling to find her own identity which she realized could not conform to the conventional female role. Her uncorested physical appearance and eccentric mode of dress aroused comment and she was described as “Big and floppy and sandaled and not caring a damn.”   www.baltimorestyle.com, Style Magazine, Rudacille, Deborah, "Baltimore Blues," retrieved October 17, 2012 Asked to give a lecture to a group of Baltimore women in 1899, Stein gave a controversial speech, undoubtedly made to provoke the largely middle-class audience. Titled “The Value of College Education for Women,” Stein maintained:

“average middle class woman [supported by] some male relative, a husband or father or brother,...[is] not worth her keep economically considered.” [This economic dependence caused her to become] oversexed...adapting herself to the abnormal sex desire of the male...and becoming a creature that should have been first a human being and then a woman into one that is a woman first and always.”  

While a student at Johns Hopkins, Stein, purportedly yet naïve of sexual matters, experienced an awakening of her latent sexuality. Sometime in 1899 or 1900, Stein became infatuated with Mary Bookstaver who was involved in a relationship with a medical student, Mabel Haynes. Witnessing the relationship between the two women served for Stein as her “erotic awakening.” The unhappy love triangle demoralized Stein, arguably contributing to her decision to abandon her medical studies.  Stein’s brother Leo Stein left for London in 1902, and Stein followed, the two subsequently relocated to Paris the following year where Leo hoped to pursue an art career. 
Art collection
The two Steins shared living quarters on the Left Bank of Paris at 27 rue de Fleurus from 1903 until 1914, when they dissolved their common household. Their residence, located near the Luxembourg Gardens, was a two-story building with adjacent studio. It was here they accumulated the works of art into a collection that would become renown for its prescience and historical importance.The gallery space was furnished with imposing, Renaissance era furniture manufactured in Florence, Italy. The paintings lined the walls in tiers trailing many feet to the ceiling. Initially illuminated by gaslight, the artwork was later lit by electric light shortly prior to World War I. www.thesmithsonianmag.com, Smithsonian Magazine, Lubow, Arthur, “An Eye for Genius: The Collections of Gertrude and Leo Stein, retrieved October 17, 2012  The joint collection of Gertrude and Leo Stein began in late 1904 when Michael Stein announced that their trust account had accumulated a balance of 8,000 francs. They spent this at Vollard's Gallery, buying Gauguin's Sunflowers  and Three Tahitians,  Cézanne's Bathers,  and two Renoirs. Leo Stein cultivated important art world connections, enabling the Stein holdings to grow over time. Bernard Berenson hosted Gertrude and Leo in his English country house in 1902, facilitating their introduction to  Paul Cézanne and Ambroise Vollard's art gallery. The art collection increased and the walls at Rue de Fleurus were rearranged continually to make way for new acquisitions.  In "the first half of 1905" the Steins acquired Cézanne's Portrait of Mme Cézanne and Delacroix's Perseus and Andromeda.  Shortly after the opening of the Salon d'Automne of 1905 (on October 18, 1905), the Steins acquired Matisse's Woman with a Hat  and Picasso's Young Girl with Basket of Flowers. Henry McBride (art critic for the New York Sun) did much for Stein's reputation in the United States, publicizing her art acquisitions and her importance as a cultural figure. Of the art collection at 27 Rue de Fleurus, McBride commented: "[I]n proportion to its size and quality... [it is] just about the most potent of any that I have ever heard of in history." Mellow (1974), p. 193.  McBride also made the observation that Gertrude "collected geniuses rather than masterpieces. She recognized them a long way off." By early 1906, Leo and Gertrude Stein's studio had many paintings by Henri Manguin, Pierre Bonnard, Pablo Picasso, Paul Cézanne, Pierre-Auguste Renoir, Honoré Daumier, Henri Matisse, and Henri de Toulouse-Lautrec.  Their collection was representative of two famous art exhibitions that took place during their residence together in Paris, and to which they contributed, either by lending their art, or by patronizing the featured artists.  The Steins' elder brother, Michael, and sister-in-law Sarah (Sally) acquired a large number of Henri Matisse paintings; Gertrude's friends from Baltimore, Claribel and Etta Cone, collected similarly, eventually donating their art collection, virtually intact, to the Baltimore Museum of Art While numerous artists visited the Stein salon, many of these artists were not represented among the paintings on the walls at 27 Rue de Fleurus. Where Renoir, Cézanne, Matisse, and Picasso's works dominated Leo and Gertrude's collection, the collection of Michael and Sarah Stein emphasized Matisse. In April 1914 Leo relocated to Settignano, Italy, near Florence, and the art collection was divided. The division of the Steins' art collection was described in a letter by Leo: Leo departed with sixteen Renoirs, and relinquishing the Picassos and most of Matisse to his sister, took only a portrait sketch Picasso had done of him. He remained dedicated to Cézanne, nonetheless, leaving all the artist’s works with his sister, taking with him only a Cézanne painting of ‘5 apples’.  The split between brother and sister was acrimonious. Stein did not see Leo Stein again for more than thirty years, and then through only a brief greeting on the street. After this accidental encounter, they never saw or spoke to each other again.  The Steins' holdings were dispersed eventually by various methods and for various reasons. After Stein's and Leo's households separated in 1914, she continued to collect examples of Picasso's art, which had turned to Cubism, a style Leo did not appreciate. At her death, Gertrude's remaining collection emphasized the artwork of Picasso and Juan Gris, most of her other pictures having been sold. MoMA (1970) Gertrude Stein’s formidable personage has dominated the provenance of the Stein art legacy. It was, however, her brother Leo who was the astute art appraiser. “Leo’s eye for art guided them in buying the collection for which Gertrude later took most of the credit.”   Alfred Barr Jr., founding director of New York’s Museum of Modern Art has said that between the years of 1905 and 1907, “[Leo] was possibly the most discerning connoisseur and collector of 20th century painting in the world.” After the artworks were divided between the two siblings, it was Gertrude Stein that moved on to champion the works of what proved to be lesser talents in the 1930s. She concentrated on the work of Juan Gris, Andre Masson, and Sir Francis Rose. In 1932, Stein asserted: "painting now after its great period has come back to be a minor art."  
27 rue de Fleurus: The Stein salonThe gatherings in the Stein home "brought together confluences of talent and thinking that would help define modernism in literature and art." Dedicated attendees included Pablo Picasso, Ernest Hemingway, F. Scott Fitzgerald, Sinclair Lewis, James Joyce, Ezra Pound, Thornton Wilder, Sherwood Anderson and Henri Matisse. www.brbl-archive.library.yale.edu, "Extravagant Crowd: Gertrude Stein and Alice B. Toklas," retrieved October 16, 2012  Saturday evenings had been set as the fixed day and time for formal congregation so Stein could work at her writing uninterrupted by impromptu visitors. It was Stein's partner Alice who became the de facto hostess for the female guests who were segregated in another room through Stein’s edict, as Stein could not countenance their inclusion among the male devotees.During the 1920s, Stein became friends with writer Mina Loy, and the two would maintain a life time association. Upon the birth of his son, Ernest Hemingway asked Stein to be the godmother of his child. During the summer of 1931, Stein advised the young composer and writer Paul Bowles to go to Tangier, where she and Alice had vacationed.Gertrude herself attributed the beginnings of the Saturday evening salons to Matisse, as
 Among Picasso's acquaintances who frequented the Saturday evenings were: Fernande Olivier (Picasso's mistress), Georges Braque (artist), André Derain (artist), Max Jacob (poet), Guillaume Apollinaire (poet), Marie Laurencin (artist, and Apollinaire's mistress), Henri Rousseau (painter), and Joseph Stella. While Stein has been credited with inventing the term "Lost Generation" for those whose defining moment in time and coming of age had been World War I and its aftermath, at least three versions of the story that led to the phrase are on record, two by Ernest Hemingway and one by Gertrude Stein. 
Literary style
Stein's writing can be placed in three categories: "hermetic" works that have gone largely unread, best illustrated by The Making of Americans: The Hersland Family; popularized writing such as The Autobiography of Alice B. Toklas; and speech writing and more accessible autobiographical writing of later years, of which Brewsie and Willie is a good example. Her works include novels, plays, stories, libretti and poems written in a highly idiosyncratic, playful, repetitive, and humorous style. Typical quotes are: "Rose is a rose is a rose is a rose"; "Out of kindness comes redness and out of rudeness comes rapid same question, out of an eye comes research, out of selection comes painful cattle"; about her childhood home in Oakland, "There is no there there"; and "The change of color is likely and a difference a very little difference is prepared. Sugar is not a vegetable."These stream-of-consciousness experiments, rhythmical essays or "portraits", were designed to evoke "the excitingness of pure being" and can be seen as literature's answer to Cubism, plasticity, and collage. Many of the experimental works such as Tender Buttons have since been interpreted by critics as a feminist reworking of patriarchal language.  These works were well received by avant-garde critics but did not initially achieve mainstream success. Despite Stein's work on automatic writing with William James, she did not see her work as automatic, but as an 'excess of consciousness'. Though Gertrude collected cubist paintings, especially those of Picasso, the largest visual influence on her work is that of Cézanne. Particularly, he influenced her idea of equality, distinguished from universality: "the whole field of the canvas is important" (p. 8 ). Rather than a figure/ground relationship, "Stein in her work with words used the entire text as a field in which every element mattered as much as any other." It is a subjective relationship that includes multiple viewpoints. Stein explained: "The important thing is that you must have deep down as the deepest thing in you a sense of equality."Her use of repetition is ascribed to her search for descriptions of the "bottom nature" of her characters, such as in The Making of Americans where the narrator is described through the repetition of narrative phrases such as "As I was saying" and "There will be now a history of her." Stein used many Anglo-Saxon words and avoided words with "too much association". Social judgement is absent in her writing, so the reader is given the power to decide how to think and feel about the writing. Anxiety, fear and anger are also absent, and her work is harmonic and integrative. Stein predominantly used the present progressive tense, creating a continuous present in her work, which Grahn argues is a consequence of the previous principles, especially commonality and centeredness. Grahn describes "play" as the granting of autonomy and agency to the readers or audience: "rather than the emotional manipulation that is a characteristic of linear writing, Stein uses play."  In addition Stein's work is funny, and multilayered, allowing a variety of interpretations and engagements. Lastly Grahn argues that one must "insterstand... engage with the work, to mix with it in an active engagement, rather than 'figuring it out.' Figure it in." In 1932, using an accessible style to appeal to a wider audience, she wrote The Autobiography of Alice B. Toklas; the book would become her first best-seller. Despite the title, it was actually Stein's autobiography. The style was quite similar to that of The Alice B. Toklas Cookbook, which was written by Toklas.Several of Stein's writings have been set to music by composers, including Virgil Thomson's operas Four Saints in Three Acts and The Mother of Us All, and James Tenney's setting of Rose is a rose is a rose is a rose as a canon dedicated to Philip Corner, beginning with "a" on an upbeat and continuing so that each repetition shuffles the words, e.g. "a/rose is a rose/is a rose is/a rose is a/rose."
Literary careerWhile living in Paris, Gertrude began writing for publication. Her earliest writings were mainly retellings of her college experiences. Her first critically acclaimed publication was Three Lives. In 1911, Mildred Aldrich introduced Gertrude to Mabel Dodge Luhan and they began a short-lived but fruitful friendship during which the wealthy Mabel Dodge promoted Gertrude's legend in the United States.Mabel was enthusiastic about Gertrude's sprawling publication The Makings of Americans and, at a time when Gertrude had much difficulty selling her writing to publishers, privately published 300 copies of Portrait of Mabel Dodge at Villa Curonia,  a copy of which was valued at $25,000 in 2007.  Dodge was also involved in the publicity and planning of the 69th Armory Show in 1913, "the first avant-garde art exhibition in America." In addition, she wrote the first critical analysis of Gertrude's writing to appear in America, in "Speculations, or Post-Impressionists in Prose", published in a special March 1913 publication of Arts and Decoration. Mellow (1974), p. 170.  Foreshadowing Gertrude's later critical reception, Mabel wrote in "Speculations": Mabel attributed the end of their friendship to an exchange in the autumn of 1912 when, during lunch, Gertrude sent her "such a good strong look over the table that it seemed to cut across the air to me in a band of electrified steel—a smile traveling across on it—powerful—Heavens!".  Alice interpreted the look as a flirtation and left the room,  prompting Gertrude to follow, and when Gertrude returned, she said, "[Alice] doesn't want to come lunch.... She feels the heat today."  The salon, and the people that came to visit it, provided the inspiration for The Autobiography of Alice B. Toklas.Stein and Carl Van Vechten, the noted critic and photographer, became acquainted in Paris in 1913.  The two became lifelong friends, devising pet names for each other: Van Vechten was “Papa Woojums,” and Stein, “Baby Woojums.”  Van Vechten served as an enthusiastic champion of Stein’s literary work in the United States, in effect becoming her American agent. 
Stein in America 1934-1935In October 1934, Stein arrived in America after a thirty-year absence. Disembarking from the ocean liner in New York, she was met by a throng of reporters. Front-page articles on Stein appeared in almost every New York City newspaper. As she rode through Manhattan to her hotel, she was able get a sense of the publicity that would hallmark her US tour. An electric sign in Times Square announced to all that “Gertrude Stein Has Arrived.”  www.smithsonianmag.com, “When Gertrude Stein Toured America,” October 14, 2011, retrieved October 21, 2012 Her six-month tour of the country encompassed one hundred ninety-one days of travel, criss-crossing twenty-three states, and visiting thirty-seven cities. The lectures Stein prepared for each stop over conformed to a formal structure, and the audience was limited to five hundred attendees for each venue.  She spoke, reading from notes, and provided for an audience question and answer period at the end of her presentation.   The effectiveness of Stein as a lecture speaker provoked varying evaluations. At the time, some maintained that “Stein’s audiences by and large did not understand her lectures.” Some of those in the psychiatric community weighed in, judging that Stein suffered from a speech disorder, palilalia, which caused her “to stutter over words and phrases.”  The predominant feeling, however, was that Stein was a compelling presence, a fascinating personality who had the ability to hold listeners with the “musicality of her language.”   In Washington, D.C. Stein was invited to have tea with the President’s wife, Eleanor Roosevelt. In Beverly Hills, California, she visited with Charlie Chaplin who reportedly discussed the future of cinema with her.  Stein left America in May of 1935, a newly minted America celebrity with a commitment from Random House, who had agreed to become the American publisher for all future works.  The Chicago Daily Tribune wrote after Stein’s return to Paris: “No writer in years has been so widely discussed, so much caricatured, so passionately championed.”  
Books
Q.E.D. (Not published until after her death)Gertrude completed Q.E.D. (Quod Erat Demonstrandum) on October 24, 1903.  This piece is discussed more completely later in this article at Lesbian relationships.
Fernhurst (1904)In 1904 Stein began this fictional account of a scandalous three-person romantic affair involving a dean (M. Carey Thomas) and a faculty member (Mary Gwinn) from Bryn Mawr College and a Harvard graduate (Alfred Hodder).  Mellow asserts that Fernhurst "is a decidedly minor and awkward piece of writing." Mellow (1974), 67.  It includes some commentary that Gertrude mentioned in her autobiography when she discussed the "fateful twenty-ninth year"  during which: Mellow observes that, in 1904, 30-year-old Gertrude "had evidently determined that the 'small hard reality' of her life would be writing". 
Three Lives  (written 1905-1906)Stein attributed the inception of this work to the inspiration she received from a portrait Cézanne had painted of his wife and which was in the Stein collection. She credited this as a revelatory moment in the evolution of her writing style. Stein described: She began her novel Three Lives during the spring of 1905, and finished it the following year. 
The Making of Americans (written 1902–1911)Gertrude Stein stated the date for her writing of The Making of Americans was 1906–8. Her biographer has uncovered evidence that it actually began in 1902 and did not end until 1911.  Stein compared her work to James Joyce's Ulysses and to Marcel Proust's In Search of Lost Time. Her critics were less enthusiastic about it. Mellow (1974), p. 122.  First publication in Alfred Stieglitz's Camera Work (August 1912).
Further publication historyStein wrote the bulk of the novel between 1903 and 1911, and evidence from her manuscripts suggests three major periods of revision during that time.  The manuscript remained mostly hidden from public view until 1924 when, at the urging of Ernest Hemingway, Ford Madox Ford agreed to publish excerpts in the transatlantic review.  In 1925, the Paris-based Contact Press published a limited run of the novel consisting of 500 copies. A much-abridged edition was published by Harcourt Brace in 1934, but the full version remained out of print until Something Else Press republished it in 1966. In 1995, a new, definitive edition was published by Dalkey Archive Press with a foreword by William Gass. Gertrude's Matisse and Picasso descriptive essays appeared in Alfred Stieglitz's August 1912 edition of Camera Work, a special edition devoted to Picasso and Matisse, and represented her very first publication. Kellner (1988), p. 266.  Of this publication, Gertrude said, "[h]e was the first one that ever printed anything that I had done. And you can imagine what that meant to me or to any one." 
Word Portraits (written 1908–1913)Gertrude's descriptive essays apparently began with her essay of Alice B. Toklas, "a little prose vignette, a kind of happy inspiration that had detached itself from the torrential prose of The Making of Americans".  Gertrude's early efforts at word portraits are catalogued in   and under individual's names in Kellner, 1988. Matisse and Picasso were subjects of early essays,  later collected and published in Geography and Plays  and Portraits and Prayers .  Her subjects included several ultimately famous personages, and her subjects provided a description of what she observed in her Saturday salons at 27 Rue de Fleurus: "Ada" (Alice B. Toklas), "Two Women" (The Cone Sisters, Claribel Cone and Etta Cone), Miss Furr and Miss Skeene (Ethel Mars and Maud Hunt Squire, "Men" (Hutchins Hapgood, Peter David Edstrom, Maurice Sterne), "Matisse" (1909, Henri Matisse), "Picasso" (1909, Pablo Picasso), "Portrait of Mabel Dodge at the Villa Curonia" (1911, Mabel Dodge Luhan), and "Guillaume Apollinaire" (1913).
Tender Buttons (written 1912)Tender Buttons is the best known of Gertrude Stein's "hermetic" works. It is a small book separated into three sections — Food, Objects and Rooms each containing prose under subtitles.  Its publication in 1914 caused a great dispute between Mabel Dodge Luhan and Gertrude, because Mabel had been working to have it published by another publisher. Mellow (1974), p. 178.  Mabel wrote at length about the bad choice of publishing it with the press Gertrude selected.  Evans wrote Gertrude: Stein ignored Mabel's exhortations, and eventually Mabel, and published 1,000 copies of the book, in 1914. An antiquarian copy was valued at over $1,200 in 2007. It is currently in print.In an interview with Robert Bartlett Haas in "A Transatlantic Interview - 1946", Stein insisted that this work was completely "realistic" in the tradition of Gustave Flaubert, stating the following: "I used to take objects on a table, like a tumbler or any kind of object and try to get the picture of it clear and separate in my mind and create a word relationship between the word and the things seen." Commentators have indicated that what she meant was that the reference of objects remained central to her work, although the representation of them had not.    Scholar Marjorie Perloff had said of Stain that "[u]nlike her contemporaries (Eliot, Pound, Moore), she does not give us an image, however fractured, of a carafe on a table; rather, she forces us to reconsider how language actually constructs the world we know." 
Alice B.ToklasStein met her life partner Alice B. Toklas  on September 8, 1907, on Toklas' first day in Paris, at Sarah and Michael Stein's apartment.  On meeting Stein, Toklas wrote: Soon thereafter, Stein introduced Toklas to Pablo Picasso at his studio, where he was at work on Les Demoiselles d'Avignon.In 1908, they summered in Fiesole, Italy, Toklas staying with Harriet Lane Levy, the companion of her trip from the United States, and her housemate until Alice moved in with Stein and Leo in 1910. That summer, Stein stayed with Michael and Sarah Stein, their son Allan, and Leo in a nearby villa. Gertrude and Alice's summer of 1908 is memorialized in images of the two of them in Venice, at the piazza in front of Saint Mark's. Toklas arrived in 1907 with Harriet Levy, with Toklas maintaining living arrangements with Levy until she moved to 27 Rue de Fleurus in 1910. In an essay written at the time, Stein discussed the complex efforts humorously, involving much letter writing and Victorian niceties, to extricate Levy from Toklas' living arrangements.  In "Harriet", Stein considers Levy's nonexistent plans for the summer, following her nonexistent plans for the winter: 
During the early summer of 1914, Gertrude bought three paintings by Juan Gris: Roses, Glass and Bottle, and Book and Glasses. Soon after she purchased them from Daniel-Henry Kahnweiler's gallery,  the Great War began, Kahnweiler's stock was confiscated and he was not allowed to return to Paris. Gris, who before the war had entered a binding contract with Kahnweiler for his output, was left without income. Gertrude attempted to enter an ancillary arrangement in which she would forward Gris living expenses in exchange for future pictures. Stein and Toklas had plans to visit England to sign a contract for the publication of Three Lives, to spend a few weeks there, and then journey to Spain. They left Paris on July 6, 1914 and returned on October 17.  When Britain declared war on Germany, Stein and Toklas were visiting Alfred North Whitehead in England. After a supposed three-week trip to England that stretched to three months due to the War, they returned to France, where they spent the first winter of the war.With money acquired from the sale of Stein's last Matisse Woman with a Hat  to her brother Michael, she and Toklas vacationed in Spain from May 1915, through the spring of 1916.  During their interlude in Majorca, Spain, Gertrude continued her correspondence with Mildred Aldrich who kept her apprised of the War's progression, and eventually inspired Gertrude and Alice to return to France to join the war effort. Toklas and Stein returned to Paris in June 1916, and acquired a Ford automobile with the help of associates in the United States; Gertrude learned to drive it with the help of her friend William Edwards Cook.   Gertrude and Alice then volunteered to drive supplies to French hospitals, in the Ford they named Auntie, "after Gertrude's aunt Pauline, 'who always behaved admirably in emergencies and behaved fairly well most times if she was flattered.'"
During the 1930s, Stein and Toklas became famous with the 1933 mass market publication of The Autobiography of Alice B. Toklas. She and Alice had an extended lecture tour in the United States during this decade. They also spent several summers in the town of Bilignin, in the Ain district of eastern France situated in the picturesque region of the Rhône-Alpes. The two women doted on their beloved poodle named "Basket" whose successor, "Basket II", comforted Alice in the years after Gertrude's death.With the outbreak of World War II, Stein and Toklas retreated to the town of Culoz. After the war, Stein was visited by many young American soldiers. The April 6, 1945 issue of Life magazine featured a photo of Stein and American soldiers posing in front of Hitler’s bunker in Berchtesgaden. They are all giving the Nazi salute and Stein is wearing the traditional Alpine cap, accompanied by the text: “Off We All Went To See Germany.”  www.tnr.com, The New Republic, Benfey, Christopher, “The Alibi of Ambiguity,” June 28, 2012, retrieved October 18, 2012 In a preface written for a Paris exhibition of Spanish painter Francisco Riba Rovira in 1945— approximately one year before her death—she expressed her opinions of Picasso, Cézanne, Matisse and Juan Gris as well as Riba-Rovira, a familiar artist of her salon at rue de Fleurus. The following is a translation from Stein's preface to the exhibition by Francisco Riba Rovira at Roquepine Gallery in May 1945:  In the 1980s, a cabinet in the Yale University Beinecke Library, which had been locked for an indeterminate number of years was opened and found to contain some 300 love letters written by Stein and Toklas. They were made public for the first time, revealing intimate details of their relationship. Stein’s endearment for Toklas was “Baby Precious,” in turn Stein was for Toklas, “Mr. Cuddle-Wuddle.”  
Lesbian relationshipsStein is the author of one of the earliest coming out stories, "Q.E.D" (published in 1950 as Things as They Are), written in 1903 and suppressed by the author. The story, written during travels after leaving college, is based on a three-person romantic affair she joined while studying at Johns Hopkins in Baltimore. The affair was complicated, as Stein was less experienced with the social dynamics of romantic friendship as well as her own sexuality and any moral dilemmas regarding it. Stein maintained at the time that she detested "passion in its many disguised forms". The relationships of Stein's acquaintances Mabel Haynes and Grace Lounsbury ended as Haynes started one with Mary Bookstaver (also known as May Bookstaver). Stein became enamored of Bookstaver but was unsuccessful in advancing their relationship. Bookstaver, Haynes, and Lounsbury all later married men. Stein began to accept and define her pseudo-masculinity through the ideas of Otto Weininger's Sex and Character (1906). Weininger, though Jewish by birth, considered Jewish men effeminate and women as incapable of selfhood and genius, except for female homosexuals who may approximate masculinity. As Stein equated genius with masculinity, her position as a female and an intellectual becomes difficult to synthesize and modern feminist interpretations of her work have been called into question. Ramsay, Tamara Ann (1998). Discursive departures: A reading paradigm affiliated with feminist, lesbian, aesthetic and queer practices (with reference to Woolf, Stein, and H.D.) (M.A. thesis) Wilfrid Laurier University More positive affirmations of Stein's sexuality began with her relationship with Alice B. Toklas. Ernest Hemingway describes how Alice was Gertrude's "wife" in that Stein rarely addressed his (Hemingway's) wife, and he treated Alice the same, leaving the two "wives" to chat. Grahn (1989)  Alice was 4'11" tall, and Gertrude was 5'1"  .The more affirming essay "Miss Furr and Miss Skeene" is one of the first homosexual revelation stories to be published. The work, like Q.E.D., is informed by Stein's growing involvement with a homosexual community,  though it is based on lesbian partners Maud Hunt Squire and Ethel Mars. Blackmer (1995)  The work contains the word "gay" over one hundred times, perhaps the first published use of the word "gay" in reference to same-sex relationships and those who have them,  and, thus, uninformed readers missed the lesbian content. A similar essay of homosexual men begins more obviously with the line "Sometimes men are kissing" but is less well known. In Tender Buttons Stein comments on lesbian sexuality and the work abounds with "highly condensed layers of public and private meanings" created by wordplay including puns on the words "box", "cow", and in titles such as "tender buttons". 
Political viewsAccording to Janet Malcolm's Two Lives: Gertrude and Alice, Stein was a vocal critic of Franklin Delano Roosevelt and the New Deal.      She publicly endorsed General Francisco Franco during the Spanish Civil War and admired Vichy leader Marshal Philippe Pétain.  Some have argued for a more nuanced view of Stein's collaborationist activity, arguing that it was rooted in her wartime predicament and status as a Jew in Nazi-occupied France.     Similarly, Stein commented at 1938 on Benito Mussolini, Adolf Hitler, Franklin D. Roosevelt, Joseph Stalin and Leon Trotsky: "There is too much fathering going on just now and there is no doubt about it fathers are depressing." 
Stein during World War II
While identified with the modernist movements in art and literature, Stein’s political affiliations were decidedly reactionary, and she was outspoken in her hostility to the liberal reforms of progressive politics. To Stein, the industrial revolution had acted as a negative societal force, disrupting stability, degrading values, and subsequently effecting cultural decline. Stein idealized the 18th century as the golden age of civilization, epitomized in America as the era of its founding fathers and what was in France, the glory of its pre-revolutionary Ancien Régime. Will, Barbara, Humanities, “The Strange Politics of Gertrude Stein,” March/April 2012 | Volume 33, Number 2, retrieved October 14, 2012  A compendium of source material confirms that Stein was able to save her life and sustain her lifestyle through the protection of powerful Vichy government official Bernard Faÿ. Stein had met Fay, in 1926, and was her “dearest friend during her life,” according to Alice B. Toklas. Faÿ had been the primary translator of Stein’s work into French and subsequently masterminded her 1933-34 American book tour, which gave Stein celebrity status and proved to be a highly successful promotion of her memoir, “The Autobiography of Alice B. Toklas.”   Fay’s influence was instrumental in protecting Nazi confiscation of the Stein’s historically significant and monetarily valuable collection of artwork, which throughout the war years was housed in Stein’s Paris rue Christine apartment, under locked safeguard. www.newyorker.com, Greenhouse, Emily, “Why Won’t The Met Tell The Whole Truth About Gertrude Stein,” Culture Desk, The New Yorker, June 8, 2012, retrieved October 14, 2012 In 1941, at Faÿ’s suggestion, Stein consented to translate into English some 180 pages of speeches made by Marshal Philippe Pétain, replete with “explicitly anti-Semitic tirades.” Stein crafts an analogy between George Washington, and Pétain, equating the Vichy leader with America’s first president, also insinuating the personage of Benjamin Franklin into the mix. She also writes of the high esteem in which Pétain is held by his countrymen; France respected and admired the man who had stuck an armistice with Hitler. Conceived and targeted for an American readership, Stein’s translations were ultimately never published in the United States. Random House publisher Bennett Cerf had read the introduction Stein had written for the translations and been horrified by what she had produced. Of Jewish parentage, Stein willingly collaborated with Vichy France, a regime that deported more than 75,000 Jews to concentration camps, of whom only 3 percent survived the Holocaust.   In 1944, Stein had written that Petain’s policies were “really wonderful so simple so natural so extraordinary.” This was Stein’s contention in the year when the town of Culoz where she and Toklas resided, saw the removal of its Jewish children to Auschwitz.  Stein was able to condemn the Japanese attack at Pearl Harbor while simultaneously maintaining the dissonant acceptance of Hitler as conqueror of Europe.  Journalist Lanning Warren interviewed Stein in her Paris apartment in a piece published in The New York Times Magazine on May 6, 1934. Stein proclaimed that Hitler merited the Nobel Peace Prize.

“I say Hitler ought to have the peace prize...because he is removing all elements of contest and struggle from Germany. By driving out the Jews and the democratic Left elements, he is driving out everything that conduces to activity. That means peace.”    

This 1934 Stein interview has come to be interpreted by some as an ironic jest made by a practiced iconoclast hoping to gain attention and provoke controversy. Gustav Hendrikksen, who had been a member of the Nobel committee in the 1930s, refuted this analysis in the 1990s. He recalled that Stein’s bid for Hitler’s Nobel honor was indeed made in earnest. In 1938, Stein spearheaded a campaign urging the Nobel committee to consider Adolf Hitler for nomination of the Peace Prize. Hendrikksen recounts that the committee formerly rejected Stein’s proposal “politely but firmly citing among their reasons the attitude of the Nazis towards Jews.”  How much of Stein’s wartime activities were motivated by the real exigencies of self-preservation in a dangerous environment, can only be speculated upon. However, her loyalty to Pétain went beyond expedience.  She had been urged to leave France by American embassy officials, friends and family when that possibility still existed, but declined to do so. Accustomed to a life of entitlement since birth, Stein was convinced her wealth and notoriety would exempt her from what had befallen other European Jews.  In an essay written for the Atlantic Monthly in November 1940, Stein had glibly written about her decision not to leave France: “it would be awfully uncomfortable and I am fussy about my food.” Stein continued to praise Pétain after the war ended, this at a time when Pétain had been sentenced to death by a French court for treason. Author Djuna Barnes provided a caustic assessment of Stein's book, "Wars I Have Seen":

"You do not feel that she [Stein] is ever really worried about the sorrows of the people. Her concerns at its highest pitch is a well-fed apprehension."  


DeathStein died at the age of 72 from stomach cancer in Neuilly-sur-Seine on July 27, 1946, and was interred in Paris in Père Lachaise Cemetery. When Stein was being wheeled into the operating room for surgery on her stomach, she asked Toklas, "What is the answer?" When Toklas did not reply, Stein said, "In that case, what is the question?"  Stein named writer and photographer Carl Van Vechten as her literary executor, and he helped to publish works of hers that remained unpublished at the time of her death. There is a monument to Stein on the Upper Terrace of Bryant Park, New York.
Critical reception of Stein as writerSherwood Anderson in his public introduction to Stein's 1922 publication of Geography and Plays wrote:
 In a private letter to his brother Karl, Anderson said, "As for Stein, I do not think her too important. I do think she had an important thing to do, not for the public, but for the artist who happens to work with words as his material. "Other critics took a more negative view of Stein's work. F. W. Dupee (1990, p. IX) defines "Steinese" as "gnomic, repetitive, illogical, sparsely punctuated... a scandal and a delight, lending itself equally to derisory parody and fierce denunciation."Composer Constant Lambert (1936) compares Stravinsky's choice of "the drabbest and least significant phrases" in L'Histoire du Soldat to Gertrude Stein's in "Helen Furr and Georgine Skeene" (1922), specifically: "[E]veryday they were gay there, they were regularly gay there everyday." He writes that the "effect would be equally appreciated by someone with no knowledge of English whatsoever", apparently missing the pun frequently employed by Stein.James Thurber wrote:
 Author Katherine Ann Porter provided her own estimation of Stein’s literary legacy: “Wise or silly or nothing at all, down everything goes on the page with an air of everything being equal, unimportant in itself important because it happened to her and she was writing about it.”  Benstock, Shari, "Women of the Left Bank: Paris, 1900-1940,"  University of Texas Press, 1987, ISBN 978-0292790407 History Professor Blanche Weisen Cook, has written of Stein: “She was not a radical feminist. She was Jewish and anti-Semitic, lesbian and contemptuous of women, ignorant about economics and hostile to socialism.”  Writing for Vanity Fair magazine in 1923, eminent literary critic Edmund Wilson presciently came to an evaluation similar to the one made by Katharine Ann Porter some twenty years later, after Stein’s death. Wilson deemed that Stein’s technique was one of flawed methodology, using words analogous to the way Cubists manipulated abstract forms in their artworks. As Wilson wrote, unlike the plastic arts, literature deals with

“human speech [which] is a tissue of ideas....Miss Stein no longer understands the conditions under which literary effects have to be produced...There is sometimes genuine music in the most baffling of her works, but there are rarely any communicated emotions.”  Wilson, Edmund, "A Guide to Gertrude Stein,"  Vanity Fair, September, 1923, Literary Essays and Reviews of the 1920s & 30s, Library of America, 2007, p. 878-879 

An elevated observer, perched high above everything below, he likened Stein to a self-conceived “Buddha...registering impressions like some august seismograph.”  Stein’s literary output was a subject of amusement for her brother Leo Stein, who characterized her writing as an “abomination.” Later detractors of Stein’s work deemed her experimentation as the serendipitous result of her real inability to communicate through linguistic convention, deficient in the skills required “to deal effectively with language, so that she made her greatest weakness into her most remarkable strength.”  
Legacy and commemorationGertrude Stein has been the subject of many artistic works. In the 1998 Latin American literary classic "Yo-Yo Boing!", novelist Giannina Braschi pays homage to Stein as an imaginary mentor. In 2005, playwright/actor Jade Esteban Estrada portrayed Stein in the solo musical ICONS: The Lesbian and Gay History of the World, Vol. 1 at Princeton University. "Loving Repeating" is a musical by Stephen Flaherty based on the writings of Gertrude Stein. Stein and Alice B. Toklas are both characters in the eight person show. Stein is a central character in Nick Bertozzi's 2007 graphic novel The Salon. The posthumously-published Journals of Ayn Rand contain several highly hostile references to Gertrude Stein. From Rand's working notes for her novel The Fountainhead, it is clear that the character Lois Cook in that book was intended as a caricature of Stein. Stein was also portrayed in the 2011 Woody Allen film Midnight in Paris by Kathy Bates. Her name is added to a list of great artists and notables in the popular Broadway musical "Rent" in the song "La Vie Boheme".
Published works 

Three Lives (The Grafton Press, 1909)
White Wines, (1913)
Tender buttons: objects, food, rooms (1914) online at Bartleby
An Exercise in Analysis (1917)
A Circular Play (1920)
 .
The Making of Americans: Being a History of a Family's Progress (written 1906–8, published 1925)
Four Saints in Three Acts (libretto, 1929: music by Virgil Thomson, 1934)
Useful Knowledge (1929)
How to Write (1931)
They must. Be Wedded. To Their Wife (1931)
 .
Matisse Picasso and Gertrude Stein with Two Shorter Stories (1933)
The Autobiography of Alice B. Toklas (1933)
 .
Lectures in America (1935)
The Geographical History of America or the Relation of Human Nature to the Human Mind (1936)
Everybody's Autobiography (1937)
Picasso (1938)
Doctor Faustus Lights the Lights (1938)
The World is Round (1939)
Paris France (1940)
Ida: A Novel (1941)
Three Sisters Who Are Not Sisters (1943)
Wars I Have Seen (1945a)
  (Riba-Rovira).
 . Riba-Rovira.
 .
Brewsie and Willie (1946b)
The Mother of Us All (libretto, 1946c: music by Virgil Thompson 1947)
 .
 .
The Things as They Are (written as Q.E.D. in 1903, published 1950)
Patriarchal Poetry (1953)
Alphabets and Birthdays (1957)
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .



 .
 
Vechten, Carl Van, ed. (1990). Selected Writings of Gertrude Stein. ISBN 0-679-72464-8


Related exhibits

 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 
 .


References 
Works cited 

Behrens, Roy R. Cook Book: Gertrude Stein, William Cook and Le Corbusier. Dysart, Iowa: Bobolink Books, 2005; ISBN 0-9713244-1-7.
 
Bowers, Jane Palatini. 1991. "They Watch Me as They Watch This": Gertrude Stein's Metadrama. Philadelphia: University of Pennsylvania Press. ISBN 0-8122-3057-4.
 .
Grahn, Judy (1989). Really Reading Gertrude Stein: A Selected Anthology with essays by Judy Grahn. Freedom, California: The Crossing Press. ISBN 0-89594-380-8.
Hobhouse, Janet. Everybody Who Was Anybody: A Biography of Gertrude Stein New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons, 1975. ISBN 978-1-199-83299-3.
 
Malcolm, Janet. Two Lives: Gertrude and Alice, London: Yale University Press, 2007. ISBN 978-0-300-12551-1
Malcolm, Janet. Gertrude Stein's War, The New Yorker, June 2, 2003, pp. 58–81
 .
Malcolm, Janet. Strangers in Paradise, The New Yorker, November 13, 2006, pp. 54–61.
 
 
Perelman, Bob. The Trouble with Genius: Reading Pound, Joyce, Stein, and Zukofsky. Berkeley, California: University of California Press, 1994.
 
 
Ryan, Betsy Alayne. 1984. Gertrude Stein's Theatre of the Absolute. Theater and Dramatic Studies Ser., 21. Ann Arbor and London: UMI Research Press. ISBN 0-8357-2021-7.
 .
Truong, Monique. The book of salt, Boston: Houghton Mifflin Company, 2003. A novel about a young Vietnamese cook who worked in Stein's Montparnasse-household.
 
External links 
 

 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 
 
 .
 , featuring a reading of If I Told Him: A Completed Portrait of Picasso and A Valentine to Sherwood Anderson.
 ; readings from Autobiography of Alice B. Toklas, Bee Time Vine, and more. Includes excerpts from Patriarchal Poetry and layered-voice readings.
 .

  
DEFAULTSORT






























  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Bret Harte
 

Francis Bret Harte (August 25, 1836  – May 6, 1902) was an American author and poet, best remembered for his accounts of pioneering life in California.
Life and careerHe was born in Albany, New York, on August 25, 1836.  He was named Francis Brett Hart after his great-grandfather Francis Brett. When he was young his father changed the spelling of the family name from Hart to Harte. Later, Francis preferred to be known by his middle name, but he spelled it with only one "t", becoming Bret Harte.An avid reader as a boy, Harte published his first work at age 11, a satirical poem titled "Autumn Musings," now lost. His formal schooling ended when he was 13 in 1849. Scarnhorst, Gary. Bret Harte: Opening the American Literary West. Norman, OK: University of Oklahoma Press, 2000: 4. ISBN 0-8061-3254-X  He moved to California in 1853, later working there in a number of capacities, including miner, teacher, messenger, and journalist. He spent part of his life in the northern California coastal town of Union (now known as Arcata), a settlement on Humboldt Bay that was established as a provisioning center for mining camps in the interior.The 1860 massacre of between 80 and 200 Wiyots killed at the village of Tutulwat was well documented historically and was reported in San Francisco and New York by Harte. When serving as assistant editor for the Northern Californian, Harte editorialized about the slayings while his boss, Stephen G. Whipple, was temporarily absent, leaving Harte in charge of the paper. Harte published a detailed account condemning the event, writing, "a more shocking and revolting spectacle never was exhibited to the eyes of a Christian and civilized people. Old women wrinkled and decrepit lay weltering in blood, their brains dashed out and dabbled with their long grey hair. Infants scarcely a span long, with their faces cloven with hatchets and their bodies ghastly with wounds." After he published the editorial, his life was threatened and he was forced to flee one month later. Harte quit his job and moved to San Francisco, where an anonymous letter published in a city paper is attributed to him, describing widespread community approval of the massacre. In addition, no one was ever brought to trial, despite the evidence of a planned attack and references to specific individuals, including a rancher named Larabee and other members of the unofficial militia called the Humboldt Volunteers. Harte married Anna Griswold on August 11, 1862, in San Rafael, California.  From the start, the marriage was rocky. Some suggested she was handicapped by extreme jealousy while an early biographer of Harte, Henry C. Merwin, privately concluded that she was "almost impossible to live with". His first literary efforts, including poetry and prose, appeared in The Californian, an early literary journal edited by Charles Henry Webb. In 1868 he became editor of The Overland Monthly, another new literary magazine, but this one more in tune with the pioneering spirit of excitement in California. His story, "The Luck of Roaring Camp", appeared in the magazine's second issue, propelling Harte to nationwide fame.When word of Charles Dickens's death reached Bret Harte in July 1870, he immediately sent a dispatch across the bay to San Francisco to hold back the forthcoming publication of his Overland Monthly for twenty-four hours, so that he could compose the poetic tribute, "Dickens in Camp". This work is considered by many of Harte's admirers as his verse masterpiece, for its evident sincerity, the depth of feeling it displays, and the unusual quality of its poetic expression.Determined to pursue his literary career, in 1871 he and his family traveled back East, to New York and eventually to Boston, where he contracted with the publisher of The Atlantic Monthly for an annual salary of $10,000, "an unprecedented sum at the time."   His popularity waned, however, and by the end of 1872 he was without a publishing contract and increasingly desperate.  He spent the next few years struggling to publish new work (or republish old), delivering lectures about the gold rush, and even selling an advertising jingle to a soap company.In 1878 Harte was appointed to the position of United States Consul in the town of Krefeld, Germany and then to Glasgow in 1880. In 1885 he settled in London.  During the twenty-four years he spent in Europe, he never abandoned writing, and maintained a prodigious output of stories that retained the freshness of his earlier work. He died in Camberley, England in 1902 of throat cancer and is buried at Frimley. His wife, by then known as Anna Bret Harte, died on August 2, 1920. Despite being married for nearly forty years, the couple lived together for only sixteen of those years. 
CriticismIn his Round the World, Andrew Carnegie praised Bret Harte as uniquely American: Writing in his autobiography four years after Harte's death, however, Mark Twain characterized him and his writing as insincere. He criticized the miners' dialect used by Harte, claiming it never existed outside of his imagination. Twain accused Harte of borrowing money from his friends with no intent to repay and of financially abandoning his wife and children.  He referred repeatedly to Harte as "The Immortal Bilk."
Dramatic and musical adaptations of Harte's work

Several film versions of "The Outcasts of Poker Flat" have been made, including one in 1937 with Preston Foster and another in 1952 with Dale Robertson. Tennessee's Partner (1955) with John Payne and Ronald Reagan was based on a story of the same name. Paddy Chayefsky's treatment of the film version of Paint Your Wagon seems to borrow from "Tennessee's Partner": two close friends—one named "Pardner"—share the same woman.  The spaghetti western Four of the Apocalypse is based on "The Outcasts of Poker Flat" and "The Luck of Roaring Camp".
Operas based on "The Outcasts of Poker Flat" include those by Samuel Adler  and by Stanford Beckler. 


Other works


The Tales of the Argonauts, a volume of short sketches published in 1875
Plain Language from Truthful James, known also as The Heathen Chinee, was a satire of racial prejudice in northern California, but was embraced by the American public as a mockery of Chinese immigrants, and shaped anti-Chinese sentiment more than any other work at the time. Scharnhorst, Gary. "Ways That Are Dark": Appropriations of Bret Harte's "Plain Language from Truthful James". Nineteenth-Century Literature, Vol. 51, No. 3 (Dec., 1996), pp. 377-399. 
The Stolen Cigar-Case, featuring ace detective "Hemlock Jones", was praised by Ellery Queen as "probably the best parody of Sherlock Holmes ever written". Davies, David Stuart (1998). Shadows of Sherlock Holmes, p. xvii. Hertfordshire: Wordsworth Editions. ISBN 1-85326-744-9. 
The Society upon the Stanislaus is a tragicomic poem, like Plain Language from Truthful James set in the northern California mining camps, and told by the same narrator, "Truthful James."
Nord-Amerika, seine Städte und Naturwunder, sein Land und seine Leute was authored by Austrian Ernst von Hesse-Wartegg, with contributions by others including Harte.


Legacy 

Bret Harte Memorial in San Francisco, California   
Bret Harte High School in Angels Camp, California
Bret Harte Lane in Humboldt Hill, California is named after him.
Bret Harte Elementary School in Chicago, Illinois
Bret Harte Preparatory Middle School in Los Angeles, California (South Hoover Street)
Bret Harte Middle School in San Jose, California
Bret Harte Middle School in Oakland, California
Bret Harte Middle School in Hayward, California
Bret Harte High School in Altaville, California is named after him and celebrated its 100th anniversary in 2005
Bret Harte Elementary in Cherry Hill, New Jersey
Bret Harte Elementary in Sacramento, California
A community called The Shores of Poker Flat, California claims to have been the location of Poker Flat, although it is usually accepted that the story takes place further north.
Bret Harte Road in Frimley (the town in which Harte was buried) is named after him.
Bret Harte Place in San Francisco, California is named after him.
In 1987 he appeared on a $5 U.S. Postage stamp, as part of the "Great Americans series" of issues. 
Bret Harte Lane, Bret Harte Road, and Harte Ave in San Rafael, California.
Bret Harte Road in Berkeley, California.
Bret Harte House, at Humboldt State University in Arcata, California.
Bret Harte Park in Danville, California.
The town of Twain Harte, California, is named after Mark Twain and Bret Harte.
The Beulah song "Ballad of the Lonely Argonaut" references "The Luck of Roaring Camp" and "Outcasts of Poker Flat" and asks, "How does it feel to roam this land like Harte and Twain did?"
Designed in 1875 by Karl L. Müller, a vessel bearing the name Heathen Chinee pitcher was manufactured by Union Porcelain Works. The vessel is elaborately decorated with depictions of Bill Nye and Ah Sin, the character's featured in Harte's poem, as well as the Flemish King Gambrinus, an official patron saint of beer and Brother Jonathan, the forerunner of Uncle Sam.   


References 
External links 
 
 

 
 
Complete bibliography
Online Bret Harte bibliography
Bret Harte Etexts
Historical Deadwood Newspaper accounts of The Bret Harte and Mark Twain Collaboration Co-author play "Ah Sin" 1877, The Main Character and Namesake Ah Sin Comes to Deadwood 1883
Bret Harte Photographs part of the Nineteenth Century Notables Digital Collection at Gettysburg College
Works by Bret Harte at LibriVox (audiobooks)
Guide to the Bret Harte Collection at The Bancroft Library

 
DEFAULTSORT







 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Amedeo Modigliani
 
 Amedeo Clemente Modigliani ( ; July 12, 1884 – January 24, 1920) was an Italian painter and sculptor who worked mainly in France. Primarily a figurative artist, he became known for paintings and sculptures in a modern style characterized by mask-like faces and elongation of form. He died in Paris of tubercular meningitis, exacerbated by poverty, overwork and addiction to alcohol and narcotics.
Family and early life
Modigliani was born into a Jewish family in Livorno, Italy. A port city, Livorno had long served as a refuge for those persecuted for their religion, and was home to a large Jewish community. His maternal great-great-grandfather, Solomon Garsin, had immigrated to Livorno in the 18th century as a refugee. Modigliani's mother (Eugénie Garsin) who was born and grew up in Marseille, was descended from an intellectual, scholarly family of Sephardic Jews, generations of whom had resided along the Mediterranean coastline. Her ancestors were learned people, fluent in many languages, known authorities on sacred Jewish texts and founders of a school of Talmudic studies. Family legend traced the Garsins' lineage to the 17th-century Dutch philosopher Baruch Spinoza. The family business was believed to be a credit agency with branches in Livorno, Marseille, Tunis, and London. Their financial fortunes ebbed and flowed. At times they enjoyed affluence, at other times they were subject to dire financial crises and reduced circumstances. Modigliani’s father, Flaminio, hailed from a family of successful businessmen and entrepreneurs. While not as culturally sophisticated as the Garsins, they knew how to invest into and develop thriving business endeavors. Their wealth was derived from mining the metals abundant in the area of Sardinia and Tuscany and extracting and exporting the ores. When the Garsin and Modigliani families announced the engagement of their children, Flaminio was a wealthy young mining engineer. He managed the mine in Sardinia and oversaw the almost 30,000 acres of timberland the family owned. He also was expert in both forestry and farming management.  A reversal in fortune occurred to this prosperous family in 1883. An economic downturn in the price of metal plunged the Modiglianis into bankruptcy. Ever resourceful, Modigliani’s mother used her social contacts to establish a school and, along with her two sisters, made the school into a successful enterprise. Modigliani was the fourth child, whose birth coincided with the disastrous financial collapse of his father's business interests.  Amedeo's birth saved the family from ruin; according to an ancient law, creditors could not seize the bed of a pregnant woman or a mother with a newborn child. The bailiffs entered the family's home just as Eugenia went into labour; the family protected their most valuable assets by piling them on top of her.Modigliani had a close relationship with his mother, who taught him at home until he was 10. Beset with health problems after an attack of pleurisy when he was about 11, a few years later he developed a case of typhoid fever. When he was 16 he was taken ill again and contracted the tuberculosis which would later claim his life. After Modigliani recovered from the second bout of pleurisy, his mother took him on a tour of southern Italy: Naples, Capri, Rome and Amalfi, then north to Florence and Venice.   His mother was, in many ways, instrumental in his ability to pursue art as a vocation. When he was 11 years of age, she had noted in her diary: 
Art student yearsModigliani is known to have drawn and painted from a very early age, and thought himself "already a painter", his mother wrote,    even before beginning formal studies. Despite her misgivings that launching him on a course of studying art would impinge upon his other studies, his mother indulged the young Modigliani's passion for the subject.At the age of fourteen, while sick with typhoid fever, he raved in his delirium that he wanted, above all else, to see the paintings in the Palazzo Pitti and the Uffizi in Florence. As Livorno's local museum housed only a sparse few paintings by the Italian Renaissance masters, the tales he had heard about the great works held in Florence intrigued him, and it was a source of considerable despair to him, in his sickened state, that he might never get the chance to view them in person. His mother promised that she would take him to Florence herself, the moment he was recovered. Not only did she fulfil this promise, but she also undertook to enroll him with the best painting master in Livorno, Guglielmo Micheli.
Micheli and the MacchiaioliModigliani worked in Micheli's Art School from 1898 to 1900. Here his earliest formal artistic instruction took place in an atmosphere steeped in a study of the styles and themes of 19th-century Italian art. In his earliest Parisian work, traces of this influence, and that of his studies of Renaissance art, can still be seen. His nascent work was shaped as much by such artists as Giovanni Boldini as by Toulouse-Lautrec.Modigliani showed great promise while with Micheli, and ceased his studies only when he was forced to, by the onset of tuberculosis.In 1901, whilst in Rome, Modigliani admired the work of Domenico Morelli, a painter of melodramatic religious and literary scenes. Morelli had served as an inspiration for a group of iconoclasts who were known by the title "the Macchiaioli" (from macchia —"dash of colour", or, more derogatively, "stain"), and Modigliani had already been exposed to the influences of the Macchiaioli. This localized landscape movement reacted against the bourgeois stylings of the academic genre painters. While sympathetically connected to (and actually pre-dating) the French Impressionists, the Macchiaioli did not make the same impact upon international art culture as did the contemporaries and followers of Monet, and are today largely forgotten outside of Italy.Modigliani's connection with the movement was through Guglielmo Micheli, his first art teacher. Micheli was not only a Macchiaiolo himself, but had been a pupil of the famous Giovanni Fattori, a founder of the movement. Micheli's work, however, was so fashionable and the genre so commonplace that the young Modigliani reacted against it, preferring to ignore the obsession with landscape that, as with French Impressionism, characterized the movement. Micheli also tried to encourage his pupils to paint en plein air, but Modigliani never really got a taste for this style of working, sketching in cafés, but preferring to paint indoors, and especially in his own studio. Even when compelled to paint landscapes (three are known to exist),  Modigliani chose a proto-Cubist palette more akin to Cézanne than to the Macchiaioli.While with Micheli, Modigliani studied not only landscape, but also portraiture, still life, and the nude. His fellow students recall that the last was where he displayed his greatest talent, and apparently this was not an entirely academic pursuit for the teenager: when not painting nudes, he was occupied with seducing the household maid. Despite his rejection of the Macchiaioli approach, Modigliani nonetheless found favour with his teacher, who referred to him as "Superman", a pet name reflecting the fact that Modigliani was not only quite adept at his art, but also that he regularly quoted from Nietzsche's Thus Spoke Zarathustra. Fattori himself would often visit the studio, and approved of the young artist's innovations.   In 1902, Modigliani continued what was to be a lifelong infatuation with life drawing, enrolling in the Accademia di Belle Arti (Scuola Libera di Nudo, or "Free School of Nude Studies") in Florence. A year later while still suffering from tuberculosis, he moved to Venice, where he registered to study at the Istituto di Belle Arti.It is in Venice that he first smoked hashish and, rather than studying, began to spend time frequenting disreputable parts of the city. The impact of these lifestyle choices upon his developing artistic style is open to conjecture, although these choices do seem to be more than simple teenage rebellion, or the cliched hedonism and bohemianism that was almost expected of artists of the time; his pursuit of the seedier side of life appears to have roots in his appreciation of radical philosophies, including those of Nietzsche.
Early literary influencesHaving been exposed to erudite philosophical literature as a young boy under the tutelage of Isaco Garsin, his maternal grandfather, he continued to read and be influenced through his art studies by the writings of Nietzsche, Baudelaire, Carducci, Comte de Lautréamont, and others, and developed the belief that the only route to true creativity was through defiance and disorder.Letters that he wrote from his 'sabbatical' in Capri in 1901 clearly indicate that he is being more and more influenced by the thinking of Nietzsche. In these letters, he advised friend Oscar Ghiglia; The work of Lautréamont was equally influential at this time. This doomed poet's Les Chants de Maldoror became the seminal work for the Parisian Surrealists of Modigliani's generation, and the book became Modigliani's favourite to the extent that he learnt it by heart.  The poetry of Lautréamont is characterized by the juxtaposition of fantastical elements, and by sadistic imagery; the fact that Modigliani was so taken by this text in his early teens gives a good indication of his developing tastes. Baudelaire and D'Annunzio similarly appealed to the young artist, with their interest in corrupted beauty, and the expression of that insight through Symbolist imagery.Modigliani wrote to Ghiglia extensively from Capri, where his mother had taken him to assist in his recovery from tuberculosis. These letters are a sounding board for the developing ideas brewing in Modigliani's mind. Ghiglia was seven years Modigliani's senior, and it is likely that it was he who showed the young man the limits of his horizons in Livorno. Like all precocious teenagers, Modigliani preferred the company of older companions, and Ghiglia's role in his adolescence was to be a sympathetic ear as he worked himself out, principally in the convoluted letters that he regularly sent, and which survive today.  
Paris
Arrival
In 1906, Modigliani moved to Paris, then the focal point of the avant-garde. In fact, his arrival at the centre of artistic experimentation coincided with the arrival of two other foreigners who were also to leave their marks upon the art world: Gino Severini and Juan Gris.He settled in Le Bateau-Lavoir, a commune for penniless artists in Montmartre, renting himself a studio in Rue Caulaincourt. Even though this artists' quarter of Montmartre was characterized by generalized poverty, Modigliani himself presented—initially, at least—as one would expect the son of a family trying to maintain the appearances of its lost financial standing to present: his wardrobe was dapper without ostentation, and the studio he rented was appointed in a style appropriate to someone with a finely attuned taste in plush drapery and Renaissance reproductions. He soon made efforts to assume the guise of the bohemian artist, but, even in his brown corduroys, scarlet scarf and large black hat, he continued to appear as if he were slumming it, having fallen upon harder times. When he first arrived in Paris, he wrote home regularly to his mother, he sketched his nudes at the Académie Colarossi, and he drank wine in moderation. He was at that time considered by those who knew him as a bit reserved, verging on the asocial.  He is noted to have commented, upon meeting Picasso who, at the time, was wearing his trademark workmen's clothes, that even though the man was a genius, that did not excuse his uncouth appearance. 
Transformation

Within a year of arriving in Paris, however, his demeanour and reputation had changed dramatically. He transformed himself from a dapper academician artist into a sort of prince of vagabonds.The poet and journalist Louis Latourette, upon visiting the artist's previously well-appointed studio after his transformation, discovered the place in upheaval, the Renaissance reproductions discarded from the walls, the plush drapes in disarray. Modigliani was already an alcoholic and a drug addict by this time, and his studio reflected this. Modigliani's behaviour at this time sheds some light upon his developing style as an artist, in that the studio had become almost a sacrificial effigy for all that he resented about the academic art that had marked his life and his training up to that point.Not only did he remove all the trappings of his bourgeois heritage from his studio, but he also set about destroying practically all of his own early work. He explained this extraordinary course of actions to his astonished neighbours thus: The motivation for this violent rejection of his earlier self is the subject of considerable speculation. From the time of his arrival in Paris, Modigliani consciously crafted a charade persona for himself and cultivated his reputation of hopeless drunk and voracious drug user. His escalating intake of drugs and alcohol may have been a means by which Modigliani masked his tuberculosis from his acquaintances, few of whom knew of his condition.  Tuberculosis—the leading cause of death in France by 1900 —was highly communicable, there was no cure, and those who had it were feared, ostracized, and pitied. Modigliani thrived on camaraderie and would not let himself be isolated as an invalid; he sought to suppress his coughing bouts and any other recognizable signs of the disease that was slowly consuming him. Modigliani used drink and drugs  to self-medicate, to serve as palliatives to ease his physical pain, helping him to maintain a facade of vitality and allowing him to continue to create his art. Modigliani's use of drink and drugs intensified from about 1914 onward. After years of remission and recurrence, this was the period in when the symptoms of his tuberculosis worsened, signaling that the disease had reached an advanced stage. He sought the company of artists such as Utrillo and Soutine, seeking acceptance and validation for his work from his colleagues.  Modigliani's behavior stood out even in these Bohemian surroundings: he carried on frequent affairs, drank heavily, and used absinthe and hashish. While drunk, he would sometimes strip himself naked at social gatherings.    He became the epitome of the tragic artist, creating a posthumous legend almost as well known as that of Vincent van Gogh.During the 1920s, in the wake of Modigliani's career and spurred on by comments by André Salmon crediting hashish and absinthe with the genesis of Modigliani's style, many hopefuls tried to emulate his "success" by embarking on a path of substance abuse and bohemian excess. Salmon claimed—erroneously—that whereas Modigliani was a totally pedestrian artist when sober, While this propaganda served as a rallying cry to those with a romantic longing to be a tragic, doomed artist, these strategies did not produce unique artistic insights or techniques in those who did not already have them.
In fact, art historians suggest  that it is entirely possible that Modigliani would have achieved even greater artistic heights had he not been immured in, and destroyed by, his own self-indulgences.
OutputDuring his early years in Paris, Modigliani worked at a furious pace. He was constantly sketching, making as many as a hundred drawings a day. However, many of his works were lost—destroyed by him as inferior, left behind in his frequent changes of address, or given to girlfriends who did not keep them. He was first influenced by Henri de Toulouse-Lautrec, but around 1907 he became fascinated with the work of Paul Cézanne. Eventually he developed his own unique style, one that cannot be adequately categorized with those of other artists.He met the first serious love of his life, Russian poet Anna Akhmatova, in 1910, when he was 26. They had studios in the same building, and although 21-year-old Anna was recently married, they began an affair.  Anna was tall (as Modigliani was only 5 foot 5 inches) with dark hair (like Modigliani's), pale skin and grey-green eyes, she embodied Modigliani's aesthetic ideal and the pair became engrossed in each other. After a year, however, Anna returned to her husband.
Gallery of works 
File:Amedeo-modigliani-XX-Portrait-of-Maude-Abrantes-1907.jpg|Portrait of Maude Abrantes, 1907
Image:Amedeo Modigliani - Paul Guillaume, Novo Pilota.jpg|Paul Guillaume, Novo Pilota, 1915
File:Bride and Groom.jpg|Bride and Groom, 1915
File:Amadeo Modigliani 040.jpg|Jacques and Berthe Lipchitz, 1916
File:Portrait of Beatrice Hastings Amedeo Modigliani 1916.jpeg|Portrait of Beatrice Hastings, 1916
File:Amadeo Modigliani 032.jpg|Portrait of Moise Kisling, 1915
File:Madame Kisling c1917 Amedeo Modigliani.jpg|Madame Kisling, 1917
File:Amadeo Modigliani 063.jpg|Nude Sitting on a Divan ("La Belle Romaine"), 1917
File:Amadeo Modigliani 012.jpg|Red Nude, 1917
File:Nude on a Blue Cushion.jpg|Nude on a Blue Cushon, 1917

File:Amadeo Modigliani 027.jpg|Portrait of Jeanne Hébuterne, 1918
File:Amedeo Modigliani (1884-1920) - Seated Nude, 1918.jpg|Seated Nude, 1918, Honolulu Museum of Art
File:Portrait of dedie.jpg|Dedie Hayden, 1918, Centre Georges Pompidou
File:Modigliani-autoretrato-macusp1.jpg|Self-portrait, 1919, oil on canvas, Museum of Contemporary Art, São Paulo, Brazil
File:Gypsy Woman with Baby.JPG|Gypsy Woman with Baby, 1919, National Gallery of Art
File:Amadeo Modigliani 010.jpg|The little peasant, 1918, Tate Modern, London
 
Sculpture
In 1909, Modigliani returned home to Livorno, sickly and tired from his wild lifestyle. Soon he was back in Paris, this time renting a studio in Montparnasse. He originally saw himself as a sculptor rather than a painter, and was encouraged to continue after Paul Guillaume, an ambitious young art dealer, took an interest in his work and introduced him to sculptor Constantin Brâncuşi. He was  Constantin Brâncuşi's disciple for one year.Although a series of Modigliani's sculptures were exhibited in the Salon d'Automne of 1912, by 1914 he abandoned sculpting and focused solely on his painting, a move precipitated by the difficulty in acquiring sculptural materials due to the outbreak of war, and by Modigliani's physical debilitation. In June 2010 Modigliani's Tête, a limestone carving of a woman's head, became the second most expensive sculpture ever sold.
Friends and InfluencesModigliani painted a series of portraits of contemporary artists and friends in Montparnasse: Chaim Soutine, Moise Kisling, Pablo Picasso, Diego Rivera, Marie "Marevna" Vorobyev-Stebeslka, Juan Gris, Max Jacob, Blaise Cendrars, and Jean Cocteau, all sat for stylized renditions.
The war yearsAt the outset of World War I, Modigliani tried to enlist in the army but was refused because of his poor health. Known as Modì, which translates as 'cursed' (maudit), by many Parisians, but as Dedo to his family and friends, Modigliani was a handsome man, and attracted much female attention.Women came and went until Beatrice Hastings entered his life. She stayed with him for almost two years, was the subject for several of his portraits, including Madame Pompadour, and the object of much of his drunken wrath. When the British painter Nina Hamnett arrived in Montparnasse in 1914, on her first evening there the smiling man at the next table in the café introduced himself as Modigliani; painter and Jew. They became great friends.In 1916, Modigliani befriended the Polish poet and art dealer Leopold Zborowski and his wife Anna. Zborowski became Modigliani's primary art dealer and friend during the artist's final years, helping him financially, and also organizing his show in Paris in 1917.
The 1917 Paris Show
The several dozen nudes Modigliani painted between 1916 and 1919 constitute many of his best-known works. This series of nudes was commissioned by Modigliani's dealer and friend Leopold Zborowski, who lent the artist use of his apartment, supplied models and painting materials, and paid him between fifteen and twenty francs each day for his work. The paintings from this arrangement were thus different from his previous depictions of friends and lovers in that they were funded by Zborowski either for his own collection, as a favor to his friend, or with an eye to their "commercial potential", rather than originating from the artist's personal circle of acquaintances.  The Paris show of 1917 was Modigliani's only solo exhibition during his life, and is "notorious" in modern art history for its sensational public reception and the attendant issues of obscenity. Klein, Mason, et al, 56  The show was closed by police on its opening day, but continued thereafter, most likely after the removal of paintings from the gallery's streetfront window. Klein, Mason, et al, 56 Nude Sitting on a Divan is one of a series of nudes painted by Modigliani in 1917 that created a sensation when exhibited in Paris that year. According to the catalogue description from the 2010 sale of the painting at Sotheby's, seven nudes were exhibited in the 1917 show.
Jeanne Hébuterne
In the spring of 1917, the Russian sculptor Chana Orloff introduced him to a beautiful 19-year-old art student named Jeanne Hébuterne  who had posed for Tsuguharu Foujita. From a conservative bourgeois background, Hébuterne was renounced by her devout Roman Catholic family for her liaison with the painter, whom they saw as little more than a debauched derelict. Despite her family's objections, soon they were living together, and although Hébuterne was the current love of his life, their public scenes became more renowned than Modigliani's individual drunken exhibitions. On December 3, 1917, Modigliani's first one-man exhibition opened at the Berthe Weill Gallery. The chief of the Paris police was scandalized by Modigliani's nudes and forced him to close the exhibition within a few hours after its opening.After he and Hébuterne moved to Nice, she became pregnant, and on November 29, 1918, gave birth to a daughter whom they named Jeanne (1918–1984). When Modigliani died on January 24, 1920, Hébuterne was pregnant with their second child.
Nice
On a trip to Nice which had been conceived and organized by Leopold Zborowski, Modigliani, Foujita and other artists tried to sell their works to rich tourists. Modigliani managed to sell a few pictures, but only for a few francs each. Despite this, during this time he produced most of the paintings that later became his most popular and valued works. During his lifetime, he sold a number of his works, but never for any great amount of money. What funds he did receive soon vanished for his habits. In May 1919 he returned to Paris, where, with Hébuterne and their daughter, he rented an apartment in the rue de la Grande Chaumière. While there, Jeanne Hébuterne and Amedeo Modigliani painted portraits of each other, and of themselves. 
Death
Although he continued to paint, Modigliani's health was deteriorating rapidly, and his alcohol-induced blackouts became more frequent.In 1920, after not hearing from him for several days, his downstairs neighbour checked on the family and found Modigliani in bed delirious and holding onto Hébuterne, who was nearly nine months pregnant. They summoned a doctor, but little could be done because Modigliani was in the final stage of his disease, dying of tubercular meningitis.Modigliani died on January 24, 1920. There was an enormous funeral, attended by many from the artistic communities in Montmartre and Montparnasse.Hébuterne was taken to her parents' home, where, inconsolable, she threw herself out of a fifth-floor window, a day after Modigliani's death, killing herself and her unborn child. Modigliani was interred in Père Lachaise Cemetery. Hébuterne was buried at the Cimetière de Bagneux near Paris, and it was not until 1930 that her embittered family allowed her body to be moved to rest beside Modigliani. A single tombstone honors them both. His epitaph reads: "Struck down by Death at the moment of glory." Hers reads: "Devoted companion to the extreme sacrifice."    Modigliani died penniless and destitute—managing only one solo exhibition in his life and giving his work away in exchange for meals in restaurants. Since his death, his reputation has soared. Nine novels, a play, a documentary, and three feature films have been devoted to his life. In November 2010, a painting of a nude by Amedeo Modigliani, part of a series of nudes he created around 1917, sold for more than $68.9m (£42.7m) at an auction in New York—a record for the artist's work. Bidding for "La Belle Romaine" pushed its price well past its $40m (£24.8m) estimate. Modigliani's previous auction record was 43.2m euros (£35.8m), set earlier this year in Paris. Another painting by the artist—Jeanne Hebuterne (au chapeau), one of the first portraits he painted of his lover—sold for $19.1m (£11.8m), high above its estimate of $9–12m (£5.6-7.4m). 
Legacy
The linear form of African sculpture and the depictive humanism of the figurative Renaissance painters informed his work. Working during that fertile period of “isms,” Cubism, Dadaism, Surrealism, Futurism, Modigliani did not choose to be categorized within any of these prevailing, defining confines. He was unclassifiable, stubbornly insisting on his difference. He was an artist putting down paint on canvas creating works not to shock and outrage, but to say, “This is what I see.” More appreciated over the years by collectors than academicians and critics, Modigliani was indifferent to staking a claim for himself in the intellectual avant-garde of the art world. One can say he recognized the merit of Jean Cocteau’s proclamation: “Ne t’attendes pas avec l’avante garde,” (“Don’t pay attention to the avante garde”).  
Modigliani's sister in Florence adopted their daughter, Jeanne (1918–1984). As an adult, she wrote a biography of her father titled, Modigliani: Man and Myth.
Critical reactionsPeter Schjeldahl wrote:

I recall my thrilled first exposure, as a teenager, to one of his long-necked women, with their piquantly tipped heads and mask-like faces. The rakish stylization and the succulent color were easy to enjoy, and the payoff was sanguinely erotic in a way that endorsed my personal wishes to be bold and tender and noble, overcoming the wimp that I was. In that moment, I used up Modigliani's value for my life. But in museums ever since I have been happy to salute his pictures with residually grateful, quick looks. Peter Schjeldahl, Book review of Meryle Secrest’s “Modigliani: A Life”, The New Yorker, March 7, 2011 Abstract 

Schjeldahl reports Meryle Secrest’s speculation that Modigliani was happy to let people consider him an alcoholic and drug addict, "and thus to mistake the symptoms of his tuberculosis, which he kept a secret. Drunks were tolerated; carriers of infectious diseases were not." 
CinemaTwo films have been made about Modigliani: Les Amants de Montparnasse in 1958, directed by Jacques Becker, and Modigliani in 2004, directed by Mick Davis starring Andy García as Modigliani.Red Nude (1917) plays an important part in the 1972 film Travels with My Aunt. The slyly winking face of Maggie Smith, complete with bright red hair, seems to have been superimposed onto the original painting.The 1968 French film, Le tatoué features a fictional Legionnaire who has his back covered by a tattoo done by Modigliani. Since after his death, works by Modigliani have skyrocketed in value, an art dealer spends the movie trying to get the tattoo off the back of the Legionnaire, and into a museum.
Selected works
Paintings

Head of a Woman with a Hat (1907)
Portrait of Juan Gris (1915)
Portrait of the Art Dealer Paul Guillaume (1916)
Portrait of Jean Cocteau (1916)
Seated Nude (ca. 1918) Honolulu Museum of Art
Portrait of Jeanne Hébuterne (1918)
Woman with a Fan (1919), stolen from the Museum of Modern Art in Paris on  
Portrait of Marios Varvoglis (1920; Modigliani's last painting)


Sculptures(Only 27 sculptures by Modigliani are known to exist. )

Head of a Woman (1910/1911).
Head (1911–1913).
Head (1911–1912).
Head (1912).
Rose Caryatid (1914).


See also

Painting the Century: 101 Portrait Masterpieces 1900-2000
Lille Métropole Museum of Modern, Contemporary and Outsider Art
Nude Sitting on a Divan


References 
External links 
 

Works art PubHist
Modigliani: Beyond the Myth, The Jewish Museum, New York 2004
Modigliani and His Models, The Royal Academy of Arts, London 2006
Review of Exhibition Modigliani at the Royal Academy of Arts, London
Rats' teeth and empty eyes, a disparaging view of Modigliani's work in The Guardian's review of the RA show of 2006.
Modigliani's Jewish influences

  
 
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Imre Nagy
 
 
 
 
Imre Nagy (7 June 1896 – 16 June 1958) was a Hungarian communist politician who was appointed Chairman of the Council of Ministers of the People's Republic of Hungary on two occasions. Nagy's second term ended when his non-Soviet-backed government was brought down by Soviet invasion in the failed Hungarian Revolution of 1956, resulting in Nagy's execution on charges of treason two years later.
Early life and careerNagy ( ) was born in Kaposvár, to a peasant family and was apprenticed to a locksmith. He enlisted in the Austro-Hungarian Army during World War I and served on the Eastern Front. He was taken prisoner in 1915. He became a member of the Russian Communist Party, and joined the Red Army.Nagy returned to Hungary in 1921. In 1930 he travelled to the Soviet Union and joined the communist party. He was engaged in agricultural research, and also worked in the Hungarian section of the Comintern. He was expelled from the party in 1936 and later worked for the Soviet Statistical Service. Rumours that he was an agent of the Soviet secret service surfaced later, begun by Hungarian party-leader Károly Grósz in 1989 in an attempt to discredit Nagy.   There is evidence, however, that Nagy did serve as an informant for the NKVD during his time in Moscow and provided names to the secret police as a way to prove his loyalty (not an uncommon tactic for foreign communists in the Soviet Union at the time). Gati, Charles (2006). Failed Illusions: Moscow, Washington, Budapest and the 1956 Hungarian Revolt, p. 42. Stanford University Press. ISBN 0-8047-5606-6. After the war Nagy returned to Hungary. He was the Minister of Agriculture in the government of Béla Miklós de Dálnok, delegated by the Hungarian Communist Party. He distributed land among the peasant population. In the next government, led by Tildy, he was the Minister of Interior. At this period he played an active role controlling the expulsion of Germans. In the Communist government, he served as Minister of Agriculture and in other posts. He was also Speaker of the National Assembly of Hungary 1947–1949.  After two years as Chairman of the Council of Ministers of the People's Republic of Hungary (1953–1955), during which he promoted his "New Course" in Socialism, Nagy fell out of favour with the Soviet Politburo. He was deprived of his Hungarian Central Committee, Politburo and all other Party functions and on 18 April 1955, he was sacked as Chairman of the Council of Ministers.
Revolution Nagy became Chairman of the Council of Ministers of the People's Republic of Hungary again, this time by popular demand, during the anti-Soviet revolution in 1956. Soon he moved toward a multiparty political system.On 1 November, he announced Hungary's withdrawal from the Warsaw Pact and appealed through the UN for the great powers, such as the United States and the United Kingdom, to recognise Hungary's status as a neutral state.   Throughout this period, Nagy remained steadfastly committed to Marxism; but his conception of Marxism was as "a science that cannot remain static", and he railed against the "rigid dogmatism" of "the Stalinist monopoly". When the revolution was crushed by the Soviet invasion of Hungary, Nagy, with a few others, was given sanctuary in the Yugoslav Embassy. In spite of a written safe conduct of free passage by János Kádár, on 22 November, Nagy was arrested by the Soviet forces as he was leaving the Yugoslav Embassy, and taken to Snagov, Romania.
Secret trial and execution
Subsequently, the Soviets returned him to Hungary, where he was secretly charged with organising the overthrow of the Hungarian people's democratic state and with treason. Nagy was secretly tried, found guilty, sentenced to death and executed by hanging in June 1958.  His trial and execution were made public only after the sentence had been carried out.  According to Fedor Burlatsky, a Kremlin insider,  Nikita Khrushchev had Nagy executed, "as a lesson to all other leaders in socialist countries." He was buried, along with his co-defendants, in the prison yard where the executions were carried out and years later was moved to a distant corner (section 301) of the Municipal Cemetery of Budapest.,  face-down, and with his hands and feet tied with barbed wire. Next to his grave stands a memorial bell inscribed in Latin, Hungarian, German and English. The Latin reads: "Vivos voco / Mortuos plango / Fulgura frango," which is translated as: "I call the living, I mourn the dead, I master (lit. "break") the lightning." 
Memorials and political rehabilitation
During the time when the Communist leadership of Hungary would not permit his death to be commemorated, or permit access to his burial place, a cenotaph in his honour was erected in Père Lachaise Cemetery in Paris.In 1989, Imre Nagy was rehabilitated and his remains reburied on the 31st anniversary of his execution in the same plot after a funeral organised in part by opponents of the country's communist regime.  Over 100,000 people are estimated to have attended Nagy's reinterment.  The occasion of Nagy's funeral was an important factor in the end of the Communist government in Hungary.
Writings
The collected writings of Nagy, most of which he wrote after his dismissal as Chairman of the Council of Ministers in April 1955, were smuggled out of Hungary and published in the West under the title "Imre Nagy on Communism".
Family
Nagy was married to Mária Égető. The couple had one daughter, Erzsébet Nagy (1927–2008), a Hungarian writer and translator.    Erzsébet Nagy married Ferenc Jánosi. Imre Nagy did not object to his daughter's romance and eventual marriage to a Protestant minister, attending their religious wedding ceremony in 1946 without Politburo permission. In 1982, Erzsébet Nagy married János Vészi. 
Nagy in film and the arts
In 2003 and 2004, the Hungarian director Márta Mészáros produced a film based on Nagy's life after the revolution, entitled A Temetetlen halott (English: The Unburied Body) (IMDb entry).Nagy is mentioned and seen in the movie Children of Glory.
Imre Nagy's home in Budapest 
Image:Budapest-Orso-u-Imre-Nagy-home-CIMG1796.jpg
Image:Budapest-Orso-u-Imre-Nagy-Home-CIMG1795.jpg
 
References 
Further reading


Gyula Háy (Julius Hay). Born 1900: memoirs. Hutchinson: 1974.
Granville, Johanna. "Imre Nagy aka 'Volodya' – A Dent in the Martyr's Halo?", "Cold War International History Project Bulletin", no. 5 (Woodrow Wilson Center for International Scholars, Washington, DC), Spring, 1995, pp. 28, and 34–37.   
Granville, Johanna, The First Domino: International Decision Making During the Hungarian Crisis of 1956, Texas A & M University Press, 2004. ISBN 1-58544-298-4
KGB Chief Vladimir Kryuchkov to CC CPSU, 16 June 1989 (trans. Johanna Granville). Cold War International History Project Bulletin 5 (1995): 36 [from: TsKhSD, F. 89, Per. 45, Dok. 82.]
Alajos Dornbach, The Secret Trial of Imre Nagy, Greenwood Press, 1995. ISBN 0-275-94332-1
Peter Unwin, Voice in the Wilderness: Imre Nagy and the Hungarian Revolution, Little, Brown, 1991. ISBN 0-356-20316-6
Karl Benziger, Imre Nagy, Martyr Of The Nation: Contested History, Legitimacy, and Popular Memory in Hungary. Lexington Books, 2008. ISBN 0-7391-2330-0


Primary sources


Johanna Granville, trans., "Soviet Archival Documents on the Hungarian Revolution, 24 October – 4 November 1956",
Cold War International History Project Bulletin, no. 5 (Woodrow Wilson Center for International Scholars, Washington, DC), Spring, 1995, pp. 22–23, 29–34. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT






















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Simone Signoret
 
Simone Signoret ( ; 25 March 1921 30 September 1985) was a French cinema actress often hailed as one of France's greatest film stars. She became the first French person to win an Academy Award, for her role in Room at the Top (1959). In her lifetime she also received a BAFTA, an Emmy, Golden Globe, Cannes Film Festival recognition and the Silver Bear for Best Actress.
Early lifeSignoret was born Simone Henriette Charlotte Kaminker in Wiesbaden, Germany to André and Georgette (Signoret) Kaminker as the eldest of three children, with two younger brothers. Her father, a pioneering interpreter who worked in the League of Nations, was a French-born Jewish army officer of Polish descent,  who brought the family to Neuilly-sur-Seine on the outskirts of Paris. Her mother Georgette, from whom she acquired her stage name, was a French Catholic.  Signoret grew up in Paris in an intellectual atmosphere and studied the English language in school, earning a teaching certificate. She tutored English and Latin and worked part-time as a typist for a French collaborationist newspaper, Les nouveaux temps, run by Jean Luchaire.
CareerDuring the German occupation of France, Signoret mixed with an artistic group of writers and actors who met at a café in the Saint-Germain-des-Prés quarter, Café de Flore. By this time, she had developed an interest in acting and was encouraged by her friends, including her lover, Daniel Gélin, to follow her ambition. In 1942, she began appearing in bit parts and was able to earn enough money to support her mother and two brothers as her father, who was a French patriot, had fled the country in 1940 to join General De Gaulle in England. She took her mother's maiden name for the screen to help hide her Jewish roots.Signoret's sensual features and earthy nature led to type-casting and she was often seen in roles as a prostitute. She won considerable attention in La Ronde (1950), a film which was banned briefly in New York as immoral. She won further acclaim, including an acting award from the British Film Academy, for her portrayal of another prostitute in Jacques Becker's Casque d'or (1951). She appeared in many notable films in France during the 1950s, including Thérèse Raquin (1953), directed by Marcel Carné, Les Diaboliques (1954), and The Crucible (Les Sorcières de Salem; 1956), based on Arthur Miller's The Crucible.

In 1958, Signoret acted in the English set Room at the Top (1959), which won her numerous awards including the Best Female Performance Prize at Cannes and the Academy Award for Best Actress. She was the only French cinema actress to receive an Oscar until Juliette Binoche in 1997 (Supporting Actress) and Marion Cotillard in 2008 (Best Actress), and the first woman to win the award appearing in a foreign film. She was offered films in Hollywood, but turned them down and continued to work in France and England. She played opposite Laurence Olivier in Term of Trial (1962). She did work in America for Ship of Fools (1965), which earned her another Oscar nomination, and appeared in a few other Hollywood films before returning to France in 1969.In 1962 she translated Lillian Hellman's play The Little Foxes into French for a production in Paris that ran for six months at the Theatre Sarah-Bernhardt. She played the Regina role as well. Hellman was displeased with the production, although the translation was approved by scholars selected by Hellman. Her one attempt at Shakespeare, performing Lady Macbeth opposite Alec Guinness at the Royal Court Theatre in London in 1966 proved to be ill-advised, although some critics were harsher and one referred to her English as "impossibly Gallic". In her later years, she was often criticised for gaining weight and letting her looks go, but Signoret, who was never concerned with glamour, ignored the insults and continued giving finely etched performances. She won more acclaim for her portrayal of a weary madam in Madame Rosa (1977) and as an unmarried sister who unknowingly falls in love with her paralyzed brother via anonymous correspondence in I Sent a Letter to my Love (1980). Her memoirs, Nostalgia Isn't What It Used To Be, were published in 1978. She also wrote a novel, Adieu Volodya, published in 1985, the year of her death.First married to the filmmaker Yves Allégret (1944–49), with whom she had a daughter Catherine Allégret, herself an actress. Her second marriage was to the Italian-born French actor Yves Montand in 1950, a union which lasted until her death. A lifelong chain smoker, she died of pancreatic cancer in Auteuil-Anthouillet, France, and is buried in Père Lachaise Cemetery in Paris next to her second husband.
Filmography

Year Title Role Notes 
1942 Boléro   uncredited 
1942   Extra uncredited 
1942     
1943 Adieu Léonard   uncredited 
1943   Extra uncredited 
1944     uncredited 
1944   La maitresse de Firmin  
1944 Service de nuit    
1944 Béatrice devant le désir   
1945     uncredited 
1946 Back Streets of Paris Gisèle  
1946   Annette  
1946   Lily, la cabaretière  
1947 Fantômas Hélène  
1948 Impasse des deux anges Marianne  
1948 Dédée d'Anvers Dédée  
1948 Against the Wind Michele Dennis  
1950 Manèges Dora  
1950 Gunman in the Streets Denise Vernon a French version was also filmed as Le Traqué 
1950   Leocadie, the Prostitute  
1950 Swiss Tour Yvonne  
1951 Ombre et lumière Isabelle Leritz  
1951 ...Sans laisser d'adresse   uncredited 
1952 Casque d'or Marie 'Casque d'Or' BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role 
1953 Thérèse Raquin Thérèse Raquin  
1955 Mother Courage and Her Children Yvette, Lagerhure  
1955   Nicole Horner Diabolique 
1956   Janine Alix  
1956 Death in the Garden Djin  
1957   Elisabeth Procter BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role 
1957 Die Windrose   
1959 Room at the Top Alice Aisgill   
1960 Adua and Friends Adua Giovannetti  
1960   Roberte  
1960 Amours célèbres Jenny segment "Jenny de Lacour" 
1961 Barabbas   
1962   Unconfirmed  
1962 Term of Trial Anna  
1963 Sweet and Sour Genevieve  
1963   Therese Dutheil  
1965   Eliane Darès  
1965 Ship of Fools     
1966 Is Paris Burning?    
1966   Elsa Fennan Nominated — BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Supporting Role 
1967 Games Lisa Schindler Nominated — BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role 
1968   Arkadina, an actress  
1969   Léone  
1969 Army of Shadows Mathilde  
1969 Mr. Freedom  uncredited cameo 
1970   Mme L. aka Lise London  
1971   Veuve Couderc Tati  
1971   Clémence Bouin Silver Bear for Best Actress at the 21st Berlin International Film Festival    
1971 Comptes à rebours Léa  
1973 Rude journée pour la reine Jeanne  
1973   Rose  
1975   Lady Vamos  
1976 Police Python 357 Thérèse Ganay  
1977 Madame Rosa Madame Rosa   
1978 Judith Therpauve Judith Therpauve  
1979   Mamie  
1980 Chère inconnue Louise  
1982 Guy de Maupassant Maupassant's mother  
1982   Mme Louise Baron Nominated — César Award for Best Actress 

Television awardEmmy Awards

1966: Won Emmy Outstanding Single Performance by an Actress in a Leading Role in a Drama for: Bob Hope Presents the Chrysler Theatre (1963) for episode A Small Rebellion


Popular Culture

Marilyn (2011) by Sue Glover, premiered at the Citizens' Theatre, Glasgow on 17 February 2011. The play charted the deteriorating relationship between Signoret and Marilyn Monroe during the filming of Let's Make Love. Unable to achieve the recognition of Oscar-winning Signoret, Monroe begins an affair with Signoret's husband, Yves Montand.


See also 

Cinema of France
César Award for Best Actress


References 
Bibliography

Monush, Barry (ed), The Encyclopedia of Hollywood Film Actors From the Silent Era to 1965. New York: Applause Books, 2003. ISBN 1-55783-551-9
Signoret, Simone, Nostalgia Isn't What It Used To Be. Weidenfeld and Nicolson, 1978. ISBN 0-297-77417-4


External links

 
 
 

  
 
DEFAULTSORT













 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Man Ray
 
 Man Ray (born Emmanuel Radnitzky, August 27, 1890 November 18, 1976) was an American modernist artist who spent most of his career in Paris, France. He was a significant contributor to the Dada and Surrealist movements, although his ties to each were informal. He produced major works in a variety of media but considered himself a painter above all. He was best known in the art world for his avant-garde photography, and he was a renowned fashion and portrait photographer. Ray is also noted for his work with photograms, which he called "rayographs" in reference to himself. Ray's work was not appreciated during his lifetime, with the exception of his fashion and portrait photography; especially in his native United States. Nevertheless, his reputation has grown steadily in the decades since. 
Life and career
Background and early lifeDuring his career as an artist, Man Ray allowed few details of his early life or family background to be known to the public. He even refused to acknowledge that he ever had a name other than Man Ray. Baldwin, Neil.  Man Ray: American Artist ; Da Capo Press; ISBN 0-306-81014-X (1988, 2000) Man Ray was born as Emmanuel Radnitzky in South Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, U.S. in 1890.  He was the eldest child of Russian Jewish immigrants.  He had a brother and two sisters, the youngest born in 1897 shortly after they settled in the Williamsburg  neighborhood of Brooklyn, New York. In early 1912, the Radnitzky family changed their surname to Ray. Man Ray's brother chose the surname in reaction to the ethnic discrimination and anti-Semitism prevalent at the time. Emmanuel, who was called "Manny" as a nickname, changed his first name to Man and gradually began to use Man Ray as his combined single name.  Francis Naumann;  Conversion to Modernism: The Early Work of Man Ray ; Rutgers University Press; ISBN 0-8135-3148-9 (2003). Man Ray's father worked in a garment factory and ran a small tailoring business out of the family home. He enlisted his children to assist him from an early age. Man Ray's mother enjoyed designing the family's clothes and inventing patchwork items from scraps of fabric.  Man Ray wished to disassociate himself from his family background, but their tailoring left an enduring mark on his art. Mannequins, flat irons, sewing machines, needles, pins, threads, swatches of fabric, and other items related to tailoring appear in almost every medium of his work. Milly Heyd; "Man Ray/Emmanuel Rudnitsky: Who is Behind the Enigma of Isidore Ducasse?"; in  Complex Identities: Jewish Consciousness and Modern Art ; ed. Matthew Baigell and Milly Heyd; Rutgers University Press; ISBN 0-8135-2869-0 (2001).  Art historians have noted similarities between Ray's collage and painting techniques and styles used for tailoring. Mason Klein, curator of a Man Ray exhibition at the Jewish Museum entitled Alias Man Ray: The Art of Reinvention, suggests that the artist may have been "the first Jewish avant-garde artist."   
First artistic endeavors
Man Ray displayed artistic and mechanical abilities during childhood. His education at Brooklyn's Boys' High School from 1904 to 1908 provided him with solid grounding in drafting and other basic art techniques. While he attended school, he educated himself with frequent visits to the local art museums, where he studied the works of the Old Masters. After his graduation, Ray was offered a scholarship to study architecture but chose to pursue a career as an artist. Ray's parents were disappointed by their son's decision to pursue art, but they agreed to rearrange the family's modest living quarters so that Ray's room could be his studio. Ray remained in the family home over the next four years. During this time, he worked steadily towards becoming a professional painter. Ray earned money as a commercial artist and was a technical illustrator at several Manhattan companies.  The surviving examples of his work from this period indicate that he attempted mostly paintings and drawings in 19th-century styles. He was already an avid admirer of contemporary avant-garde art, such as the European modernists he saw at Alfred Stieglitz's "291" gallery and works by the Ashcan School. However, with a few exceptions, he was not yet able to integrate these trends into his own work. The art classes he sporadically attended—including stints at the National Academy of Design and the Art Students League—were of little apparent benefit to him. When he enrolled in the Ferrer School in the autumn of 1912, he began a period of intense and rapid artistic development. 
New YorkWhile living in New York City, Man Ray was visually influenced by the 1913 Armory Show and galleries of European contemporary works. His early paintings display facets of cubism. After befriending Marcel Duchamp, who was interested in showing movement in static paintings, his works began to depict movement of the figures. An example is the repetitive positions of the dancer's skirts in The Rope Dancer Accompanies Herself with Shadows (1916).    In 1915, Man Ray had his first solo show of paintings and drawings. His first proto-Dada object, an assemblage titled Self-Portrait, was exhibited the following year. He produced his first significant photographs in 1918.
Man Ray abandoned conventional painting to involve himself with Dada, a radical anti-art movement. He started making objects and developed unique mechanical and photographic methods of making images. For the 1918 version of Rope Dancer, he combined a spray-gun technique with a pen drawing. Like Duchamp, he did readymades—ordinary objects that are selected and modified. His Gift readymade (1921) is a flatiron with metal tacks attached to the bottom, and Enigma of Isidore Ducasse  is an unseen object (a sewing machine) wrapped in cloth and tied with cord. Aerograph (1919), another work from this period, was done with airbrush on glass. In 1920, Ray helped Duchamp make the Rotary Glass Plates, his  first machine and one of the earliest examples of kinetic art. It was composed of glass plates turned by a motor. That same year, Man Ray, Katherine Dreier, and Duchamp founded the Société Anonyme, an itinerant collection that was the first museum of modern art in the U.S.Ray teamed up with Duchamp to publish one issue of New York Dada in 1920. For Man Ray, Dada's experimentation was no match for the wild and chaotic streets of New York.    He wrote that "Dada cannot live in New York. All New York is dada, and will not tolerate a rival." In 1913, Man Ray met his first wife, the Belgian poet Adon Lacroix, in New York. They married in 1914, separated in 1919, and formally divorced in 1937. 
ParisIn July 1921, Man Ray went to live and work in Paris, France. He soon settled in the Montparnasse quarter favored by many artists. Shortly after arriving in Paris, he met and fell in love with Kiki de Montparnasse (Alice Prin), an artists' model and celebrated character in Paris bohemian circles. Kiki was Man Ray's companion for most of the 1920s. She became the subject of some of his most famous photographic images and starred in his experimental films. In 1929, he began a love affair with the Surrealist photographer Lee Miller.For the next 20 years in Montparnasse, Man Ray was a distinguished photographer. Significant members of the art world, such as James Joyce, Gertrude Stein, Jean Cocteau, Bridget Bate Tichenor,    and Antonin Artaud, posed for his camera.Man Ray was represented in the first Surrealist exhibition with Jean Arp, Max Ernst, André Masson, Joan Miró, and Pablo Picasso at the Galerie Pierre in Paris in 1925. A metronome with an eye, originally titled Object to Be Destroyed, was one of his works from the time. Another important work from the time was the Violon d'Ingres,  a stunning photograph of Kiki de Montparnasse,  styled after the painter/musician Ingres. Violon d'Ingres is a popular example of how Man Ray could juxtapose disparate elements in his photography to generate meaning. In 1934, surrealist artist Méret Oppenheim, known for her fur-covered teacup, posed nude for Man Ray in a well-known series of photographs depicting her standing next to a printing press. With Lee Miller, his photography assistant and lover, Man Ray reinvented the photographic technique of solarization. He also created a type of photogram he called "rayographs", which he described as "pure dadaism". Man Ray directed a number of influential avant-garde short films, known as Cinéma Pur. He directed Le Retour à la Raison (2 mins, 1923); Emak-Bakia (16 mins, 1926); L'Étoile de Mer (15 mins, 1928); and Les Mystères du Château de Dé (27 mins, 1929). Man Ray also assisted Marcel Duchamp with the cinematography of his film Anemic Cinema (1926), and Ray personally manned the camera on Fernand Léger's Ballet Mécanique (1924). In René Clair's film Entr'acte (1924), Man Ray appeared in a brief scene playing chess with Duchamp. Duchamp, Man Ray, and Francis Picabia were friends and collaborators. The three were connected by their experimental, entertaining, and innovative art.  
Later life
Man Ray was forced to return from Paris to the United States due to the Second World War. He lived in Los Angeles, California from 1940 to 1951. A few days after arriving in Los Angeles, Man Ray met Juliet Browner, a first-generation American of Romanian-Jewish lineage. She was a trained dancer and an experienced artists' model.  They began living together almost immediately. The two married in 1946 in a double wedding with their friends Max Ernst and Dorothea Tanning. Nonetheless, he called Montparnasse home and returned there.In 1963, he published his autobiography, Self-Portrait, which was republished in 1999 (ISBN 0-8212-2474-3).He died in Paris on November 18, 1976 from a lung infection. He was interred in the Cimetière du Montparnasse in Paris. Ray's epitaph reads "unconcerned, but not indifferent". When Juliet Browner died in 1991, she was interred in the same tomb. Her epitaph reads "together again". Juliet organized a trust for his work and donated much of his work to museums.
AccoladesIn 1999, ARTnews magazine named Ray one of the 25 most influential artists of the 20th century. The publication cited his groundbreaking photography, "his explorations of film, painting, sculpture, collage, assemblage and prototypes of what would eventually be called performance art and conceptual art." ARTnews further stated that "Man Ray offered artists in all media an example of a creative intelligence that, in its 'pursuit of pleasure and liberty', unlocked every door it came to and walked freely where it would." Seeking pleasure and liberty was one of Ray's guiding principles, along with others such as doing things that are socially prohibited. Coleman, A. D. "Willful Provocateur"; ARTnews, May 1999. 
  
Quotations
By Man Ray


"It has never been my object to record my dreams, just the determination to realize them."  —  Julien Levy exhibition catalog, April 1945.



"There is no progress in art, any more than there is progress in making love. There are simply different ways of doing it."  —  1948 essay, "To Be Continued, Unnoticed".



"To create is divine, to reproduce is human."  —  "Originals Graphic Multiples", circa 1968; published in Objets de Mon Affection, 1983.



"I paint what cannot be photographed, that which comes from the imagination or from dreams, or from an unconscious drive. I photograph the things that I do not wish to paint, the things which already have an existence."  —  Undated interview, circa 1970s; published in Man Ray: Photographer, 1981.



"I have been accused of being a joker. But the most successful art to me involves humor."  —  Undated interview, circa 1970s; published in Man Ray: Photographer, 1981.



"An original is a creation motivated by desire. Any reproduction of an original is motivated by necessity. It is marvelous that we are the only species that creates gratuitous forms. To create is divine, to reproduce is human."



"Of course, there will always be those who look only at technique, who ask 'how', while others of a more curious nature will ask 'why'. Personally, I have always preferred inspiration to information."



"I do not photograph nature. I photograph my visions." 


About Man Ray

"MAN RAY, n.m. synon. de Joie jouer jouir." (Translation: "MAN RAY, masculine noun, synonymous with joy, to play, to enjoy.")  —  Marcel Duchamp, as the opening epigram for Man Ray's memoir Self-Portrait, 1963.



"With him you could try anything—there was nothing you were told not to do, except spill the chemicals. With Man Ray, you were free to do what your imagination conjured, and that kind of encouragement was wonderful."  —  Artist and photographer, Naomi Savage, Man Ray's niece and protégée, in a 2000 newspaper interview.



"Man Ray is a youthful alchemist forever in quest of the painter's philosopher's stone. May he never find it, as that would bring an end to his experimentations which are the very condition of living art expression."  —  Adolf Wolff, "Art Notes", International 8, no. 1 (January 1914), p. 21.



"[Man Ray was] a kind of short man who looked a little like Mr. Peepers, spoke slowly with a slight Brooklynese accent, and talked so you could never tell when he was kidding."  —  Brother-in-law Joseph Browner on his first impression of the artist; quoted in the Fresno Bee, August 26, 1990.


Selected books by Man Ray

Ray, Man; and Tristan Tzara (1922). Champs délicieux: album de photographies. Paris: [Société générale d'imprimerie et d'édition].
Ray, Man (1926). Revolving doors, 1916-1917: 10 planches. Paris: Éditions Surrealistes.
Ray, Man (1934). Man Ray: photographs, 1920–1934, Paris. Hartford, CT: James Thrall Soby.
Éluard, Paul, and Man Ray (1935). Facile. Paris: Éditions G.L.M.
Ray, Man; and André Breton (1937). La photographie n'est pas l'art. Paris: Éditions G.L.M.
Ray, Man; and Paul Éluard (1937). Les mains libres: dessins. Paris: Éditions Jeanne Bucher.
Ray, Man (1948). Alphabet for adults. Beverly Hills, CA: Copley Galleries.
Ray, Man (1963). Self portrait. London: Andre Deutsch.
Ray, Man; and L. Fritz Gruber (1963). Portraits. Gütersloh, Germany: Sigbert Mohn Verlag.


Notes 
References

Alexandrian, Sarane.  Man Ray ; J. P. O'Hara; ISBN 0-87955-603-X (1973).
Allan, Kenneth R. “Metamorphosis in 391: A Cryptographic Collaboration by Francis Picabia, Man Ray, and Erik Satie” in Art History 34, No. 1 (February, 2011): 102-125. 
Baldwin, Neil.  Man Ray: American Artist ; Da Capo Press; ISBN 0-306-81014-X (1988, 2000).
Coleman, A. D. "Willful Provocateur"; ARTnews, May 1999.
Heyd, Milly. "Man Ray/Emmanuel Radnitsky: Who is Behind the Enigma of Isidore Ducasse?"; in  Complex Identities: Jewish Consciousness and Modern Art ; ed. Matthew Baigell and Milly Heyd; Rutgers University Press; ISBN 0-8135-2869-0 (2001).
Naumann, Francis.  Conversion to Modernism: The Early Work of Man Ray ; Rutgers University Press; ISBN 0-8135-3148-9 (2003).
Mileaf, Janine. "Between You and Me: Man Ray's Object to be Destroyed," Art Journal 63, No. 1 (Spring 2004): 4-23.
Brown, Gaye; Axelrod, Alan, eds. Perpetual Motif: The Art of Man Ray. Washington: National Museum of American Art; New York: Abbeville Press, 1988.


External links 
 
 

Works by Man Ray -- Official Licensing Archive. Searchable; over 1,000 photos
Man Ray Trust
 
Works by Man Ray in Europeana
Biography of Man Ray at J. Paul Getty Museum
London Transport Posters by Man Ray
Brief biography of Man Ray by the Biography Resource Center, Gale Group
Collection of Man Ray short films
Omnibus of Man Ray
 
 
Man Ray letters and album, 1922-1976. Research Library at the Getty Research Institute. Los Angeles, California.
Man Ray exhibition at Museo del Banco de la República, Bogotá, Colombia
Man Ray in the National Gallery of Australia's Kenneth Tyler collection

  
DEFAULTSORT





















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Irène Joliot-Curie
 Irène Joliot-Curie (12 September 1897-17 March 1956) was a French scientist, the daughter of Marie Skłodowska-Curie and Pierre Curie and the wife of Frédéric Joliot-Curie. Jointly with her husband, Joliot-Curie was awarded the Nobel Prize for chemistry in 1935 for their discovery of artificial radioactivity. This made the Curies the family with most Nobel laureates to date.   Both children of the Joliot-Curies, Hélène and Pierre, are also esteemed scientists. 
Biography

Early years
Curie was born in Paris, France. After a year of traditional education, which began when she was 10 years old, her parents realized her obvious mathematical talent and decided that Irène’s academic abilities needed a more challenging environment. Marie joined forces with a number of eminent French scholars, including the prominent French physicist Paul Langevin to form “The Cooperative,” a private gathering of some of the most distinguished academics in France. Each contributed to educating one another’s children in their respective homes. The curriculum of The Cooperative was varied and included not only the principles of science and scientific research but such diverse subjects as Chinese and sculpture and with great emphasis placed on self-expression and play. This arrangement lasted for two years after which Curie re-entered a more orthodox learning environment at the Collège Sévigné in central Paris from 1912 to 1914 and then onto the Faculty of Science at the Sorbonne, to complete her Baccalaureate. Her studies at the Faculty of Science were interrupted by World War I.
World War IInitially, Curie was taken by her mother to the countyside but a year later when she turned 18 she was re-united with her mother, running the 20 mobile field hospitals that Marie had established. The hospitals were equipped with primitive X-ray equipment made possible by the Curies’ radiochemical research. This technology greatly assisted doctors to locate shrapnel in wounded soldiers, but it was crude and led to both Marie and Irène, who were serving as nurse radiographers, suffering large doses of radiation exposure.After the War, Curie returned to Paris to study at the Radium Institute, which had been built by her parents. The institute was completed in 1914 but remained empty during the war. Her doctoral thesis was concerned with the alpha rays of polonium, the element discovered by her parents (along with radium) and named after Marie’s country of birth, Poland. Curie became Doctor of Science in 1925.
Research
As she neared the end of her doctorate in 1924 she was asked to teach the precise laboratory techniques required for radiochemical research to the young chemical engineer Frédéric Joliot whom she would later come to wed.
From 1928 Joliot-Curie and her husband Frédéric combined their research interests on the study of atomic nuclei. Though their experiments identified both the positron and the neutron, they failed to interpret the significance of the results and the discoveries were later claimed by Carl David Anderson and James Chadwick respectively. These discoveries would have secured greatness indeed, as together with J. J. Thomson's discovery of the electron in 1897, they finally replaced John Dalton’s theory of atoms being solid spherical particles.Finally, in 1934 they made the discovery that sealed their place in scientific history. Building on the work of Marie and Pierre, who had isolated naturally occurring radioactive elements, Joliot-Curies  realized the alchemist’s dream of turning one element into another, creating radioactive nitrogen from boron and then radioactive isotopes of phosphorus from aluminum and silicon from magnesium. For example, irradiating the main natural and stable isotope of aluminum with alpha particles (i.e. helium nuclei) results in an unstable isotope of phosphorus :  27 Al +  4 He →  30 P +  1 n.    By now the application of radioactive materials for use in medicine was growing and this discovery led to an ability to create radioactive materials quickly, cheaply and plentifully. The Nobel Prize for chemistry in 1935 brought with it fame and recognition from the scientific community and Joliot-Curie was awarded a professorship at the Faculty of Science.Irène’s group pioneered research into radium nuclei that led a separate group of German physicists, led by Otto Hahn, Lise Meitner, and Fritz Strassman, to discover nuclear fission; the splitting of the nucleus itself and the vast amounts of energy emitted as a result.The years of working so closely with such deadly materials finally caught up with Joliot-Curie and she was diagnosed with leukemia. She had been accidentally exposed to polonium when a sealed capsule of the element exploded on her laboratory bench in 1946. Treatment with antibiotics and a series of operations did relieve her suffering temporarily but her condition continued to deteriorate. Despite this Joliot-Curie continued to work and in 1955 drew up plans for new physics laboratories at the Universitie d’Orsay, South of Paris.
Political viewsThe Joliot-Curies had become increasingly aware of the growth of the fascist movement. They opposed its ideals and joined the Socialist Party in 1934, the Comité de vigilance des intellectuels antifascistes a year later, and in 1936 actively supported the Republicans in the Spanish Civil War. In the same year, Joliot-Curie was appointed Undersecretary of State for Scientific Research by the French government, in which capacity she helped in founding the Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique.The Joliot-Curies had continued Pierre and Marie’s policy of publishing all of their work for the benefit of the global scientific community, but afraid of the danger that might result should it be developed for military use, they stopped. On 30 October 1939 they placed all of their documentation on nuclear fission in the vaults of the French Academy of Sciences, where it remained until 1949.Joliot-Curie's political career continued after the war and she became a commissioner in the Commissariat à l'énergie atomique. However, she still found time for scientific work and in 1946 became director of her mother’s Institut du Radium (Radium Institute).Joliot-Curie became actively involved in promoting women’s education, serving on the National Committee of the Union of French Women (Comité National de l'Union des Femmes Françaises) and the World Peace Council. Joliot-Curies were given memberships to the French Légion d'honneur; Irène as an officer and Frédéric as a commissioner, recognising his earlier work for the resistance.
Personal life
Irène and Frédéric hyphenated their surnames to Joliot-Curie after they married in 1926. Eleven months later, their daughter Hélène was born, who would also become a noted physicist. Their son, Pierre, a biologist, was born in 1932.During World War II Joliot-Curie contracted tuberculosis and was forced to spend several years convalescing in Switzerland. Concern for her own health together with the anguish of leaving her husband and children in occupied France was hard to bear and she did make several dangerous visits back to France, enduring detention by German troops at the Swiss border on more than one occasion. Finally, in 1944 Joliot-Curie judged it too dangerous for her family to remain in France and she took her children back to Switzerland.In 1956, after a final convalescent period in the French Alps, Joliot-Curie was admitted to the Curie hospital in Paris where she died on 17 March at the age of 58 from leukemia.  
 Joliot-Curie's daughter, Hélène Langevin-Joliot, is a nuclear physicist and professor at the University of Paris; her son, Pierre Joliot, is a biochemist at Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique.
References 
Further reading

  

 
See also

List of female Nobel laureates

  
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Harold Robbins
 
 
 
 Harold Robbins (May 21, 1916 – October 14, 1997) was an American author of popular novels.  One of the best-selling writers of all time, he penned over 25 best-sellers, totaling over 750 million copies in 32 languages.Born Harold Rubin in New York City, he later claimed to be a Jewish orphan who had been raised in a Catholic boys home.   In reality he was the son of well-educated Russian and Polish Jewish immigrants. Kirjasto: Harold Robbins  He was reared by his pharmacist father and stepmother in Brooklyn.
WorkHis first book, Never Love a Stranger (1948), caused controversy with its graphic sexuality.The Dream Merchants (1949) was a novel about the American film industry, from its beginning to the sound era. Again Robbins blended his own experiences, historical facts, melodrama, sex, and action into a fast-moving story. His 1952 novel, A Stone for Danny Fisher, was adapted into a 1958 motion picture King Creole, which starred Elvis Presley. Among his best-known books is The Carpetbaggers – loosely based on a composite of Howard Hughes, Bill Lear, Harry Cohn, and Louis B. Mayer – 
"A Tour through the Harold Robbins Industry"
by Thomas Thompson.
"Life" magazine 1967 Dec 8.
 
taking the reader from New York to California, from the prosperity of the aeronautics|aeronautical industry to the glamour of Hollywood. Its sequel, The Raiders, was released in 1995.Since his death, several new books have been published, written by ghostwriters and based on Robbins's own notes and unfinished stories. On several of these final books, Junius Podrug has been credited as co-writer. From the Hodder & Stoughton 2008 edition of The Carpetbaggers About the author section:
 Robbins was the playboy of his day and a master of publicity. He was a renowned novelist but tales of his own life contain even more fiction than his books. What is known is that with reported worldwide sales of 750m, Harold Robbins sold more books than J.K. Rowling, earned and spent $50m during his lifetime, and was as much a part of the sexual and social revolution as the pill, Playboy and pot. In March 1965, he had three novels on the British paperback bestseller list – Where Love Has Gone at No.1, The Carpetbaggers at No.3 and The Dream Merchants in the sixth spot. His widow, Jann Robbins, has republished 12 of his most famous titles with AuthorHouse Publishing.
Personal lifeRobbins was married three times, his first wife being his high school sweetheart. He spent a great deal of time on the French Riviera and Monte Carlo until his death on October 14, 1997 from respiratory heart failure at the age of 81 in Palm Springs, California.  He is buried nearby at Forest Lawn Cemetery in Cathedral City.Robbins has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame at 6743 Hollywood Boulevard.
Selected bibliography

Never Love A Stranger, 1948 (adapted into the 1958 film of the same name)
The Dream Merchants, 1949 (adapted into a TV movie in 1980)
A Stone for Danny Fisher, 1952 (adapted into the film King Creole (1958)
Never Leave Me, 1953
79 Park Avenue, 1955
Stiletto, 1960 (adapted into the 1969 film, Stiletto)
The Carpetbaggers, 1961 (adapted into both the 1964 film of the same title and the 1966 film Nevada Smith)
Where Love Has Gone, 1962
The Adventurers, 1966; this was adapted for the cinema as The Adventurers in 1970 by Lewis Gilbert
The Inheritors, 1969
The Betsy, 1971 (made into the film of the same title in 1978)
The Pirate, 1974 (made into a TV movie in 1978)
The Lonely Lady, 1976 (adapted into the 1983 film of the same title)
Dreams Die First, 1977
Memories of Another Day, 1979
Goodbye, Janette, 1981
The Storyteller, 1982
Spellbinder, 1982
Descent from Xanadu, 1984
The Piranhas, 1986
The Raiders, 1995 (sequel to The Carpetbaggers)
The Stallion, 1996 (sequel to The Betsy)
Tycoon, 1997
The Predators, 1998
The Secret, 2000 (sequel to The Predators)
Never Enough, 2001
Sin City, 2002
Heat of Passion, 2003
The Betrayers, (with Junius Podrug) 2004
Blood Royal, (with Junius Podrug) 2005
The Devil to Pay, (with Junius Podrug) 2006
The Looters, (with Junius Podrug) 2007
The Deceivers, (with Junius Podrug) 2008
The Shroud, (with Junius Podrug) 2009
The Curse, (with Junius Podrug) 2011


References 
External links

Harold Robbins at Internet Book List [1]

 
DEFAULTSORT







 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh
 
 
 Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh  (born Prince Philip of Greece and Denmark  10 June 1921)He was born on 10 June 1921 according to the Gregorian calendar. Until 1 March 1923, Greece used the Julian calendar, in which the date is 28 May 1921.  is the husband of Queen Elizabeth II. He is the Commonwealth realms' longest-serving consort and the oldest spouse ever of a reigning British monarch. A member of the House of Schleswig-Holstein-Sonderburg-Glücksburg, Prince Philip was born in Greece into the Greek and Danish royal families, but his family was exiled from Greece when he was a child. After being educated in France, England, Germany and Scotland, he joined the British Royal Navy at the age of 18 in 1939. From July 1939, he began corresponding with the 13-year-old Princess Elizabeth (his third cousin through Queen Victoria and the eldest daughter and heiress presumptive of King George VI) whom he had first met in 1934. During World War II he served with the Mediterranean and Pacific fleets.After the war, Philip was granted permission by George VI to marry Elizabeth. Prior to the official engagement announcement, he abandoned his Greek and Danish royal titles, converted from Greek Orthodoxy to Anglicanism, and became a naturalised British subject, adopting the surname Mountbatten from his British maternal grandparents. After an official engagement of five months, as Lieutenant Philip Mountbatten, he married Elizabeth on 20 November 1947. On his marriage, he was granted the style of His Royal Highness and the title of Duke of Edinburgh by the King. Philip left active service, having reached the rank of Commander, when Elizabeth became queen in 1952. The Queen, his wife, made him a Prince of the United Kingdom in 1957.Philip has four children with Elizabeth: Prince Charles, Princess Anne, Prince Andrew and Prince Edward. He has eight grandchildren: Peter Phillips, Zara Phillips, Prince William, Prince Harry of Wales, Princess Beatrice of York, Princess Eugenie of York, Lady Louise Mountbatten-Windsor and James, Viscount Severn. Through an Order in Council issued in 1960, descendants of Philip and Elizabeth not bearing royal styles and titles can use the surname Mountbatten-Windsor, which has also been used by some members who do hold titles, such as Charles and Anne.A keen sportsman, Philip helped develop the equestrian event of carriage driving. He is a patron of over 800 organisations, and chairman of The Duke of Edinburgh's Award Scheme for people aged 14 to 24 years.
Early lifePrince Philip of Greece and Denmark was born at Mon Repos on the Greek island of Corfu on 10 June 1921, the only son and fifth and final child of Prince Andrew of Greece and Denmark and Princess Alice of Battenberg.  Philip's four elder sisters were Margarita, Theodora, Cecilie, and Sophie. He was baptised into the Greek Orthodox Church. His godparents were Queen Olga of Greece (his paternal grandmother) and the Mayor of Corfu. Yvonne's Royalty Home Page – Royal Christenings Shortly after Philip's birth, his maternal grandfather, Prince Louis of Battenberg then known as Louis Mountbatten, Marquess of Milford Haven, died in London. Louis was a naturalised British citizen, who, after a career in the Royal Navy, had renounced his German titles and adopted the surname Mountbatten during the First World War. After visiting London for the memorial, Philip and his mother returned to Greece where Prince Andrew had remained behind to command an army division embroiled in the Greco-Turkish War (1919–1922). The war went badly for Greece, and the Turks made large gains. On 22 September 1922, Philip's uncle, the reigning King Constantine I of Greece, was forced to abdicate, and Prince Andrew, along with others, was arrested by the military government. The commander of the army, General Georgios Hatzianestis, and five senior politicians were executed. Prince Andrew's life was believed to be in danger, and Alice was under surveillance. In December, a revolutionary court banished Prince Andrew from Greece for life.  The British naval vessel HMS Calypso evacuated Prince Andrew's family, with Philip being carried to safety in a cot made from a fruit box. Philip's family went to France, where they settled in the Paris suburb of Saint-Cloud in a house lent to them by his aunt, Princess George  of Greece. Although both he and his father were born in Greece, he left the country as a baby and does not have a strong grasp of Greek. In 1992, Philip said that he "could understand a certain amount of" the language.    He speaks fluent English, German and French. 
 
Youth

Education
Philip was first educated at an American school in Paris run by Donald MacJannet, who described Philip as a "rugged, boisterous ... but always remarkably polite" boy.  In 1928, he was sent to the UK to attend Cheam School, living with his maternal grandmother at Kensington Palace and his uncle, George Mountbatten, 2nd Marquess of Milford Haven, at Lynden Manor in Bray, Berkshire.  In the next three years, his four sisters married German noblemen and moved to Germany, his mother was placed in an asylum after being diagnosed with schizophrenia,  and his father moved to a small flat in Monte Carlo. Philip had little contact with his mother for the remainder of his childhood.  In 1933, he was sent to Schule Schloss Salem in Germany, which had the "advantage of saving school fees" because it was owned by the family of his brother-in-law, Berthold, Margrave of Baden.  With the rise of Nazism in Germany, Salem's Jewish founder, Kurt Hahn, fled persecution and founded Gordonstoun School in Scotland. After two terms at Salem, Philip moved to Gordonstoun.  In 1937, his sister Cecilie, her husband (Georg Donatus, Hereditary Grand Duke of Hesse), her two young sons and her mother-in-law were killed in an air crash at Ostend; Philip, then sixteen years old, attended the funeral in Darmstadt.   The following year, his uncle and guardian Lord Milford Haven died of cancer of the bone marrow. 
Naval serviceAfter leaving Gordonstoun in 1939, Prince Philip joined the Royal Navy, graduating the next year from the Royal Naval College, Dartmouth, as the top cadet in his course.    During World War II, he continued to serve in the British forces, while two of his brothers-in-law, Prince Christopher of Hesse and Berthold, Margrave of Baden, fought on the opposing German side.  He was commissioned as a midshipman in January 1940. Philip spent four months on the battleship HMS Ramillies, protecting convoys of the Australian Expeditionary Force in the Indian Ocean, followed by shorter postings on HM Ships Kent, Shropshire and in Ceylon (now Sri Lanka). After the invasion of Greece by Italy in October 1940, he was transferred from the Indian Ocean to the battleship HMS Valiant in the Mediterranean Fleet.  Among other engagements, he was involved in the Battle of Crete, was mentioned in despatches for his service during the Battle of Cape Matapan where he controlled the battleship's searchlights.Philip was also awarded the Greek War Cross of Valour.  Duties of lesser glory included stoking the boilers of the troop transport ship RMS Empress of Russia.  He was promoted to sub-lieutenant after a series of courses at Portsmouth in which he gained the top grade in four out of five sections of the qualifying examination.  In June 1942, he was appointed to the V and W class destroyer and flotilla leader, HMS Wallace, which was involved in convoy escort tasks on the east coast of Britain, as well as the allied invasion of Sicily.    Promotion to lieutenant followed on 16 July 1942. In October of the same year he became first lieutenant of HMS Wallace, at 21 years old one of the youngest first lieutenants in the Royal Navy. During the invasion of Sicily, in July 1943, as second in command of HMS Wallace, he saved his ship from a night bomber attack. He devised a plan to launch a raft with smoke floats that successfully distracted the bombers allowing the ship to slip away unnoticed.  In 1944, he moved on to the new destroyer, HMS Whelp, where he saw service with the British Pacific Fleet in the 27th Destroyer Flotilla.   He was present in Tokyo Bay when the instrument of Japanese surrender was signed. In January 1946, Philip returned to the United Kingdom on the Whelp, and was posted as an instructor at HMS Royal Arthur, the Petty Officers' School in Corsham, Wiltshire. 
Marriage
 
In 1939, King George VI and Queen Elizabeth toured the Royal Naval College, Dartmouth. During the visit, the Queen and Earl Mountbatten asked Philip to escort the King's two daughters, Elizabeth and Margaret, who were Philip's third cousins through Queen Victoria, and second cousins once removed through King Christian IX of Denmark.  Elizabeth fell in love with Philip and they began to exchange letters, when she was thirteen.  Eventually, in the summer of 1946, Philip asked the King for his daughter's hand in marriage. The King granted his request, provided that any formal engagement was delayed until Elizabeth's twenty-first birthday the following April.  By March 1947, Philip had abandoned his Greek and Danish royal titles, had adopted the surname Mountbatten from his mother's family, and had become a naturalised British subject. In 1957, it was established by a ruling in Attorney-General vs. HRH Prince Ernest Augustus of Hanover [1957] 1 All ER 49, that all descendants of Sophia of Hanover, including Philip, were already naturalised British subjects under the terms of the Sophia Naturalization Act 1705.  The engagement was announced to the public on 10 July 1947.  The day preceding his wedding, King George VI bestowed the style His Royal Highness on Philip, and on the morning of the wedding, 20 November 1947, he was made the Duke of Edinburgh, Earl of Merioneth, and Baron Greenwich of Greenwich in the County of London. Philip and Elizabeth were married in a ceremony at Westminster Abbey, recorded and broadcast by BBC radio to 200 million people around the world.  However, in post-war Britain, it was not acceptable for any of the Duke of Edinburgh's German relations to be invited to the wedding, including Philip's three surviving sisters, all of whom had married German princes, some of them with Nazi connections. After their marriage, the Duke and Duchess of Edinburgh took up residence at Clarence House. Their first two children were born: Prince Charles in 1948 and Princess Anne in 1950.Philip was keen to pursue his naval career, though aware that his wife's future role as queen would eventually eclipse his ambitions. Nevertheless, Philip returned to the navy after his honeymoon, at first in a desk job at the Admiralty, and later on a staff course at the Naval Staff College, Greenwich.  From 1949, he was stationed in Malta, after being posted as the first lieutenant of the destroyer HMS Chequers, the lead ship of the 1st Destroyer Flotilla in the Mediterranean Fleet.  In July 1950, he was promoted to lieutenant commander and given command of the frigate HMS Magpie.  He was promoted to commander in 1952,  but his active naval career ended in July 1951.   In 1960 he joined The Castaways' Club, having been introduced by his first cousin David Mountbatten, 3rd Marquess of Milford Haven, which enabled him to keep in close contact with many of his naval contemporaries. With the King in ill health, Princess Elizabeth and the Duke of Edinburgh were each appointed to the Privy Council on 4 November 1951, after having made a coast-to-coast tour of Canada. At the end of January the following year, Philip and his wife set out on a tour of the Commonwealth. On 6 February 1952, when they were in Kenya, Elizabeth's father died so she became Queen. It was Philip who broke the news of her father's death to Elizabeth at Sagana Lodge, and the royal party immediately returned to the United Kingdom. 
Consort of the Queen
Royal houseThe accession of Elizabeth to the throne brought up the question of the name of the royal house. The Duke's uncle, Louis Mountbatten, advocated the name House of Mountbatten, as Elizabeth would typically have taken Philip's last name on marriage; however, when Queen Mary, Elizabeth's paternal grandmother, heard of this suggestion, she informed the British Prime Minister Winston Churchill, who himself later advised the Queen to issue a royal proclamation declaring that the royal house was to remain known as the House of Windsor. The Duke privately complained, "I am nothing but a bloody amoeba. I am the only man in the country not allowed to give his name to his own children." In 1960, several years after the death of Queen Mary and the resignation of Churchill, the Queen issued an Order in Council declaring that the surname of male-line descendants of the Duke and the Queen who are not styled as Royal Highness, or titled as Prince or Princess, was to be Mountbatten-Windsor. In practice, the Duke's children have all used Mountbatten-Windsor as a surname when not using a name derived from their highest titles (i.e., Wales, York, or Wessex);  similarly, his male-line grandchildren use names derived from these titles. After her accession to the throne, the Queen also announced that the Duke was to have "place, pre-eminence and precedence" next to her "on all occasions and in all meetings, except where otherwise provided by Act of Parliament". This meant the Duke took precedence over his son, the Prince of Wales, except, officially, in the British parliament. In fact, however, he attends Parliament only when escorting the Queen for the annual State Opening of Parliament, where he walks and sits beside her. Contrary to rumors over the years, the Queen and Duke are said by insiders to have had a strong relationship throughout their marriage, despite the challenges of Elizabeth's reign.   Queen Elizabeth referred to Prince Philip as her "constant strength and guide". Prince Philip: The Man At The Queen's Side, 5 June 2012   
Duties and milestonesAs consort to the Queen, Philip supported his wife in her new duties as Sovereign, accompanying her to ceremonies such as the State Opening of Parliament in various countries, state dinners, and tours abroad. As Chairman of the Coronation Commission, he was the first member of the royal family to fly in a helicopter, visiting the troops that were to take part in the ceremony.  Philip was not crowned in the service, but knelt before Elizabeth, with her hands enclosing his, and swore to be her "liege man of life and limb". 

In the early 1950s, his sister-in-law, Princess Margaret, considered marrying a divorced older man, Peter Townsend. The press accused Philip of being hostile to the match. "I haven't done anything," he complained. Philip had not interfered, preferring to stay out of other people's love lives.  Eventually, Margaret and Townsend parted. For six months over 1953–54 Philip and Elizabeth toured the Commonwealth; again their children were left in the United Kingdom. In 1956, the Duke founded the Duke of Edinburgh's Award with Kurt Hahn, in order to give young people "a sense of responsibility to themselves and their communities". From 1956 to 1957, Philip travelled around the world aboard the newly commissioned HMY Britannia, during which he opened the 1956 Summer Olympics in Melbourne and visited the Antarctic. The Queen and the children remained in the UK. On the return leg of the journey, Philip's private secretary, Mike Parker, was sued for divorce by his wife. As with Townsend, the press still portrayed divorce as a scandal, and eventually Parker resigned. He later said that the Duke was very supportive and "the Queen was wonderful throughout. She regarded divorce as a sadness, not a hanging offence."  In a show of public support, the Queen created Parker a Commander of the Royal Victorian Order. Further press reports claimed that the Queen and the Duke were drifting apart, which enraged the Duke and dismayed the Queen, who issued a strongly worded denial.  On 22 February 1957, she granted her husband the style and title of a Prince of the United Kingdom by Letters Patent, restoring the princely status that he had formally renounced ten years earlier. On the same date, it was gazetted that he was to be known as "His Royal Highness The Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh". Philip was appointed to the Queen's Privy Council for Canada on 14 October 1957, taking his Oath of Allegiance before the Queen in person at her Canadian residence, Rideau Hall.  Visiting Canada in 1969, Philip spoke about his views on republicanism:
 

Philip is patron of some 800 organisations, particularly focused on the environment, industry, sport, and education. He served as UK President of the World Wildlife Fund from 1961 to 1982, International President from 1981 and President Emeritus from 1996. He is patron of The Work Foundation, was President of the International Equestrian Federation from 1964 to 1986, and has served as Chancellor of the Universities of Cambridge, Edinburgh, Salford, and Wales. At the beginning of 1981, Philip wrote to his eldest son, Charles, counselling him to make up his mind to either propose to Lady Diana Spencer, or break off their courtship.  Charles felt pressured by his father to make a decision, and did so, proposing to Diana in February.  They married six months later.By 1992, the marriage of the Prince and Princess of Wales had broken down. The Queen and Philip hosted a meeting between Charles and Diana, trying to get them reconciled but without success.  Philip wrote to Diana, expressing his disappointment at both Charles's and her extra-marital affairs, and asking her to examine both his and her behaviour from the other's point of view.  The Duke was direct, and Diana was sensitive.  She found the letters hard to take, but she nevertheless appreciated that he was acting with good intent.  Charles and Diana separated and later divorced.A year after the divorce, Diana was killed in a car crash in Paris on 31 August 1997. At the time, the Duke was on holiday at Balmoral with the extended royal family. In their grief, Diana's two sons, Princes William and Harry, wanted to attend church, and so their grandparents took them that morning. Brandreth, p.358  For five days, the Queen and the Duke shielded their grandsons from the ensuing press interest by keeping them at Balmoral where they could grieve in private.  The Royal Family's seclusion caused public dismay,  but the public mood was transformed from hostility to respect by a live broadcast made by the Queen on 5 September. Brandreth, p.359  Uncertain as to whether they should walk behind her coffin during the funeral procession, Diana's sons hesitated.  Philip told William, "If you don't walk, I think you'll regret it later. If I walk, will you walk with me?"  On the day of the funeral, Philip, William, Harry, Charles and Diana's brother, Earl Spencer, walked through London behind her bier.Over the next few years Mohammed Al-Fayed, whose son Dodi Fayed was also killed in the crash, claimed that Prince Philip had ordered the death of Diana, Princess of Wales, and that the accident was staged. The inquest into Diana's death concluded in 2008 that there was no evidence of a conspiracy. 
Twenty-first century

During the Golden Jubilee of Elizabeth II in 2002, the Duke was commended by the Speaker of the British House of Commons for his role in supporting the Queen during her reign. The Duke of Edinburgh's time as royal consort exceeds that of any other consort in British history; however, Queen Elizabeth The Queen Mother (his mother-in-law), who died aged 101, was the consort with the longest lifespan.In April 2008, Philip was admitted to the King Edward VII Hospital for "assessment and treatment" for a chest infection, though he walked into the hospital unaided and recovered quickly,  and was discharged three days later to recuperate at Windsor Castle.  In August the same year, the Evening Standard newspaper reported that Philip was suffering from prostate cancer.  Buckingham Palace, which usually refuses to comment on rumours of ill health, claimed that the report was an invasion of privacy. Unusually, Philip authorised a statement denying the story.  The newspaper retracted the report, and admitted it was untrue. In June 2011, in an interview marking the occasion of his 90th birthday he said that he would now slow down and reduce his duties, stating that he had "done [his] bit".  While staying at the royal residence at Sandringham, Norfolk, on 23 December 2011, the Duke suffered chest pains and was taken to the cardio-thoracic unit at Papworth Hospital, Cambridgeshire, where he underwent successful coronary angioplasty and stenting.  He was discharged on 27 December. On 4 June 2012, during the celebrations in honour of his wife's Diamond Jubilee, Philip was taken from Windsor Castle to the King Edward VII Hospital, London suffering from a bladder infection.   He was released from hospital on 9 June.  After a recurrence of infection in August 2012, while staying at Balmoral Castle, he was admitted to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary for five nights as a precautionary measure. The record for the longest-lived male member of the British Royal Family is currently held by Prince Arthur, Duke of Connaught and Strathearn who lived to be 91 years, 8 months and 15 days old. Prince Philip would surpass this record on 25 February 2013. The record for the longest-lived male descendant of Queen Victoria is currently held by Count Carl Johan Bernadotte of Wisborg (the Duke of Connaught's grandson) who lived to be 95 years, 6 months and 5 days old. Prince Philip would surpass this record on 15 December 2016.
Personality and image
Philip played polo until 1971, when he started to compete in carriage driving, a sport which he helped expand; the early rule book was drafted under his supervision.  He was a keen yachtsman, striking up a friendship in 1949 with Uffa Fox in Cowes. He and the Queen regularly attended Cowes Week in HMY Britannia. His first airborne flying lesson took place in 1952; by his 70th birthday he had accrued 5,150 pilot hours.  He has painted with oils, and collected artworks, including contemporary cartoons, which hang at Buckingham Palace, Windsor Castle, Sandringham House, and Balmoral Castle. Hugh Casson described Philip's own artwork as "exactly what you'd expect ... totally direct, no hanging about. Strong colours, vigorous brushstrokes." In 1979, when Queen Elizabeth II and Prince Philip were guests of President Carter, Prince Philip was approached by White House butler Lynwood Westray and another unnamed butler. Westray asked him "Your majesty, would you like a cordial?", and Prince Phillip responded, "I'll take one if you'll let me serve you". "Oh my God, this had never happened before," said Westray. "There we were standing there. I was holding the glasses and my buddy was holding the liqueurs and we looked at each other, and I said 'If that's the only way you'll have it, we'll go along with it.' And the prince served us what he was having, and the three of us had a drink and a conversation. It was an honour to let him do it." Over his sixty years as royal consort, Philip became famous for making remarks that were often construed as being offensive or stereotypical in nature.   Some of them were immediately interpreted as gaffes; but other awkward observations were construed by apologists as merely odd, off-colour, and often funny.    In his own words, comments attributed to Prince Philip have contributed to the perception that he is "a cantankerous old sod".  The historian David Starkey has described him as a kind of " H.R.H Victor Meldrew".  For example, in May 1999 British newspapers accused Philip of insulting deaf children at a pop concert in Wales by saying, "No wonder you are deaf listening to this row."  Later Philip wrote, "The story is largely invention. It so happens that my mother was quite seriously deaf and I have been Patron of the Royal National Institute for the Deaf for ages, so it's hardly likely that I would do any such thing."  During a state visit to the People's Republic of China in 1986, in a private conversation with British students from Xian's North West University, Philip joked, "If you stay here much longer, you'll go slit-eyed ."  The British press reported on the remark as indicative of racial intolerance, but the Chinese authorities were reportedly unconcerned. Chinese students studying in the UK, an official explained, were often told in jest not to stay away too long, lest they go "round-eyed".  His comment had no effect on Sino-British relations, but it shaped his own reputation. 
Titles, styles, honours and arms
 
Philip has held a number of titles throughout his life. Originally holding the title and style of a prince of Greece and Denmark, Philip abandoned these royal titles before his marriage, and was thereafter created a British duke, among other noble titles. It was not, however, until the Queen issued Letters Patent in 1957 that Philip was again titled as a prince.When addressing the Duke of Edinburgh, as with any member of the royal family except the monarch, the rules of etiquette are to address him the first time as Your Royal Highness, and thereafter as Sir. 
Honours and honorary military appointmentsUpon his wife's accession to the throne in 1952, the Duke of Edinburgh was appointed Admiral of the Sea Cadet Corps, Colonel-in-Chief of the British Army Cadet Force, and Air Commodore-in-Chief of the Air Training Corps.  The following year, he was appointed to the equivalent positions in Canada, and made Admiral of the Fleet, Captain General Royal Marines,  Field Marshal, and Marshal of the Royal Air Force in the United Kingdom.  Subsequent military appointments were made throughout the Commonwealth.  To celebrate his 90th birthday, the Queen appointed him Lord High Admiral of the Royal Navy (the highest rank in the organisation anyone other than the sovereign can hold)  and to the highest ranks available in each branch of the Canadian Forces: honorary Admiral of the Maritime Command (now the Royal Canadian Navy) and General of the Land Force Command (now the Canadian Army) and Air Command (now the Royal Canadian Air Force). Before he became consort, the Duke was appointed to the Order of the Garter on 19 November 1947. Since then, Philip has received 17 different appointments and decorations in the Commonwealth, and 48 by foreign states. The inhabitants of some small villages in Vanuatu also worship Prince Philip as a god; the islanders possess portraits of the Duke and hold feasts on his birthday. 
Arms 
Issue

Name  Birth  Marriage  Children  Grandchildren 
Charles, Prince of Wales  14 November 1948  29 July 1981  Divorced 28 August 1996   Lady Diana Spencer  Prince William, Duke of Cambridge Prince Harry of Wales   
9 April 2005  Camilla Parker Bowles    
Anne, Princess Royal  15 August 1950  14 November 1973  Divorced 28 April 1992   Captain Mark Phillips  Peter Phillips  Savannah Phillips Isla Phillips 
Zara Phillips   
12 December 1992  Sir Timothy Laurence    
Prince Andrew, Duke of York  19 February 1960  23 July 1986  Divorced 30 May 1996   Sarah Ferguson  Princess Beatrice of York Princess Eugenie of York  
 
Prince Edward, Earl of Wessex  10 March 1964  19 June 1999  Sophie Rhys-Jones  Lady Louise Windsor James, Viscount Severn   

AncestryPhilip is currently the oldest living great-great grandchild of Queen Victoria, as well as her oldest living descendant following the death of Count Carl Johan Bernadotte of Wisborg in May 2012. As such, he is in the line of succession to the thrones of 16 countries.In July 1993, through mitochondrial DNA analysis of a sample of Prince Philip's blood, British scientists were able to confirm the identity of the remains of several members of Empress Alexandra of Russia's family, several decades after their 1918 massacre by the Bolsheviks. Prince Philip was then one of two living great-grandchildren in the female line of Alexandra's mother Princess Alice of the United Kingdom, the other being his sister Sophie, who died in 2001. 
 
 
Fictional portrayalsActor James Cromwell portrayed Prince Philip in the Academy Award-winning film The Queen (2006).David Threlfall played him in a TV movie, The Queen's Sister (2005).Stewart Granger played him in The Royal Romance of Charles and Diana (1982). A fictionalised Philip (in his capacity as a World War II naval officer) is a minor character in John Birmingham's Axis of Time series of alternate history novels. Prince Philip also appears as a fictional character in Nevil Shute's novel In the Wet (1952).Prince Philip is a minor character in Paul Gallico's novel Mrs. 'Arris Goes To Moscow, in which Mrs. Ada Harris, the main character, whom Soviet bureaucrats have caused to be called "Lady Ada Harris Char," confesses her true identity of Ada Harris of Battersea, whose work is "charring," or house-cleaning on daily hire, to him.Prince Philip is a minor character in Tom Clancy's novel Patriot Games.The satirical British television series Spitting Image regularly featured a Prince Philip puppet, always dressed in naval uniform. His voice was provided by Roger Blake, who reprised the role in Alistair McGowan's regal parody of The Royle Family within his show The Big Impression.
Bibliography

Selected Speeches – 1948–55 (1957)
Selected Speeches – 1956–59 (1960)
Birds from Britannia (1962) (published in the United States as Seabirds from Southern Waters)
Wildlife Crisis with James Fisher (1970)
The Environmental Revolution: Speeches on Conservation, 1962–1977 (1978)
Competition Carriage Driving (1982) (published in France 1984, second edition 1984, revised edition 1994)
A Question of Balance (1982)
Men, Machines and Sacred Cows (1984)
A Windsor Correspondence with Michael Mann (1984)
Down to Earth: Collected Writings and Speeches on Man and the Natural World 1961–87 (1988) (paperback edition 1989, Japanese edition 1992)
Survival or Extinction: A Christian Attitude to the Environment with Michael Mann (1989)
Driving and Judging Dressage (1996)
Thirty Years On, and Off, the Box Seat (2004)

Forewords to:

The Concise British Flora in Colour by William Keble Martin, Ebury Press/ Michael Joseph (1965)
Kurt Hahn by Hermann Röhrs and Hilary Tunstall-Behrens (1970)
The Art of Driving by Max Pape (1982)
National Maritime Museum Guide to Maritime Britain by Keith Wheatley, (2000)
1953: The Crowning Year of Sport by Jonathan Rice, (2003)
British Flags and Emblems by Graham Bartram, Tuckwell Press (2004)
Chariots of War by Robert Hobson, Ulric Publication (2004)


Notes 
References 
Further reading

Brandreth, Gyles (2004). Philip and Elizabeth: Portrait of a Marriage. London: Century. ISBN 0-7126-6103-4
Heald, Tim (1991). The Duke: A Portrait of Prince Philip. London: Hodder and Stoughton. ISBN 0-340-54607-7
Lacey, Robert (2002) Royal: Her Majesty Queen Elizabeth II, London: Little, Brown, ISBN 0-316-85940-0
Vickers, Hugo (2000). Alice, Princess Andrew of Greece. London: Hamish Hamilton. ISBN 0-241-13686-5


External links 
 

Official website of the British Monarchy: The Duke of Edinburgh
Duke of Edinburgh Award
 
In the Words of Prince Philip – slideshow by Life magazine

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  in England and Wales and in Northern Ireland
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
   
DEFAULTSORT








 











 


















































 









 








 



 






 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Louis XVIII of France
 Louis XVIII (Louis Stanislas Xavier; 17 November 1755 – 16 September 1824), known as "the Desired" (le Desiré) , was a Bourbon King of France and of Navarre from 1814 to 1824, omitting the Hundred Days in 1815. Louis XVIII spent twenty-three years in exile, from 1791 to 1814, during the French Revolution and the First French Empire, and again in 1815, for 111 days, upon the return of Napoleon I from Elba.Until his accession to the throne of France, Louis held the title of Count of Provence, being the brother of King Louis XVI. On the 21 September 1792, the National Convention abolished the monarchy and deposed King Louis XVI, who was later executed by guillotine.  When the young Louis XVII, Louis XVI's son, died in prison in June 1795, Louis XVIII succeeded his nephew as titular King, although the monarchy had been disestablished. During the French Revolution and the Napoleonic era, Louis XVIII lived in exile in Prussia, the United Kingdom and Russia.  When the Sixth Coalition finally defeated Napoleon, Louis XVIII was restored to what he, and Royalists, considered his rightful place. This period was marked by an Ultra-royalist reaction. However Napoleon escaped from his exile in Elba, marched on Paris and restored the French Empire. Louis XVIII fled and a Seventh Coalition declared war on the French Empire, defeated Napoleon and for a second time restored Louis XVIII on the French throne. In 1823, Louis XVIII sent an expeditionary corps, known as the "Hundred Thousand Sons of Saint Louis", in Spain to restore the absolute King of Spain.Louis XVIII ruled as king for slightly less than a decade. The Bourbon Restoration regime was a constitutional monarchy (unlike the Ancien Régime, which was absolute). As a constitutional monarch, Louis XVIII's royal prerogative was reduced substantially by the Charter of 1814, France's new constitution. Louis had no children; therefore, upon his death, the crown passed to his brother, Charles, Count of Artois.  Louis XVIII was the last French monarch to die while reigning.
YouthLouis Stanislas Xavier, titled comte de Provence at birth, was born on 17 November 1755 in the Palace of Versailles, the son of Louis, Dauphin of France, and of his wife, Princess Maria Josepha of Saxony. He was the grandson of the reigning King Louis XV. As a son of the Dauphin he was a Fils de France. Louis Stanislas was christened Louis Stanislas Xavier six months after his birth, in accordance with Bourbon family tradition, being nameless before his baptism. By this act, he became also a Knight of the Order of the Holy Spirit.
The name of Louis was bestowed because it was typical of a Prince of France; Stanislas after his great-grandfather King Stanisław Leszczyński of Poland; and Xavier for Saint Francis Xavier, whom his mother's family held as one of their patron saints. 

At the time of his birth, Louis Stanislas was fourth in line to the throne of France, behind his father, the Dauphin; and his two elder brothers, Louis Joseph Xavier, Duke of Burgundy and Louis Auguste, Duke of Berry. The former died in 1761, leaving Louis Auguste as heir apparent until the Dauphin's own premature death in 1765. The two deaths elevated Louis Stanislas to second in the line of succession, while Louis Auguste, acquired the title of Dauphin. Louis Stanislas found comfort in his governess, Madame de Marsan, Governess of the Children of France, (Gouvernante des Enfants de France), as he was her favourite among his siblings. Mansel, 11  Louis Stanislas was taken away from his governess when he turned seven, age at which the education of boys of royal blood and of the nobility was turned over to men. Antoine de Quélen de Stuer de Caussade, Duke of La Vauguyon, a friend of his father, was named his governor.
Louis Stanislas was an intelligent boy, excelling in classics. His education was of the same quality and consistency as that of his older brother, Louis Auguste, despite the fact that Louis Auguste was heir and Louis Stanislas was not.  Louis Stanislas' education was quite religious in nature, several of his teachers being ecclesiastics. La Vauguyon drilled into young Louis Stanislas and his brothers the way he thought princes should "know how to withdraw themselves, to like to work," and "to know how to reason correctly".In April 1771, Louis Stanislas's education was formally concluded, and his own independent household was established,  which astounded contemporaries with its extravagance: in 1773, the number of servants reached 390. Mansel, 20  In the same month his household was founded, Louis was granted several titles by his grandfather, Louis XV: Duke of Anjou, Count of Maine, Count of Perche and Count of Senoches. Mansel, 24 On 17 December 1773 he was ordained as Grand Master of the Order of St. Lazarus.
Marriage
On 14 May 1771, Louis Stanislas married Princess Maria Giuseppina of Savoy. Marie Joséphine (as she was known in France) was a daughter of the then Duke and Duchess of Savoy, future king Victor Amadeus III of Sardinia.A luxurious ball followed the wedding on 20 May.  Louis Stanislas was repulsed by his wife, the new Countess of Provence, who was considered to be ugly, tedious and ignorant of the court at Versailles. The marriage remained unconsummated; biographers disagree about the reason, maintaining that it was due to Louis Stanislas' alleged impotence (according to biographer Antonia Fraser) or his unwillingness to sleep with his wife, due to her poor personal hygiene. She never brushed her teeth, plucked her eyebrows, or used any perfumes.  At the time of his marriage, Louis Stanislas was obese and waddled instead of walked. He never exercised and continued to eat enormous amounts of food. Despite the fact that Louis Stanislas was not infatuated with his wife, he boasted that the two enjoyed vigorous conjugal relations — such declarations were held in low esteem by courtiers at Versailles. He also proclaimed his wife to be pregnant, merely to spite Louis Auguste and his wife Archduchess Marie Antoinette of Austria, who had not yet consummated their marriage.  The Dauphin and Louis Stanislas did not enjoy a harmonious relationship, and often quarrelled,  as did their wives. Mansel, 111  Louis Stanislas impregnated his wife in 1774, having conquered his aversion to Marie Joséphine. However, the pregnancy ended in a miscarriage.  A second pregnancy in 1781 was also miscarried. The marriage was, ultimately, childless.  
At his brother's court
On 27 April 1774, Louis XV fell ill after having contracted smallpox, and died the following 10 May.   The Dauphin, Louis Auguste, succeeded his grandfather as King Louis XVI.  Louis Stanislas longed for political influence. He attempted to gain admittance to the King’s council in 1774, ultimately failing. Louis Stanislas was left in a political limbo that he called "a gap of 12 years in my political life".  Louis XVI granted Louis Stanislas revenues from the Duchy of Alençon in December 1774. The duchy was given to enhance Louis Stanislas' prestige; however, his appanage turned over only 300,000 livres per annum, an amount much lower than it had been at its peak in the fourteenth century.  King Louis XVI, his brothers, and Marie Antoinette became fellows of the masonic lodge Trois Frères à l'Orient de Versailles. Charles Porset, Hiram sans-culotte? Franc-maçonnerie, lumières et révolution: trente ans d'études et de recherches, Paris: Honoré Champion, 1998
p. 207.  Louis Stanislas travelled more through France than other members of the royal family, who rarely left the Île-de-France. In 1774, he accompanied his sister Madame Clotilde to Chambéry, on the journey to meet her bridegroom Charles Emmanuel, Prince of Piedmont, heir to the throne of Sardinia. In 1775, he visited Lyon and also his spinster aunts, Madame Adélaïde and Madame Victoire, while they were taking the waters at Vichy.  The four provincial tours that Louis Stanislas took before the year 1791 amounted to a total of three months. On 5 May 1778, Dr. Lassonne, Marie Antoinette's private physician, confirmed her pregnancy.  On 19 December 1778, the Queen gave birth to a daughter, who was named Marie-Thérèse Charlotte de France, and given the honorific title Madame Royale. The birth of a girl came as a relief to the comte de Provence, who kept his position as heir to Louis XVI, since Salic Law excluded women from acceding to the throne of France.  Fraser, 201  However, Louis Stanislas did not remain heir to the throne much longer, as on 22 October 1781, Marie Antoinette gave birth to the Dauphin, Louis Joseph. Louis Stanislas and the Comte d’Artois served as godfathers by proxy for the Holy Roman Emperor, the Queen’s brother.   When Marie Antoinette gave birth to her second son, Louis Charles, in March 1785, Louis Stanislas slid further down the line of succession. In 1780, Anne Nompar de Caumont de La Force, comtesse de Balbi entered the service of Marie Joséphine. Louis Stanislas soon fell in love with his wife's new lady-in-waiting, and installed her as his mistress,  which resulted in the couple's already small affection for each other cooling entirely.  Louis Stanislas commissioned a pavilion for his mistress on a parcel that became known as the Parc Balbi, near the Pièce d’eau des Suisses and the Potager du Roi at Versailles. Louis Stanislas lived a quiet and sedentary lifestyle at this point, not having a great deal to do since his self-proclaimed political exclusion in 1774. He kept himself occupied with his vast library of over 11,000 books at Balbi's pavilion, reading for several hours each morning.  In the early 1780, he also incurred huge debts totaling 10 million livres, which his brother Louis XVI paid for him. An Assembly of Notables (the members consisted of magistrates, mayors, nobles and clergy) was convened in February 1787 to ratify the financial reforms sought by the Controller-General of Finance Charles Alexandre de Calonne. This provided Louis Stanislas, who abhorred the radical reforms proposed by Calonne, the opportunity he had long been waiting for to establish himself in politics.  The reforms proposed a new property tax,  and new elected provincial assemblies that would have a say in local taxation.  Calonne's proposition was rejected outright by the notables, and, as a result, Louis XVI dismissed him. The Archbishop of Toulouse, Étienne Charles de Loménie de Brienne, acquired Calonne's ministry. Brienne attempted to salvage Calonne's reforms, but ultimately failed to convince the notables to approve them. A frustrated Louis XVI dissolved the assembly. 
Brienne's reforms were then submitted to the Parlement de Paris in the hopes that they would be approved. (A parlement was responsible for ratifying the King’s edicts. Each province had its own parlement, but the parlement de Paris was the most significant of all.) The Parlement de Paris refused to accept Brienne’s proposals, and pronounced that any new taxation would have to be approved by an Estates-General (the nominal parliament of France). Louis XVI and Brienne took a hostile stance against the parlement's rejection, and Louis XVI had to implement a Lit de justice (which automatically registered an edict in the Parlement de Paris) to ratify the desired reforms. On 8 May, Jean-Jacques Duval d'Eprémesnil and Goislard de Montsabert, two of the leading members of the Parlement de Paris were arrested. There was rioting in Brittany, Provence, Burgundy and Béarn in reaction to their arrest. This unrest was engineered by local magistrates and nobles, who enticed the people to revolt against the Lit de Justice, which was quite unfavourable to the nobles and magistrates. The clergy also joined the provincial cause, and condemned Brienne's tax reforms. Brienne conceded defeat in July and agreed to calling the Estates-General to meet in 1789. He resigned from his post in August and was replaced by the Swiss magnate Jacques Necker. In November 1788, a second Assembly of Notables was convened by Jacques Necker, to consider the makeup of the next Estates-General.  The Parlement de Paris recommended that the Estates should be the same as they were at the last assembly, in 1614 (this would mean that the clergy and nobility would have more representation than the Third Estate).  The notables rejected the "dual representation" proposal. Louis Stanislas was the only notable to vote to increase the size of the Third Estate.  Necker disregarded the notables' judgment, and convinced Louis XVI to grant the extra representation — Louis duly obliged on 27 December. 
The outbreak of the French Revolution The Estates-General were convened in May 1789 to ratify financial reforms.  Louis Stanislas favoured a stalwart position against the Third Estate and its demands for tax reform. On 17 June, the Third Estate declared itself a National Assembly, an Assembly not of the Estates, but of the People.Louis Stanislas urged the King to act strongly against the declaration, while the King's popular minister, Jacques Necker, intended to compromise with the new assembly. Louis XVI was characteristically indecisive. On 9 July, the assembly declared itself a National Constituent Assembly, that would give France a Constitution. On 11 July, Louis XVI dismissed Jacques Necker, which led to widespread rioting across Paris. On 12 July, the sabre charge of Charles-Eugène de Lorraine, prince de Lambesc's cavalry regiment, the Royal-Allemand, on a crowd gathered at the Tuileries gardens, sparked the Storming of the Bastille two days later.  On 16 July, the comte d’Artois left France with his wife and children, along with many other courtiers.  Artois and his family took up residence in Turin, the capital city of his father-in-law’s Kingdom of Sardinia, with the Condé family. Louis Stanislas decided to remain at Versailles.  When the royal family plotted to abscond from Versailles to Metz, Louis Stanislas advised the King not to leave, to which the latter duly agreed. The royal family was ripped away from their Palace at Versailles, the day after the 5 October 1789 women's march on Versailles.  In Paris, the Comte and his wife lodged in the Luxembourg Palace, while the rest of the royal family stayed in the Tuileries Palace.  In March 1791, the National Assembly created a law outlining the regency of Louis Charles in case his father died while he was still too young to reign. The law created the potential regency as follows: Louis Charles' nearest male relative in France (presently the comte de Provence Louis Stanislas), and after him, the regency would be given to the duc d’Orléans, and if he were unavailable, the regency would go to election. The comte de Provence and his wife fled to the Austrian Netherlands in conjunction with the royal family’s failed Flight to Varennes in June 1791. 
Exile
The early yearsWhen the comte de Provence arrived in the Low Countries, he proclaimed himself de facto regent of France. Louis Stanislas exploited a document that he and Louis XVI had written  before the latter's failed escape to Varennes. The document gave Louis Stanislas the regency in the event of his brother's death, or inability to perform his role as King. Louis Stanislas would join the other princes-in-exile at Coblenz soon after his escape. It was there that the comte d’Artois, the Condés and the comte de Provence, proclaimed that their objective was to invade France. Louis XVI was greatly annoyed by his brothers' behaviour. Provence sent emissaries to various European courts asking for financial aid, soldiers, and munition. Artois secured a castle for the court in exile in the Electorate of Trier, where their maternal uncle, Clemens Wenceslaus of Saxony, was the Archbishop-Elector. Louis Stanislas' rallying bore fruit when the rulers of Prussia and Austria gathered at Dresden. They released the Declaration of Pillnitz in August 1791, which urged Europe to intervene in France if Louis XVI or his family were threatened. Provence's endorsement of the declaration was not well received in France, by the people, or by Louis XVI. In January 1792, the Legislative Assembly declared that all the émigrés were traitors to France. Their property and titles were confiscated.  The monarchy of France was abolished by the National Convention on 21 September 1792. Louis XVI was executed in January 1793. This left his young son, Louis Charles, as titular King Louis XVII of France. The princes-in-exile proclaimed Louis Charles "King Louis XVII". Louis Stanislas now unilaterally declared himself regent for his nephew, who was too young to be head of the House of Bourbon (since the French monarchy had been abolished for several months, Louis XVII never actually ruled, and any claim to regency would have been in name only). Young Louis XVII's reign did not last long as he died in June 1795. His only surviving sibling was his sister Marie-Thérèse Charlotte de France, Madame Royale, who was not considered a candidate for the throne because of France's traditional adherence to Salic Law. Thus on 16 June, the princes-in-exile declared the comte de Provence "King Louis XVIII". The new King accepted their declaration soon after.  Louis XVIII busied himself drafting a manifesto in response to Louis XVII's death. The manifesto, known as "The Declaration of Verona" was Louis XVIII's attempt to introduce the French people to his politics. The Declaration of Verona beckoned France back into the arms of the monarchy, "which for fourteen centuries was the glory of France". Louis XVIII negotiated Marie-Thérèse’s release from her Paris prison in 1795. Louis XVIII desperately wanted Marie-Thérèse to marry her first cousin, Louis Antoine, duc d’Angoulême, the son of the comte d'Artois. Louis XVIII deceived his niece by telling her that her parents' last wishes were for her to marry Louis Antoine, and Marie-Thérèse duly agreed to her uncle-king's wishes. Louis XVIII was forced to abandon Verona when Napoleon Bonaparte invaded the Republic of Venice. Nagel, 190 
1796 – 1807Louis XVIII had been vying for the custody of his niece Marie-Thérèse since her release from the Temple Tower in December 1795. Louis succeeded when Francis II, Holy Roman Emperor agreed to relinquish custody of Marie-Thérèse in 1796. She had been staying in Vienna with her Habsburg relatives since January 1796.  Louis XVIII moved to Blankenburg in the Duchy of Brunswick (Braunschweig) after his departure from Verona. He lived in a modest two-bedroom apartment over a shop. Nagel, 203  Louis XVIII was forced to leave Blankenberg when King Frederick William II of Prussia died. In light of this, Marie-Thérèse decided to wait a while longer before reuniting with her uncle. In 1798, Emperor Paul I of Russia offered Louis the use of Jelgava Palace in Courland (now Latvia). Paul I also guaranteed Louis's safety and bestowed upon him a generous pension,  however, the Emperor later disregarded this allowance. Nagel, 216  Marie-Thérèse finally joined Louis XVIII at Jelgava in 1799.  In the winter of 1798–1799, Louis XVIII wrote a biography on Marie Antoinette titled Réflexions Historiques sur Marie Antoinette. He attempted to recreate the court life of Versailles at Jelgava, where many old courtiers lived, reestablishing all the court ceremonies, including the lever and coucher (ceremonies that accompanied waking and bedding, respectively). Nagel, 213 Marie-Thérèse married her cousin Louis Antoine on 9 June 1799, at Jelgava Palace. Louis XVIII ordered his wife to attend the marriage ceremony in Courland without her long-time friend (and rumoured lover) Madame de Gourbillon. Queen Marie Joséphine lived apart from her husband in Schleswig Holstein. Louis XVIII was trying desperately to display to the world a united family front. The Queen refused to leave her friend behind with unpleasant consequences that rivalled the wedding in notoriety.  Louis XVIII knew that his nephew Louis Antoine was not compatible with Marie-Thérèse. Despite this, he still pressed for the marriage, which proved to be quite unhappy and produced no children. Louis XVIII attempted to strike up a correspondence with Napoleon Bonaparte (now First Consul of France) in 1800. Louis XVIII urged Bonaparte to restore the Bourbons to their throne, but the future emperor was immune to Louis's requests and continued to consolidate his position as ruler of France. Louis XVIII encouraged his niece to write her memoirs, as he wished them to be used as Bourbon propaganda. Louis also used the diaries of Louis XVI's final attendants in the same way, in 1796 and in 1803.  In January 1801, Tsar Paul told Louis XVIII that he could no longer live in Russia. The court at Jelgava was so low on funds that it had to auction some of its possessions to afford the journey out of Russia. Marie-Thérèse even sold a diamond necklace that the Emperor Paul had given her as a wedding gift. Marie-Thérèse convinced Queen Louise of Prussia to give her family refuge in Prussian territory. Louise consented, but the Bourbons were forced to assume pseudonyms. With Louis XVIII using the title Comte d'Isle (named after his estate in Languedoc), he and his family assumed residence in Warsaw in the Lazienki Palace from 1801 to 1804, after an arduous voyage from Jelgava.  It was very soon after their arrival that they learned of the death of Paul I. Louis hoped that Paul's successor, Alexander I of Russia, would repudiate his father's banishment of the Bourbons (which he later did). Louis XVIII then intended to set off to the Neapolitan court. Charles, comte d'Artois, asked Louis to send his son, Louis Antoine, and daughter-in-law, Marie-Thérèse, to him in Edinburgh. Charles had an allowance from King George III of Great Britain and sent some money to Louis. He requested that his son Louis Antoine and daughter-in-law Marie Thérèse to join him in Edinburgh, but they did not at this time. Louis XVIII's court in exile was being spied on by French police.  The court-in-exile was being financed mainly by interest owed from Francis II on valuables his aunt, Marie Antoinette, had removed from France and had to cut its expenses significantly. In 1803, Napoleon tried to force Louis XVIII to renounce his right to the throne of France, but Louis refused.  In May 1804, Napoleon Bonaparte declared himself Emperor of the French. Louis XVIII and his nephew departed for Sweden in July for a Bourbon family conference, where Louis XVIII, the comte d’Artois, and the duc d'Angoulême issued a statement condemning Napoleon's decision to declare himself emperor.  The King of Prussia issued a proclamation saying that Louis XVIII would have to leave Prussian territory, which meant leaving Warsaw. Alexander I of Russia invited Louis XVIII to resume residence in Jelgava. Louis XVIII had to live under less generous conditions than those enjoyed under Paul I, and he intended to embark for England as soon as possible. Louis XVIII created another policy in 1805: a declaration that was far more liberal than his former ones. It repudiated his Declaration of Verona, promised to abolish conscription, keep Napoleon I's administrative and judicial system, reduce taxes, eliminate political prisons, and guarantee amnesty to everyone who did not oppose a Bourbon Restoration. The opinions expressed in the declaration were largely those of the comte d’Avaray (Louis's best friend in exile). Louis XVIII was forced once again to leave Jelgava when Alexander of Russia informed him that his safety could not be guaranteed on continental Europe. In July 1807, Louis boarded a Swedish frigate to Stockholm, bringing with him only the duc d'Angoulême. Louis did not stay in Sweden for long, and arrived in Great Yarmouth, Norfolk, England, in November 1807. He took up residence in Gosfield Hall, leased to him by the Marquess of Buckingham. 
England
Louis brought his wife and Queen, Marie Joséphine, from mainland Europe in 1808. Louis's stay at Gosfield Hall did not last long, and he moved to Hartwell House in Buckinghamshire, where over one hundred courtiers were housed.   The King paid £500 in rent each year to the proprietor, Sir George Lee. The Prince Regent of the United Kingdom was very charitable to the exiled Bourbons, granting them permanent asylum and giving them extremely generous allowances. The comte d'Artois did not join the court-in-exile in Hartwell, continuing his frivolous life in London. Louis's friend the comte d'Avaray left Hartwell for Madeira in 1809, and died there in 1811. Louis replaced Avaray with the Comte de Blacas. Louis XVIII's wife, Queen Marie Joséphine, died on 13 November 1810.  That same winter, Louis suffered a particularly severe case of gout, which was a recurring problem for him at Hartwell, and he had to be put in a wheelchair. Napoleon I embarked on an invasion of Russia in 1812. This war would prove to be the turning point in his fortunes, as the expedition failed miserably and Napoleon was forced to retreat with an army in tatters.In 1813, Louis XVIII issued another declaration while at Hartwell. "The Declaration of Hartwell" was more liberal than his "Declaration of 1805", asserting that all those who served Napoleon or the Republic would not suffer repercussions for their acts, and that the original owners of the Biens nationaux (lands confiscated from the nobles and clergy during the Revolution) were to be compensated for their losses. Allied troops entered Paris on 31 March 1814.  Louis was, however, unable to walk, and so sent the comte d'Artois to France in January 1814. Louis XVIII issued letters patent appointing Artois Lieutenant General of the Kingdom in the event of the Bourbons being restored. Napoleon I abdicated on 11 April, five days after his Senate had invited the Bourbons to re-assume the throne of France. 
Bourbon Restoration 

Restoration IThe comte d'Artois ruled as Lieutenant-General of the Kingdom until his brother's arrival in Paris on 3 May. Upon his return, the King displayed himself to his subjects by creating a procession through the city. He took up residence in the Tuileries Palace the same day. His niece, the duchesse d'Angoulême, fainted at the sight of the Tuileries. Napoleon's senate called Louis XVIII to the throne on the condition that he would accept the new constitution, which entailed recognition of the Republic and the Empire, a bicameral parliament elected every year, and the tri-colour flag of the aforementioned regimes.  Louis XVIII opposed the senate's constitution, and stated that he was "disbanding the current senate in all the crimes of Bonaparte, and appealing to the French people". The senatorial constitution was burned in a theatre in royalist Bordeaux, and the Municipal Council of Lyon voted for a speech that defamed the senate. The armies occupying Paris demanded that Louis XVIII implement a constitution.  The Charter of 1814 that Louis created entailed all that Saint-Ouen wished for and more: Freedom of Religion, a legislature composed of the Chamber of Deputies  and the Chamber of Peers,  the press would enjoy a degree of freedom, the biens nationaux  would remain in the hands of their current owners.  The constitution had 76 articles. Taxation was to be voted on by the chambers.Catholicism was the official religion of France. To be eligible for election to the Chamber of Deputies, one had to pay over 1,000 francs per year in tax, and be over the age of forty. The King appointed peers to the Chamber of Peers on a hereditary basis, or for life at his discretion. Deputies were elected every five years, with one fifth of them up for election each year.  There were 90,000 citizens eligible to vote. Louis XVIII signed the Treaty of Paris on 30 May 1814. The treaty gave France her 1792 borders, which extended east of the Rhine. She had to pay no war indemnity, and the occupying armies of the Sixth Coalition withdrew instantly from French soil. These generous terms would be reversed in the next Treaty of Paris after the Hundred Days (Napoleon's return to France in 1815). It did not take Louis XVIII long to go back on one of his many promises. He and his Controller-General of Finance Baron Louis were determined not to let the exchequer fall into deficit (there was a 75 million franc debt inherited from Napoleon I), and took fiscal measures to ensure this. Louis XVIII assured the French that the unpopular tax on tobacco, wine and salt would be abolished when he was restored, but he failed to do so, which led to rioting in Bordeaux. Expenditure on the army was slashed in the 1815 budget — in 1814, the military had accounted for 55% of government spending.  
Louis XVIII admitted the comte d'Artois and his nephews, the duc d'Angoulême, and the duc de Berry into the King's council in May 1814, upon its establishment. The council was informally headed by the Prince de Talleyrand.  Louis XVIII took a large interest in the goings-on of the Congress of Vienna (set up to redraw the map of Europe after Napoleon's demise). Talleyrand represented France at the proceedings. Louis was horrified by Prussia's intention to annex the Kingdom of Saxony, to which he was attached because his mother was born a Saxon princess, and he was also concerned that Prussia would dominate Germany. He also wished the Duchy of Parma to be restored to the Parmese Bourbons, and not to Empress Marie Louise of France, as was being suggested by the Allies.  Louis also protested the Allies' inaction in Naples, where he wanted the Napoleonic usurper Joachim Murat removed in favour of the Neapolitan Bourbons.On behalf of the Allies, Austria agreed to send a force to the Kingdom of Naples to depose Murat in February 1815, when it became apparent that Murat corresponded with Napoleon I, which was explicitly forbidden by a recent treaty. Murat never actually wrote to Napoleon, but Louis, intent on restoring the Neapolitan Bourbons at any cost, forged the correspondence, and subsidised the Austrian expedition with 25 million francs. Louis XVIII succeeded in getting the Neapolitan Bourbons restored immediately. Parma was bestowed upon Empress Marie Louise for life, and the Parmese Bourbons were given the Duchy of Lucca until the death of Marie Louise.
Hundred Days 

On 26 February 1815, Napoleon Bonaparte escaped his island prison of Elba and embarked for France. He arrived with about 1,000 troops near Cannes on 1 March. Louis XVIII was not particularly worried by Bonaparte's excursion, as such small numbers of troops could be easily overcome. There was, however, a major underlying problem for the Bourbons: Louis XVIII had failed to purge the military of its Bonapartist troops. This led to mass desertions from the Bourbon armies to Bonaparte's. Furthermore, Louis XVIII could not join the campaign against Napoleon in the south of France because he was suffering from another case of gout.  Minister of War Marshall Soult dispatched Louis Philippe d'Orléans, the comte d'Artois and Marshall MacDonald to apprehend Napoleon. Louis XVIII's underestimation of Bonaparte proved disastrous. On 19 March, the army stationed outside Paris defected to Bonaparte, leaving the city vulnerable to attack.  That same day, Louis XVIII quit the capital with a small escort at midnight. Louis decided to go first to Lille, and then crossed the border into the United Kingdom of the Netherlands, staying in Ghent.  Other leaders, most prominently Alexander I of Russia, debated that in case of a second victory over the French Empire, the First Prince of the Blood Louis Philippe d'Orléans should be proclaimed king instead of Louis XVIII. However, Napoleon did not rule France again for very long, suffering a decisive defeat at the hands of the armies of the Duke of Wellington and Field Marshal Blücher at the Battle of Waterloo on 18 June. Leaders came to the consensus that Louis XVIII should be restored to the throne of France. 
1815 – 1824


Louis XVIII returned to France promptly after Napoleon's defeat, to ensure his second restoration "in baggage train of the enemy", i.e. with Wellington's troops.  The Duke of Wellington used King Louis's person to open up the route to Paris, as some fortresses refused to surrender to the Allies, but agreed to do so for their King. King Louis arrived at Cambrai on 26 June, where he released a proclamation stating that all those who served the Emperor in the Hundred Days would not be persecuted, except for the "instigators". It was also acknowledged that Louis XVIII's government might have made mistakes during the First Restoration.  On 29 June, a deputation of five from the Chamber of Deputies and the Chamber of Peers approached Wellington about putting a foreign Prince on the throne of France. Wellington rejected their pleas outright, declaring that "[Louis XVIII is] the best way to preserve the integrity of France".  Wellington ordered the deputies to espouse King Louis's cause.  Louis XVIII entered Paris on 8 July to a boisterous reception: the Tuileries Palace gardens were thronged with bystanders, and, according to the Duke of Wellington, the acclamation of the crowds there were so loud that evening, that he could not converse with the King. Louis XVIII's role in politics from the Hundred Days onward was voluntarily diminished; he resigned most of his duties to his council. He and his ministry embarked on a series of reforms through the summer of 1815. The King's council, an informal group of ministers that advised Louis XVIII, was dissolved and replaced by a tighter knit privy council, the "Ministère de Roi". Artois, Berry and Angoulême were purged from the new "ministère", and Talleyrand was appointed as the first Président du Conseil, i.e. Prime Minister of France.  On 14 July, the ministry dissolved the units of the army deemed "rebellious". Hereditary peerage was re-established to Louis's behest by the ministry. In August elections for the Chamber of Deputies returned unfavourable results for Talleyrand. The ministry wished for moderate deputies, but the electorate voted almost exclusively for ultra-royalists, resulting in the Chambre introuvable. The duchesse d'Angoulême and the comte d'Artois pressured King for the dismissal of his obsolete ministry. Talleyrand tendered his resignation on 20 September. Louis XVIII chose Armand-Emmanuel du Plessis, duc de Richelieu to be his new Prime Minister. Richelieu was chosen because he was accepted by Louis's family and the reactionary Chamber of Deputies. Anti-Napoleonic sentiment was high in Southern France, and this was prominently displayed in the White Terror. The White Terror saw the purge of all important Napoleonic officials from government, and the execution of others. The people of France committed barbarous acts against some of these officials. Guillaume Marie Anne Brune (a Napoleonic marshal) was savagely assassinated, and his remains thrown into the Rhône River.  Louis XVIII deplored such illegal acts, but vehemently supported the prosecution of those marshals that helped Napoleon I in the Hundred Days.   Louis XVIII’s government executed Napoleon's Marshal Ney, Prince de la Moskowa, in December 1815 for treason. His confidants the Marquis de Bonnay and the Duc de la Chatre advised him to inflict firm punishments on the “traitors”.The King was reluctant to shed blood, and this greatly irritated the ultra-reactionary chamber of deputies, who felt that Louis XVIII was not executing enough.  The government issued a proclamation of amnesty to the “traitors” in January 1816, but the trials that had already begun were finished in due course. That same declaration also banned any member of the House of Bonaparte from owning property in, or entering, France.  It is estimated that between 50,000 – 80,000 officials were purged from the government during what was known as the Second White Terror. In November 1815, Louis XVIII’s government had to sign another Treaty of Paris, formally ending Napoleon’s hundred days. The previous treaty had been quite favourable to France, but this one took a hard-line. France’s borders were retracted to their extent at 1790. France had to pay for an army to occupy her, for at least five years, at a cost of 150 million francs per year. France also had to pay a war indemnity of 700 million francs to the allies. In 1818, the Chambers passed a military law, which increased the size of the army by over 100,000. In October of the same year, Louis XVIII’s foreign minister, the Duc de Richelieu, succeeded in convincing the powers to withdraw their armies early, in exchange for a sum of over 200 million francs. Louis XVIII chose many centrist cabinets, as he wanted to appease the populace. Much to the dismay of his brother, the ultra-royalist comte d’Artois,  he always dreaded the day he would die, believing that his brother, and heir, Artois, would abandon the centrist government for an ultra-royalist autocracy, which would not bring favourable results. King Louis disliked the First Prince of the Blood, Louis-Philippe d'Orléans, and took every opportunity to snub him.  King Louis's nephew, the duc de Berry, was assassinated at the Paris Opera, on 14 February 1820. The royal family was grief-stricken Price, 106–107  and Louis XVIII broke an ancient tradition to attend his nephew's funeral, as previous Kings of France could not have any association with death. Berry was the only member of the family thought to be able to beget children. His wife gave birth to a posthumous son in September Henri, duc de Bordeaux.  The future of the Bourbons as kings of France was in still doubt. The Chamber of Deputies proposed amending the Salic law to allow the Duchesse d’Angoulême to accede to the throne.  On 12 June 1820, the Chambers ratified legislation that increased the number of deputies from 258 to 430. The extra deputies were to be elected by the wealthiest quarter of the population in each département. These individuals now effectively had two votes.  Around the same time as the “law of the two votes”, Louis XVIII began to receive visits every Wednesday from a lady named Zoé Talon, comtesse du Cayla, and ordered that nobody should disturb him while he was with her. It was rumoured that he inhaled snuff from her breasts,  which earned her the nickname of tabatière (snuffbox).   In 1823, France embarked on a military intervention in Spain, where a revolt had occurred against the King Ferdinand VII. France succeeded in crushing the rebellion,  which the duc d’Angoulême headed. 
DeathLouis XVIII's health began to fail in the spring of 1824. He was suffering from obesity, gout and gangrene, both dry and wet, in his legs and spine. Louis died on 16 September 1824, surrounded by the extended royal family and some government officials. He was succeeded by his youngest brother, the comte d’Artois, as Charles X. Louis XVIII was the only French monarch of the 19th century to die while still ruling. He was interred at the Basilica of St Denis, the necropolis of French kings.
Ancestors   
In fiction
Louis XVIII appears briefly in the novel The Count of Monte Cristo, by Alexandre Dumas. The Count of Provence was portrayed by Sebastian Armesto in the 2006 film Marie Antoinette, a biographical film written and directed by Sofia Coppola, based on the book, Marie Antoinette: The Journey by Lady Antonia Fraser. In contradiction with historical facts, he is portrayed in the film as having a son.
In the 1970 film Waterloo, Louis XVIII was portrayed by Orson Welles.
References 
Notes 
Sources

Lever, Évelyne, Louis XVIII, Fayard, Paris, 1988. (paperback, ISBN 2-213-78010-1  (French)
Mansel, Philip. Louis XVIII. Thrupp, Stroud, Gloucestershire, UK: Sutton Publishing, 1999 (paperback, ISBN 0-7509-2217-6).


External links 

Louis XVIII at NNDB.COM
Quotes of Louis XVIII

 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
  
   
DEFAULTSORT



























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Raymond Burr
 Raymond William Stacey Burr (May 21, 1917 – September 12, 1993) was a Canadian actor,    primarily known for his title roles in the television dramas Perry Mason and Ironside. His early acting career included roles on Broadway, radio, television and in film,    usually as the villain. Raymond Burr U.S Actor. Museum of Broadcast Communications. Updated 2010 Accessed March 25, 2010  He won two Emmy Awards in 1959 and 1961 Awards for Raymond Burr (IMDB)  for the role of Perry Mason, which he played for nine seasons between 1957 and 1966. His second hit series, Ironside, earned him six Emmy nominations, and two Golden Globe nominations. 
He is also widely known for his role as Steve Martin in both Godzilla, King of the Monsters! and Godzilla 1985.In addition to acting, Burr owned an orchid business and had begun to grow a vineyard. He was a collector of wines and art, and was very fond of cooking.    He was also a dedicated seashell collector whose financial support and gift of cowries and cones from Fiji helped to create the Bailey-Matthews Shell Museum on Sanibel, Florida.[1]After his death from cancer in 1993, Burr's personal life came into question as details of his known biography appeared to be unverifiable. Podolsky, J.D. "The Defense Rests". People. September 27, 1993 Vol. 40, No. 13  People/Television;For the Defense. Pittsburgh Post-Gazette. September 21, 1993. Pg. D6. Retrieved March 23, 2010. In 1996, Raymond Burr was ranked #44 on TV Guide's 50 Greatest TV Stars of All Time. 
Early lifeBurr was born Raymond William Stacey Burr in New Westminster, British Columbia, Canada,  to William Johnston Burr (1889–1985), an Irish hardware salesman, Obituary. Los Angeles Daily News. September 14, 1993. Retrieved March 25, 2010.  and his wife, Minerva (née Smith, 1892–1974), a concert pianist and music teacher, who was of English and Scottish descent.  After his parents divorced, Burr moved to Vallejo, California  with his mother and younger siblings, Geraldine and James Edmond. He attended a military academy for a while and graduated from Berkeley High School. In later years Burr freely invented stories of a happy childhood. He told the Modesto Bee in 1986, for example, that when he was twelve and a half years old, his mother sent him to New Mexico for a year to work as a ranch hand. He was already his full adult height and rather large and "had fallen in with a group of college-aged kids who didn't realize how young Raymond was, and they let him tag along with them in activities and situations far too sophisticated for him to handle." The Modesto Bee: Jane Ardmore "Welcome Home to Perry Mason", June 3, 1986, accessed March 26, 2010  He developed a passion for growing things and, while still a teenager, joined the Civilian Conservation Corps for a year.  Throughout his teenage years he had some acting work, making his stage debut at age 12 with a Vancouver stock company. Burr may have served in the Coast Guard, but never in the United States Navy as he and his publicists later claimed. Starr, Hiding in Plain Sight, 57–58. The National Personnel Records Center has no record of a Raymond Burr serving in any branch of the U.S. military.  Nor was he seriously wounded in the stomach during the Battle of Okinawa in the latter stages of World War II.  Other invented biographical details include years of college education at a variety of institutions, world travel, an acting tour of the United Kingdom, and success in high school athletics.  Such claims were accepted as fact by the press during his lifetime   and by his first biographer. 
Early careerIn 1937 Burr began his acting career at the Pasadena Playhouse. In 1941, he landed his first Broadway role in Crazy with the Heat. He became a contract player at RKO studio, playing a film noir villain in Raw Deal (1948).Burr appeared in over 60 movies between 1946 and 1957. In 1976 Richard Schickel cited his performance in Pitfall (1948) as a prototype of film noir in contrast with the appealing television characters for which Burr later became famous.  He received favorable notice for his role as an aggressive prosecutor in A Place in the Sun (1951), co-starring Elizabeth Taylor, Montgomery Clift and Shelly Winters. Perhaps his best-known film role of the period was that of a suspected murderer in the Alfred Hitchcock classic Rear Window (1954), starring James Stewart and Grace Kelly.   He played the part of reporter, Steve Martin, in Godzilla, King of the Monsters! (1956). Burr emerged as a prolific television character actor in the early-to-mid 1950s. He made his television debut on the April 24, 1952 episode "The Tiger" of Gruen Playhouse on the DuMont TV network. (At about the same time, Burr guest-starred on an episode of The Amazing Mr. Malone on ABC.) This part led to other roles in such programs as Dragnet, Chesterfield Sound Off Time, Four Star Playhouse, Mr. & Mrs. North, Schlitz Playhouse of Stars, The Ford Television Theatre, and Lux Video Theatre.During this time Burr's distinctive voice also could be heard on network radio, appearing alongside Jack Webb in the short-lived Pat Novak for Hire on ABC radio, as well as in early episodes of NBC's Dragnet.  He also made guest appearances on other Los Angeles-based shows, such as Yours Truly, Johnny Dollar and landed a starring role in CBS's Fort Laramie (1956),  which depicted 19th-century life at old Fort Laramie.  One year later, Burr became a television star as Perry Mason.
Perry Mason and IronsideIn 1956, Burr auditioned for the role of District Attorney Hamilton Burger in Perry Mason, a new courtroom drama based on the highly successful novels written and created by Erle Stanley Gardner that was to air on CBS. William Talman tried out for the title role. The producers of the show allowed Burr to try for the title role and when Gardner, who was present at the audition, saw him he declared, "He is Perry Mason."  Mason eventually won the role with which Burr was most closely identified.  The series ran from 1957 to 1966, and Burr won Emmy Awards  in 1959 and 1961 for his performance as Perry Mason. The series has been re-run in syndication ever since.  Beginning in 2006, the series has become available on DVD, with each calendar year seeing the release of one season as two separate volumes. Though Burr's character is often said never to have lost a case, he did lose two murder cases in early episodes of the series, once when his client misled him and another time when his client was later cleared. In the early 1960s, Burr narrated one film and appeared in several others sponsored by the U.S. Public Health Service. They were designed to educate the public about accident prevention. 

Burr moved from CBS to Universal Studios, where he played the title role in the television drama Ironside, which ran on NBC. In the pilot episode, San Francisco Chief of Detectives Robert T. Ironside is wounded by a sniper during an attempt on his life and is left an invalid in a wheelchair. This role gave Burr another hit series, the first crime drama show ever to star a disabled police officer. The show, which ran from 1967 to 1975, earned Burr six Emmy nominations and two Golden Globe nominations.  Burr's weight, always an issue for him in getting roles, became a public relations problem when Johnny Carson began making jokes about him during his Tonight Show monologues. Burr refused to appear as Carson's guest from then on and told Us Weekly years later: "I have been asked a number of times to do his show and I won't do it. Because I like NBC. He's doing an NBC show. If I went on I'd have some things to say, not just about the bad jokes he's done about me, but bad jokes he does about everybody who can't fight back because they aren't there. And that wouldn't be good for NBC."  In later life his distinctive physique and manner could be used as a reference that would be universally recognized. One journal for librarians published a writer's opinion that "asking persons without cataloging experience to design automated catalogs...is as practical as asking Raymond Burr to pole vault." NBC failed in two attempts to launch Burr as the star of a new series. In a two-hour television movie format, Mallory: Circumstantial Evidence aired in February 1976 with Burr again in the role of the lawyer who outwits the district attorney. Despite good reviews for Burr, the critical reception was poor and NBC decided against developing it into a series.  In 1977, Burr starred in the short-lived TV series Kingston: Confidential, a critical failure that was scheduled opposite the extraordinarily popular Charlie's Angels. It was cancelled after thirteen weeks.  Burr took on a shorter project next, playing an underworld boss in a six-hour miniseries, 79 Park Avenue  One last attempt to launch a series followed on CBS. The two-hour premiere of The Jourdan Chance aroused little interest. In 1985, Burr was approached by producers Dean Hargrove and Fred Silverman to star in a made-for-TV movie Perry Mason Returns. Raymond Burr to Return as Perry Mason. Eugene Register. November 30, 1985  Burr recalled in a 1986 interview, "They asked me to do a new "Godzilla" the same week they asked me to do another Perry Mason, so I did them both." "Dougan, Michael, Raymond Burr: Much More than Just Perry Mason. The Telegraph. June 9, 1986. Retrieved March 26, 2006.  He agreed to do the Mason movie if Barbara Hale returned to reprise her role as Della Street.  Hale agreed and when Perry Mason Returns aired in December 1985, her character became the defendant.  The rest of the original cast had died, but Hale's real-life son William Katt played the role of Paul Drake, Jr.  The movie was so successful Burr made 26 more before his death.  Many episodes were filmed in and around Denver, Colorado. By 1993, when Burr signed with NBC for another season of Mason films, he was using a wheelchair full-time because of his failing health. In his final Perry Mason movie, The Case of the Killer Kiss, he was shown either sitting or standing while leaning on a table, but only once standing unsupported for a few seconds. O'Conner, John J. Review/Television; Case of the Missing Mason. New York Times, May 10, 1994. Retrieved March 26, 2010.  Twelve more Mason movies were scheduled before Burr's death, including one scheduled to film the month he died. Raymond Burr Reported Seriously Ill at Ranch. The Sunday Gazette. April 27, 1993. Retrieved March 27, 2010. In 1993, as he had with the Perry Mason TV movies, Burr decided to do an Ironside reunion movie. In May of that year, The Return of Ironside aired, reuniting the entire original cast of the 1967-1975 series.  Burr's illness precluded any further such reunions. 
Other workIn 1973, Burr starred in one-hour television drama, Portrait: A Man Whose Name Was John. He portrayed Archbishop Angelo Roncalli, the future Pope John XXIII, as he tried to prevent the forced return of Jewish children from Istanbul to Nazi Germany. Burr co-starred in such TV films as Eischied: Only The Pretty Girls Die and Disaster On The Coastliner (both 1979), The Curse of King Tut's Tomb and The Night the City Screamed (both 1980), and Peter and Paul (1981). He also had a supporting role in Dennis Hopper's controversial film Out of the Blue (1980) and spoofed his Perry Mason image in Airplane II: The Sequel (1982).Burr reprised his 1956 role in Godzilla, King of the Monsters! in Godzilla 1985: The Legend Is Reborn.   The film won Burr a nomination for a Razzie Award for Worst Supporting Actor.  Burr delivered the film's closing lines: "For now, Godzilla - that strangely innocent and tragic monster - has gone to earth. Whether he returns or not, or is never again seen by human eyes, the things he has taught us remain." Burr also worked as media spokesman for the now-defunct British Columbia-based real estate company Block Bros. in TV, radio, and print ads during the late 1970s and early 1980s. In 1983, he made a rare stage appearance when he starred in the thriller Underground at the Royal Alexandra Theatre, Toronto and after a UK tour, at the Prince of Wales Theatre, London. On January 20, 1987, he hosted the television special that later served as the pilot for the long-running series Unsolved Mysteries. 
Personal lifeBurr married actress Isabella ("Bella") Ward on January 10, 1949. They lived together for less than a year and divorced after four years. Neither remarried.  At various times in his career, Burr or his managers offered biographical details that appear spurious or unverifiable. These include marriage to Scottish actress Annette Sutherland, supposedly killed in the same plane crash as Leslie Howard. A son, Michael Evan, was said to have resulted from another disputed possible marriage to Laura Andrina Morgan. Burr's account provided the only evidence of the boy's existence and death from leukemia at age 10.  As late as 1991, Burr told Parade magazine that when he realized his son was dying, he took him on a one-year tour of the United States. He said, "Before my boy left, before his time was gone, I wanted him to see the beauty of his country and its people."  His publicist knew that Burr worked in Hollywood throughout the year he said he was touring with his son.  As with Burr's claims to have served in the U.S. military, many of these fictions were believed and widely reported.  In the late 1950s, Burr was rumored to be romantically involved with Natalie Wood.  Wood's agent sent her on public dates so she could be noticed by directors and producers and so that the actors could present themselves in public as heterosexuals. The dates also helped to disguise Wood's intimate relationship with Robert Wagner, whom she later married.  Burr felt enough attraction to Wood to resent Warner Bros.' decision to promote her attachment to Tab Hunter instead. Robert Benevides later said: "He was a little bitter about it. He was really in love with her, I guess."  
Sexual orientationIn the mid 1950s, Burr met Robert Benevides (born 1929), a young actor and Korean War veteran, on the set of Perry Mason. According to Benevides, they became a couple about 1960. Benevides gave up acting in 1963   and later became a production consultant for 21 of the Perry Mason TV movies. Murphy, Mary. "With Raymond Burr During His Final Battle." TV Guide, 25 September 1993, pp. 34-43  Together they owned and operated an orchid business and then a vineyard,  in the Dry Creek Valley. They were partners until Burr's death in 1993.  Burr left Benevides his entire estate, including "all my jewelry, clothing, books, works of art,...and other items of a personal nature." Later accounts of Burr's life explain that he hid his homosexuality to protect his career. In 2000, AP reporter Bob Thomas recalled the situation: Andrew Mersmann, "Robert Benevides: Raymond Burr Vineyards, Sonoma County, California," April 2008, accessed July 13, 2011   Art Marks, a producer of Perry Mason, recalled Burr's talk of wives and children: "I know he was just putting on a show....That was my gut feeling. I think the wives and the loving women, the Natalie Wood thing, were a bit of a cover."  In 2006, Dean Hargrove, who worked on Perry Mason Returns, said: "I had always assumed that Raymond was gay, because he had a relationship with Robert Benevides for a very long time. Whether or not he had relationships with women, I had no idea. I did know that I had trouble keeping track of whether he was married or not in these stories. Raymond had the ability to mythologize himself, to some extent, and some of his stories about his past...tended to grow as time went by." A 2007 memoir by actor Paul Picerni described several experiences with Burr about 1951 on the set of A Place in the Sun, when he felt Burr expressed sexual interest in him. He wrote, "I saw him staring at me. With his big blue eyes. And with this strange expression on his face. For the first time in my life, I felt like a DAME. Then it hit me: He'd been giving me all this bullshit about his wife and his two kids in London, when in fact he was gay, and he was makin' a move on me!" He remembered Burr "was a great guy and very subtle in his homosexuality." 
HobbiesBurr had many hobbies over the course of his life: cultivating orchids, collecting wine, art, stamps, and seashells. He was interested in cooking, flying, sailing, and fishing. According to A&E Biography, Burr was also an avid reader with a retentive memory. He was also among the earliest importers and breeders of Portuguese Water Dogs in the United States. He developed his interest in cultivating and hybridizing orchids into an orchid business with Benevides. Over 20 years, their company, Sea God Nurseries, had nurseries in Fiji, Hawaii, the Azores, and California, and was responsible for adding more than 1,500 new orchids to the worldwide catalog.  Burr named one them "Barbara Hale Orchid" after his Perry Mason costar.    

Together Burr and Benevides cultivated Cabernet Sauvignon, Chardonnay, and Port grapes, as well as orchids, at Burr's farmland holdings in Sonoma County, California. After Burr's death, Benevides named the property after Burr: "I finally decided it should be called Raymond Burr Vineyards. He didn't want it named after him, I know that. We had talked about that possibility and he didn't like that at all, but we're making great wines now. It's a memorial to him, to his idea, and I think it deserves to be named after him."  The land is still in production and is known as the Raymond Burr Vineyards.In 1965, Burr purchased the Naitauba, a   island in Fiji, rich in seashells. There, he and Benevides oversaw the raising of copra (coconut meat) and cattle, as well as orchids.   They spent two months a year there, and Burr planned to retire there permanently. However, medical problems made that impossible and he sold the property in 1983. 
PhilanthropyBurr was a well-known philanthropist.       He gave enormous sums of money, including his salaries from the Perry Mason movies, to charity. He was also known for sharing his wealth with friends. He sponsored 26 foster children through the Foster Parents' Plan or Save The Children, many with the greatest medical needs.  He also gave money and some of his Perry Mason scripts to the McGeorge School of Law in Sacramento, California. Burr raised money for the Bailey-Matthews Shell Museum in Sanibel, Florida, donating a considerable collection of Fijian cowries and cones from his island in the Fijis.  In 1993, Sonoma State University awarded Burr an honorary doctorate.  He supported medical and education institutions in Denver, and in 1993, the University of Colorado awarded him an honorary doctorate for his acting work.  Burr also founded financed the American Fijian Foundation that funded academic research, including efforts to develop a dictionary of the language. Burr made repeated trips on behalf of the United Service Organizations (USO). He toured both Korea and Vietnam during wartime and once spent six months touring Korea, Japan, and the Philippines. He sometimes organized his own troupe and toured bases both in the U.S. and overseas, often small installations that the USO did not serve, like one tour of Greenland, Baffinland, Newfoundland and Labrador.  Returning from Vietnam in 1965, he made a speaking tour of the U.S. to advocate an intensified war effort. As the war became more controversial, he modified his tone, called for more attention to the sacrifice of the troops, and said, "My only position on the war is that I wish it were over." Starr, Hiding in Plain Sight, 160-1  In October 1967, NBC aired Raymond Burr Visits Vietnam, a documentary of one of his visits that received mixed reviews, ranging from "The impressions he came up with are neither weighty nor particularly revealing" (Chicago Tribune) to "His questions...were intelligent and elicited some interesting replies." (Los Angeles Times). Burr had a reputation in Hollywood as a thoughtful, generous man years before much of his more-visible philanthropic work. In 1960, Ray Collins, who portrayed Lt. Arthur Tragg on the original Perry Mason series, and who was by that time often ill and unable to remember all the lines he was supposed to speak, stated, "There is nothing but kindness from our star, Ray Burr. Part of his life is dedicated to us, and that's no bull. If there's anything the matter with any of us, he comes around before anyone else and does what he can to help. He's a great star — in the old tradition." 
Illness and deathDuring the filming of his last Perry Mason movie in the spring of 1993, Raymond Burr fell ill.  A Viacom spokesperson told the media that the illness might be related to the malignant kidney that Burr had removed that February.  It was determined that the cancer had spread to his liver and was at that point inoperable. Stevenson, Jennifer. Raymond Burr Dies of Cancer. St. Petersburg Times. September 14, 1993. Accessed on march 27,2010  Burr threw several "goodbye parties" before his death on September 12, 1993, at his Sonoma County, California ranch near Healdsburg.  He was 76 years old.Burr was interred with his parents at Fraser Cemetery, New Westminster, British Columbia, Canada.  On October 1, 1993, a gathering of about 600 family members and friends of Burr mourned him at a memorial service at the Pasadena Playhouse in Pasadena, California.  The private memorial was attended by Robert Benevides, Barbara Hale, Don Galloway, Don Mitchell, Barbara Anderson, Elizabeth Baur, Dean Hargrove, William R. Moses, and Christian I. Nyby II.R. William Ide III, president of the American Bar Association, paid tribute to the way Burr's Perry Mason presented lawyers "in a professional and dignified manner" and helped "to educate many people who previously had not had access to the justice system." Though lawyers once complained of the character's implausibly perfect track record, Ide complimented Burr because he "strove for such authenticity in his courtroom characterizations that we regard his passing as though we lost one of our own." New York Times: [David Margolick, "At the Bar: Raymond Burr's Perry Mason was fictional, but he was surely relevant and, oh, so competent," September 24, 1993], accessed July 15, 2011  The New York Times added that Mason "made the presumption of innocence real...[and] also made lawyers look good.  Not long before Burr died, Mason was named second after F. Lee Bailey in a poll that asked Americans to name the attorney, fictional or not, they most admired. Because Burr had not revealed his homosexuality during his lifetime, initial press accounts gave it sensational treatment. The Pittsburgh Post-Gazette reported that People magazine was preparing a story on Burr's "secret life" and asked, "Are the inevitable rumors true?"     Burr's Ironside co-star, Don Galloway, when asked about Burr's sexual orientation, told People, "I don't know. I never discussed with Raymond his sexuality." The Sunday Mail invented a feminine Burr "wearing a pink frilly apron and doing the ironing. He fussed around like the woman of the house." Burr bequeathed his estate to Robert Benevides and excluded all relatives, including a sister, nieces, and nephews. His will was challenged by a niece and nephew, Minerva and James, the children of his late brother, James E. Burr, without success.  The tabloids estimated that the estate was worth $32 million, but Benevides' attorney, John Hopkins said that was an overestimate.    
RecognitionBurr won the Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actor - Drama Series twice, in 1959 and 1961, for his performance as Perry Mason. He was also nominated a further seven times, once for Mason and six times for Ironside. For the latter role, he was also nominated twice for the Golden Globe Award for Best Actor – Television Series Drama.The Thomas M. Cooley Law School in Lansing, Michigan, awards the Raymond Burr Award for Excellence in Criminal Law. Burr has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame at 6656 Hollywood Blvd. In 2008, Canada Post issued a postage stamp in its "Canadians in Hollywood" series featuring Burr. Burr received the 2009 Canadian Legends Award and a star on Canada's Walk of Fame in Toronto. The induction ceremony was held on September 12, 2009.   A circular garden at the entrance to the Bailey-Matthews Shell Museum in Florida honors Burr, who was a shell collector as well as a benefactor and fund-raiser for the museum.  In August 2012, a renovated exhibit about Raymond Burr with information about him as an actor, a benefactor and a shell collector, opened in the museum's Great Hall of Shells. The Raymond Burr Performing Arts Centre in New Westminster, British Columbia, opened in October 2000, near a city block bearing the Burr family name, and closed in 2006.  Originally a movie theatre, under ownership of the Famous Players chain (as the Columbia Theatre), it was an intimate, 238-seat theater. Initial plans included expanding the venue to a 650-seat regional performing arts facility.  When in operation, it was the custom to have a picture of Raymond Burr included somewhere on each set, with the first toast on the opening night of every production always dedicated to his memory.  The Centre was commonly referred to as the "Burr Theatre," or simply as "the Burr". It is owned by the City of New Westminster, which placed it for sale on 15 June 2009. 
Selected filmography

Film 
Year Film Role Notes 
1946 San Quentin   
1947 Desperate Walt Radak  
1948 Sleep, My Love Detective Sgt. Strake  
Pitfall MacDonald  
Raw Deal Rick Coyle  
Adventures of Don Juan Capt. Alvarez  
1949 Black Magic Alexandre Dumas, Jr.  
Red Light Nick Cherney  
Abandoned Kerric  
1950 Borderline Pete Ritchie  
Key to the City Les Taggart  
Love Happy Alphonse Zoto  
1951 A Place in the Sun District Attorney R. Frank Marlow  
His Kind of Woman Nick Ferraro  
Bride of the Gorilla Barney Chavez  
1952 Meet Danny Wilson Nick Driscoll alias Joe Martell  
1953 The Blue Gardenia Harry Prebble  
The Bandits of Corsica   
Serpent of the Nile Mark Antony  
Tarzan and the She-Devil Vargo  
1954 Casanova's Big Night Bragadin  
Gorilla at Large Cy Miller  
Rear Window Lars Thorwald  
1955 You're Never Too Young Noonan  
Count Three and Pray Yancey Huggins  
1956 Godzilla, King of the Monsters! Steve Martin  
Please Murder Me Attorney Craig Carlson  
1957 Crime of Passion Police Inspector Anthony "Tony" Pope  
Ride the High Iron Publicity agent Ziggy Moline  
1960 Desire in the Dust Col. Ben Marquand  
1968 P.J. (aka New Face in Hell) William Orbison  
The Amazing World of Psychic Phenomena host of documentary  
1980 The Curse of King Tut's Tomb Jonash Sebastian  
The Return Dr. Kramer  
Out of the Blue Dr. Brean  
1982 Airplane II: The Sequel Judge D.C. Simonton  
1985 Godzilla 1985 Steve Martin  
1991 Delirious Carter Hedison  
Television 
Year Title Role Notes 
1957–1966  Perry Mason  Perry Mason  271 episodes 
1967–1975  Ironside  Robert T. Ironside  194 episodes 
1972  The Bold Ones: The New Doctors  Robert T. Ironside  1 episode 
1977  Kingston: Confidential  R.B. Kingston  13 episodes 
1979  The Love Boat  Malcolm Dwyer  2 episodes 
Centennial  Herman Bockweiss  12 episodes 
Eischied  Police Commissioner  2 episodes 
The Misadventures of Sheriff Lobo  The Godfather  1 episode 
1981  Peter and Paul Herod Agrippa I  Television movie 
1985–1993  Perry Mason television movies  Perry Mason  26 movies 
1993  The Return of Ironside  Robert T. Ironside  Television movie 

See also

List of celebrities who own wineries and vineyards


References 
Sources

 
 
 


External links 

Raymond Burr Vineyards
 
Raymond Burr at the MBC Encyclopedia of Television
Complete biography of Raymond Burr
 
 
 
Raymond Burr Performing Arts Centre - New Westminster, BC

 
  
DEFAULTSORT






















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Nicolas Poussin
 
 
Nicolas Poussin ( ; 15 June 1594 – 19 November 1665) was a French painter in the classical style. His work predominantly features clarity, logic, and order, and favors line over color. His work serves as an alternative to the dominant Baroque style of the 17th century. Until the 20th century he remained the major inspiration for such classically oriented artists as Jacques-Louis David, Jean-Auguste-Dominique Ingres and Paul Cézanne.He spent most of his working life in Rome, except for a short period when Cardinal Richelieu ordered him back to France to serve as First Painter to the King.
Biography
Early yearsNicolas Poussin's early biographer was his friend Giovanni Pietro Bellori,  who relates that Poussin was born near Les Andelys in Normandy and that he received an education that included some Latin, which would stand him in good stead. Early sketches attracted the notice of Quentin Varin, a local painter, whose pupil Poussin became, until he ran away to Paris at the age of eighteen. There he entered the studios of the Flemish painter Ferdinand Elle and then of Georges Lallemand, both minor masters now remembered for having tutored Poussin. He found French art in a stage of transition: the old apprenticeship system was disturbed, and the academic training destined to supplant it was not yet established by Simon Vouet; but having met Courtois the mathematician, Poussin was fired by the study of his collection of engravings by Marcantonio Raimondi after Italian masters.After two abortive attempts to reach Rome, he fell in with Giambattista Marino, the court poet to Marie de Medici, at Lyon. Marino employed him on illustrations to his poem Adone (untraced) and on a series of illustrations for a projected edition of Ovid's Metamorphoses,  took him into his household, and in 1624 enabled Poussin (who had been detained by commissions in Lyon and Paris) to rejoin him at Rome. It has been suggested that it was this early friendship with Marino, and the commissioning of illustrations of his poetry (which drew on Ovidian themes), that founded, or at least reinforced, the prominent eroticism in Poussin's early work. 
In RomePoussin was thirty when he arrived in Rome in 1624. At first he lodged with Simon Vouet.  Through Marino, he had been introduced to Marcello Sacchetti who in turn introduced him to another of his early patrons, Cardinal Francesco Barberini. Financial difficulties arose  with the departure to Spain of Barberini, accompanied by Cassiano dal Pozzo, the antiquarian and the Cardinal's secretary, who later would become a great friend and patron. However, their return from Spain in 1626 stabilized Poussin’s position, with renewed patronage by the Barberini and their circle. Two major commissions at this period resulted in Poussin's early masterwork, the Barberini Death of Germanicus (1628), partly inspired by the reliefs of the Meleager sarcophagus,  and the commission for St. Peter's that amounted to a public debut, the Martyrdom of St. Erasmus (1629, Vatican Pinacoteca), indebted to designs on the same subject by the contemporary Baroque painter, Pietro da Cortona.  He fell ill at this time and was taken into the house of his compatriot Jacques Dughet, where he was nursed by Dughet’s daughter, Anna Maria, who Poussin married in 1630. His two brothers-in-law were artists and Gaspard Dughet later took Poussin’s surname.  

 
During the  late 1620s and 1630s, he had the opportunity to experiment and formulate his own stance in painting with reference to others which he did through study of the Antique and works such as Titian’s Bacchanals at the Casino Ludovisi and the paintings of  Domenichino and Guido Reni.  At the same time, the Roman Baroque was emerging: in the 1620s Cortona was producing his early Baroque paintings for the Sacchetti family; Bernini, having established his reputation in sculpture, was designing the great bronze baldachin in St. Peter’s; and an ingenious architectural imagination was emerging in works by Borromini.Poussin became acquainted with other artists in Rome and tended to befriend those with classicizing artistic leanings: the French sculptor François Duquesnoy whom he lodged with in 1626; the French artist Jacques Stella; Claude Lorraine; Domenichino; Andrea Sacchi; and joined an informal academy of artists and patrons opposed to the current Baroque style that formed around Joachim von Sandrart.At the time the papacy was Rome’s foremost patron of the arts. Poussin’s Martyrdom of St. Erasmus  for St. Peter’s was Poussin’s only papal commission, secured for him by Cardinal Barberini, the papal nephew, and Poussin was not asked again to contribute major altarpieces or paint large scale decorations for a pope.  His subsequent career depended on private patronage. Apart from Cardinal Francesco Barberini, his first patrons included Cardinal Luigi Omodei, for whom he produced the Triumphs of Flora (c 1630–32, Louvre); Cardinal de Richelieu, who commissioned various  Bacchanals; Vincenzo Giustiniani, for whom he painted the Massacre of the Innocents (uncertain early date, Museé Condé, Chantilly);  Cassiano dal Pozzo who became the owner of the first series of the Seven Sacraments (late 1630s, Belvoir Castle); and Paul Fréart de Chantelou, with whom Poussin, at the call of Sublet de Noyers, returned to France in 1640.
In FranceLouis XIII conferred on him the title of First Painter in Ordinary.  In two years at Paris he produced several pictures for the royal chapels (the Last Supper, painted for Versailles, now in the Louvre), eight cartoons for the Gobelins tapestry manufactory, the series of the Labors of Hercules for the Louvre, the Triumph of Truth for Cardinal Richelieu (Louvre), and much minor work.In 1642, disgusted by the intrigues of Simon Vouet, Fouquières and the architect Jacques Lemercier, Poussin withdrew to Rome. There, in 1648, he finished for de Chantelou the second series of the Seven Sacraments (Bridgewater Gallery), and also his noble Landscape with Diogenes (Louvre). This painting shows the philosopher discarding his last worldly possession, his cup, after watching a man drink water by cupping his hands.  In 1649 he painted the Vision of St Paul (Louvre) for the comic poet Paul Scarron, and in 1651 the Holy Family (Louvre) for the duc de Créquy. Year by year he continued to produce an enormous variety of works, many of which are included in the list given by Félibien. He suffered from declining health after 1650, and was troubled by a worsening tremor in his hand, evidence of which is apparent in his late drawings.   He died in Rome on 19 November 1665 and was buried in the church of San Lorenzo in Lucina, his wife having predeceased him. Chateaubriand in 1820 donated the monument to Poussin.Poussin left no children, but he adopted as his son Gaspard Dughet (Gasparo Duche), his wife's brother, who became a painter and took the name of Poussin.
Works
Throughout his life Poussin stood apart from the popular tendency  toward the decorative in French art of his time.  In Poussin's works a survival of the impulses of the Renaissance is coupled with conscious reference to the art of classical antiquity as the standard of excellence. His goal was clarity of expression achieved by disegno or ‘nobility of design’ in preference to colore or color. Perhaps his concern with disegno can best be seen in the line engraved copies of his works; among the many who reproduced his paintings, some of the most successful are Audran, Claudine Stella, Picart and Pesne.Themes of tragedy and death are prevalent in Poussin's work.  Et in Arcadia ego, a subject he painted twice (second version is seen at right), exemplifies his cerebral approach. In this composition, idealized shepherds examine a tomb inscribed with the title phrase, which is usually interpreted as a memento mori: "Even in Arcadia I exist", as if spoken by personified Death. Poussin intended his figures to "display the most distilled and most typical attitude and emotion for the role they were playing", but he was concerned with emotion "in a generalized and not specific way ... Thus in both compositions of Et in Arcadia Ego (Chatsworth and Louvre) the theme is the realization of death in life. The specific models hardly matter. We are not intended to have sympathy with them and instead we are forced by the artist to think on the theme." Wright 1985, p. 13.  Poussin is an important figure in the development of landscape painting. In his early paintings  the landscape usually forms a graceful background for a group of figures; later he progressed to the painting of landscape for its own sake, although the figure is never entirely absent. Examples are Landscape with St. John on Patmos (1640), (Art Institute of Chicago) and Landscape with a Roman Road (1648), (Dulwich Picture Gallery). The finest collection of Poussin's paintings is at the Louvre in Paris. Other significant collections are in the National Gallery in London; the National Gallery of Scotland; the Dulwich Picture Gallery; the Musée Condé, Chantilly; the Hermitage Museum, St. Petersburg; and the Museo del Prado, Madrid.  Poussin was a prolific artist.  Among his many works are:



Some of the paintings by Poussin at the Louvre, Paris:
The Inspiration of the Poet (1629–1630)
The Plague at Ashdod (1630)
Les Bergers d’Arcadie (late 1630s)
The Judgement of Solomon (1649)
The Blind Men of Jericho (1650)
Landscape with Orpheus and Eurydice (c.1650)
The Adulteress (1653)
The Four Seasons (series) (1660–1664)



A few of Poussin’s other paintings:
Adoration of the Golden Calf (National Gallery, London)
The Crossing of the Red Sea (National Gallery of Victoria, Melbourne)
Nymphs and a Satyr (1627) Cleveland Museum of Art
The Return of the Holy Family to Nazareth (1627) Cleveland Museum of Art
Holy Family on the Steps (1648) Cleveland Museum of Art
Cacus (St. Petersburg)
The Testament of Eudamidas (Copenhagen)
Hymenaios Disguised as a Woman During an Offering to Priapus (1634) 
Tancred and Erminia, second version (Barber Institute, Birmingham)
The Rape of the Sabine Women (1636)
The Destruction of Jerusalem (1637)
Hebrews Gathering Manna (1639)
A Dance to the Music of Time (1639–40), (Wallace Collection, London)
Ecstasy of Saint Paul (1643), (John and Mable Ringling Museum of Art, Sarasota, Florida)
Moses Rescued from the Waters (1647)
Eliezer and Rebecca (1648)
The Funeral of Phocion (1648) (National Museum Cardiff)
Landscape with Polyphemus (1649)
Seven Sacraments (two separate series, see main article for details as to locations)
The Flight into Egypt (1657, Musée des Beaux-Arts de Lyon)


Legacy
Initially, Poussin's genius was recognized only by small circles of collectors. (In the two decades following his death, a particularly large collection of his works was amassed by Louis XIV.)  At the same time, it was recognized that he had contributed a new theme of "classical severity" to French art.Benjamin West, an American painter of the 18th century who worked in Britain, based his canvas of the death of General Wolfe at Quebec on Poussin's example. As a result, the image is one in which each character gazes with appropriate seriousness on Wolfe's death after securing British domination of North America.Jacques-Louis David resurrected a style already known as "Poussinesque" during the French Revolution in part because the leaders of the Revolution looked to replace the frivolity and oppression of the court with Republican severity and civic-mindedness, most obvious in David's dramatic canvas of Brutus receiving the bodies of his sons, sacrificed to his own principles, and the famous death of Marat.Throughout the 19th century, Poussin, available to the ordinary person's gaze because the Revolution had opened the collections of the Louvre, was inspirational for thoughtful and self-reflexive artists who pondered their own work methods, notably Cézanne, who strove to "recreate Poussin after nature", and the Post-Impressionists. In addition to formal considerations, also appealing was the eroticism of some of Poussin's classicizing subjects.In the twentieth century art critics have suggested that the "analytic Cubist" experiments of Pablo Picasso and Georges Braque were founded upon Poussin's example.   In 1963 Picasso based a series of paintings on Poussin's The Rape of the Sabine Women. The work of Jean Hugo was also influenced by Poussin.The most famous 20th-century scholar of Poussin was the Englishman Anthony Blunt, Keeper of the Queen's Pictures, who in 1979 was disgraced by revelations of his complicity with Soviet intelligence.  Today, Poussin's paintings at the Louvre reside in a gallery dedicated to him.
Gallery 
Image:Venus and Adonis - Poussin - 1624 - Texas, Fort Worth, Kimbell Art Museum.jpg|Venus and Adonis - Nicolas Poussin - 1624 - Kimbell Art Museum, Fort Worth, Texas.
Image:Cephalus and Aurora - Poussin - 1627-30 National Gallery, London.jpg |Cephalus and Aurora - Nicolas Poussin - 1627 - National Gallery, London.
Image:Acis and galatea - Poussin -1629 - Dublin National Gallery of Art.jpg|Acis and Galatea - Nicolas Poussin - 1629 - National Gallery of Ireland, Dublin.
File:Diane et Endymion 1630 Detroit Institute of Art.jpg|Diana and Endymion - Nicolas Poussin - 1630s - The Detroit Institute of Arts.
Image:Nymphe chevauchant un bouc - Nicolas Poussin - The Hermitage Museum.jpg|Venus, a Faun and Putti - Nicolas Poussin - 1630s - The Hermitage Museum, St-Petersburg.
Image:GoldCalf.jpg|The Adoration of the Golden Calf - Nicolas Poussin - 1633-34 - National Gallery, London.
File:Nicolas Poussin 037.jpg|The Crossing of the Red Sea - Nicolas Poussin - 1633-34 - National Gallery of Victoria.
Image:The dance to the music of time c. 1640.jpg|A Dance to the Music of Time  - Nicolas Poussin - 1640  - The Wallace Collection.
 
See also

List of Nicolas Poussin paintings


Notes 
References

 
Blunt, Anthony (1966). The Paintings of Nicolas Poussin: A Critical Catalogue. London: Phaidon.  
 
Cropper, Elizabeth and Charles Dempsey (1995).  Nicolas Poussin: Friendship and the Love of Painting.  Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1995. ISBN 978-0-691-05067-6
Friedländer, Walter (1964). Nicolas Poussin: A New Approach. New York: Abrams. 1964.  
Keazor, Henry: Poussins Parerga. Quellen, Entwicklung und Bedeutung der Kleinkompositionen in den Gemälden Nicolas Poussins. Schnell & Steiner, Regensburg 1998, ISBN 3-7954-1146-7
Keazor, Henry : Nicolas Poussin 1594-1665. Taschen, Hong Kong, Köln, London et al., 2007, ISBN 3-8228-5319-4/ISBN 978-3-8228-5319-1
 
Serres, Michel (1995). Genesis (Grasset). Ann Arbor: The University of Michigan Press. ISBN 978-0-472-08435-7.  
Thuillier, Jacques(1995). Nicolas Poussin. Flammarion, Paris, ISBN 2-08-012440-4
Unglaub, Jonathan (2006). Poussin and the Poetics of Painting: Pictorial Narrative and the Legacy of Tasso. Cambridge and New York: Cambridge University Press, 2006.  ISBN 978-0-521-83367-7
Wright, Christopher (1985). Poussin Paintings: A Catalogue Raisonné. New York: Hippocrene. ISBN 0-87052-218-3


Exhibitions

Paris 1960. "Poussin peintre: retrospectif." Galvanized the renewed interest in Poussin.
Fort Worth 1988. "Poussin: The Early Years in Rome: The Origins of French Classicism."
New York City 2008. "Poussin and Nature: Arcadian Visions." Metropolitan Museum of Art; Poussin's landscapes.


External links 
 

Nicolas Poussin Biography, Style and Artworks
Landscape with the ashes of Phocion at the Walker Art Gallery, Liverpool
Poussin and Nature: Arcadian Visions at the Metropolitan Museum of Art, New York
A 16min educational film about Nicolas Poussin
www.NicolasPoussin.org 92 works by Nicolas Poussin
Nicolas Poussin at Olga's Gallery
 

  
DEFAULTSORT




 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Hyacinthe Rigaud
 
  

Hyacinthe Rigaud (18 July 1659 – 29 December 1743) was a French baroque painter of Catalan origin whose career was based in Paris.He is renowned for his portrait paintings of Louis XIV, the royalty and nobility of Europe, and members of their courts and considered one of the most notable French portraitists of the classical period. For Jacques Thuillier, professor at the Collège de France:  He was the most important portrait painter during the reign of King Louis XIV. His instinct for impressive poses and grand presentations precisely suited the tastes of the royal personages, ambassadors, clerics, courtiers, and financiers who sat for him. Rigaud owes his celebrity to the faithful support he received from the four generations of Bourbons whose portraits he painted. He garnered the core of his clientele among the richest circles as well as among the bourgeois, financiers, nobles, industrialists and government ministers, also courting all the major ambassadors of his time and several European monarchs. His œuvre reads as a near-complete portrait gallery of the chief movers in France from 1680 to 1740. Some of that œuvre (albeit a minority) also includes those of more humble origins - Rigaud's friends, fellow artists or simple businessmen.Rigaud is inseparable from his best-known work, a 1701 painting of Louis XIV in his coronation costume which today hangs in the Louvre in Paris,  as well as the second copy also requested by Louis XIV that now hangs at the Palace of Versailles.  The exact number of paintings he produced remains in dispute, since he left a highly detailed catalogue but also more than a thousand different models which specialists agree he used.  To these may be added the large number of copies in Rigaud's  , without even mentioning the hundreds of other paintings rediscovered since the accounts' publication in 1919.Hyacinthe Rigaud was born in Perpignan (Pyrénées-Orientales), the grandson of painter-gilders from Roussillon and the elder brother of another painter (Gaspard). He was trained in tailoring in his father's workshop and perfected his skills under Antoine Ranc at Montpellier from 1671 onwards, before moving to Lyon four years later. It was in these cities that he became familiar with Flemish, Dutch and Italian painting, particularly that of Rubens, Van Dyck, Rembrandt and Titian, whose works he later collected. Arriving in Paris in 1681, he won the prix de Rome in 1682, but on the advice of Charles Le Brun did not make the trip to Rome to which this entitled him. Received into the Académie royale de peinture et de sculpture in 1700, he rose to the top of this institution before retiring from it in 1735.Since Rigaud's paintings captured very exact likenesses along with the subject's costumes and background details, his paintings are considered precise records of contemporary fashions. According to the French art historian Louis Hourticq,  
True "photographs", Antoine-Joseph Dezallier d'Argenville 1745, p. 318  faces that Diderot called "letters of recommendation written in the common language of all men",  Rigaud's works today populate the world's major museums.
NameRigaud was born with the Catalan name Jyacintho Rigau or Jacint Rigau i Ros  This is variously translated as  Híacint Francesc Honrat Mathias Pere Martyr Andreu Joan Rigau  – in Perpignan, which became part of France by the Treaty of the Pyrenees (7 November 1659) shortly after his birth.
FamilyHyacinthe's father, Josep Matias Pere Ramon Rigau, was a tailor (sastre in Catalan) in the parish of Saint-Jean de Perpignan, "as well as a painter",  descended from a line of well-established artists in the Perpignanian basin who had been commissioned to decorate several tabernacles and other panels for liturgical use. Few of these have survived to the present (Palau-del-Vidre, Perpignan, Montalba-d'Amélie, Joch...). Hyacinthe's grandfather, Jacinto major, died in 1631. On 25 July 1617, in the église de La Réal in Perpignan, he married Madalena Roat. She was the widow of Pera Roat and on 1 November 1634 remarried in the église Saint-Mathieu in Perpignan, to Antoni Balasco.  and even more Jacinto's father, Honorat minor, His year of birth unknown, on 5 July 1617 in the église de La Réal in Perpignan he married Antiga Franch, widow of Antoni Franch  were heads of the family and the local art world from 1570 to 1630 ; probably as much as gilders as painters,  since in their studios were to be found "many prints and books treating on the art of painting, and other things, such as brushes and palettes for painting".   Working for the collège Saint-Éloi in his city since 1560, and acting as representative of its guild of painters and gilders, on 22 November 1630 Jacinto major and other gilders and colleagues Joan Antoni Marti, Guillem Andreu, Thomas Blat et Jaume Fuster  participated in the development of the statutes and minutes of the city's collège Saint-Luc
.  Honorat minor is generally identified as the painter of The Canonisation of Saint Hyacinthe, formerly in Perpignan's Dominican convent and now at Joch,  the tabernacle of the church of Palau-del-Vidre (28 March 1609) 25 ducats were paid to the painter for painting the tabernacle "inside and outside [with] ... good and living and fine colours".  and the retable at Montalba near Amélie-les-Bains. The father of Honorat minor is generally identified as the painter of the retable at Saint-Ferréol (1623) in the église Saint-Jacques de Perpignan and formerly in the couvent des Minimes, whilst Honorat major is usually identified as the painter of the paintings of the retable of the église Saint-Jean-l'Évangéliste at Peyrestortes. On 13 March 1647 Hyacinthe's father Matias Rigau, married Thérèse Faget (1634–1655), daughter of a carpenter. Joan Antoni Faget had already died, in 1647. The marriage contract was witnessed before Honoré Sunyer in Perpignan.  Widowed shortly after, he decided to speedily remarry, to Maria Serra, daughter of a Perpignan textile merchant (pentiner in Catalan), on 20 December 1655.  In 1665, he acquired a house "en lo carrer de las casas cremades" (now rue de l'Incendie, near the cathedral) and received the income from a parcel of vineyards in the Bompas territory.  By his second marriage, he also acquired a house on place de l'Huile, but he soon sold it. 
Life===Perpignan=== 

Rigaud was baptised with his Catalan name in the old cathédrale Saint-Jean de Perpignan on 20 July 1659,    two days after his birth at rue de la Porte-d'Assaut. He would not have become French had not Roussillon and the Cerdanya been annexed to France the following 7 November thanks to the Treaty of the Pyrenees. That Treaty also put an end to the wars that had taken place between France and Habsburg Spain since 1635 and married King Louis XIV of France to the infanta Maria Theresa of Spain.  

Journey to LyonUnfortunately, little is known about Rigaud's activities in Lyon, due to the lack of surviving documents. However, as per tradition, artists from Montpellier had strong ties with this city, as had, for example, Samuel Boissière who was trained in there, in Lyon.  The identity of Rigaud's future depicted models shows that he worked for the city's cloth merchants, whose flourishing trade had long since given the city its profitable income.     Even if they had only been registered from 1681 onwards, the date when he moved to Paris, his "youthful" portraits were probably pre-dated, like those of Antoine Domergue, the king's councillor and provincial governor of Lyon, in 1686,      and "Mr Sarazin de Lion", of a famous dynasty of bankers of Swiss origins, in 1685.      Rigaud's portrait of Jean de Brunenc, painted in 1687, a silk merchant, banker and consul of Lyon, assembles all the ingredients for which the painter was later successful.     In her thesis on the engravers from the Drevet family,  Gilberte Levallois-Clavel revealed certain aspects of the private relations between Rigaud and Pierre Drevet; their friendship came about at the beginning of the 1700s, after the painter produced a portrait of the engraver, in which he depicted himself as well. In 1681, when Hyacinthe Rigaud decided to move to Paris, inspired by Drevet who was also attracted to the capital, he had already established a good reputation amongst the local clientele, from Switzerland to Aix-en-Provence. ===Beginnings=== 
In 1682, he was awarded the Prix de Rome.
 
Going back to the artist's biographie, Dezallier d'Argenville states that one of Rigaud's main reasons for his 1695 voyage was to paint his mother's portrait: "He painted her from many angles, and had her marble bust made by the notable Coysevox, which was his cabinet's ornament for the rest of his life". In his first will, dated 30 May 1707, the artist left the bust to the Grand Dauphin, Louis XIV's son, though the sculpture would then be left to the Academy which explains its presence in the Louvre. Also in the document, Rigaud bequeathed the portrait containing the two profiles of Maria Serra to the elder son of his brother Gaspard, named Hyacinthe.
In reality, Rigaud painted a second painting, bearing the three stances presented to Coysevox: an oval painting kept in a private collection, copied by Géricault, in Dijon, and the subject of one of Drevet's engravings. He also applied sketches of his sister Claire, accompanied by her husband and their first daughter, to the canvas.The year 1695 also saw the production of two versions of Christ expiant sur la Croix, with a distinct Flemish influence, proof of Rigaud's rare incursion into the domain of historical depictions or the "great genre". He bequeathed his mother the first version which would then, at her death, be left to the Grands Augustins convent in Perpignan, and gave the second, in 1722, to the Dominican convent of his city of birth.In spring 1696, Hyacinthe Rigaud returned to Paris, where he painted one of his most important portraits of the year. This was in fact sollicited by the duke of Saint-Simon, to depict Armand Jean le Bouthillier de Rancé, an abbot, using a skillful subterfuge that remains notable in the history of painting.
HonoursIn 1709 he was made a noble by his hometown of Perpignan. In 1727 he was made a knight of the Order of Saint Michael.
 

Clientele




 
Rigaud painted many important figures in the world of art such as the sculptors Desjardins, to whom, as an old friend, he delivered three successive portraits, Girardon and Coysevox; the painters Joseph Parrocel, La Fosse and Mignard; the architects De Cotte, Hardouin-Mansart and Gabriel. He also painted portraits of poets such as La Fontaine or Boileau, as well as religious figures such as the cardinal de Fleury and Bossuet; many influential archbishops and bishops paid large sums of money for a portrait.
 
==Personal life== 
Rigaud died in Paris in 1743 at the age of 84.In 1820, the Musée des beaux-arts Hyacinthe Rigaud in Perpignan, France, was dedicated to him. It is still open to the public and shows some of his work. 
Selected works

Portrait of Graf Philipp Ludwig Wenzel Sinzendorf, 1712, oil on canvas,  , Kunsthistorisches Museum, Vienna
Portrait of Philippe de Courcillon, Marquis de Dangeau, 1702, oil on canvas,  , Musée national du château de Versailles et des Trianons, Versailles
Portrait of Louis XIV, 1701, oil on canvas,  , Musée du Louvre, Paris
Portrait of Louis XIV, c. 1700, oil on canvas, Centre Block, Parliament of Canada, Ottawa
ditto, oil on canvas,  , Museo del Prado, Madrid
ditto, oil on canvas, 1694 (full shot portrait), Musée du Louvre, Paris
ditto, oil on canvas, 1715 (full shot portrait, "State Portrait"), Musée national du château de Versailles et des Trianons, Versailles
Portrait of the artist's mother, 1695, oil on canvas,  , Musée du Louvre, Paris
Portrait of Everhard Jabach, 1688, oil on canvas,  , Wallraf-Richartz Museum, Cologne
Studies Of Spaniels And Whippets, And A Study Of A White Headdress, oil on canvas
Portrait of Louis Bossuet, location unknown 
Portrait of a Scholar, oil on canvas, Hermitage Museum, St Petersburg, Russia
Portrait of Pierre Imbert Drevet, c. 1700, oil on canvas,  , Musée des beaux-arts de Lyon, France
Portrait of Louis XV of France at the age 5, wearing the Coronation Robes, 1715, oil on canvas, Musée national du château de Versailles et des Trianons, Versailles
Portrait of Elizabeth Charlotte of the Palatinate, c. 1719, oil on canvas, Musée national du château de Versailles et des Trianons, Versailles
Portrait of La comtesse de Selles Marguerite-Henriette de Labriffe  , 1712, oil on canvas
Portrait of Charles Auguste d'Allonville de Louville, Marquis de Louville, 1708, oil on canvas, private collection
Portrait of Frederick IV of Denmark, Nationalhistoriske Museum, Frederiksborg Palace, Denmark
Portrait of Sébastien Bourdon, drawing, 1731,  , Städelsches Kunstinstitut und Städtische Galerie, Frankfurt am Main
Portrait of Louis Antoine de Pardaillan de Gondrin, Marquis d'Antin, c. 1710
Portrait of Augustus II the Strong, oil on canvas, 1715, Gemäldegalerie Alte Meister, Dresden
Portrait of Martin van der Bogaert, drawing, c. 1700,  , Städelsches Kunstinstitut, Frankfurt am Main
Portrait of a young scholar, drawing, 1685,  , Städelsches Kunstinstitut und Städtische Galerie, Frankfurt am Main
Portrait of Cardinal Henri Oswald de La Tour d'Auvergne , 1732, oil on canvas,  , private collection.
Portrait of Nicolas Le Camus, drawing, c. 1701,  , Städelsches Kunstinstitut und Städtische Galerie, Frankfurt am Main


References 
    
DEFAULTSORT





 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Pierre Berton
 

For other people with the same name, see Pierre Berton (disambiguation).
 
Pierre Francis de Marigny Berton,   (July 12, 1920 – November 30, 2004) was a noted Canadian author of non-fiction, especially Canadiana and Canadian history, and was a well-known television personality and journalist.An accomplished storyteller, Berton was one of Canada's most prolific and popular authors. He wrote on popular culture, Canadian history, critiques of mainstream religion, anthologies, children's books and historical works for youth. He was also a founder of the Writers' Trust of Canada, a non-profit literary organization that seeks to encourage Canada's writing community. Berton's 50 books became popular because his light and fast-paced style was not weighted down by footnotes or deep probes into primary sources. Historian C.P. Stacey in 1980, said Berton demonstrated his skill as an anecdotalist, or storyteller, who emphasized the human dimension, while often overlooking the scholarship. His two-volume history of the war of 1812, running to 928 pages, was republished in 2011 as "Pierre Berton's War of 1812 (Toronto: Anchor Canada, 2011). 
Early yearsHe was born on July 12, 1920, in Whitehorse, Yukon, where his father had moved for the 1898 Klondike Gold Rush.     His family moved to Dawson City, Yukon in 1921, where they lived until moving to Victoria, British Columbia in 1932.   His mother, Laura Beatrice Berton (née Thompson) was a school teacher in Toronto until she was offered a job as a teacher in Dawson City at the age of 29 in 1907. She met Frank Berton in the nearby mining town of Granville shortly after settling in Dawson and teaching kindergarten. Laura Beatrice Berton's autobiography of life in the Yukon entitled I Married the Klondike was published in her later years and gave her, what her son Pierre describes as 'a modicum of fame, which she thoroughly enjoyed.' 
  Like his father, Pierre Berton worked in Klondike mining camps during his years as a history major at the University of British Columbia,    where he also worked on the student paper The Ubyssey.     He spent his early newspaper career in Vancouver, where at 21 he was the youngest city editor on any Canadian daily, replacing editorial staff that had been called up during the Second World War. Berton himself was conscripted into the Canadian Army under the National Resources Mobilization Act in 1942 and attended basic training in British Columbia, nominally as a reinforcement soldier intended for The Seaforth Highlanders of Canada.  He elected to "go Active" (the euphemism for volunteering for overseas service) and his aptitude was such that he was appointed Lance Corporal and attended NCO school, and became a basic training instructor in the rank of corporal.   Due to a background in university COTC and inspired by other citizen-soldiers who had been commissioned, he sought training as an officer. Berton spent the next several years attending a variety of military courses, becoming, in his words, the most highly trained officer in the military. He was warned for overseas duty many times, and was granted embarkation leave many times, each time finding his overseas draft being cancelled.  A coveted trainee slot with the Canadian Intelligence Corps saw Berton, now a Captain, trained to act as an Intelligence Officer (IO), and after a stint as an instructor at the Royal Military College in Kingston, Ontario, he finally went overseas in March 1945.  In the UK, he was told that he would have to requalify as an IO because the syllabus in the UK was different from that in the intelligence school in Canada. By the time Berton had requalified, the war in Europe had ended. He volunteered for the Canadian Army Pacific Force (CAPF), granted a final "embarkation leave", and found himself no closer to combat employment by the time the Japanese surrendered in September 1945. 
Editor in TorontoBerton moved to Toronto in 1947. At the age of 31 he was named managing editor of Macleans.  In 1957, he became a key member of the CBC's public affairs flagship program, Close-Up, and a permanent panelist on the popular television show Front Page Challenge.    That same year, he also narrated the Academy Award-nominated National Film Board of Canada documentary  City of Gold, exploring life in his hometown of Dawson City during the Klondike Gold Rush.     He then released an album in conjunction with Folkways Records, entitled The Story of the Klondike: Stampede for Gold - The Golden Trail. Berton joined the Toronto Star as associate editor and columnist in 1958, leaving in 1962 to commence The Pierre Berton Show, which ran until 1973.  It was on this show that in 1971 Berton interviewed Bruce Lee in what was to be the famous martial artist's only surviving television interview.  Berton's television career included spots as host and writer on My Country, The Great Debate, Heritage Theatre, The Secret of My Success and The National Dream. Berton served as the Chancellor of Yukon College and, along with numerous honorary degrees, received over 30 literary awards such as the Governor General's Award for Creative Non-Fiction (three times), the Stephen Leacock Medal of Humour, and the Gabrielle Léger Award for Lifetime Achievement in Heritage Conservation.  He is a member of Canada's Walk of Fame, having been inducted in 1998. In The Greatest Canadian project, he was voted #31 in the list of great Canadians. 
RetirementIn 2004, Berton published his 50th book, Prisoners of the North, after which he announced in an interview with CanWest News Service that he was retiring from writing.  On October 17, 2004, the $12.6 million CAD Pierre Berton Resource Library, named in his honour, was opened in Vaughan, Ontario. 
    He had lived in nearby Kleinburg, Ontario, for about fifty years. Berton raised eyebrows in October 2004 by discussing his forty years of recreational use of marijuana on two CBC Television programs, Play and Rick Mercer Report. On the latter show he gave a  "celebrity tip" on how to roll a joint.  
    
 
DeathBerton died at Sunnybrook hospital in Toronto, reportedly of heart failure, at the age of 84 on November 30, 2004.  His cremated remains were scattered at his home in Kleinburg.
Berton House Writers' RetreatHis childhood home in Dawson City, Yukon, now called Berton House, is currently used as a retreat for professional Canadian writers. Established authors apply for a three-month long subsidized residency, adding to the area's literary community with events such as local public readings. Previously, The Berton House Writers' Retreat was administered by the Berton House Writer's Retreat Society and Elsa Franklin, Pierre Berton's long-time editor and agent. In October of 2007, the deed to Berton House was passed to the Writers' Trust of Canada; the literary organization now oversees the program as part of its roster of literary support. 
Pierre Berton AwardEstablished in 1994, the Pierre Berton Award is presented annually by Canada's National History Society for distinguished achievement in presenting Canadian history in an informative and engaging manner. Berton was the first recipient and agreed to lend his name to future awards. 
Awards

Queen Elizabeth II Golden Jubilee Medal 2002
Order of Canada, Companion, 1986. 
Canadian Booksellers Award, 1982.
Canadian Authors Association Literary Award for non-fiction, 1981
Queen Elizabeth II Silver Jubilee Medal 1977
Nellie Award, best public affairs broadcaster in radio, 1978.
Governor General's Awards for: The Last Spike, 1972; Klondike, 1958; The Mysterious North, 1956.
Stephen Leacock Medal for Humour, 1959.


Bibliography

1954 The Golden Trail: The Story of the Klondike Rush
1954 The Royal Family
1955 The Golden Trail
1956 The Mysterious North: Encounters with the Canadian Frontier, 1947-1954
1956 Illustrated Heritage of Canada: The Beginning Years, 1860-1870
1957 Illustrated Heritage of Canada: The Seventies
1958 Klondike: The Last Great Gold Rush, 1896-1899
1959 The Klondike Fever: The Life and Death of the Last Great Gold Rush
1959 Just Add Water and Stir
1960 Adventures of a Columnist
1961 The Secret World of Og
1961 The New City : A Prejudiced View of Toronto
1962 Fast, Fast, Fast Relief
1963 The Big Sell : An Introduction to the Black Arts of Door-to Door Salesmanship & Other Techniques
1965 My War with the Twentieth Century
1965 The Comfortable Pew : A Critical look at Christianity and the Religious Establishment in the New Age
1966 The Cool, Crazy, Committed World of the Sixties
1967 "Voices from the Sixties"
1968 The Smug Minority
1970 The National Dream: The Great Railway, 1871-1881
1972 The Last Spike: The Great Railway, 1881-1885
1972 The Impossible Railway: The Building of the Canadian Pacific
1973 Drifting Home
1975 Hollywood’s Canada: The Americanization of the National Image
1976 My Country: The Remarkable Past
1977 The Dionne Years: A Thirties Melodrama
1978 The Wild Frontier: More Tales from the Remarkable Past
1980 The Invasion of Canada: 1812-1813
1981 Flames Across the Border: 1813-1814
1982 Why we Act like Canadians: A Personal Exploration of our National Character
1983 The Klondike Quest
1984 The Promised Land: Settling the West 1896-1914
1985 Masquerade
1985 Vimy
1987 Starting out: 1920-1947
1988 The Arctic Grail: The Quest for the North West Passage and the North Pole, 1818-1909
1990 The Great Depression: 1929-1939
1992 Niagara: A History of the Falls
1994 The Battle of Lake Erie
1994 Winter
1995 My Times: Living With History, 1917-1995
1995 Attack on Montreal
1996 The Great Lakes
1996 Farewell to the Twentieth Century
1997 1967: The Last Good Year
1999 Worth Repeating: A Literary Resurrection
2000 Welcome To The 21st Century: More Absurdities From Our Time
2001 Marching as to War: Canada's Turbulent Years
2002 Cats I Have Known and Loved
2003 The Joy of Writing: A Guide for Writers Disguised as a Literary Memoir
2004 Prisoners of the North
2005 For the Love of History: Winners of the Pierre Berton Award Bring to Life Canada's Past



History for Young Canadians
The Battles of the War of 1812
The Capture of Detroit
The Death of Isaac Brock
Revenge of the Tribes
Canada Under Siege
The Battle of Lake Erie
The Death of Tecumseh
Attack on Montreal
Exploring the Frozen North
Parry of the Arctic
Jane Franklin's Obsession
Dr. Kane of the Arctic Seas
Trapped in the Arctic
Canada Moves West
The Railway Pathfinders
The Men in Sheepskin Coats
A Prairie Nightmare
Steel Across the Plains
Steel Across the Shield
The Great Klondike Gold Rush
Bonanza Gold
The Klondike Stampede
Trails of '98, City of Gold
Before the Gold Rush
Kings of the Klondike

All of Pierre Berton's writings, including finished books and articles as well as manuscripts, drafts, and research material are now held in the Pierre Berton fonds at the McMaster University Archives here.  
References 
External links

The Canadian Encyclopedia
CBC Archives
Berton House Writers' Retreat
Pierre Berton Award
The Story of the Klondike: Stampede for Gold - The Golden Trail Album Details at Smithsonian Folkways

 
 
DEFAULTSORT
























 
 
 
 
 
 
	Gore Vidal
 
Eugene Luther Gore Vidal ( ;,   born Eugene Louis Vidal, October 3, 1925 – July 31, 2012) was an American writer known for his essays, novels, screenplays, and Broadway plays. He was also known for his patrician manner, Transatlantic accent, and witty aphorisms. Vidal came from a distinguished political lineage; his grandfather was the U.S. Senator Thomas Gore of Oklahoma.Vidal was a lifelong Democrat; he ran for political office twice and was a longtime political commentator. As well known for his essays as his novels, Vidal wrote for The Nation, the New Yorker, the New York Review of Books and Esquire. Through his essays and media appearances, Vidal was a longtime critic of American foreign policy. In addition to this, he characterised the United States as a decaying empire from the 1980s onwards. He was also known for his well-publicized spats with such figures as Norman Mailer, William F. Buckley, Jr., and Truman Capote.His most widely regarded social novel was Myra Breckinridge; his best known historical novels included  Julian,  Burr, and Lincoln. His third novel, The City and the Pillar (1948), outraged conservative critics as one of the first major American novels to feature unambiguous homosexuality. Vidal always rejected the terms of "homosexual" and "heterosexual" as inherently false, claiming that the vast majority of individuals had the potential to be pansexual. His screenwriting credits included the epic historical drama Ben-Hur (1959), into which he claimed he had written a "gay subplot." Ben-Hur won the Academy Award for Best Picture.At the time of his death he was the last of a generation of American writers who had served during World War II, including J.D. Salinger, Kurt Vonnegut, Norman Mailer, and Joseph Heller. Perhaps best remembered for his caustic wit, he referred to himself as a "gentleman bitch" and has been described as the 20th century's answer to Oscar Wilde. 
Life and career

Early lifeVidal was born Eugene Louis Vidal in West Point, New York, the only child of Eugene Luther Vidal (1895–1969) and Nina Gore (1903–1978). Vidal, Gore, "West Point and the Third Loyalty", The New York Review of Books, Volume 20, Number 16, October 18, 1973.  The middle name, Louis, was a mistake on the part of his father, "who could not remember for certain whether his own name was Eugene Louis or Eugene Luther."    As Vidal explained in his memoir Palimpsest (Deutsch, 1995), "... my birth certificate says 'Eugene Louis Vidal': this was changed to Eugene Luther Vidal, Jr.; then Gore was added at my christening [in 1939]; then at fourteen I got rid of the first two names." Vidal was born in the Cadet Hospital of the United States Military Academy (West Point), where his father, a first lieutenant, was the first aeronautics instructor. According to Conversations with Gore Vidal, the future writer was not baptised until January 1939, at age 13, by the headmaster of St. Albans, where Vidal was attending preparatory school. The ceremony took place so Vidal "could be confirmed [into the Episcopal faith] at the Washington Cathedral in February [1939] as Eugene Luther Gore Vidal."  He later stated that although Gore was added to his names at the time of the baptism, "I wasn't named for him, although he had a great influence on my life."  In 1941,  Vidal dropped both of his first two names, saying that he "wanted a sharp, distinctive name, appropriate for an aspiring author or national political leader. 'I wasn't going to write as Gene since there was already one. I didn't want to use the Jr.'" 
Vidal's father served as director of the Commerce Department's Bureau of Air Commerce (1933–1937) in the Roosevelt administration,  was one of the first Army Air Corps pilots and, according to biographer Susan Butler, was the great love of Amelia Earhart's life.  In the 1920s and 1930s, he was a co-founder of three American airlines: the Ludington Line, which merged with others and became Eastern Airlines, Transcontinental Air Transport (TAT, which became TWA), and Northeast Airlines, which he founded with Earhart, as well as the Boston and Maine Railroad. The elder Vidal had also been a West Point football quarterback, coach, and captain and an all-American basketball player. He also participated in the 1920 and 1924 Summer Olympics (seventh in the decathlon; U.S. pentathlon team coach).  Vidal's mother was a society figure who made her Broadway debut as an extra gorevidalnow.com, in which Gore Vidal corrects his Wikipedia page  in Sign of the Leopard in 1928.   She married Eugene Luther Vidal, Sr. in 1922 and divorced him in 1935.  Two more marriages followed (one to Hugh D. Auchincloss, later the stepfather of Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis), and, according to  her son, she had "a long off-and-on affair" with actor Clark Gable.  As Nina Auchincloss, she was an alternate delegate to the 1940 Democratic National Convention. Vidal had four half-siblings from his parents' later marriages (Vance Vidal, Valerie Vidal, Thomas Gore Auchincloss, and Nina Gore Auchincloss) and four stepbrothers from his mother's third marriage to Army Air Forces Major General Robert Olds, who died in 1943, ten months after marrying Vidal's mother.  Vidal's nephews include the brothers Burr Steers, writer and film director, and painter Hugh Auchincloss Steers (1963–1995).      Vidal was raised in Washington, D.C., where he attended Sidwell Friends School and then St. Albans School. Since Senator Gore was blind, his grandson read aloud to him and was often his guide. The senator's isolationism contributed a major principle of his grandson's political philosophy, which is critical of foreign and domestic policies shaped by American imperialism. Rutten, Tim, "'The Selected Essays of Gore Vidal'", Los Angeles Times, June 18, 2008.  Gore attended St. Albans in 1939, but left to study in France. He returned following the outbreak of World War II and studied at the Los Alamos Ranch School in 1940, later transferring to Phillips Exeter Academy in Exeter, New Hampshire.  Roy Hattersley writes, "for reasons he never explained, he did not go on to Harvard, Yale or Princeton with other members of his social class."    Instead, Vidal enlisted in the US Navy, serving as first mate on the F.S. 35th which was birthed at the Dutch Harbor.  After three years, he contracted hypothermia, developed rheumatoid arthritis and became a mess officer.
Writing career

FictionVidal, whom a Newsweek critic called "the best all-around American man of letters since Edmund Wilson,"  began his writing career in 1946, aged twenty-one, with the publication of the military novel Williwaw, based upon his Alaskan Harbor Detachment duty. The novel was about World War II and proved a success for Vidal.  Published two years later in 1948, The City and the Pillar caused a furor for its dispassionate presentation of homosexuality. The novel was dedicated to "J.T." Decades later, after a magazine published rumors about J.T.'s identity, Vidal confirmed they were the initials of his alleged St. Albans-era love, James "Jimmy" Trimble III, killed in the Battle of Iwo Jima on March 1, 1945; Roberts, James "The Legacy of Jimmy Trimble", ESPN, March 14, 2002.  Vidal later said that Trimble was the only person he had ever loved. Chalmers, Robert, "Gore Vidal: Literary feuds, his 'vicious' mother and rumours of a secret love child", The Independent, May 25, 2008. Orville Prescott, the book critic for the New York Times, found The City and the Pillar so objectionable that he refused to review or allow the Times to review Vidal's next five books.  In response, Vidal wrote several mystery novels in the early 1950s under the pseudonym Edgar Box. Featuring public relations man Peter Cutler Sargeant II,  their success financed Vidal for more than a decade. 

He wrote plays, films, and television series. Two plays, The Best Man (1960) and Visit to a Small Planet (1955), were both Broadway and film successes.In 1956, Vidal was hired as a contract screenwriter for Metro Goldwyn Mayer. In 1959, director William Wyler needed script doctors to re-write the script for Ben-Hur, originally written by Karl Tunberg. Vidal collaborated with Christopher Fry, reworking the screenplay on condition that MGM release him from the last two years of his contract. Producer Sam Zimbalist's death complicated the screenwriting credit. The Screen Writers Guild resolved the matter by listing Tunberg as sole screenwriter, denying credit to both Vidal and Fry. This decision was based on the WGA screenwriting credit system which favors original authors. Vidal later claimed in the documentary film The Celluloid Closet that to explain the animosity between Ben-Hur and Messala, he had inserted a gay subtext suggesting that the two had had a prior relationship, but that actor Charlton Heston was oblivious.  Heston denied that Vidal contributed significantly to the script.  Vidal has accused Heston of being a compulsive liar and a truly bad actor to boot. In the 1960s, Vidal wrote three novels. The first, Julian (1964) dealt with the apostate Roman emperor, while the second, Washington, D.C. (1967) focused on a political family during the Franklin D. Roosevelt era. The third was the satirical transsexual comedy Myra Breckinridge (1968), a variation on Vidal's familiar themes of sex, gender, and popular culture. In the novel, Vidal showcased his love of the American films of the '30s and '40s, and he resurrected interest in the careers of the forgotten players of the time including, for example, that of the late Richard Cromwell, who, he wrote, "was so satisfyingly tortured in The Lives of a Bengal Lancer."After the staging of the plays Weekend (1968) and An Evening With Richard Nixon (1972), and the publication of the novel Two Sisters: A Novel in the Form of a Memoir (1970), Vidal focused on essays and two distinct themes in his fiction. The first strain comprises novels dealing with American history, specifically with the nature of national politics.    Critic Harold Bloom wrote, "Vidal's imagination of American politics ... is so powerful as to compel awe." Titles in this series, the Narratives of Empire, include Burr (1973), 1876 (1976), Lincoln (1984), Empire (1987), Hollywood (1990), The Golden Age (2000). Another title devoted to the ancient world, Creation, appeared in 1981 and then in expanded form in 2002.The second strain consists of the comedic "satirical inventions": Myron (1974, a sequel to Myra Breckinridge), Kalki (1978), Duluth (1983), Live from Golgotha: The Gospel according to Gore Vidal (1992), and The Smithsonian Institution (1998).Vidal occasionally returned to writing for film and television, including the television movie Gore Vidal's Billy the Kid with Val Kilmer and the mini-series Lincoln. He also wrote the original draft for the controversial film Caligula, but later had his name removed when director Tinto Brass and actor Malcolm McDowell rewrote the script, changing the tone and themes significantly. The producers later made an attempt to salvage some of Vidal's vision in the film's post-production. "Show Business: Will the Real Caligula Stand Up?", Time, January 3, 1977. 
Essays and memoirsVidal is — at least in the United States — respected more for his essays than his novels.  Even an occasionally hostile critic like Martin Amis admitted, "Essays are what he is good at ... [h]e is learned, funny and exceptionally clear-sighted.  Even his blind spots are illuminating."For six decades, Gore Vidal applied himself to a wide variety of sociopolitical, sexual, historical and literary themes.  In 1987, Vidal wrote the essays titled Armageddon?, exploring the intricacies of power in contemporary America.  He pilloried the incumbent president Ronald Reagan as a "triumph of the embalmer's art."  In 1993, he won the National Book Award for Nonfiction for the collection United States: Essays 1952–1992 
"National Book Awards – 1993". National Book Foundation. Retrieved 2012-03-12.  (With acceptance speech by Vidal, read by Harry Evans.) 
According to the citation, "Whatever his subject, he addresses it with an artist's resonant appreciation, a scholar's conscience and the persuasive powers of a great essayist."  A subsequent collection of essays, published in 2000, is The Last Empire. He subsequently published such self-described "pamphlets" as Perpetual War for Perpetual Peace, Dreaming War: Blood for Oil and the Cheney-Bush Junta, and Imperial America, critiques of American expansionism, the military-industrial complex, the national security state and the George W. Bush administration.  Vidal also wrote an historical essay about the U.S.'s founding fathers, Inventing a Nation.  In 1995, he published a memoir Palimpsest, and in 2006 its follow-up volume, Point to Point Navigation.  Earlier that year, Vidal also published Clouds and Eclipses: The Collected Short Stories.Because of his matter-of-fact treatment of same-sex relations in such books as The City and The Pillar, Vidal is often seen as an early champion of sexual liberation.  In the September 1969 edition of Esquire, for example, Vidal wrote:  In 2005, Jay Parini was appointed as Vidal's literary executor. In 2009, he won the annual Medal for Distinguished Contribution to American Letters from the National Book Foundation, which called him a "prominent social critic on politics, history, literature and culture". 
"Distinguished Contribution to American Letters". National Book Foundation. Retrieved 2012-03-11.  (With acceptance speech by Vidal and official blurb.)  
Acting and popular cultureIn the 1960s, Vidal moved to Italy; he gave a cameo appearance in Federico Fellini's film Roma.  In 1992, Vidal appeared in the film Bob Roberts (starring Tim Robbins) and appeared in other films, notably Gattaca, With Honors, and Igby Goes Down, which was directed by his nephew Burr Steers.  In 2005 he appeared as himself in artist Francesco Vezzoli's "Trailer for the Remake of Gore Vidal's Caligula" piece of video art which was included in the 2005 Venice Biennale and is in the permanent collection of the Guggenheim Museum. 
Vidal voiced himself on both The Simpsons and Family Guy and appeared on the Da Ali G Show, where Ali G mistakes him for Vidal Sassoon.
He provided the narrative for the Royal National Theatre's production of Brecht's Mother Courage in the autumn of 2009.Vidal was portrayed as a child in Amelia (2009) by Canadian actor William Cuddy, and as a young adult in Infamous (2006), the story of Truman Capote, by American actor Michael Panes.Comedian Robin Williams depicted him as a drunk trying to push Thunderbird wine in a commercial on his first stand-up album, Reality...What a Concept.  The weekly American sketch comedy television program; Rowan & Martin's Laugh-in did a recurring theme covertly featuring his personality by Lily Tomlin as Ernestine the Telephone Operator, such as one titled: "Mr. Veedul, this is the Phone Company calling! (snort! snort!)" (but other citations are spelled as; "Veedle").   This skit theme was also recorded other places such as Lily Tomlin's album; "This Is A Recording" titled "Mr. Veedle" by Rhapsody records. 
Political views and activitiesBesides his politician grandfather, Vidal had other connections with the Democratic Party: his mother, Nina, married Hugh D. Auchincloss, Jr., who later was stepfather of Jacqueline Bouvier Kennedy. Gore Vidal is a fifth cousin of Jimmy Carter.  Vidal also may have been a distant cousin of Al Gore.  As a political activist, in 1960, Gore Vidal was an unsuccessful Democratic candidate for Congress, losing an election in New York's 29th congressional district, a traditionally Republican district on the Hudson River, encompassing all of Columbia, Dutchess, Greene, Schoharie, and Ulster Counties to J. Ernest Wharton, by a margin of 57% to 43%.  Campaigning with a slogan of "You'll get more with Gore", he received the most votes any Democrat in 50 years received in that district. Among his supporters were Eleanor Roosevelt, Paul Newman, and Joanne Woodward; the latter two, longtime friends of Vidal's, campaigned for him and spoke on his behalf. On the December 15, 1971 taping of The Dick Cavett Show, with Janet Flanner, Norman Mailer allegedly head-butted Vidal during an altercation prior to their appearance on the show.   Asked by a journalist what comment he had about Mailer's head-butting him backstage, Gore dead-panned, "Once again, words failed Norman Mailer."   During the taping of the show, there was a legendary on-camera feud between Vidal and Mailer    over what Vidal had written about the latter, prompting Mailer to say: "I've had to smell your works from time to time."  Mailer was apparently irate at Gore's concealed reference to an incident where Mailer had stabbed his wife.From 1970 to 1972, Vidal was one of the chairmen of the People's Party.  In 1971, he wrote an article in Esquire advocating consumer advocate Ralph Nader for president in the 1972 election. In 1982, he campaigned against incumbent Governor Jerry Brown for the Democratic primary election to the United States Senate from California. Jerry Brown joined the race after Mr. Vidal in order to gracefully exit the governorship, in spite of knowing that Vidal was the more beloved across the United States, a situation which likely still provides rancor. Mr. Vidal prophetically announced that their Republican opponent would take the race.  This was documented in the film Gore Vidal: The Man Who Said No directed by Gary Conklin.Vidal's favorite U.S. politician during his lifetime was populist Louisiana Governor Huey Long.  Frequently identified with Democratic causes and personalities,     Vidal wrote in the 1970s:  
Despite this, Vidal said "I think of myself as a conservative."  Vidal had a protective, almost proprietary attitude toward his native land and its politics: "My family helped start [this country]", he wrote, "and we've been in political life ... since the 1690s, and I have a very possessive sense about this country."  At a 1999 lecture in Dublin, Vidal said: He suggested that President Roosevelt deliberately provoked the Japanese to attack the United States at Pearl Harbor to facilitate American entry to the war, and believes FDR had advance knowledge of the attack.   During an interview in the 2005 documentary Why We Fight, Vidal asserts that during the final months of World War II, the Japanese had tried to surrender to the United States, to no avail. He said, "They were trying to surrender all that summer, but Truman wouldn't listen, because Truman wanted to drop the bombs." When the interviewer asked why, Vidal replied, "To show off. To frighten Stalin. To change the balance of power in the world. To declare war on communism. Perhaps we were starting a pre-emptive world war." During domestic terrorist Timothy McVeigh's imprisonment, Vidal corresponded with McVeigh and concluded that he bombed the federal building as retribution for the FBI's role in the 1993 Branch Davidian Compound massacre near Waco in Elk, Texas. Vidal was a member of the advisory board of The World Can't Wait, a left-wing organization seeking to repudiate the Bush administration's program, and advocated the impeachment of George W. Bush for war crimes. In 1997, Vidal was one of 34 celebrities to sign an open letter to then-German Chancellor Helmut Kohl, published as a newspaper advertisement in the International Herald Tribune, which protested the treatment of Scientologists in Germany. 
Despite this, Vidal was fundamentally critical of Scientology. Vidal contributed an article to The Nation in which he expressed support for Democratic Presidential candidate Dennis Kucinich, citing him as "the most eloquent of the lot" and that Kucinich "is very much a favorite out there in the amber fields of grain". In April 2009, Vidal accepted appointment to the position of honorary president of the American Humanist Association, succeeding Kurt Vonnegut. On September 30, 2009, The Times of London published a lengthy interview with him headlined "We’ll have a dictatorship soon in the US — The grand old man of letters Gore Vidal claims America is ‘rotting away’ — and don’t expect Barack Obama to save it", which brings up-to-date his views on his own life, and a variety of political subjects. 
Vidal versus BuckleyIn 1968, ABC News invited Vidal and William F. Buckley, Jr. to be political analysts of the Republican and Democratic presidential conventions.  Verbal and nearly physical combat ensued. After days of mutual bickering, their debates degraded to vitriolic, ad hominem attacks. During discussions of the 1968 Democratic National Convention protests, the men were arguing about freedom of speech with regard to American protesters displaying a Viet Cong flag when Vidal told Buckley to "shut up a minute" and, in response to Buckley's reference to "pro-Nazi" protesters, went on to say: "As far as I'm concerned, the only sort of pro-crypto-Nazi I can think of is yourself." The visibly livid Buckley replied, "Now listen, you queer. Stop calling me a crypto-Nazi, or I'll sock you in the goddamn face and you'll stay plastered." After an interruption by anchor and facilitator Howard K. Smith, who is patently in favor of Buckley throughout the debates,  the men continued to discuss the topic in a less hostile manner.  Buckley later expressed regret for having called Vidal a "queer," but nonetheless described Vidal as an "evangelist for bisexuality." Later, in 1969, the feud was continued as Buckley further attacked Vidal in the lengthy essay, "On Experiencing Gore Vidal", published in the August 1969 issue of Esquire. The essay is collected in The Governor Listeth, an anthology of Buckley's writings of the time. In a key passage attacking Vidal as an apologist for homosexuality, Buckley wrote, "The man who in his essays proclaims the normalcy of his affliction [i.e., homosexuality], and in his art the desirability of it, is not to be confused with the man who bears his sorrow quietly. The addict is to be pitied and even respected, not the pusher."Vidal responded in the September 1969 issue of Esquire, variously characterizing Buckley as "anti-black", "anti-semitic", and a "warmonger".  The presiding judge in Buckley's subsequent libel suit against Vidal initially concluded that "[t]he court must conclude that Vidal's comments in these paragraphs meet the minimal standard of fair comment. The inferences made by Vidal from Buckley's [earlier editorial] statements cannot be said to be completely unreasonable."  However, Vidal also strongly implied that, in 1944, Buckley and unnamed siblings had vandalized a Protestant church in their Sharon, Connecticut, hometown after the pastor's wife had sold a house to a Jewish family. Buckley sued Vidal and Esquire for libel. Vidal counter-claimed for libel against Buckley, citing Buckley's characterization of Vidal's novel Myra Breckinridge as pornography. The court dismissed Vidal's counter-claim.  Buckley settled for $115,000 in attorney's fees and an editorial statement from Esquire magazine that they were "utterly convinced" of the untruthfulness of Vidal's assertion.  However, in a letter to Newsweek, the Esquire publisher stated that "the settlement of Buckley's suit against us" was not "a 'disavowal' of Vidal's article. On the contrary, it clearly states that we published that article because we believed that Vidal had a right to assert his opinions, even though we did not share them."As Vidal's biographer, Fred Kaplan, later commented, "The court had 'not' sustained Buckley's case against Esquire ... [t]he court had 'not' ruled that Vidal's article was 'defamatory.' It had ruled that the case would have to go to trial in order to determine as a matter of fact whether or not it was defamatory. [italics original.] The cash value of the settlement with Esquire represented 'only' Buckley's legal expenses [not damages based on libel] ... " Ultimately, Vidal bore the cost of his own attorney's fees. In 2003, this affair re-surfaced when Esquire published Esquire's Big Book of Great Writing, an anthology that included Vidal's essay. Buckley again sued for libel, and Esquire again settled for $55,000 in attorney's fees and $10,000 in personal damages to Buckley. After Buckley's death on February 27, 2008, Vidal summed up his impressions of his rival with the following obituary on March 20, 2008:  "RIP WFB — in hell."   In a June 15, 2008, interview with the New York Times, Vidal was asked by Deborah Solomon, "How did you feel when you heard that Buckley died this year?" Vidal responded:  
Criticism of the George W. Bush administrationVidal was strongly critical of the George W. Bush administration, once describing Bush as "the stupidest man in the United States"  and listing his administration as one of those he considered to have either an explicit or implicit expansionist agenda.  He also subscribed to the view that for several years the Bush administration and their associates aimed to control the petroleum of Central Asia (after gaining effective control of the petroleum of the Persian Gulf in 1991). 
In May 2007, discussing the many conspiracy theories surrounding the September 11, 2001 terrorist attacks on New York and Washington, Vidal said:  
Personal life
Vidal had affairs with both men and women. The novelist Anaïs Nin claimed an involvement with Vidal in her memoir The Diary of Anaïs Nin but Vidal denied it in his memoir Palimpsest. Vidal also discussed having dalliances with people such as actress Diana Lynn, and alluded to the possibility that he may have a daughter.  He was briefly engaged to Joanne Woodward, before she married Paul Newman; after eloping, the couple shared a house with Vidal in Los Angeles for a short time. In 1950, he met his long-term partner Howard Austen. 
Vidal once reported that the secret to his lengthy relationship with Austen was that they did not have sex with each other:  "It's easy to sustain a relationship when sex plays no part & impossible, I have observed, when it does."   According to literary critic Harold Bloom, Vidal believed his homosexuality had denied him the full recognition of the literary community. Bloom, meanwhile, claimed this had more to do with Vidal's association with the unfashionable genre of historical fiction.   Vidal was an atheist,  and in 2009 was named honorary president of the American Humanist Association. During the latter part of the twentieth century Vidal divided his time between Italy and California. In 2003, he sold his 5,000-square-foot (460 m²) Italian Villa, La Rondinaia (The Swallow's Nest) on the Amalfi Coast, and moved to Los Angeles.  Austen died in November 2003 and, in February 2005, was buried in a plot for himself and Vidal at Rock Creek Cemetery in Washington, D.C.Vidal died at his home in Hollywood Hills, California, at about 6:45 p.m. PDT July 31, 2012, of complications from pneumonia.   He was 86.
LegacyAfter Vidal's death tributes immediately poured in from various media sources. The New York Times described him in his obituary as being in his old age "an Augustan figure who believed himself to be the last of a breed, and he was probably right. Few American writers have been more versatile or gotten more mileage from their talent."  The Los Angeles Times described him as a "literary juggernaut" whose novels and essays were considered "among the most elegant in the English language".  The Washington Post remembered him as a "major writer of the modern era" and an "astonishingly versatile man of letters". UK's The Guardian said "Vidal's critics disparaged his tendency to formulate an aphorism rather than to argue, finding in his work an underlying note of contempt for those who did not agree with him. His fans, on the other hand, delighted in his unflagging wit and elegant style."  The Daily Telegraph described him as "an icy iconoclast" who "delighted in chronicling what he perceived as the disintegration of civilisation around him",  while BBC News said he was "one of the finest post-war American writers... an indefatigable critic of the whole American system. Writing in Los Angeles, BBC journalist Alastair Leithead said: "Gore Vidal saw himself as the last of the breed of literary figures who became celebrities in their own right. Never a stranger to chat shows, his wry and witty opinions were sought after as much as his writing." Popular Spanish publication Ideal reported Vidal's death as a loss to the "culture of the United States" and described him as a "Huge American novelist and essayist". 
The Italian Il Corriere described him as "the enfant terrible of American culture" and said that he was "one of the giants of American literature".  French paper Le Figaro described him as "the Killjoy of America" but also said that he was an "outstanding polemicist" who used phrases "like high precision weapons." Following his death, despite generally positive appraisals by many, Vidal has been criticized by at least one commentator as "racist and elitist" and as "forever mourning the decline of his era of aristocratic privilege". 
Bibliography

Essays and non-fiction

Rocking the Boat (1963)
Reflections Upon a Sinking Ship (1969)
Sex, Death and Money (1969) (paperback compilation)
Homage to Daniel Shays (1972)
Matters of Fact and of Fiction (1977)
Views from a Window Co-Editor (1981)
The Second American Revolution (1983)
Vidal In Venice (1985) ISBN 0-671-60691-3
Armageddon? (1987) (UK only)
At Home (1988)
A View From The Diner's Club (1991) (UK only)
Screening History (1992) ISBN 0-233-98803-3
Decline and Fall of the American Empire (1992) ISBN 1-878825-00-3
United States: Essays 1952–1992 (1993) ISBN 0-7679-0806-6 — National Book Award 
Palimpsest: a memoir (1995) ISBN 0-679-44038-0
Virgin Islands (1997) (UK only)
The American Presidency (1998) ISBN 1-878825-15-1
Sexually Speaking: Collected Sex Writings (1999)
The Last Empire: essays 1992–2000 (2001) ISBN 0-375-72639-X (there is also a much shorter UK edition)
Perpetual War for Perpetual Peace or How We Came To Be So Hated, Thunder's Mouth Press, 2002, (2002) ISBN 1-56025-405-X
Dreaming War: Blood for Oil and the Cheney-Bush Junta, Thunder's Mouth Press, (2002) ISBN 1-56025-502-1
Inventing a Nation: Washington, Adams, Jefferson (2003) ISBN 0-300-10171-6
Imperial America: Reflections on the United States of Amnesia (2004) ISBN 1-56025-744-X
Point to Point Navigation: A Memoir (2006) ISBN 0-385-51721-1
The Selected Essays of Gore Vidal (2008) ISBN 0-385-52484-6
Gore Vidal: Snapshots in History's Glare (2009) ISBN 0-8109-5049-9


Plays

Visit to a Small Planet (1957) ISBN 0-8222-1211-0
The Best Man (1960)
On the March to the Sea (1960–1961, 2004)
Romulus (adapted from Friedrich Dürrenmatt's 1950 play Romulus der Große) (1962)
Weekend (1968)
Drawing Room Comedy (1970)
An Evening with Richard Nixon (1970) ISBN 0-394-71869-0
On the March to the Sea (2005)


Novels

Williwaw (1946) ISBN 0-226-85585-6
In a Yellow Wood (1947)
The City and the Pillar (1948) ISBN 1-4000-3037-4
The Season of Comfort (1949) ISBN 0-233-98971-4
A Search for the King (1950) ISBN 0-345-25455-4
Dark Green, Bright Red (1950) ISBN 0-233-98913-7 (prophecy of the Guatemala coup d'état of 1954, see "In the Lair of the Octopus" Dreaming War)
A Star's Progress (aka Cry Shame!) (1950) under the pseudonym Katherine Everard
The Judgment of Paris (1952) ISBN 0-345-33458-2
Death in the Fifth Position (1952) under the pseudonym Edgar Box
Thieves Fall Out (1953) under the pseudonym Cameron Kay
Death Before Bedtime (1953) under the pseudonym Edgar Box
Death Likes It Hot (1954) under the pseudonym Edgar Box
Messiah (1954) ISBN 0-14-118039-0
A Thirsty Evil (1956) (short stories)
Julian (1964) ISBN 0-375-72706-X
Washington, D.C. (1967) ISBN 0-316-90257-8
Myra Breckinridge (1968) ISBN 1-125-97948-8
Two Sisters (1970) ISBN 0-434-82958-7
Burr (1973) ISBN 0-375-70873-1
Myron (1974) ISBN 0-586-04300-4
1876 (1976) ISBN 0-375-70872-3
Kalki (1978) ISBN 0-14-118037-4
Creation (1981) ISBN 0-349-10475-1
Duluth (1983) ISBN 0-394-52738-0
Lincoln (1984) ISBN 0-375-70876-6
Empire (1987) ISBN 0-375-70874-X
Hollywood (1990) ISBN 0-375-70875-8
Live from Golgotha: The Gospel according to Gore Vidal (1992) ISBN 0-14-023119-6
The Smithsonian Institution (1998) ISBN 0-375-50121-5
The Golden Age (2000) ISBN 0-375-72481-8
Clouds and Eclipses: The Collected Short Stories (2006) (short stories, this is the same collection as A Thirsty Evil (1956), with one previously unpublished short story — Clouds and Eclipses — added)


Screenplays

Climax!: Dr. Jekyll & Mr. Hyde (1954) (TV adaptation)
The Catered Affair (1956)
I Accuse! (1958)
The Scapegoat (1959)
Ben Hur (1959) (uncredited)
Suddenly, Last Summer (1959)
The Best Man (1964)
Is Paris Burning? (1966)
Last of the Mobile Hot Shots (1970)
Caligula (1979)
Dress Gray (1986)
The Sicilian (1987) (uncredited)
Billy the Kid (1989)
Dimenticare Palermo (1989)


Media appearances

CBS Reports: The Homosexuals (1967)
Mary Hartman, Mary Hartman (1976 — 7 episodes) — as himself
Profile of a Writer: Gore Vidal — RM Productions (1979 documentary film)
Gore Vidal: The Man Who Said No (1983 documentary film)
Weekend In Wallop (1984)
Vidal in Venice — Antelope Films for Channel Four Television (1987 documentary film)
Bob Roberts — as Senator Brickley Paiste (1992 film)
With Honors — Plays the pessimistic and right-wing Prof. Pitkannan (1994 film)
The Celluloid Closet (1995 documentary film) 
Gattaca — Plays Director Josef in science-fiction film (1997)
Shadow Conspiracy — Plays Congressman Paige Political Thriller (1997)
Igby Goes Down (2001 film) — School headmaster (uncredited)
The Education of Gore Vidal (2003) Documentary by Deborah Dickson, aired in the US on PBS
Thinking XXX (2004 documentary)
Da Ali G Show (2004 TV)
Why We Fight (2005 film)
Inside Deep Throat (2005 film)
One Bright Shining Moment (2005 film)
Trailer for a Remake of Gore Vidal's Caligula (2005 spoof trailer)
Foreign Correspondent — with former NSW premier Bob Carr
The U.S. Versus John Lennon (2006 film)
Hollywood Bowl, Los Angeles Philharmonic Orchestra concert, August 2, 2007 — Narrated Aaron Copland's Lincoln Portrait (conducted by Michael Tilson Thomas) from a wheelchair.
The Henry Rollins Show (2007 TV)
The Simpsons episode: "Moe'N'a Lisa"
Family Guy episode: "Mother Tucker"
Alex Jones radio show
Jon Wiener's radio program in Los Angeles    
Terrorstorm: Final Cut Special Edition (2007)
Lateline — ABC Television Australia Interview (May 2, 2008)
Democracy Now — interview: on the Bush Presidency, History and the "United States of Amnesia"  (May 14, 2008)
The South Bank Show (May 18, 2008)
Hardtalk — BBC News (May 22, 2008)
The Andrew Marr Show (May 25, 2008)
The US is not a republic anymore  (June, 2008)
Zero: An Investigation Into 9/11  (June, 2008)
Interview on the BBC's US Presidential Election Coverage with David Dimbleby (November 04, 2008) 
"Writer Against the Grain": Gore Vidal in conversation with Jay Parini at the 2009 Key West Literary Seminar (audio, 59:09) 
Real Time with Bill Maher (April 10, 2009)
Shrink (2009 film)
"Gore Vidal's America"  on The Real News Network (December 24, 2010)
What's My Line? occasional guest panelist (early 1960s)


See also

Politics in fiction


References 
External links 
 

Official website of Gore Vidal
Gore Vidal Index, by Harry Kloman
Gore Vidal Pages
 
 
 
 

  
DEFAULTSORT



































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Jean-Paul Marat
 
 
Jean-Paul Marat ( ; 24 May 1743 – 13 July 1793), born in the Principality of Neuchâtel, was a physician, political theorist, and scientist best known for his career in France as a radical journalist and politician during the French Revolution. His journalism was renowned for its fiery character and uncompromising stance toward "enemies of the revolution" and basic reforms for the poorest members of society. Marat was one of the more extreme voices of the French Revolution, and he became a vigorous defender of the sans-culottes; he broadcast his views through impassioned public speaking, essay writing, and newspaper journalism, which carried his message throughout France. Marat's radical denunciations of counter-revolutionaries supported much of the violence that occurred during the wartime phases of the French Revolution. His constant persecution of "enemies of the people," consistent condemnatory message, and uncanny prophetic powers brought him the trust of the populace and made him their unofficial link to the radical Jacobin group that came to power in June 1793. He was murdered in his bathtub by Charlotte Corday, a Girondist sympathizer.
Scientist and physician 
Jean-Paul Marat was born in Boudry in the Prussian Principality of Neuchâtel, now part of Switzerland, on 24 May 1743.  He was the second of nine children born to Jean Mara (Giovanni Mara), a native of Cagliari, Sardinia, and Louise Cabrol, a French Huguenot from Castres. His father was a Mercedarian "commendator" and religious refugee who converted to Calvinism in Geneva. At the age of sixteen, Marat left home and set off in search of fame and fortune, aware of the limited opportunities for outsiders. His highly educated father had been turned down for several secondary teaching posts. His first post was as a private tutor to the wealthy Nairac family in Bordeaux. After two years there he moved on to Paris where he studied medicine without gaining any formal qualifications. Moving to London around 1765, for fear of being "drawn into dissipation", he set himself up informally as a doctor, befriended the Royal Academician artist Angelika Kauffmann, and began to mix with Italian artists and architects in the coffee houses around Soho. Highly ambitious, but without patronage or qualifications, he set about imposing himself into the intellectual scene with essays on philosophy ("A philosophical Essay on Man", published 1773) and political theory ("Chains of Slavery", published 1774).  Voltaire's sharp critique in defense  of his friend Helvétius brought the young Marat to wider attention for the first time and reinforced his growing sense of a wide division between the materialists, grouped around Voltaire on one hand, and their opponents, grouped around Rousseau on the other. Around 1770, Marat moved to Newcastle upon Tyne, possibly gaining employment as a veterinarian. His first political work Chains of Slavery, inspired by the activities of the MP and Mayor John Wilkes, was most probably compiled in the central library here. By Marat's own colourful  account, he lived on black coffee for three months, during its composition, sleeping only two hours a night – and then slept soundly for thirteen days in a row.  He gave it the subtitle, "A work in which the clandestine and villainous attempts of Princes to ruin Liberty are pointed out, and the dreadful scenes of Despotism disclosed". It earned him honorary membership of the patriotic societies of Berwick, Carlisle and Newcastle. The Newcastle Literary and Philosophical Society Library  possesses a copy, and Tyne and Wear Archives Service holds three presented to the various Newcastle guilds.A published essay on curing a friend of gleets (gonorrhea) probably helped him to secure his referees for an honorary medical degree from the St. Andrews University in June 1775. On his return to London, he further enhanced his reputation with the publication of an Enquiry into the Nature, Cause, and Cure of a Singular Disease of the Eyes.In 1776, Marat moved to Paris following a brief stopover in Geneva to visit his family. Here his growing reputation as a highly effective doctor, along with the patronage of the marquis de l'Aubespine, the husband of one of his patients, secured his appointment, in 1777, as physician to the bodyguard of the comte d'Artois, Louis XVI's youngest brother who was to become king Charles X in 1824. The position paid 2,000 livres a year plus allowances.Marat was soon in great demand as a court doctor among the aristocracy and he used his new-found wealth to set up a laboratory in the marquise de l'Aubespine's (thought to be his mistress) house. Soon he was publishing works on fire & heat, electricity and light. In his Mémoires, his later enemy Brissot admitted Marat's growing influence in Parisian scientific circles. When Marat presented his scientific researches to the Académie des Sciences, they were not approved and he was rejected as a member several times. In particular, the Academicians were appalled by his temerity in disagreeing with (the hitherto uncriticized ) Newton. Benjamin Franklin visited him on several occasions and Goethe described his rejection by the Academy as a glaring example of scientific despotism. In 1780, Marat published his "favourite  work", a Plan de législation criminelle. Inspired by Rousseau and Beccaria, his polemic for judicial reform argued for a common death penalty for all regardless of social class and the necessity for a twelve-man jury to ensure fair trials.In April 1786, he resigned his court appointment and devoted his energies full-time to scientific research. He published a well-received translation of Newton's Opticks (1787), and later a collection of experimental essays including a study on the effect of light on soap bubbles in his Mémoires académiques, ou nouvelles découvertes sur la lumière ("Academic memoirs, or new discoveries on light", 1788).Many of his references to slavery illustrate the curious links between the use of the language of slavery in a metaphorical sense (to be "slave" to a king) and the triangular trade (chattel slavery). As a tutor in the leading slave port of Bordeaux, he may have witnessed aspects of the trade. He worked as a tutor to those merchants who benefitted from it for many months. Soon after the uprisings in the Caribbean island and sugar colony of St Domingue (later Haiti after its revolution), he wrote in 1792 that those in St Domingue are "a separate people" from France. He cited the new constitution (of 1791), "The basis of all free government is that no people can be legally subject to another people..." (from "The Friend of the People" 1792. See the excerpt in Dubois & Garrigus, editors, "Slave Revolution in the Caribbean, 1789-1804, p 111-112).
"Friend of the People"On the eve of the French Revolution, Marat placed his career as a scientist and doctor behind him and took up his pen on behalf of the Third Estate. After 1788, when the Parlement of Paris and other Notables advised the assembling of the Estates-General for the first time in 175 years, Marat devoted himself entirely to politics.  His Offrande à la Patrie ("Offering to the Nation") dwelt on much the same points as the Abbé Sieyès' famous "Qu'est-ce que le Tiers État?" ("What is the Third Estate?") When the Estates-General met, in June 1789, he published a supplement to his Offrande, followed in July by La Constitution ("The Constitution") and in September by the Tableau des vices de la constitution d'Angleterre ("Tableau of the flaws of the English constitution") intended to influence the structure of a constitution for France. The latter work was presented to the National Constituent Assembly and was an anti-oligarchic dissent from the anglomania that was gripping that body.In September 1789, Marat began his own paper, which was at first called Moniteur patriote ("Patriotic Watch"), changed four days later to Publiciste parisien, and then finally L'Ami du peuple ("The Friend of the People"). From this position, he expressed suspicion of those in power, and dubbed them "enemies of the people". Although Marat never joined a specific faction during the Revolution, he condemned several sides in his L'Ami du peuple, and reported their alleged disloyalties (until he was proven wrong or they were proven guilty).Marat often attacked the most influential and powerful groups in Paris, including the Corps Municipal, the Constituent Assembly, the ministers, and the Cour du Châtelet. In January 1790, he moved to the radical Cordeliers section, the Club des Cordeliers, then under the leadership of the lawyer Danton, was nearly arrested for his aggressive campaign against the marquis de La Fayette, and was forced to flee to London, where he wrote his Dénonciation contre Necker ("Denunciation of Jacques Necker"), an attack on Louis XVI's popular Finance Minister. In May, he returned to Paris to continue the publication of L'Ami du peuple, and attacked many of France's most powerful citizens.
Marat faced the problem counterfeiters distributing falsified versions of L'Ami du peuple, which led him to call for police intervention.  Ironically, Marat’s L'Ami de peuple was originally an illegal publication itself.  However, effective police intervention resulted in the suppression of the fraudulent issues, leaving Marat the continuing sole author of L'Ami de peuple.
Fearing reprisal, Marat went into hiding in the Paris sewers, where he almost certainly aggravated a debilitating chronic skin disease (dermatitis herpetiformis).   During this period, Marat made regular attacks on the more conservative revolutionary leaders. In a pamphlet from 26 July 1790, entitled "C'en est fait de nous" ("We're done for!"), he wrote:
 
EventsFrom 1790 to 1792, Marat frequently had to go into hiding. In April 1792, he married the 26-year-old Simonne Evrard  in a common-law ceremony on his return from exile in London, having previously expressed his love for her. She was the sister-in-law of his typographer, Jean-Antoine Corne, and had lent him money and sheltered him on several occasions.Marat only emerged publicly on the 10 August Insurrection, when the Tuileries Palace was invaded and the royal family forced to shelter within the Legislative Assembly. The spark for this uprising was Karl Wilhelm Ferdinand, Duke of Brunswick-Luneburg's provocative proclamation, which called for the crushing of the Revolution and helped to inflame popular outrage in Paris.
The National ConventionMarat was elected to the National Convention in September 1792 as one of 26 Paris deputies although he belonged to no party. When France was declared a Republic on 22 September, Marat renamed his L'Ami du peuple as Le Journal de la République française ("Journal of the French Republic").
His stance during the trial of the deposed king Louis XVI was unique. He declared it unfair to accuse Louis for anything before his acceptance of the French Constitution of 1791, and, although implacably believing that the monarch's death would be good for the people, defended Guillaume-Chrétien de Lamoignon de Malesherbes, the King's counsel, as a "sage et respectable vieillard" ("wise and respected old man").On 21 January 1793, Louis XVI was guillotined, which caused political turmoil. From January to May, Marat fought bitterly with the Girondins, whom he believed to be covert enemies of republicanism.  Marat’s hatred of the Girondins became increasingly heated which led him to call for the use of violent tactics against them.  The Girondins fought back and demanded that Marat be tried before the Revolutionary Tribunal.  After attempting to avoid arrest for several days Marat was finally imprisoned.  On the 24th of April, he was brought before the Tribunal on the charges that he had printed in his paper statements calling for widespread murder as well as the suspension of the Convention.  Marat decisively defended his actions, stating that he had no evil intentions directed against the Convention.  Marat was acquitted of all charges to the riotous celebrations of his supporters.
Death 

The fall of the Girondins on 2 June, helped by the actions of François Hanriot, the new leader of the National Guard, was one of Marat's last great achievements. Forced to retire from the Convention as a result of his worsening skin disease, he continued to work from home, where he soaked in a medicinal bath. Now that The Mountain no longer needed his support in the struggle against the Girondins, Robespierre and other leading Montagnards began to separate themselves from him, while the Convention largely ignored his letters.
Marat was in his bathtub on 13 July, when a young woman from Caen, Charlotte Corday, appeared at his flat, claiming to have vital information on the activities of the escaped Girondins who had fled to Normandy. Despite his wife Simonne's protests, Marat asked for her to enter and gave her an audience by his bath, over which a board had been laid to serve as a writing desk. Their interview lasted around fifteen minutes. He asked her what was happening in Caen and she explained, reciting a list of the offending deputies. After he had finished writing out the list, Corday claimed that he told her, "Their heads will fall within a fortnight". A statement which she later changed at her trial to, "Soon I shall have them all guillotined in Paris". This was unlikely since Marat did not have the power to have anyone guillotined.   At that moment, Corday rose from her chair, drawing out from her corset the five-inch kitchen knife, which she had bought earlier that day, and brought it down hard into Marat’s chest, where it pierced just under his right clavicle, opening the carotid artery, close to the heart. The massive bleeding was fatal within seconds. Slumping backwards, Marat cried out his last words to Simonne, "Aidez-moi, ma chère amie!" ("Help me, my dear friend!") and died.Corday was a Girondin sympathiser  who came from an impoverished royalist family – her brothers were émigrés who had left to join the exiled royal princes. From her own account, and those of witnesses, it is clear that she had been inspired by Girondin speeches to a hatred of the Montagnards and their excesses, symbolised  most powerfully in the character of Marat.  The Book of Days claims the motive was to "avenge the death of her friend Barboroux". Marat's assassination contributed to the mounting suspicion which fed the Terror during which thousands of the Jacobins' adversaries – both royalists and Girondins – were executed on supposed charges of treason. Charlotte Corday was guillotined on 17 July 1793 for the murder. During her four-day trial, she had testified that she had carried out the assassination alone, saying "I killed one man to save 100,000."
Memory in the RevolutionMarat's assassination led to his apotheosis. The painter Jacques-Louis David, a member of one of the two "Great Committees" (the Committee of General Security), was asked to organize  a grand funeral. David took up the task of immortalizing  Marat in the painting The Death of Marat, beautifying the skin that was discoloured  and scabbed from his chronic skin disease in an attempt to create antique virtue. David, as a result of this work, has since been criticized as glorifying the Jacobin's death. The entire National Convention attended Marat's funeral and he was buried under a weeping willow, in the garden of the former Club des Cordeliers (former Couvent des Cordeliers). After Marat’s death, he was viewed by many as a martyr for the revolution, and was immortalized in various ways in order to preserve the values he stood for.  His heart was removed and hung from the ceiling of the Cordeliers Club in order to inspire speeches that were similar in style to Marat’s eloquent journalistic skills.  On his tomb, the inscription on a plaque read: "Unité, Indivisibilité de la République, Liberté, Égalité, Fraternité ou la mort". His heart was embalmed separately and placed in an urn in an altar erected to his memory at the Cordeliers.  His remains were transferred to the Panthéon on 25 November 1793 and his near messianic role in the Revolution was confirmed with the elegy: Like Jesus, Marat loved ardently the people, and only them. Like Jesus, Marat hated kings, nobles, priests, rogues and, like Jesus, he never stopped fighting against these plagues of the people. The eulogy was given by the Marquis de Sade, delegate of the Section Piques and an ally of Marat's faction in the National Convention (there is evidence to suggest that shortly before his death Marat had fallen out with de Sade and was arranging for him to be arrested). By this stage de Sade was becoming appalled with the excesses of the Reign of Terror and was later removed from office and imprisoned for "moderatism" on the fifth of December.On 19 November, the port city of Le Havre-de-Grâce changed its name to Le Havre-de-Marat and then Le Havre-Marat. When the Jacobins started their dechristianisation  campaign to set up the Cult of Reason of Hébert and Chaumette and Cult of the Supreme Being of Robespierre, Marat was made a quasi-saint, and his bust often replaced crucifixes in the former churches of Paris.By early 1795, Marat's memory had become tarnished. On 13 January 1795, Le Havre-Marat became simply Le Havre, the name it bears today. In February, his coffin was removed from the Panthéon and his busts and sculptures were destroyed. His final resting place is the cemetery of the church of Saint-Étienne-du-Mont.His memory lived on in the Soviet Union. Marat became a common name and the Russian battleship Petropavlovsk ( ) was renamed Marat in 1921. A street in the centre  of Sevastopol was named after Marat ( ) on 3 January 1921, shortly after the Soviets took over the city. 
Skin diseaseDescribed during his time as a man "short in stature, deformed in person, and hideous in face,"  Marat has long been noted for physical irregularities. The nature of Marat's debilitating skin disease, in particular, has been an object of ongoing medical interest. Dr. Josef E. Jelinek noted that his skin disease was intensely itchy, blistering, began in the perianal region, and was associated with weight loss leading to emaciation. He was sick with it for the three years prior to his assassination, and spent most of this time in his bathtub. There were various minerals and medicines that were present in his bath while he soaked to help ease the pain caused by his debilitating skin disease. The bandana that is seen wrapped around his head was soaked in vinegar to reduce the severity of his discomfort.  Jelinek's diagnosis is dermatitis herpetiformis. 
BathtubAfter Marat's death, his wife may have sold his bathtub to her journalist neighbour , as it was included in an inventory of his possessions after his death. The royalist de Saint-Hilaire  bought the tub, taking it to Sarzeau, Morbihan in Brittany. His daughter, Capriole de Saint-Hilaire inherited it when he died in 1805   and she passed it on to the Sarzeau curé when she died in 1862. A journalist for Le Figaro tracked down the tub in 1885. The curé then discovered that selling the tub could earn money for the parish, yet the Musée Carnavalet turned it down due to its lack of provenance as well as the high price. The curé approached Madame Tussaud's waxworks, who agreed to purchase Marat's bathtub for 100,000 francs, but the curé's acceptance was lost in the mail. After rejecting other offers, including one from Phineas Barnum, the curé sold the tub for 5,000 francs to the Musée Grévin, where it remains today.  The tub was in the shape of an old-fashioned high-buttoned shoe and had a copper lining. 
WorksBesides the works mentioned above, Marat also wrote:

Recherches physiques sur l'électricité, &c. (1782)
Recherches sur l'électricité médicale (1783)
Notions élémentaires d'optique (1784)
Lettres de l'observateur Bon Sens à M. de M sur la fatale catastrophe des infortunés Pilatre de Rozier et Ronzain, les aéronautes et l'aérostation (1785)
Observations de M. l'amateur Avec à M. l'abbé Sans . . . &c., (1785)
Éloge de Montesquieu (1785) (provincial Academy competition entry first published 1883 by M. de Bresetz)
Les Charlatans modernes, ou lettres sur le charlatanisme académique (L'Ami du Peuple, 1791)
Les Aventures du comte Potowski (unpublished manuscript first published in 1847 by Paul Lacroix)
Lettres polonaises (unpublished manuscript first printed in English in 1905; recently translated into French but authenticity disputed)


See also

Marat
Marat (name)


References 
 

 
The 1911 Encyclopædia Britannica, in turn, gives the following references:


A. Vermorel, Jean Paul Marat (1880)
Chèvremont, François, Marat: esprit politique, accomp. de sa vie (2 vols., 1880)
Cabanès, Auguste, Marat inconnu (1891)
Bougeart, A., Marat, l'ami du peuple (2 vols., 1865)
Tourneux, Jean Maurice, Bibliographie de l'histoire de Paris pendant la Révolution française (vol. ii., 1894; vol. iv., 1906)
Belfort Bax, Ernest, J. P. Marat (1900)



The   has been edited with notes by C. Vellay (2006)
Conner, Clifford D., Jean Paul Marat: Scientist and Revolutionary (1997, Humanity Books)
Bax, Ernest, Jean-Paul Marat: The People's Friend (Prism Key Press)
Edited by Pôle Nord – Brussels:

1989–1995 : Jean-Paul Marat, Œuvres Politiques (ten volumes 1789–1793 – Text: 6.600 p. – Guide: 2.200 p.)
2001:Marat en famille – La saga des Mara(t) (2 volumes) – New approach of Marat's family.
2006: Plume de Marat – Plumes sur Marat (2 volumes) : Bibliography (3.000 references of books and articles of and on Marat)


External links 
 

 
  
  
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	David Horowitz
 
 
David Joel Horowitz (born January 10, 1939) is an American conservative  writer and policy advocate. He is a founder and current president of the David Horowitz Freedom Center and edits FrontPage Magazine. Horowitz also founded the organization Students for Academic Freedom, whose self-stated goal is combating "leftist indoctrination" in academia.Horowitz was raised by parents who were members of the Communist Party USA. Between 1956 and 1975, Horowitz was an outspoken adherent of the New Left before rejecting Leftism completely. Horowitz has recounted his ideological journey in a series of retrospectives, culminating with his 1996 memoir Radical Son: A Generational Odyssey.
FamilyHorowitz was born to a Secular Jewish family in Forest Hills, New York City. His parents, Phil and Blanche Horowitz, were high school teachers. Phil taught English and Blanche taught stenography.    Horowitz majored in English and received a BA from Columbia University in 1959 and a master's degree in English literature at University of California, Berkeley.Phil and Blanche Horowitz were long-standing members of the American Communist Party and avid supporters of Joseph Stalin.      According to Horowitz,  "Underneath the ordinary surfaces of their lives, my parents and their friends thought of themselves as secret agents. The mission they had undertaken, and about which they could not speak freely except with each other, was not just an idea to them. It was more important to their sense of themselves than anything else they did. Nor were its tasks of a kind they could attend or ignore, depending on their moods. They were more like the obligations of a religious faith. Except that their faith was secular, and the millennium they awaited was being instituted, at that moment, in the very country that had become America's enemy. It was this fact that made their ordinary lives precarious and their secrecy necessary. If they lived under a cloud of suspicion, it was the result of more than just their political passions. The dropping of the atomic bomb on Hiroshima had created a terror in the minds of ordinary people. Newspapers reported on American spy rings working to steal atomic secrets for the Soviet state. When people read these stories, they inevitably thought of progressives like us. And so did we ourselves. Even if we never encountered a Soviet agent or engaged in a single illegal act, each of us knew that our commitment to socialism implied the obligation to commit treason, too."  After the death of Stalin in 1953, Phil Horowitz, commenting on how the numerous official titles held by Stalin had to be divided among his successors, told his son, "You see what a genius Stalin was. It took five men to replace him." 
Career in the New LeftThe Horowitz family broke with the American Communist Party after the publication of Nikita Khrushchev's Secret Speech in 1956. According to Horowitz,  "The publication of the Khrushchev Report was probably the greatest blow struck against the Soviet Empire during the Cold War. When my parents and their friends opened the morning Times and read its text, their world collapsed -- and along with it their will to struggle. If the document was true, almost everything they had said and believed was false. Their secret mission had led them into waters so deep that its tide had overwhelmed them, taking with it the very meaning of their lives."  In the early 1960s, Horowitz lived in London as an employee of the Bertrand Russell Peace Foundation.  He regarded himself as a serious Marxist intellectual. In 1966, Ralph Schoenman persuaded Bertrand Russell to convene a war crimes tribunal to judge American involvement in the Vietnam War.  Horowitz developed serious reservations about the process when the tribunal's judges, who included Isaac Deutscher, Jean-Paul Sartre, Stokely Carmichael, Simone de Beauvoir, James Baldwin, and Vladimir Dedijer, degenerated into a feuding rabble.  See Russell Tribunal.While in London, Horowitz was a close friend of Deutscher, of whom he published a biography in 1971.     He also wrote The Free World Colossus: A Critique of American Foreign Policy in the Cold War. In January 1968, Horowitz returned to the United States and became editor of the New Left magazine, Ramparts.During the early 1970s, Horowitz developed a close friendship with Black Panther Party founder Huey P. Newton. In Horowitz's subsequent writings, Newton is depicted as equal parts gangster, terrorist, intellectual, and media celebrity.As part of their work together, Horowitz helped raised money for Newton and assisted with the running of a school for the children of Party members. He further recommended that Newton hire a bookkeeper, Betty Van Patter, who was then working for Ramparts. In December 1974, Van Patter's murdered body was found floating in San Francisco Harbor.  Horowitz, who was certain that the Panthers were responsible, had his suspicions confirmed by several Party members. He has cited that experience as the catalyst which led him to reject Marxism completely.
Activism on the RightFor nearly a decade, Horowitz's rejection of Marx remained a private matter. In the spring of 1985, however, Horowitz and longtime collaborator Peter Collier wrote an article for the Washington Post entitled, Goodbye to All That. The article explained their change of views and recent decision to vote for President Ronald Reagan. In 1987, Horowitz co-hosted a "Second Thoughts Conference" in Washington, D.C., described by Sidney Blumenthal in The Washington Post as his "coming out" as a social conservative. According to attendee Alexander Cockburn, Horowitz related how his Stalinist parents had not permitted him or his sister to watch Doris Day and Rock Hudson movies. Instead, they were required to watch propaganda films from the Soviet Union. In May 1989, Horowitz, Ronald Radosh, and Peter Collier travelled to Poland for a conference in Kraków calling for the end of Communism.  After marching with Polish dissidents in an anti-regime protest, Horowitz declared,  "For myself, my family tradition of socialist dreams is over. Socialism is no longer a dream of a revolutionary future. It is only a nightmare of the past. But for you, the nightmare is not a dream. It is a reality that is still happening. My dream for the people of socialist Poland  is that someday you will wake up from your nightmare and be free."  In 1992, Horowitz and Collier founded Heterodoxy magazine. The magazine focused on exposing excessive political correctness on American college and university campuses. About the decision, Horowitz has stated,  "As an undergraduate at Columbia in the McCarthy Fifties, I had written papers from a Marxist point of view, but had never been graded politically by my anti-communist professors. Nor had I ever felt that the lectures I attended were veiled indoctrinations. As a student, I was invariably presented with both sides of an argument. When I visited university campuses now, however, the contrast was striking. Courses were often baldly ideological. Many left-wing professors gave one-sided presentations of subjects, expecting their views to be parroted on papers and exams. Students were graded poltically, and frequently intimidated from expressing their own perspectives. The atmosphere of political terror  was far greater than anything which I had experienced, as a Marxist, in the McCarthy era. Although there was no statistical evidence to prove it, I would estimate that more academic careers had been aborted for political reasons during those post-Sixties decades than during the entire Communist 'witch hunt' of the McCarthy period. The reason for the lack of statistics was the same as for the effectiveness of the purge. Unlike the McCarthyites, whose base was government, the left-wing witch-hunters were inside the academy, were they could operate in secrecy and to far greater effect."  Horowitz has also opposed reparations for slavery as something inherently racist against blacks. He argues that applying labels like "descendents of slaves" to blacks would damage their self-esteem and segregate them from mainstream society.    Horowitz purchased, or attempted to purchase, advertising space in school publications in order to publicize his opinion that African Americans are not entitled to reparations for Slavery in the United States. Many of these offers were refused and, at some schools, papers which carried the ads were stolen or destroyed.   While he supported the interventionist foreign policy associated with the Bush Doctrine, Horowitz opposed American intervention in the Kosovo War, arguing that it was unnecessary and harmful to U.S. interests.   He has recently been critical of libertarian anti-war views.  In 2004, Horowitz launched Discover the Networks, a conservative watchdog project that monitors funding for, and various ties among, leftists and progressive causes. In his 2004 book, Unholy Alliance: Radical Islam and the American Left, Horowitz contends that leftists support, intentionally or not, Islamist terrorism, and thus require ongoing scrutiny.In two books, Horowitz accused Dana L. Cloud, associate professor of communication studies at the University of Texas at Austin, as an “anti-American radical” who “routinely repeats the propaganda of the Saddam regime” and, along with all of the 99 other professors in his book, The Professors: The 101 Most Dangerous Academics in America, Horowitz accuses her of the “explicit introduction of political agendas into the classroom.” (pp. 93, 377)He felt his claim was substantiated when Cloud stated after 9/11 that: "the United States military has, in recent years, been the most effective and constant killer of civilians around the world."Cloud replied in Inside Higher Ed that her experience demonstrates that Horowitz does real damage to professors' lives—and that he needs to be viewed as such, not just as a political opponent.
 Horowitz's attacks have been significant. People who read the book or his Web site regularly send letters to university officials asking for her to be fired. Personally, she has received—mostly via e-mail—"physical threats, threats of removing my daughter from my custody, threats of sexual assaults, horrible disgusting gendered things," she said. That Horowitz doesn't send these isn't the point, she said. "He builds a climate and culture that emboldens people," and as a result, shouldn't be seen as a defender of academic freedom, but as its enemy.
 "Communicating About David Horowitz" in Insider Higher Ed February 19, 2008   After discussion, the National Communication Association chose not to grant Horowitz a spot as a panelist at its national conference in 2008, even after he agreed to forego the $7,000 speaking fee he had requested.Horowitz replied, "The fact that no academic group has had the balls to invite me says a lot about the ability of academic associations to discuss important issues if a political minority wants to censor them."  An association official said the decision was based in part on Horowitz's request to be provided with a stipend for $500 to hire a personal bodyguard. Association officials decided that having a bodyguard present "communicates the expectation of confrontation and violence."  While Horowitz was on the Riz Khan television show with Hussein Ibish, he was reported by Ibish to have published on his Frontpage Mag website: Arabs do nothing on impulse, Muslims have no allegiance to their countries, [and] their only allegiance is to Islam, that’s what they have been taught since birth that’s all they know, Muslims have no borders”  al-Jazeera news: Riz Khan show, transcript for 8/21/08 In the same television program, Horowitz claimed that the Prophet Muhammad called for the “extermination of Jews,”.  
Horowitz also states that he supports the “creation of a Palestinian State in Jordan” in opposition to the prevailing “two state” model  Horowitz appeared in Occupy Unmasked, a documentary film that contends that the Occupy Wall Street movement is a sinister, violent, and organized with the purpose of destroying the American government.   

Academic Bill of Rights 
The issue of alleged political abuse by universities is currently Horowitz's main focus. He, Eli Lehrer, and Andrew Jones published a pamphlet, "Political Bias in the Administrations and Faculties of 32 Elite Colleges and Universities" (2004), in which they find the ratio of Democrats to Republicans at 32 schools to be more than 10 to 1.   Horowitz's book, The Professors: The 101 Most Dangerous Academics in America (2006), criticizes individual professors for their professorial conduct. Horowitz accuses these professors of engaging in indoctrination rather than a disinterested pursuit of knowledge. Horowitz states that his campaign for academic freedom is ideologically neutral. Horowitz and others promote his Academic Bill of Rights (ABR), an eight-point guide that seeks to eliminate political bias in university hiring and grading. Horowitz says that bias in universities amounts to indoctrination, and charges that conservatives and particularly Republicans are systematically excluded from faculties, citing statistical studies on faculty party affiliation.  Critics of the proposed policy, such as Stanley Fish, have argued that "academic diversity", as Horowitz describes it, is not a legitimate academic value, and that no endorsement of "diversity" can be absolute. In 2004 a version of the ABR was adopted by the Georgia General Assembly on a 41–5 vote.  In Pennsylvania, the House of Representatives created a special legislative committee to investigate the state of academic freedom and whether students who hold unpopular views need more protection. In November 2006 it reported that it couldn’t find evidence of problems with students’ rights.      
Personal lifeHorowitz has been married four times. He married his first wife, Elissa Krauthamer, in a Yonkers, New York synagogue on June 14, 1959.  Elissa is the mother of their four children, Jonathan Daniel, Benjamin Horowitz, Anne Pilat, and Sarah Rose Horowitz, who died in March 2008 at age 44 from Turner syndrome-related heart complications.       She is the subject of Horowitz's 2009 book, A Cracking of the Heart. Horowitz's daughter, Sarah, was a human rights activist who cooked for the homeless, stood vigil at San Quentin on nights when the state of California executed prisoners, worked with autistic children in public schools, and with the American Jewish World Service, helped rebuild homes in El Salvador after a hurricane and traveled to India to oppose child labor.  In a review of Horowitz's paean  to Sarah, in which Horowitz explores their estrangement and reconciliation, FrontPage magazine associate editor David Swindle wrote that she fused "the painful lessons of her father's life with a mystical Judaism to complete the task he never could: showing how the Left could save itself from self-destruction." After ending his first marriage, Horowitz married Sam Moorman, whom he also later divorced. On June 24, 1990, Horowitz married Shay Marlowe in an Orthodox Jewish ceremony conducted at the Pacific Jewish Center by Rabbi Daniel Lapin.  After the marriage with Marlowe also ended in divorce, Horowitz married April Mullvain Horowitz, his present wife.       They live in Los Angeles County.
Controversy and criticism
AcademiaSome stories Horowitz has used as evidence that U.S. colleges and universities are bastions of liberal indoctrination have been disputed.  For example, Horowitz alleged that a University of Northern Colorado student received a failing grade on a final exam for refusing to write an essay arguing that George W. Bush is a war criminal.   A spokeswoman for the university said that the test question was not as described by Horowitz and that there were nonpolitical reasons for the grade, which was not an F. Tattered Poster Child :: Inside Higher Ed :: Higher Education's Source for News, and Views and Jobs   Horowitz identified the professor in this story Tattered Poster Child in Inside Higher Ed March 15, 2005  as Robert Dunkley, an assistant professor of criminal justice at Northern Colorado. Dunkley said Horowitz made him an example of "liberal bias" in academia and yet, "Dunkley said that he comes from a Republican family, is a registered Republican and considers himself politically independent, taking pride in never having voted a straight party ticket," Inside Higher Ed reported. In another instance, Horowitz stated that a Pennsylvania State University biology professor showed his students the film Fahrenheit 9/11 just before the 2004 election in an attempt to influence their votes.   Pressed by Inside Higher Ed, Horowitz reversed himself and retracted the story. Horowitz has also come under fire for material in his books, particularly The Professors: The 101 Most Dangerous Academics in America, as New York University Professor Todd Gitlin has written.  The group Free Exchange on Campus issued a 50-page report in May 2006 in which they take issue with many of Horowitz's assertions in the book and describe what they see as factual errors, unsubstantiated assertions, and quotations which appear to be either misquoted or taken out of context.   
Allegations of racismChip Berlet, writing for the Southern Poverty Law Center (SPLC), identified Horowitz's Center for the Study of Popular Culture as one of 17 "right-wing foundations and think tanks support[ing] efforts to make bigoted and discredited ideas respectable." Berlet accused Horowitz of blaming slavery on "black Africans … abetted by dark-skinned Arabs" and of "attack[ing] minority 'demands for special treatment' as 'only necessary because some blacks can't seem to locate the ladder of opportunity within reach of others,' rejecting the idea that they could be the victims of lingering racism."  Responding with an open letter to Morris Dees, president of the SPLC, Horowitz opens with the claim that Berlet's report was "so tendentious, so filled with transparent misrepresentations and smears that if "[he continues] to post the report [he] will create for [the] Southern Poverty Law Center a well-earned reputation as a hate group itself." He claims the intention of "[this reminder] that the slaves transported to America were bought from African and Arab slavers" was a response to demands that only whites pay blacks reparations, and he never held Africans and Arabs solely responsible for slavery. He concludes that the accusation of racism was a deliberate and calculated lie and requests that the report be removed.  The SPLC refused Horowitz's request,  and subsequent critical pieces on Berlet and the SPLC have been featured on Horowitz's website and personal blog.  Tim Wise, a lecturer and a liberal activist, has accused Horowitz of associating with racist organizations. According to Wise, Horowitz has received $4 million from the Bradley Foundation. This foundation has also financed The Bell Curve, a controversial book about the Heritability of IQ which proposed a correlation between ethnicity and intelligence. In 2008, while speaking at UCSB, Horowitz stated that the keffiyah, the traditional Arab head covering made famous by PLO leader Yasser Arafat, is a symbol of terrorism. In response, UCSB professor Walid Afifi accused Horowitz of "preaching hate" and smearing Arab culture.   
Muslims and universitiesOn April, 2008, the 'David Horowitz Freedom Center' ran an advertisement in the Daily Nexus, the University of California Santa Barbara school newspaper, alleging the Muslim Students' Association (MSA) of having links to the Muslim Brotherhood, Al Qaeda and Hamas. Speaker Addresses Jihad, Role of U.S. in the Middle East  In May 2008, Horowitz, speaking at UCSB, accused the Muslim Students' Association of supporting "a second Holocaust of the Jews".  The MSA responded by saying they were a peaceful organization and not a political group.  The MSA's faculty advisor said the group had "been involved in interfaith activities with Jewish student groups, and they’ve been involved in charity work for national disaster relief." Around the same time Horowitz also ran the ad in The GW Hatchet, claiming the MSA was a radical group. Jake Sherman, the newspaper's editor in chief, said claims the MSA was radical were "ludicrous", and promised to review his newspapers' editorial policies. In the Columbia Spectator newspaper, Horowitz said that, according to public opinion polls, "between 150 million and 750 million Muslims support a holy war against Christians, Jews and other Muslims." At the University of Massachusetts Amherst Horowitz made numerous comparisons of Islamists to Nazis: "Islamists are worse than the Nazis, because even the Nazis did not tell the world that they want to exterminate the Jews." Horowitz also said "there are good Muslims and bad Muslims just like there were good Germans and bad Germans" and "The Palestinians are Nazis. Every one of them and their elected officials are terrorists." During a speech at the University of California at Santa Barbara, Horowitz accused students wearing green in support of the school's Muslim Student Association of supporting Hamas, and students wearing Arab Keffiyehs of honoring Yassir Arafat and terrorism.  Horowitz has also directed campaigns such as "Islamofascism Awareness Week", which brought leading critics of radical Islam to more than a hundred college campuses in October 2007. On an Al-Jazeera broadcast, Horowitz states "The Muslim Students Association pretends to be a religious organization while it is really an arm of the Muslim Brotherhood…Hamas and Hezbollah." He then stated that "he has had many encounters with this [MSAs and the Muslim Brotherhood] and that is how my views are correct...they need to convert to Judaism or Christianity and then condemn Hamas and Hezbollah as a terrorist organization for me to leave them alone..." 
Books and other publications

Student: The Political Activities of the Berkeley Students (New York: Ballantine Books, 1962)
Corporations and the Cold War (editor) (New York: Monthly Review, 1969)
Sinews of Empire Ramparts, October 1969, pp. 32–42
Empire and Revolution: A Radical Interpretation of Contemporary History (1969) ISBN 0-394-70856-3
Corporations and the Cold War, edited, and with introduction (1970) ISBN 0-85345-160-5
The Free World Colossus: A Critique of American Foreign Policy in the Cold War (1971) ISBN 0-8090-0107-1
The First Frontier: The Indian Wars and America's Origins, 1607-1776 (1978) ISBN 0-671-22534-0
Second Thoughts: Former Radicals Look Back at the Sixties, ed. by Peter Collier and David Horowitz (Lanham, MD: Madison Books, 1989) ISBN 0-8191-7148-4
Destructive Generation: Second Thoughts About the '60s, by Peter Collier and David Horowitz (New York: Summit Books/Simon & Schuster, 1989) ISBN 0-671-66752-1
Radical Son: A Generational Odyssey (New York: The Free Press, 1997) autobiography ISBN 0-684-82793-X
The Race Card: White Guilt, Black Resentment, and the Assault on Truth and Justice (Prima Lifestyles, 1997) ISBN 0-7615-0942-9
Hating Whitey: and Other Progressive Causes (Spence Publishing, 1999) ISBN 1-890626-21-X
The Politics of Bad Faith: The Radical Assault on America’s Future (Free Press, 2000) ISBN 0-684-85679-4
The Art of Political War And Other Radical Pursuits (Spence Publishing, 2000) ISBN 1-890626-28-7
How to Beat the Democrats and Other Subversive Ideas (Spence Publishing, 2002) ISBN 1-890626-41-4
Uncivil Wars: The Controversy Over Reparations For Slavery (2002) ISBN 1-893554-44-9
Left Illusions: An Intellectual Odyssey (Spence Publishing, 2003) ISBN 1-890626-51-1
Unholy Alliance: Radical Islam and the American Left (Regnery Publishing, 2004) ISBN 0-89526-076-X
The Anti-Chomsky Reader with Peter Collier (Encounter Books, 2004) ISBN 1-893554-97-X
The End Of Time (2005) ISBN 1-59403-080-4
The Professors: The 101 Most Dangerous Academics in America (Regnery Publishing, 2006) ISBN 0-89526-003-4
Shadow Party: How George Soros, Hillary Clinton, and Sixties Radicals Seized Control of the Democratic Party (Thomas Nelson Books, 2007) ISBN 1-59555-103-4
Indoctrination U:The Left's War Against Academic Freedom (Encounter Books, 2007) ISBN 1-59403-190-8
 


Histories(co-authored with Peter Collier)

The Rockefellers: An American Dynasty (New York: Holt, Rinehart and Winston, 1976) ISBN 0-03-008371-0
The Kennedys: An American Drama (New York: Summit Books/Simon & Schuster, 1985) ISBN 0-671-44793-9
The Fords: An American Epic (New York: Summit Books/Simon & Schuster, 1987) ISBN 0-671-66951-6
The Roosevelts: An American Saga (1994)


Notes 
Alternative academic views

Ellis, M. H. (1997) Unholy alliance: religion and atrocity in our time Minneapolis: Augsburg Fortress Publishers. ISBN 0-8006-3080-7.
Henry Giroux (2006) America on the Edge New York: Palgrave Macmillan. ISBN 1-4039-7159-5.


External links 
 

FrontPageMag.com
David Horowitz's NewsReal Blog
Horowitz Freedom Center
Bibliography Of Published Works
Students for Academic Freedom – promotional website for Horowitz's "Academic Bill of Rights"
David Horowitz TV - contains numerous video podcasts of Horowitz appearances and sponsored events.
Booknotes interview with Horowitz on Radical Son: A Generational Odyssey, April 13, 1997.
In Depth interview with Horowitz, October 7, 2007

 
DEFAULTSORT

















 
 
 
 
	Theodoros Angelopoulos
 
Theodoros "Theo" Angelopoulos ( ) (27 April 1935 – 24 January 2012), was a Greek filmmaker, screenwriter and film producer.This acclaimed and multi-awarded film director, who has dominated the Greek art ﬁlm industry since 1975,  and is considered one of the most influential and widely respected filmmakers in the world,    started making films in 1967.  In the 1970s he made a series of political films about modern Greece.Angelopoulos, defined by Martin Scorsese as "a masterful filmmaker", has developed a unique cinematic vision, characterized by slightest movement, slightest change in distance, long takes, and complicated but carefully composed scenes, offering a hypnotic, sweeping, and profoundly emotional cinema.  In 1998 his film, Eternity and a Day, went on to win the prestigious Palme d'Or at the 51st edition of the Cannes Film Festival, and his films have been shown at the most important film festivals around the world. 
Biography 
Theodoros Angelopoulos was born in Athens on 17 April 1935.  During the Greek Civil War, his father was taken hostage and returned when Angelopoulos was 9 years old; according to the director, the absence of his father and looking for him among the dead bodies had a great impact on his cinematography.   He studied law at the National and Kapodistrian University of Athens, but after his military service went to Paris to attend the Sorbonne.  He soon dropped out to study film at the Institut des hautes études cinématographiques (IDHEC) before returning to Greece.  There, he worked as a journalist and film critic.  Angelopoulos began making films after the 1967 coup that began the Greek military dictatorship known as the Regime of the Colonels.  He made his first short film in 1968 and in the 1970s he began making a series of political feature films about modern Greece: Days of '36 (Meres Tou 36, 1972), The Travelling Players (O Thiassos, 1975) and The Hunters (I Kynighoi, 1977).  In 1978, he was a member of the jury at the 28th Berlin International Film Festival.    
He quickly established a characteristic style, marked by slow, episodic and ambiguous narrative structures as well as long takes (The Travelling Players, for example, consists of only 80 shots in about four hours of film).  These takes often include meticulously choreographed and complicated scenes involving many actors.  His regular collaborators include the cinematographer Giorgos Arvanitis, the screenwriter Tonino Guerra and the composer Eleni Karaindrou.  One of the recurring themes of his work is immigration, the flight from homeland and the return, as well as the history of 20th century Greece.  Angelopoulos was considered by British film critics Derek Malcolm  and David Thomson  as one of the world's greatest directors.Angelopoulos was awarded honorary doctorates by the Université libre de Bruxelles, Belgium in 1995, by Paris West University Nanterre La Défense, France, by the University of Essex, UK in July 2001,    by the University of Western Macedonia, Greece in December 2008,    and by the University of the Aegean, Greece in December 2009.   
DeathAngelopoulos died late on Tuesday, 24 January 2012, several hours after being involved in an accident while shooting his latest film, the final part of a trilogy, (The other sea) in Athens.  The filmmaker had been with his crew in the area of Drapetsona, near Piraeus when he was hit by a motorcycle driven by an off-duty police officer, on Tuesday evening.  The accident occurred when Angelopoulos, 76, attempted to cross a busy road without wearing a special reflective uniform. He was taken to the hospital, where he was treated in an intensive care unit but succumbed to his serious injuries several hours later. Before expiring, Angelopoulos suffered at least one heart attack.      
AwardsAngelopoulos won numerous awards, including the Palme d'Or at the 51st edition of the Cannes Film Festival in 1998 for Eternity and a Day (Mia aioniotita kai mia mera).  His films have been shown at the most important film festivals around the world.   

Year Issuer Award Film Result 
    Hellenic Association of Film Critics – Best Short Fiction         
    Best Greek Art Film Reconstruction       
    Best Greek New Director Reconstruction     
    Hellenic Association of Film Critics – Best Film Reconstruction     
    FIPRESCI – Special Mention Reconstruction      
    Best Film of the Year Shown in France Reconstruction   
    Best Foreign Film Reconstruction   
    Best Greek Director Days of '36       
    FIPRESCI – Forum of New Cinema Days of '36      
    FIPRESCI (Parallel Sections)            
    Interfilm Award – Forum of New Cinema          
    Best Greek Film           
    Best Greek Director        
    Best Greek Screenplay        
    Sutherland Trophy          
    Palme d'Or           
    Golden Hugo for Best Film     
    Best Foreign Language Film Director          
    Best Foreign Language Film          
    FIPRESCI Alexander the Great      
    Best Greek Film Alexander the Great      
    Hellenic Association of Film Critics – Best Film Alexander the Great    
    Palme d'Or Voyage to Cythera          
    Best Screenplay Voyage to Cythera      
  FIPRESCI International Critic's Prize Voyage to Cythera     
    Critics' Award Voyage to Cythera   
    Golden Lion        
    Silver Lion Landscape in the Mist       
    Interfilm Award – Forum of New Cinema Landscape in the Mist      
    European Film Award for Best Film Landscape in the Mist         
    Palme d'Or The Suspended Step of the Stork      
    Golden Hugo for Best Director Landscape in the Mist    
    Palme d'Or Ulysses' Gaze         
    Grand Jury Prize Ulysses' Gaze     
    International Critics' Prize Ulysses' Gaze     
    FIPRESCI – FELIX of the Critics Ulysses' Gaze         
    Prix Léon Moussinac – Best Foreign Film Ulysses' Gaze      
    Best Foreign Film Director Ulysses' Gaze      
    Best European Film Ulysses' Gaze      
    Best Foreign Language Film Ulysses' Gaze      
    Best Foreign Film Ulysses' Gaze      
    Best Foreign Film Ulysses' Gaze      
    Palme d'Or Eternity and a Day         
    Prize of the Ecumenical Jury Eternity and a Day     
    Audience Award – Best Feature Ulysses' Gaze      
    Best Greek Film        
    Best Greek Director      
    Best Greek Screenplay      
    Silver Condor for Best Foreign Film Ulysses' Gaze      
    Silver Condor for Best Foreign Film Eternity and a Day      
    Golden Bear        
    European Film Award for Best Film            
    Audience Award        
    FIPRESCI – European Film Academy Critics         
    Special Jury Prize – Spiritual Competition        

Lifetime achievement awardsTheodoros Angelopoulos was also the recipient of many awards for his long standing career. 

Year Provider Award 
  Université libre de Bruxelles Honorary Doctorate 
    European Silver Ribbon  
  University of Essex Honorary Graduate  
    Honorary Award     
    Honorary Award    
    Grand Prix Special des Amériques    
    Hand Printing    
  University of Western Macedonia Honorary Graduate  
    Lifetime Achievement Award    
  University of the Aegean Honorary Graduate  
  Paris West University Nanterre La Défense Honorary Doctorate 

Filmography
Feature films

Year Title Original title Contribution Notes 
1970 Reconstruction (Anaparastasi) Director 
1972 Days of '36 (Meres tou '36) Director Part 1 of the "Trilogy of History" 
1975   (O Thiassos) Director/writer Part 2 of the "Trilogy of History" 
1977   (I Kinighi) Director/co-writer Part 3 of the "Trilogy of History" 
1980 Alexander the Great (O Megalexandros) Director 
1984 Voyage to Cythera (Taxidi sta Kythira) Director/co-writer Part 1 of the "Trilogy of Silence" 
1986   (O Melissokomos) Director/co-writer Part 2 of the "Trilogy of Silence" 
1988 Landscape in the Mist (Topio stin Omichli) Director/co-writer European Film Award for Best Film 1989 Part 3 of the "Trilogy of Silence" 
1991   (To Meteoro Vima tou Pelargou) Director/writer Part 1 of the "Trilogy of Borders" 
1995 Ulysses' Gaze (To Vlemma tou Odyssea) Director/co-writer Part 2 of the "Trilogy of Borders" 
1998 Eternity and a Day (Mia aioniothta kai mia mera) Director/co-writer Palme d'Or 1998 Part 3 of the "Trilogy of Borders" 
2004   (Trilogia I: To Livadi pou dakryzi) Director Part 1 of the trilogy on modern Greece 
2009   (I skoni tou chronou) Director Part 2 of the trilogy on modern Greece 
2012?   (L'altro mare) Director/writer Part 3 of the trilogy on modern Greece 

Other films

Year Title Original title Contribution Notes 
1968 Broadcast (I Ekpombi) Director/writer Short film 
1983 Athens (Athina, epistrofi stin Akropoli) Director/writer Television film 
1995 Lumière and Company (Lumière et compagnie) Co-director/co-writer   
2007 To Each His Own Cinema (Chacun son cinéma) Co-director/co-writer   

Notes 
References 
Bibliography and sources

Books
  

 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Journals, magazines, and web
  

 
 
 
External links 
 

 
 
 
   
DEFAULTSORT









 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Lewis Milestone
 
Lewis Milestone (born Leib Milstein)  (September 30, 1895 – September 25, 1980) was a Russian-born American motion picture director. He is known for directing Two Arabian Knights (1927) and All Quiet on the Western Front (1930), both of which received Academy Awards for Best Director. He also directed The Front Page (1931 - nomination), The General Died at Dawn (1936), Of Mice and Men (1940), Ocean's 11 (1960), and Mutiny on the Bounty (1962).
BiographyMilestone was born in Kishinev, Bessarabia, Imperial Russia (now Chişinău), Moldova to a family of Jewish heritage.  He came to the United States in 1912 just prior to World War I.   Milestone held a number of odd jobs before enlisting in the U.S. Signal Corps, where he worked as an assistant director on Army training films during the war. In 1919 he became a naturalized citizen of the United States. After the war he went to Hollywood, where he first worked as a film cutter, and later as an assistant director.  Howard Hughes promoted Milestone to director, and one of his early efforts, the 1928 film Two Arabian Knights, won him an Oscar in the first Academy Award ceremony. He also directed The Racket, an early gangster film, and later helped Hughes direct scenes for his aviation saga Hell's Angels (for which he never received credit).Milestone won his second Academy Award for All Quiet on the Western Front, a harrowing screen adaptation of the antiwar novel by Erich Maria Remarque.  His next, The Front Page, brought the Ben Hecht/Charles MacArthur play to the screen.  It earned him another Oscar nomination. His work during the 1930s and 1940s was always easily identifiable by its lighting and imaginative use of fluid camera. During this time, he made the original Of Mice and Men. Then in the war years  Milestone made The North Star, The Purple Heart, and A Walk In The Sun, movies made during and set in World War II. In these films, he defended the world's fighting both Nazi Germany and Imperial Japan. After the war, he was blacklisted under the suspicion that he was a Red sympathizer. Deciding to wait for the Communist witch hunts to end, he and his wife left for Europe: here he did a few films. In the U.S., he made other films before leaving for Europe, but his postwar films did not have the same power as the early works. He worked extensively in television from the mid 1950s on.He returned to the U.S. to do two more films: Ocean's 11 starring the Rat Pack including Frank Sinatra and Dean Martin, and Mutiny On The Bounty starring Marlon Brando. The original 'Ocean's 11' worked, but 'Bounty' became a box office bomb. With no other work to do, he turned to TV work which he disliked, then left directing as he became very sick. Milestone died from natural complications on September 25, 1980, short of his 85th birthday.Lewis Milestone's final request before he died in 1980 was for Universal Studios to restore All Quiet on the Western Front to its original length.  That request would eventually be granted nearly two decades later by Universal and other film preservation companies, and this restored version is what is widely seen today on television and home video.  Milestone is interred in the Westwood Village Memorial Park Cemetery in Los Angeles.
Academy Awards

Year Award Film Result 
1927–28 Best Director (Comedy) Two Arabian Knights   
1929–30 Best Director All Quiet on the Western Front   
1930–31 Best Director The Front Page   
1939 Outstanding Production Of Mice and Men   

Filmography as a director 

1918 – The Toothbrush
1918 – Posture
1918 – Positive
1919 – Fit to Win
1923 - Where the North Begins (*editor)
1925 – Seven Sinners
1926 – The Caveman
1926 – The New Klondike
1926 – Fine Manners (uncredited)
1927 – The Kid Brother (uncredited)
1927 – Two Arabian Knights
1928 – The Garden of Eden
1928 – Tempest (uncredited)
1928 – The Racket
1929 – New York Nights
1929 – Betrayal
1930 – All Quiet on the Western Front
1931 – The Front Page
1932 – Rain
1933 – Hallelujah, I'm a Bum
1934 – The Captain Hates the Sea
1935 – Paris in Spring
1936 – Anything Goes
1936 – The General Died at Dawn
1939 – Of Mice and Men
1939 – The Night of Nights
1940 – Lucky Partners
1941 – My Life with Caroline
1943 – Edge of Darkness
1943 – The North Star
1944 – Guest in the House
1944 – The Purple Heart
1945 – A Walk in the Sun
1946 – The Strange Love of Martha Ivers
1948 – Arch of Triumph
1948 – No Minor Vices
1949 – The Red Pony
1951 – Halls of Montezuma
1952 – Les Misérables
1952 – Kangaroo
1953 – Melba
1954 – They Who Dare
1955 – La Vedova X
1957 - "Alfred Hitchcock Presents (television series)
1957 - "Schlitz Playhouse (television series)
1957 - "Suspicion (television series)
1958 – "Have Gun – Will Travel" (television series)
1959 – Pork Chop Hill
1960 – Ocean's 11
1962 – Mutiny on the Bounty
1963 - "The Richard Boone Show" (television series)
1963 – "Arrest and Trial" (television series)
 
Filmography as a writer

1922 - Up and at 'Em
1924 - The Yankee Consul
1924 - Listen Lester
1925 - The Mad Whirl
1925 - Dangerous Innocence
1925 - The Teaser
1925 - Bobbed Hair
Also as writer/director:
1925 - Seven Sinners
1928 - Tempest
1930 - All Quiet on the Western Front
1940 - Lucky Partners
1948 - Arch of Triumph
1955 - La Vedova X


References 
External links 

 
 
Lewis Milestone at Virtual History

 
  
DEFAULTSORT















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Ben Hecht
 Ben Hecht (   ; 1894–1964)  was an American screenwriter, director, producer, playwright, and novelist. Called "the Shakespeare of Hollywood", he received screen credits, alone or in collaboration, for the stories or screenplays of some seventy films and as a prolific storyteller, authored thirty-five books and created some of the most entertaining screenplays and plays in America. Film historian Richard Corliss called him "the" Hollywood screenwriter, someone who "personified Hollywood itself." The Dictionary of Literary Biography - American Screenwriters calls him "one of the most successful screenwriters in the history of motion pictures."  He was the first screenwriter to receive an Academy Award for Original Screenplay, for the movie Underworld (1927). The number of screenplays he wrote or worked on that are now considered classics is, according to Chicago's Newberry Library, "astounding," and included films such as, Scarface (1932), The Front Page, Twentieth Century (1934), Barbary Coast (1935), Nothing Sacred (1937), Some Like It Hot, Gone with the Wind, Gunga Din, Wuthering Heights, (all 1939), His Girl Friday (1940), Spellbound (1945), Notorious (1946), Monkey Business, A Farewell to Arms (1957), Mutiny on the Bounty (1962), and Casino Royale (released posthumously, in 1967). He also provided story ideas for such films as Stagecoach (1939). In 1940, he wrote, produced, and directed, Angels Over Broadway, which was nominated for Best Screenplay. In total, six of his movie screenplays were nominated for Academy Awards, with two winning. He became an active Zionist shortly before the Holocaust began in Germany, and as a result wrote articles and plays about the plight of European Jews, such as, We Will Never Die in 1943 and A Flag is Born in 1946. Medoff, Rafael. "Ben Hecht's "A Flag is Born", David S. Wyman Institute, April 2004  Of his seventy to ninety screenplays, he wrote many anonymously to avoid the British boycott of his work in the late 1940s and early 1950s. The boycott was a response to Hecht's active support of paramilitary action against British forces in Palestine and sabotaging British property there (see below), during which time a supply ship to Palestine was named the S. S. Ben Hecht.He could produce a screenplay in two weeks and, according to his autobiography, never spent more than eight weeks on a script. Yet he was still able to produce mostly rich, well-plotted, and witty screenplays. His scripts included virtually every movie genre: adventures, musicals, and impassioned romances, but ultimately, he was best known for two specific types of film: crime thrillers and screwball comedies. Despite his success, however, he disliked the effect that movies were having on the theater, American cultural standards, and on his own creativity.
Early yearsHecht was born in New York City, the son of Russian–Jewish immigrants. Hecht’s father, Joseph Hecht, was a garment worker whose specialty was cutting cloth to patterns. He and his future wife, Sarah Swernofski, had immigrated to the Lower East Side from Minsk, Belarus, then part of the Russian Empire. The family language was Yiddish. The Hechts married on the Lower East Side in 1892 and Ben was born the next year. Sternlicht, Sanford V.. The Tenement Saga: The Lower East Side and Early Jewish American Writers, Terrace Books (2004)   The family moved to Racine, Wisconsin, where Ben attended high school. When Hecht was in his early teens he would spend the summers with an uncle in Chicago. On the road much of the time, his father did not have much effect on Hecht’s childhood, and his mother was busy managing the store outlet in downtown Racine. Film author Scott Siegal wrote, "He was considered a child prodigy at age ten, seemingly on his way to a career as a concert violinist, but two years later was performing as a circus acrobat.". Siegel, Scott, and Siegel, Barbara. The Encyclopedia of Hollywood, 2nd ed. (2004) Checkmark Books  After being graduated from high school in 1910, at age sixteen Hecht moved to Chicago, running away to live permanently lived there with relatives, and started a career in journalism. He found work as a reporter, first for the Chicago Journal, and later with the Chicago Daily News. Clark, Randall. Dictionary of Literary Biography - American Screenwriters (1984) Gale Research  He was an excellent reporter who worked on several Chicago papers. After World War I, Hecht was sent to cover Berlin for the Chicago Daily News.  There he wrote his first and most successful novel, Erik Dorn (1921). It was a sensational debut for Hecht as a serious writer.  The 1969 movie, Gaily, Gaily, directed by Norman Jewison and starring Beau Bridges as "Ben Harvey", was based on his life during his early years working as a reporter in Chicago. The film was nominated for three Oscars. The story was taken from a portion of his autobiography, A Child of the Century.
Writing career
Journalist
From 1918 to 1919 Hecht served as war correspondent in Berlin for the Chicago Daily News. According to Siegel, "Besides being a war reporter, he was noted for being a tough crime reporter while also becoming known in Chicago literary circles.".  In 1921, Hecht inaugurated a Daily News column called, One Thousand and One Afternoons in Chicago. While it lasted, the column was enormously influential. His editor, Henry Justin Smith, later said it represented a new concept in journalism: 

"the idea that just under the edge of the news as commonly understood, the news often flatly unimaginatively told, lay life; that in this urban life there dwelt the stuff of literature, not hidden in remote places, either, but walking the downtown streets, peering from the windows of sky scrapers, sunning itself in parks and boulevards. He was going to be its interpreter. His was to be the lens throwing city life into new colors, his the microscope revealing its contortions in life and death." Kerrane, Kevin, Yagoda, and Ben. The Art of Fact: A Historical Anthology of Literary Journalism, Simon and Schuster (1998) 

While at the Chicago Daily News, Hecht famously broke the 1921 "Ragged Stranger Murder Case" story, about the murder of Carl Wanderer's wife, which led to the trial and execution of war hero Carl Wanderer. In Chicago, he also met and befriended Maxwell Bodenheim, an American poet and novelist, known as the King of Greenwich Village Bohemians, and with whom he became a lifelong friend.After concluding One Thousand and One Afternoons, Hecht went on to produce novels, plays, screenplays, and memoirs, but none of these eclipsed his early success in finding the stuff of literature in city life. Recalling that period, Hecht wrote, "I haunted streets, whorehouses, police stations, courtrooms, theater stages, jails, saloons, slums, madhouses, fires, murders, riots, banquet halls, and bookshops. I ran everywhere in the city like a fly buzzing in the works of a clock, tasted more than any fit belly could hold, learned not to sleep, and buried myself in a tick-tock of whirling hours that still echo in me." 
PlaywrightBeginning with a series of one-acts in 1914, he began writing plays. His first full-length play was, The Egotist, and it was produced in New York in 1922. While living in Chicago, he met fellow reporter Charles MacArthur and together they moved to New York to collaborate on their play, The Front Page. It was widely acclaimed and had a successful run on Broadway of 281 performances, beginning August,1928. In 1931 it was turned into a successful film, which was nominated for three Oscars.
Novelist and short-story writer
Besides working as reporter in Chicago, "he also contributed to literary magazines including the Little Review. After World War I he was sent by the Chicago Daily News to Berlin to witness the revolutionary movements, which gave him the material for his first novel, Erik Dorn (1921). ... A daily column he wrote, 1001 Afternoons in Chicago, was later collected into a book, and brought Hecht fame." These works enhanced his reputation in the literary scene as a reporter, columnist, short story writer, and novelist. After leaving the News in 1923 he started his own newspaper, The Chicago Literary Times. 
According to biographer, author Eddy Applegate, "Hecht read voraciously the works of Gautier, Adelaide, Mallarmé, and Verlaine, and developed a style that was extraordinary and imaginative. The use of metaphor, imagery, and vivid phrases made his writing distinct... again and again Hecht showed an uncanny ability to picture the strange jumble of events in strokes as vivid and touching as the brushmarks of a novelist." "Ben Hecht was the enfant terrible of American letters in the first half of the twentieth century," wrote author Sanford Sternlicht. "If Hecht was consistently opposed to anything, it was to censorship of literature, art, and film by either the government or self-appointed guardians of public morality." He adds, "Even though he never attended college, Hecht became a successful novelist, playwright, journalist, and screenwriter. His star has sunk below the horizon now, but in his own lifetime Hecht became one of the most famous American literary and entertainment figures..."  Eventually Hecht became associated with the writers Sherwood Anderson, Theodore Dreiser, Maxwell Bodenheim, Carl Sandburg, and Pascal Covici. He knew Margaret Anderson and contributed to her Little Review, the magazine of the Chicago "literary renaissance," and to Smart Set. Applegate, Eddy. Literary Journalism: A Biographical Dictionary of Writers and Editors, Greenwood Publishing Group (1996) 

A Child of the Century
In 1954 Hecht published his autobiography, A Child of the Century, which, according to literary critic Robert Schmuhl, "received such extensive critical acclaim that his literary reputation improved markedly during the last decade of his life... Hecht's vibrant and candid memoir of more than six hundred pages restored him to the stature of a serious and significant American writer."  Novelist Saul Bellow commented about the book for the New York Times: "His manners are not always nice, but then nice manners do not always make interesting autobiographies, and this autobiography has the merit of being intensely interesting... If he is occasionally slick, he is also independent, forthright, and original. Among the pussycats who write of social issues today he roars like an old-fashioned lion." 

Ghostwriting Marilyn Monroe's biography
Besides working on novels and short stories (see book list), he has been credited with ghostwriting books, including Marilyn Monroe's autobiography My Story. "The reprint of Marilyn Monroe's memoir, My Story, in the year 2000, by Cooper Square Press, correctly credits Ben Hecht as an author, ending a period of almost fifty years in which Hecht's role was denied...Hecht himself publicly denied writing it until much later..." According to Monroe biographer, Sarah Churchwell, Monroe was "persuaded to capitalize on her newfound celebrity by beginning an autobiography. It was born out of a collaboration with journalist and screenwriter Ben Hecht, hired as a ghostwriter..." Churchwell, Sarah. “The Many Lives of Marilyn Monroe”, Macmillan (2005)    Churchwell adds that the truths in her story were highly selective. "Hecht reported to his editor during the interviews that he was sometimes sure Marilyn was fabricating. He explained, 'When I say lying, I mean she isn’t telling the truth. I don’t think so much that she is trying to deceive me as that she is a fantasizer.'"  
Screenwriter
Film historian Richard Corliss writes that "Ben Hecht was the Hollywood screenwriter...[and] it can be said without too much exaggeration that Hecht personifies Hollywood itself." Movie columnist Pauline Kael added that "between them, Hecht and Jules Furthman wrote most of the best American talkies." Corliss, Richard, Talking Pictures, (1974) Overlook Press   His movie career can be defined by about twenty credited screenplays he wrote for Hawks, Hitchcock, Hathaway, Lubitsch, Wellman, Sternberg, and himself. He wrote many of those with his two regular collaborators, Charles MacArthur and Charles Lederer.While living in New York in 1926, he received a telegram from screenwriter friend Herman J. Mankiewicz, who had recently moved to Los Angeles. "Millions are to be grabbed out here and your only competition is idiots", it read. "Don't let this get around." As a writer in need of money, he traveled to Hollywood as Mankiewicz suggested.  

Working in Hollywood
He arrived in Los Angeles and began his career at the beginning of the sound era by writing the story for Josef von Sternberg's gangster movie, Underworld, in 1927. For that first screenplay and story he won an Academy Award for Best Original Screenplay in Hollywood's first Academy award ceremony.  Soon afterward, he became the highest paid screenwriter in Hollywood..."  Hecht spent from two to twelve weeks in Hollywood each year, "during which he earned enough money (his record was $100,000 in one month, for two screenplays) to live on for the rest of the year in New York, where he did what he considered his serious writing," writes film historian Carol Easton. Easton, Carol, The Search for Sam Goldwyn, (1976) William Morrow and Company   Nonetheless, later in his career, "he was a writer who liked to think that his genius had been stifled by Hollywood and by its dreadful habit of giving him so much money."  Yet his income was as much a result of his skill as a writer as well as his early jobs with newspapers. As film historians Mast and Kawin wrote, "The newspaper reporters often seemed like gangsters who had accidentally ended up behind a typewriter rather than a tommy gun; they talked and acted as rough as the crooks their assignments forced them to cover... It is no accident that Ben Hecht, the greatest screenwriter of rapid-fire, flavorful tough talk, as well as a major comic playwright, wrote gangster pictures, prison pictures, and newspaper pictures." Mast, Gerald, and Kawin, Bruce, A Short History of the Movies, (2006) Pearson Longman Hecht became one of Hollywood's most prolific screenwriters, able to write a full screenplay in two to eight weeks. According to Samuel Goldwyn biographer, Carol Easton, in 1931, with his writing partner Charles MacArthur, he "knocked out The Unholy Garden in twelve hours. Hecht subsequently received a fan letter from producer Arthur Hornblow, Jr.: 

'After reading your magnificent script, Mr. Goldwyn and I both wish to go on record with the statement that if The Unholy Garden isn't the finest motion picture Samuel Goldwyn has ever produced, the fault will be entirely ours. You have done your part superbly." It was produced exactly as written, and "became one of the biggest, yet funniest, bombs ever made by a studio."  



Censorship, profit, and art
Despite his monetary success, however, Hecht always kept Hollywood at arms's length. According to film historian Gregory Black, "he did not consider his work for the movies serioius art; it was more a means of replenishing his bank account. When his work was finished, he retreated to New York." At least part of the reason for this was due to the industry's system of censorship. Black writes, "as Mankiewicz, Selznick, and Hecht knew all too well, much of the blame for the failure of the movies to deal more frankly and honestly with life, lay with a rigid censorship imposed on the industry . . . [and] on the content of films during its golden era of studio production." Because the costs of production and distribution were so high, the primary "goal of the studios was profit, not art. . .[and] fearful of losing any segment of their audiences, the studios  either carefully avoided controversial topics or presented them in a way that evaded larger issues," thereby creating only 'harmless entertainment' ". Black, Gregory D. Hollywood Censored: Morality Codes, Catholics, and the Movies, Cambridge University Press (1996) pg. 5 According to historian David Thomson, "to their own minds, Herman Mankiewicz and Ben Hecht both died morose and frustrated. Neither of them had written the great books they believed possible." Thomson, David, The Whole Equation - A History of Hollywood, (2005) Alfred A. Knopf  

with Howard Hawks
In an interview with director Howard Hawks, with whom Hecht worked on many films, Scott Breivold elicited comments on the way they often worked:

Breivold. Could you explain how the day-to-day writing goes on a script?
Hawks. "Well, when Hecht and MacArthur and I used to work on a script, we’d sit in a room and work for two hours and then we’d play backgammon for an hour. Then we’d start again and one of us would be one character and one would be another character. We’d read our lines of dialogue and the whole idea was to try to stump the other people, to see if they could think of something crazier than you could." Hawks; Howard, Breivold, Scott. Howard Hawks - Interviews, University Press of Mississippi (2006) 



with David O. Selznick
According to film historian Virginia Wexman, "David Selznick had a flair for the dramatic, and no one knew that better than Ben Hecht. The two collaborated on some of Hollywood’s biggest hits – movies like Gone With the Wind and Notorious and Duel in the Sun – and often enough the making of those films was as rife with conflict as the films themselves..." Wexman, Virginia Wright. “Film and Authorship”, Rutgers University Press (2003)  Nothing Sacred is probably the "most famous of all the Carole Lombard films next to My Man Godfrey," wrote movie historian James Harvey. And it impressed people at the time with its evident ambition ... "and Selznick determined to make the classiest of all screwball comedies, turned to Lombard as a necessity, but also to Ben Hecht, nearly the hottest screenwriter in Hollywood at the time, especially for comedy. ... it was also the first screwball comedy to lay apparent claim to larger satiric meanings, to make scathing observations about American life and society." Harvey, James. Romantic Comedy in Hollywood from Lubitsch to Sturges, Da Capo Press (1998)  In an interview with Irene Selznick, ex-wife of producer David O. Selznick, she discussed the other leading screenwriters of that time: 

"They all aspired to be Ben. The resourcefulness of his mind, his vitality were so enormous. His knowledge. His talent and ambition. He could tear through things, and he tore through life. They'd see this prodigious output of Ben's, and they'd think, 'Oh, hell, I'm a bum.' I think it must have been devastating. Ben did it to MacArthur, who died in time to save his reputation. And I'd hate to have been Herman [Mankiewicz], caught between Kaufman and Hecht." Meryman, Richard, Mank - the Wit, World, and Life of Herman Mankiewicz, (1978) William Morrow  



with Ernst Lubitsch
According to James Harvey, Ernst Lubitsch felt uneasy in the world of playwright Noël Coward. "If Coward could write his play for three particular actors, he reasoned to an interviewer, why couldn’t it be rewritten for three others? It was at this point … that he turned to Ben Hecht...to work with him on the screenplay for Design for Living." It was the first and only Lubitsch-Hecht collaboration. Harvey adds, "Though Lubitsch must have been reassured by Hecht’s taking the job. No writer in Hollywood had better credentials in the tough, slangy, specifically American style that Lubitsch wanted to impart to the Coward play. And together they transformed it."  
Styles of writingAccording to Siegel, "The talkie era put writers like Hecht at a premium because they could write dialogue in the quirky, idiosyncratic style of the common man. Hecht, in particular, was wonderful with slang, and he peppered his films with the argot of the streets. He also had a lively sense of humor and an uncanny ability to ground even the most outrageous stories successfully with credible, fast-paced plots."  "Ben Hecht," his friend Budd Schulberg wrote many years ago, "seemed the personification of the writer at the top of his game, the top of his world, not gnawing at doubting himself as great writers were said to do, but with every word and every gesture indicating the animal pleasure he took in writing well." Eszterhas, Joe. The Devil’s Guide to Hollywood: The Screenwriter as God, Macmillan (2006) "Movies," Hecht was to recall, "were seldom written. In 1927 they were yelled into existence in conferences that kept going in saloons, brothels, and all-night poker games. Movie sets roared with arguments and organ music."  He was best known for two specific and contrasting types of film: crime thrillers and screwball comedies.  Among crime thrillers, Hecht was responsible for such films as The Unholy Night (1929), the classic Scarface (1932), and Hitchcock's Notorious. Among his comedies, there were The Front Page, which led to many remakes, Noël Coward's Design for Living (1933), Twentieth Century, Nothing Sacred, and Howard Hawks's Monkey Business (1952).Film historian Richard Corliss wrote, "it is his crisp, frenetic, sensational prose and dialogue style that elevates his work above that of the dozens of other reporters who streamed west to cover and exploit Hollywood's biggest 'story': the talkie revolution.  
Personal life
Married lifeHe married Marie Armstrong in 1915, when he was twenty-one years of age, and they had a daughter, Edwina, who became actress Edwina Armstrong. He was divorced a decade later, by 1925. He married Rose Caylor that same year, and they remained married until Hecht's death in 1964. In 1943, they had a daughter Jenny Hecht, who also became an actress. She died of a drug overdose in March 1971, at age twenty-seven.
Civil rights activismAccording to Hecht historian Florice Whyte Kovan, he became active in promoting civil rights early in his career. "...in the early 1920s, Hecht organized campaigns against the Ku Klux Klan, whose lynchings of minorities, primarily blacks, terrorized the American South and North... Artists and writers joined the effort, blending civil rights into the arts and literary scene..."Hecht wrote enough stories about black-white dynamics to form a small collection, including To Bert Williams, a richly symbolic obituary to the eminent vaudevillian, the thought provoking The Miracle...In the same period, circa May–June 1923, Hecht ... collaborated on a musical with Dave Payton (Peyton), jazz pianist and music critic for the black newspaper the Chicago Defender...He broke taboos by publishing a regular column, Black-belt Shadows, about Chicago and broader AfroAmerica by young William Moore -- with the then-daring editorial note: 'This column is conducted by a Negro journalist'. A factor in his willingness to work with blacks on occasion was his first playwriting experience: his collaborator was a young black student."Hecht film stories featuring black characters included Hallelujah, I'm a Bum, co-starring Edgar Conner as Al Jolson's sidekick in a politically savvy, rhymed dialogue over Richard Rodgers music." Jolson, a noted blackface performer and star of The Jazz Singer, was also active in promoting racial equality on the Broadway stage."Hecht's most important race film historically was the Frank Capra message film The Negro Soldier, a feature length tribute shown to the armed forces and civilians during World War II." Kovan, Florice Whyte, Some Notes on Ben Hecht's Civil Rights Work , the Klan and Related Projects, [3] 
Supporting allies during WWIIHecht was among a number of signers of a formal statement, issued in July, 1941, calling for the "utmost material assistance by our government to England, the Soviet Union, and China." Among those who signed were former Nobel Prize winners in science, and others persons eminent in education, literature, and the arts. It advocated "the protection of civil liberties and the rights of labor, ... the elimination of all forms of racial and religious discrimination from our public and private life ... [and] the world-wide defense of human liberty ... There can be no victory over Hitlerlism abroad if democracy is destroyed at home."Later that year, he had his first musical collaboration with symphonic composer Ferde Grofe on their patriotic cantata, Uncle Sam Stands Up. 
Jewish activism
 

Hecht claimed that he had never experienced anti-Semitism in his life, and claimed to have had little to do with Judaism, but nevertheless, "was drawn back to the Lower East Side late in life and lived for a while on Henry Street, where he could absorb the energy and social consciousness of the ghetto," wrote author Sanford Sternlicht.  In later years, before World War II began, Hecht "took on a ten year commitment to publicize the atrocities befalling his own religious minority, the Jews of Europe and the quest for survivors, to find a permanent home in the Middle East."  In 1943, during the midst of the Holocaust, he predicted, in a widely published article in Reader's Digest magazine, "Of these 6,000,000 Jews [of Europe], almost a third have already been massacred by Germans, Romanians, and Hungarians, and the most conservative of scorekeepers estimate that before the war ends at least another third will have been done to death." Also in 1943, "out of frustration over American policy and outrage at Hollywood's fear of offending its European markets," he organized and wrote a pageant, We Will Never Die, which was produced by Billy Rose and Ernst Lubitsch and with the help of composer Kurt Weill and staging by Moss Hart. The pageant was performed at Madison Square Garden for two shows in front of 40,000 people in March, 1943. It then traveled nationwide, including a performance at the Hollywood Bowl. Hecht was disappointed nonetheless. As Weill noted afterward, ""The pageant has accomplished nothing. Actually, all we have done is make a lot of Jews cry, which is not a unique accomplishment."   


A Flag is Born
Ben Hecht's activism began when he met Peter Bergson. Hecht wrote in his book, Perfidy, that he used to be a scriptwriter until his meeting with Bergson, when he accidentally bumped into history - i.e. the burning need to do anything possible to save the doomed Jews of Europe (paraphrase from Perfidy). After meeting Bergson, Hecht dedicated himself to working with his rescue group, and after the war ended he continued work for the establishment of the state of Israel. He wrote the screenplay for the Bergson Group’s production of A Flag is Born, which opened on September 5, 1946 at the Alvin Playhouse in New York City. The play starred Marlon Brando and Paul Muni during its various productions. The proceeds from the play were used to purchase a ship that was renamed the S. S. Ben Hecht, which carried 900 refugees to Palestine in March, 1947. The British Navy captured the ship after it docked and sent 600 of its passengers to detention camps in Cyprus. The S. S. Ben Hecht later became the flagship of the Israeli Navy. Porter, Darwin. Brando Unzipped, Blood Moon Productions (2006) p.120  Six months after the establishment of Israel by the United Nations, Bergson and Hecht officially dissolved the organization which produced the fund-raising play, followed by a dinner in New York City where Menachem Begin appeared, saying, "I believe that my people, liberated and re-assembled in its country, will contribute its full share toward the progress of all mankind ... [and predicted] that all of Palestine eventually would be free and that peace and brotherhood would prevail among Arabs and Jews alike." Thanks to his fund-raising, speeches, and jawboning, Sternlicht writes, "Ben Hecht did more to help Jewish refugees from the Holocaust and to ensure the survival of the nascent state of Israel than any other American Jew in the twentieth century". As much as anything, it was the abiding love of his Jewish parents and Rose Hecht that motivated the writer to become arguably "the most effective propagandist the Jewish state ever had." In 1964, at Hecht’s funeral service at Temple Rodeph Shalom in New York City, among the eulogists was Menachem Begin, the future Prime Minister of Israel. 

Blacklisted in the UK
From 1948 to 1951, Hecht's films were blacklisted in the UK by a "concerted action by English film exhibitors to boycott" films written by him. This was a result of "his intemperate utterances on the Palestine problem," according to one source.  In May 1947, for instance, ten months after Irgun, the Jewish insurgency organisation led by Begin, had responded to British arrests by blowing up the King David Hotel in Jerusalem, British military headquarters at the time, killing 91 people, including Arabs and Jews as well as Britons, Hecht addressed Jewish militants thus: 'Every time you blow up a British arsenal, or wreck a British jail, or send a British railroad sky high, or rob a British bank, or let go with your guns at the British betrayers and invaders of your homeland, the Jews of America make a little holiday in their hearts.'  His films were banned in the UK, and of the ones shown, his name was removed from the credits.  " Ben Hecht's Films Face London Boycott" New York Times, Oct. 24, 1948 
Notable screenplays

Underworld (1927)
Underworld was the story of a petty hoodlum with political pull; it was based on a real Chicago gangster Hecht knew. "The film began the gangster film genre that became popular in the early 1930s."  And along with Scarface, "were the alpha and omega of Hollywood's first gangster craze."   In it, he "manages both to congratulate journalism for its importance and to chastise it for its chicanery, by underlining the newspapers' complicity in promoting the underworld image."  "Like so many of his films, Underworld and Scarface are 'stories' that ace-reporter Hecht loved to cover, as much for the larger-than-life qualities of his headliners as for the enormity of their crimes. Love-hate ... fascination-revulsion ... exposé-glorification ... these are the polarities that make Hecht's best films deliciously ambiguous."   "Hecht's introduction, which is nothing if not moody and Sandburgian, describes 'A great city in the dead of night - streets lonely, moon-flooded - buildings empty as the cliff-dwellings of a forgotten age."  Hecht was noted for confronting producers and directors when he wasn't satisfied with the way they used his scripts. For this film, at one point he demanded that its director, Josef von Sternberg, remove his name from the credits since Sternberg unilaterally changed one scene. Afterward, however, he relented and took credit for the film's story, which went on to win the Academy Award for Best Original Screenplay - the first year the awards were presented. 

The Front Page (1931)
After contributing to the original stories for a number of films, he worked without credit on the first film version of his original 1928 play The Front Page. It was produced by Howard Hughes and directed by Lewis Milestone in 1931. James Harvey writes, "it is Hecht and MacArthur’s Chicago ... that counts most deeply in the imagination of Hollywood. And their play, the first of the great newspaper comedies, did more to define the tone and style, the look and the sound of Hollywood comedy than any other work of its time."  Of the original play, theater producer and writer Jed Harris writes, "...here is a play which reflects miraculously the real as well as the literary personalities of the playwrights. Every line of it glows with a demoniacal humor, sordid, insolent, and mischievous to the point of down right perversity, in which one instantly recognizes the heroic comic spirit of its authors... Both Hecht and MacArthur owe their literary origins to the newspapers of Chicago. Famous crime reporters, their talents were first cradled in the recounting of great exploits in arson, rape, murder, gang war, and municipal politics. Out of a welter of jail breaks, hangings, floods, and whore-house raidings, they have gathered the rich, savory characters who disport themselves on the stage to Times Square Theatre." 

Scarface (1932)
After ushering in the beginning of the gangster films with Underworld, his next film became one of the best films of that genre. Scarface was directed by Howard Hawks, with "Hecht the wordsmith and Hawks the engineer..."  , who became "one of the few directors with whom Hecht enjoyed working."  It starred Paul Muni playing the role of an Al Capone-like gangster. "Scarface's all-but-suffocating vitality is a kind of cinematic version of tabloid prose at its best."  The story of how Scarface came to be written represents Hecht's writing style in those days. Film historian Max Wilk interviewed Leyland Hayward, an independent literary agent, who, in 1931, managed to convince Hecht that a young oil tycoon in Texas named Howard Hughes wanted him to write the screenplay to his first book. Hayward wrote about that period:

"So I went back to Hughes, and told him I’d been able to persuade Hecht to do his script; I told him Ben’s terms, - $1,000 per day - and Howard didn’t blink an eye. He nodded, and said 'Okay-it’s a deal. But you tell Hecht I want a real tough shoot-‘em up script that'll knock the audience out of its seats, okay?' Wilk, Max. “Schmucks with Underwoods: Conversations with Hollywood’s Classic Screenwriters”, Hal Leonard Corp. (2004) 



"So Ben went to work,” added Hayward. Hayward was to receive 10% of Hecht’s fees as his commission. "He was a hell of a fast writer – sometimes too fast. I didn’t even know how fast he could go... At the end of the first day I went back to Ben’s house. There he was, typing away... I said 'Ben – please slow down.' Over the next few days, 'while watching the accumulated pages of Hecht’s script growing higher and higher, 'I couldn’t slow the guy down!' sighed Hayward, who only made his commission for each day Hecht worked.



"I came by his home the next day... 'I’ve got an idea. I’m going to finish this damn thing tomorrow,' Ben told me. 'Ben—for God’s sake!' I said. 'Can’t you slow down a little? Hughes isn’t interested in you setting some sort of a speed record for writing!'"



But it was as if young Hayward had set out to flag down an army tank. Nothing stopped Hecht. On the night of the ninth day, Hayward arrived with his daily payment from Hughes, to find Hecht lounging in a chair, enjoying a highball.



"Hecht waved at his stack of manuscript. 'Done', he announced. 'Finished the damn thing'.



"Nine thousand dollars – for the screenplay of Scarface? sighed Hayward.  ... Hughes was tickled with Ben’s script; he showed it to Howard Hawks. Hawks loved it, and then they picked up this wonderful young actor from New York, Paul Muni, to play the lead. The picture went out and cleaned up – made a bundle for Hughes… And if old Ben really outsmarted himself on that one... he didn’t care. He was on to something else. Ben was always on to something else." 



Twentieth Century (1934)
For his next film, Twentieth Century, he wrote the screenplay in collaboration with Charles MacArthur as an adaptation of their original play from 1932. It was directed by Howard Hawks, and starred John Barrymore and Carole Lombard. It's a comedy about a Broadway producer who was losing his leading lady to the seductive Hollywood film industry, and will do anything to win her back. It's "a fast-paced, witty film that contains the rapid-fire dialogue for which Hecht became famous. It is one of the first, and finest, of the screwball comedies of the 1930s." 

Viva Villa! (1934)
This was the story about Mexican rebel, Pancho Villa, who takes to the hills after killing an overseer in revenge for his father's death. It was directed by Howard Hawks and starred Wallace Beery. Although the movie took liberties with the facts, it became a great success, and Hecht received an Academy Award nomination for his screenplay adaptation.In a letter from the film's producer, David O. Selznick, to studio head Louis B. Mayer, Selznick discussed the need for a script rewrite:  

"I have arranged with Ben Hecht to do the final script of Viva Villa!... On the quality we are protected not merely by Hecht's ability, but by the clause that the work must be to my satisfaction. It may seem like a short space of time for a man to do a complete new script, but Hecht is famous for his speed, and did the entire job on Scarface in eleven days."



Barbary Coast (1935)
Barbary Coast was also directed by Howard Hawks and starred Miriam Hopkins and Edward G. Robinson. The film takes place in late nineteenth century San Francisco with Hopkins playing the role of a dance-hall girl up against Robinson, who runs the town.

Nothing Sacred (1938)
Nothing Sacred became Hecht's first project after he and Charles MacArthur closed their failing film company, which they started in 1934. The film was adapted from his play, Hazel Flagg, and starred Carole Lombard as a small-town girl diagnosed with radium poisoning. "A reporter makes her case a cause for his newspaper. The story "allowed Hecht to work with one of his favorite themes, hypocrisy (especially among journalists); he took the themes of lying, decadence, and immorality and made them into a sophisticated screwball comedy." 

Gunga Din (1939)
Gunga Din was co-written with Charles MacArthur and became "one of Hollywood's greatest action-adventure films."  The screenplay was based on the poem by Rudyard Kipling, directed by George Stevens and starred Cary Grant and Douglas Fairbanks, Jr.. In 1999 the film was deemed "culturally significant" by the United States Library of Congress.

Wuthering Heights (1939)
After working without credit on Gone with the Wind in 1939, he co-wrote (with Charles MacArthur) an adaptation of Emily Bronte's novel, Wuthering Heights. Although the screenplay was cut off at the story's half-way point, as it was considered too long, it was nominated for an Academy Award. 


It's a Wonderful World (1939)
Movie historian James Harvey notes that in some respects It’s a Wonderful World is an even more accomplished film –the comedy counterpart to the supremely assured and high-spirited work Van Dyke had accomplished with San Francisco (1936). "Ben Hecht, another speed specialist, wrote the screenplay (from a story by Hecht and Herman Mankiewicz); it’s in his Front Page vein, with admixtures of It Happened One Night and Bringing Up Baby, as well as surprising adumbrations of the nineteen-forties private-eye film.  

Angels Over Broadway (1940)
Angels Over Broadway was one of only two movies he directed, produced, and wrote originally for film, the other was Specter of the Rose (1946). Angels Over Broadway was considered "one of his most personal works."   It starred Douglas Fairbanks, Jr. and Rita Hayworth and was nominated for an Academy Award. "The dialogue as well as the script's descriptive passages are chock full of brittle Hechtian similes that sparkle on the page, but turn leaden when delivered. Hecht was an endlessly articulate raconteur. In his novels and memoirs, articulation dominates..."  In the script, he experimented with "reflections of life - as if a ghost were drifiting in the rain." These "reflections" of sidewalks, bridges, glass, and neon make the film a visual prototype of the nineteen-forties film noir.  

Alfred Hitchcock's Spellbound (1945) and Notorious (1946)
For Alfred Hitchcock he wrote a number of his best psycho-dramas and received his final Academy Award nomination for Notorious. He also worked without credit on Hitchcock's next two films, The Paradine Case (1947) and Rope (1948). Spellbound, the first time Hitchcock worked with Hecht, is notable for being one of the first Hollywood movies to deal seriously with the subject of psychoanalysis. 

Monkey Business (1952)
In 1947 he teamed up with Charles Lederer and co-wrote three films: Her Husband's Affairs, Kiss of Death, and Ride the Pink Horse. In 1950 he co-wrote The Thing without credit. They again teamed up to write the 1952 screwball comedy, Monkey Business, which became Hecht's last true success as a screenwriter. 
Uncredited filmsAmong the more well-known films he helped write without credit were, Gone with the Wind, The Shop Around the Corner, Foreign Correspondent, His Girl Friday (the second film version of his play The Front Page), The Sun Also Rises, Mutiny on the Bounty, Casino Royale (1967), and The Greatest Show on Earth. Often, the only evidence of Hecht's involvement in a movie screenplay has come from letters.  The following are snippets of letters discussing The Sun Also Rises, based on the novel by Ernest Hemingway: Selznick, David O. Memo from David O. Selznick, The Viking Press (1972)  

Letter by David O. Selznick to Hecht, 12/19/1956: "My present feeling is that eighty per cent of the script is eighty percent right, and that twenty per cent of it is eighty per cent wrong. That's pretty damn good, considering the time we spent on it, even though it was twice as long as you normally spend. So let's really try to do a job that will be ... something that we can be proud of for many years to come ..."



Letter by Selznick to John Huston, 3/4/1957: "It is certainly not demeaning your talent to say that I don't think there is anybody alive who can come in on a job at the last minute and revise, without serious danger, work to which two old hands like Ben and myself have devoted many, many months of most careful work and devoted effort. . . it is also true that I have never seen Ben or anyone else bring to a job more thorough analysis, more willingness to rewrite, than he has."

The following letter discusses Portrait of Jennie (1948):  

Letter by Selznick to Hecht, 11/24/1948: "Dear Ben: Very many thanks in advance for coming to the rescue again . . . the audience was enchanted ... and it set the mood beautifully for the picture . . . It needs the type of cinematic foreward journalese of which you are the only master I know . . . In any event, I shall be eagerly awaiting your redraft, which can take an entirely different form ... either actual or Hechtian creations..."



Gone with the Wind (1939)
For original screenplay writer Sidney Howard, film historian Joanne Yeck writes, "reducing the intricacies of Gone with the Wind's epic dimensions was a herculean task...and Howard's first submission was far too long, and would have required at least six hours of film; ... [producer] Selznick wanted Howard to remain on the set to make revisions...but Howard refused to leave New England [and] as a result, revisions were handled by a host of local writers, including Ben Hecht..."  "Producer David O. Selznick replaced the film's director three weeks into filming and then had the script rewritten. He sought out director Victor Fleming, who, at the time, was directing The Wizard of Oz. Fleming was dissatisfied with the script, so Selznick brought in famed writer Ben Hecht to rewrite the entire screenplay within five days." Keelor, Josette, Northern Virginia Daily.com, A new play by Ron Hutchinson, "Moonlight and Magnolias" depicts the five day marathon by Hecht, Selznick and director Victor Fleming to create the screenplay for "Gone with the Wind."
[4] Behind the Scenes, August 1, 2008  Hecht was not credited, however, for his contribution, and Sidney Howard received the Academy Award for Best Screenplay.
In a letter from Selznick to film editor O'Shea [10/19/1939], Selznick discussed how the writing credits should appear, taking into consideration that Sidney Howard died a few months earlier after a farm-tractor accident at his home in Massachusetts: 

"To Mr. O'Shea: Some time ago, it was my intention ot have, in addition to the Sidney Howard credit on Gone With the Wind, a list of contributing writers. I would rather now abandon this idea, first because while it is true that Sidney Howard did only a portion of the script ... [but] because I don't want to deprive Sidney Howard, and more particularly his widow, of any of the glory that may be attendant upon his last job."  

In a letter [9/25/1939] from Selznick to Hecht, regarding writing introductory sequences and titles, which were used to set the scene and condense the narrative throughout the movie, Selznick wrote,

"Dear Ben: There are only seven titles needed for Gone With the Wind and I am certain you could bat them out in a few minutes, especially since a few of them can be based on titles you wrote while you were here. Will you do these for me in accordance with your promise?... Very anxious to get picture into laboratory at once and would appreciate it if you could tackle them immediately upon their receipt"  



His Girl Friday (1940)
"His Girl Friday remains not just the fastest-talking romantic comedy ever made, but a very tricky inquiry into love's need for a chase (or a dream) and the sharpest pointer to uncertain gender roles."  The D.C. Examiner writes, "Director Howard Hawks’ 1940 classic “His Girl Friday” is not just one of the funniest screwball comedies ever made, it is also one of the finest film adaptations of a stage play. "Hawks took Ben Hecht and Charles MacArthur’s Broadway hit “The Front Page,” the best play about newspapers ever written, and, by changing the gender of a major character, turned it into a romantic comedy. The new script was by Hecht (uncredited) and Charles Lederer." 

Casino Royale (1967)
Hecht wrote the first screenplay for Ian Fleming's first novel, Casino Royale. Although the final screenplay and film was made into a comedy spoof, Hecht's version was written as a straight Bond adventure, states spy novelist Jeremy Duns, who recently discovered the original lost scripts. According to Duns, Hecht's version included elements hard to imagine in a film adaptation, adding that "these drafts are a master-class in thriller-writing, from the man who arguably perfected the form with Notorious." Duns, Jeremy. "Casino Royale: discovering the lost script" The Telegraph, U.K. March 2, 2011  Hecht wrote that he has "never had more fun writing a movie," and felt the James Bond character was cinema’s first "gentleman superman" in a long time, as opposed to Hammett and Chandler’s "roughneck supermen." A few days before the final screenplay was announced to the press, Hecht died of a heart attack at his home. Duns compares Hecht's unpublished screenplay with the final rewritten film:

"All the pages in Hecht’s papers are gripping, but the material from April 1964 is phenomenal, and it’s easy to imagine it as the basis for a classic Bond adventure. Hecht’s treatment of the romance element is powerful and convincing, even with the throwaway ending, but there is also a distinctly adult feel to the story. It has all the excitement and glamour you would expect from a Bond film, but is more suspenseful, and the violence is brutal rather than cartoonish." 


Quotes
Excerpts: on movies and writersfrom "Elegy for Wonderland", by Ben Hecht, Esquire Magazine, March 1959 "The factors that laid low so whooping and puissant an empire as the old Hollywood are many. I can think of a score, including the barbarian hordes of Television. But there is one that stands out for me in the post-mortem.... The factor had to do with the basis of movie-making: ‘Who shall be in charge of telling the story.’
...“The answer Hollywood figured out for this question was what doomed it. It figured out that writers were not to be in charge of creating stories. Instead, a curious tribe of inarticulate Pooh-Bahs called Supervisors and , later, Producers were summoned out of literary nowhere and given a thousand scepters. It was like switching the roles of teacher and pupil in the fifth grade. The result is now history. An industry based on writing had to collapse when the writer was given an errand-boy status.
...
“Time is a circus, always packing up and moving away.”
...“The writer is a definite human phenomenon. He is almost a type – as pugilists are a type. He may be a bad writer – an insipid one or a clumsy one – but there is a bug in him that keeps spinning yarns; and that bulges his brow a bit, narrows his jaws, weakens his eyes and gives him girl children instead of boys. Nobody but a writer can write.  People who hang around writers for years – as producers did – who are much smarter and have much better taste, never learn to write.
...“Most of my script-writing friends – I never had more than a handful—took eagerly to the bottle or the analyst’s couch, filled their extravagant ménages with threats of suicide, hurled themselves into hysterical amours. And some of them actually died in their forties and fifties. Among these were the witty Herman Mankiewicz and F. Scott Fitzgerald, the fine novelist.
...“I have known a handful of producers who actually were equal or superior to the writers with whom they worked. These producers were a new kind of nonwriting writer hatched by the movies—as Australia produced wingless birds. They wrote without pencils or even words. Using a sort of mime-like talent, they could make up things like writers.“When I come to put down their names, there weren’t many. David O. Selznick, Sam Goldwyn, Darryl Zanuck, Walter Wanger, Irving Thalberg seem to exhaust the list…Ninety per cent of the producers I have known were not bright. They were as slow-witted and unprofessional toward making up a story as stockbrokers might be, or bus drivers. Even after twenty or thirty years of telling writers what and how to write, they were still as ignorant of writing as if they had never encountered the craft.“Out of the seventy movies I’ve written some ten of them were not entirely waste product. These were Underworld, The Scoundrel, Wuthering Heights, Viva Villa, Scarface, Specter of the Rose, Actors and Sin, Roman Holiday, Spellbound, Nothing Sacred.”
Screenplays

"It's gonna be just like war!" an editor exults. "That's it! War! You put that in the lead. 'WAR - GANG WAR!'" Scarface (1932)
"The actual facts are so simple. I love you. You love me. You love Otto. I love Otto. Otto loves you. Otto loves me. There now! Start to unravel from there." Design for Living (1933)
"They're a symbol of the whole town, pretending to fight, love, weep, and laugh all the time - and they're phonies, all of them. And I head the list...their phony hearts were dripping with the milk of human kindness." Nothing Sacred (1937)
"Three years ago, the white hope of the theatre. Today, a mug. That's New York for you. Puts you on a Christmas tree, and then - the alley." Angels Over Broadway (1940)
"Gibbons is a man full of pain and violence. On this night, there is a Witch's Sabbath in his heart. Storms are blowing his world to bits and great troubles are pounding him on a reef." Angels Over Broadway (1940)
"The only place I felt at home was in your heart. You were the only light that didn't go out on me." Angels Over Broadway (1940)
"Keep those lights burning, cover them with steel, build them in with guns, build a canopy of battleships and bombing planes around them and, hello, America, hang on to your lights, they're the only lights in the world." Foreign Correspondent (1940)
"You're such a nice boy, what do you want to go off and get killed in the War for?" Miracle in the Rain (1956)


Books

"Writing a good movie brings a writer about as much fame as steering a bicycle. It gets him, however, more jobs. If his movie is bad it will attract only critical tut-tut for him. The producer, director, and stars are the geniuses who get the hosannas when it's a hit. Theirs are also the heads that are mounted on spears when it's a flop." (from Let's Make the Hero a MacArthur)
"In Hollywood, a starlet is the name for any woman under thirty who is not actively employed in a brothel."
"The honors Hollywood has for the writer are as dubious as tissue-paper cuff links."
"People's sex habits are as well known in Hollywood as their political opinions, and much less criticized."
When asked by his new wife's discomfited parents, "Why didn't you tell us you were a Jew?", Hecht responded "I was afraid you would think I was bragging."
"Trying to determine what is going on in the world by reading newspapers is like trying to tell the time by watching the second hand of a clock."
"There is nothing as dull as an intellectual ally after a certain age." (A Guide for the Bedevilled)
"The only practical way yet discovered by the world for curing its ills is to forget about them." (Perfidy)
"Like the actor, authority has faith in its false whiskers. But its deepest faith is in the human illusion. People will hang on to illusion as eagerly as life itself." (Perfidy)
"Of the things men give each other the greatest is loyalty."
"Movies are one of the bad habits that have corrupted our century. They have slipped into the American mind more misinformation in one evening than the Dark Ages could muster in a decade."
"A movie is never any better than the stupidest man connected with it."
"The movies are an eruption of trash that has lamed the American mind and retarded Americans from becoming cultured people."



How My Egoism Died from A Child of the Century
   
Academy Award nominations

19th Academy Awards Nominated Notorious
13th Academy Awards Nominated Angels Over Broadway
12th Academy Awards Nominated Wuthering Heights
8th Academy Awards Won The Scoundrel
7th Academy Awards Nominated Viva Villa!
1st Academy Awards - Won Underworld


Screenplays 

Kiss of Death
Casino Royale (uncredited)
Circus World
7 Faces of Dr. Lao (uncredited)
Cleopatra (uncredited)
Billy Rose's Jumbo
Mutiny on the Bounty (uncredited)
Walk on the Wild Side (uncredited)
North to Alaska (uncredited)
John Paul Jones (uncredited)
The Gun Runners (uncredited)
Queen of Outer Space
Legend of the Lost
The Sun Also Rises
A Farewell to Arms
Miracle in the Rain
The Iron Petticoat
The Hunchback of Notre Dame (uncredited)
Trapeze (uncredited)
The Court-Martial of Billy Mitchell (uncredited)
The Indian Fighter
The Man with the Golden Arm (uncredited)
Guys and Dolls (uncredited)
Living It Up (based on his play Hazel Flagg)
Ulysses
Light's Diamond Jubilee (television)
Terminal Station (uncredited)
Angel Face (uncredited)
Hans Christian Andersen (uncredited)
Monkey Business
Actors and Sin (also directed and produced)
The Wild Heart (uncredited)
The Thing from Another World (uncredited)
The Secret of Convict Lake (uncredited)
Strangers on a Train (uncredited)
September Affair (uncredited)
Where the Sidewalk Ends
Edge of Doom (uncredited)
Perfect Strangers
Love Happy (uncredited)
The Inspector General (uncredited)
Whirlpool
Roseanna McCoy (uncredited)
Big Jack (uncredited)
Portrait of Jennie (uncredited)
Cry of the City (uncredited)
Rope (uncredited)
The Miracle of the Bells
Dishonored Lady (uncredited)
Her Husband's Affairs
The Paradine Case (uncredited)
Ride the Pink Horse
Kiss of Death
Duel in the Sun (uncredited)
Notorious
A Flag is Born
Specter of the Rose (also directed and produced)
Gilda (uncredited)
Cornered (uncredited)
Spellbound
Watchtower Over Tomorrow
Lifeboat (uncredited)
The Outlaw (uncredited)
China Girl
Journey Into Fear (uncredited)
The Black Swan
Ten Gentlemen from West Point (uncredited)
Roxie Hart (uncredited)
Lydia
The Mad Doctor (uncredited)
Comrade X
Second Chorus (uncredited)
Angels Over Broadway (also directed and produced)
Foreign Correspondent (final scene-uncredited)
The Shop Around the Corner (uncredited)
His Girl Friday
I Take This Woman (uncredited)
Gone with the Wind (uncredited)
At the Circus (uncredited)
Lady of the Tropics
It's a Wonderful World
Wuthering Heights
Let Freedom Ring
Stagecoach (uncredited)
Gunga Din
Angels with Dirty Faces (uncredited)
The Goldwyn Follies
Nothing Sacred
The Hurricane (uncredited)
The Prisoner of Zenda (uncredited)
Woman Chases Man (uncredited)
King of Gamblers (uncredited)
A Star Is Born (uncredited)
Soak the Rich (also directed)
The Scoundrel (also directed)
Spring Tonic
Barbary Coast
Once in a Blue Moon (also directed)
The Florentine Dagger
The President Vanishes (uncredited)
Crime Without Passion (also directed)
Shoot the Works
Twentieth Century (uncredited)
Upperworld
Viva Villa!
Riptide (uncredited)
Queen Christina (uncredited)
Design for Living
Turn Back the Clock
Topaze
Hallelujah, I'm a Bum
Back Street (uncredited)
Rasputin and the Empress (uncredited)
Million Dollar Legs (uncredited)
Scarface
The Beast of the City (uncredited)
The Unholy Garden (1931 film)
The Sin of Madelon Claudet  (uncredited)
Monkey Business (uncredited)
Homicide Squad (uncredited)
Quick Millions (uncredited)
Le Spectre vert
Roadhouse Nights
Street of Chance (uncredited)
The Unholy Night
The Great Gabbo
The Big Noise
The American Beauty (uncredited)
Underworld
The New Klondike (uncredited)
 
Books (partial list) 

1001 Afternoons in Chicago, McGee/Covici, (1922); University of Chicago Press, (2009) ISBN 978-0-226-32274-2
Fantazius Mallare, a Mysterious Oath, 174 pp.,  Pascal Covici (1922)
The Florentine Dagger: A Novel for Amateur Detectives w/ illustrations by Wallace Smith, 256 pp. Boni & Liveright (1923)
Kingdom of Evil, 211pp., Pascal Covici (1924)
Broken Necks { Containing More 1001 Afternoons }, 344pp., Pascal Covici (1926)
Count Bruga, 319 pp., Boni & Liveright  (1926)
The Book of Miracles, 465 pp., Viking Press (1939)
A Guide for the Bedevilled, 276 pages, Charles Scribner's Sons (1944), 216 pp. Milah Press Incorporated (September 1, 1999) ISBN 0-9646886-2-X
The Collected Stories of Ben Hecht, 524 pp., Crown (1945)
Perfidy (with critical supplements), 281 pp. (plus 29 pp.), Julian Messner (1962); about the 1954–1955 Kastner trial in Jerusalem
Perfidy 288 pp. Milah Press (1961), Inc. (April 1, 1997) ISBN 0-9646886-3-8
Concerning a Woman of Sin, 222 pp., Mayflower (1964)
Gaily, Gaily, Signet (1963) (November 1, 1969) ISBN
A Child of the Century 672 pp. Plume (1954) (May 30, 1985) ISBN
The Front Page, Samuel French Inc Plays (January 1, 1998) ISBN
The Champion From Far Away (1931)
Actor's Blood (1936)
A Treasury Of Ben Hecht: Collected Stories And Other Writings (1959, anthology)
Erik Dorn
A Jew in Love
I Hate Actors!
1001 Afternoons in New York
The Sensualists
Winkelberg
Miracle in the Rain
Letters From Bohemia
Gargoyles
The Egoist
 
Musical contributions

In 1937, lyricist Hecht collaborated with composer Louis Armstrong on "Red Cap," a song about the hard life of a railway porter. That summer, Louis Armstrong and his Orchestra recorded it for Decca Records, as did Erskine Hawkins's Orchestra for Vocalion. This may be Ben Hecht's only "popular" song, and it's a good one.  (see   Sam Stands Up (1941) Hecht contributed the lyrics and poetry to this patriotic cantata for baritone solo, chorus, and orchestra by Ferde Grofe, written during the height of World War II.



We Will Never Die (1943) a pageant he composed with Kurt Weill, with staging by Moss Hart, written partly because of Hecht's consternation with American foreign policy in Europe concerning the Holocaust and Hollywood's fear of offending European (Axis) markets.


Footnotes 
References

Bleiler, Everett, The Checklist of Fantastic Literature (1948) Shasta Publishers
Bluestone, George, From Novels Into Film (1968) Berkeley: University of California Press
Fetherling, Doug, The Five Lives of Ben Hecht (1977) Lester & Orpen
Halliwell, Leslie, Who's Who in the Movies (2006) Harper Collins
MacAdams, William, "Ben Hecht: The Man Behind the Legend" (1990) Scribner; "Ben Hecht" (1995) Barricade
Thomson, David, A Biographical Dictionary of Film (1995) Alfred A. Knopf
Wollen, Peter, Signs and Meaning in the Cinema (1969) Indiana University Press


External links 

Works by or about Ben Hecht at Internet Archive and Google Books (scanned books original editions)
  (plain text and HTML)
 
 
 
Ben Hecht: Biography with credits for many other works
Summary: Perfidy and the Kastner Trial
"Perfidy" Written by Ben Hecht: Reviewed by Michael Jacobs
"Nirvana" by Ben Hecht
United States Holocaust Memorial Museum - Ben Hecht
 
Ben Hecht Papers at the Newberry Library

 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT


















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	James Boswell
  James Boswell, 9th Laird of Auchinleck (29 October 1740 – 19 May 1795) was a lawyer, diarist, and author born in Edinburgh, Scotland; he is best known for the biography he wrote of one of his contemporaries, the English literary figure Samuel Johnson, which the modern Johnsonian critic Harold Bloom has claimed is the greatest biography written in the English language.Boswell's surname has passed into the English language as a term (Boswell, Boswellian, Boswellism) for a constant companion and observer, especially one who records those observations in print.  In A Scandal in Bohemia, Sir Arthur Conan Doyle's character Sherlock Holmes affectionately says of Dr. Watson, who narrates the tales, "I am lost without my Boswell." 
Early life
Boswell was born near St Giles' Cathedral in Edinburgh on 29 October 1740.  He was the eldest son of a judge, Alexander Boswell, Lord Auchinleck  and his wife Euphemia Erskine; he inherited his father’s estate Auchinleck in Ayrshire. Boswell's mother was a strict Calvinist, and he felt that his father was cold to him. As a child, he was delicate and suffered from some type of nervous ailment which appeared to be inherent  and would afflict him sporadically all through his life.  At the age of five, he was sent to James Mundell's academy, an advanced institution by the standards of the time, where he was instructed in English, Latin, writing and arithmetic.  Boswell was unhappy there, and his sickliness began to manifest itself in the physical indicants associated with nightmares and extreme shyness.In view of this, the now-eight-year-old was removed from the academy and educated by a string of private tutors who included John Dunn and a Mr Fergusson.  The former had rather more success than his successor: he versed his charge in the joys of literature (not least of all the Spectator essays) and opened his eyes to the pleasances of religion.  Dunn was also present during, if not directly involved in, Boswell's serious affliction of 1752, when he was rusticated to the hamlet of Moffat in northern Dumfriesshire.  This afforded him his first experience of genuine society, and his recovery was rapid and complete.  It may, however, have inculcated the notion that travel and entertainment were his best sedatives.At thirteen, Boswell was enrolled into the arts course at the University of Edinburgh, studying there from 1753 to 1758.  Midway through his studies, he suffered a serious depression and nervous illness, but, when he recovered, he had thrown off all signs of delicacy and attained robust health.  Boswell had swarthy skin, black hair and dark eyes; he was of average height, and he tended to plumpness.  His appearance was alert and masculine, and he had an ingratiating sense of good humour.Upon turning nineteen, he was sent to continue his studies at the University of Glasgow, where he was taught by Adam Smith.  While at Glasgow, Boswell decided to convert to Catholicism and become a monk.  Upon learning of this, his father ordered him home.  Instead of obeying, though, Boswell ran away to London, where he spent three months, living the life of a libertine, before he was taken back to Scotland by his father.  Upon returning, he was re-enrolled at Edinburgh University and forced by his father to sign away most of his inheritance in return for an allowance of £100 a year.On 30 July 1762, Boswell took his oral law exam, which he passed with some skill.  Upon this success, Lord Auchinleck decided to raise his son's allowance to £200 a year and allowed him to return to London.  It was during his second spell there that Boswell wrote his London Journal and, on 16 May 1763, met Johnson for the first time.  The pair became friends almost immediately.  Johnson eventually nicknamed him "Bozzy".The first conversation between Johnson and Boswell is quoted in Life of Samuel Johnson as follows: [Boswell:] "Mr. Johnson, I do indeed come from Scotland, but I cannot help it." 
[Johnson:] "That, Sir, I find, is what a very great many of your countrymen cannot help."  It is widely believed that Johnson despised the Scots; however, on being specifically asked the question, he admitted that this prejudice was without basis.
European travels
It was around three months after this first encounter with Johnson that Boswell departed for Europe with the initial goal of continuing his law studies at Utrecht University. He spent a year there and although desperately unhappy the first few months, eventually quite enjoyed his time in Utrecht. He befriended and fell in love with Isabelle de Charrière, also known as Belle van Zuylen, a vivacious young Dutchwoman of unorthodox opinions, his social and intellectual superior. Boswell admired the young widow Geelvinck who refused to marry him. After this, Boswell spent most of the next two years travelling around the continent. During this time he met Jean-Jacques Rousseau and made a pilgrimage to Rome. Boswell also travelled to Corsica to meet one of his heroes, the independence leader Pasquale Paoli. His well-observed diaries of this time have been compiled into two books Boswell in Holland and Boswell on the Grand Tour.
Mature life
Boswell returned to London in February 1766 accompanied by Rousseau's mistress, with whom he may have had a brief affair on the journey home.  After spending a few weeks in the capital, he returned to Scotland to take his final law exam. He passed the exam and became an advocate. He practised for over a decade, during which time he spent no more than a month every year with Johnson. Nevertheless, he returned to London annually to mingle with Johnson and the rest of the London literary crowd, and to escape his mundane existence in Scotland. He found enjoyment in playing the intellectual rhyming game crambo with his peers.Some of his journal entries and letters from this period describe his amatory exploits. Thus, in 1767, in a letter to William Johnson Temple, he wrote, "I got myself quite intoxicated, went to a Bawdy-house and past a whole night in the arms of a Whore. She indeed was a fine strong spirited Girl, a Whore worthy of Boswell if Boswell must have a whore"  A few years earlier, he wrote that during a night with an actress named Louisa "five times was I fairly lost in supreme rapture. Louisa was madly fond of me; she declared I was a prodigy and asked me if this was not extraordinary for human nature."  Though he sometimes used a condom for protection,  he contracted venereal disease at least seventeen times. Boswell was a major supporter of the Corsican Republic. Following the island's invasion by France in 1768 Boswell attempted to raise public awareness and rally support for the Corsicans. He sent arms and money to the Corsican fighters, who were ultimately defeated at the Battle of Ponte Novu in 1769. Boswell attended the masquerade held at the Shakespeare Jubilee in Stratford-upon-Avon in September 1769 dressed as a Corsican Chief. Boswell married his cousin, Margaret Montgomerie, in November 1769. She remained faithful to Boswell, despite his frequent liaisons with prostitutes, until her death of tuberculosis in 1789. After his infidelities, he would deliver tearful apologies to her and beg her forgiveness, before again promising her, and himself, that he would reform. James and Margaret had four sons and three daughters. Two sons died in infancy; the other two were Alexander (1775–1822) and James (1778–1822). Their daughters were Veronica (1773–1795), Euphemia (1774-ca. 1834) and Elizabeth (1780–1814). Boswell also had at least two extramarital children, Charles (1762–1764) and Sally (1767-1768?).Despite his relative literary success with accounts of his European travels, Boswell was an unsuccessful advocate, with the exception of the copyright infringement case of Donaldson v Beckett where Boswell was the advocate of the Scottish bookseller, Alexander Donaldson. By the late 1770s, Boswell descended further and further into alcoholism and gambling addiction. Throughout his life, from childhood until death, he was beset by severe swings of mood. His depressions frequently encouraged, and were exacerbated by, his various vices. His happier periods usually saw him relatively vice-free. His character mixed a superficial Enlightenment sensibility for reason and taste with a genuine and somewhat romantic love of the sublime and a propensity for occasionally puerile whimsy. The latter, along with his tendency for drink and other vices, caused many contemporaries and later observers to regard him as being too lightweight to be an equal in the literary crowd that he wanted to be a part of. However, his humour and innocent good nature won him many lifelong friends.Boswell was a frequent guest of Lord Monboddo at Monboddo House, a setting where he gathered significant observations for his writings by association with Samuel Johnson, Robert Burns, Lord Kames, Lord Monboddo, and other luminaries.After Johnson's death in 1784, Boswell moved to London to try his luck at the English Bar, which proved even more unsuccessful than his career in Scotland. He also offered to stand for Parliament but failed to get the necessary support, and he spent the final years of his life writing his Life of Johnson. During this time his health began to fail due to venereal disease and his years of drinking. Boswell died in London in 1795. Close to the end of his life he became strongly convinced that the "Shakespeare papers", including two previously unknown plays Vortigern and Rowena and Henry II, allegedly discovered by William Henry Ireland, were genuine. After Boswell's death they proved to be forgeries created by Ireland himself. 
Boswell's Life of Samuel Johnson 
 
When the Life of Samuel Johnson was published in 1791 it at once commanded the admiration that Boswell had sought for so long, and it has since suffered no diminution. Its style was unique in that, unlike other biographies of that era, it directly incorporated conversations that Boswell had noted down at the time for his journals. He also included far more personal and human details than those to which contemporary readers were accustomed. Instead of writing a respectful and dry record of Johnson's public life, in the style of the time, he painted a vivid portrait of the complete man. It is still often said to be the greatest biography ever written.It has often been asked how a man such as Boswell could have produced so remarkable a work as the Life of Johnson. Among those who attempted an answer were Macaulay and Carlyle: the former argued that Boswell's uninhibited folly and candour were his greatest qualifications; the latter replied that beneath such traits was a mind to discern excellence and a heart to appreciate it, aided by the power of accurate observation and considerable dramatic ability.  
Slavery
Boswell was present at the meeting of the Committee for the Abolition of the Slave Trade in May 1787 set up to persuade William Wilberforce to lead the abolition movement in Parliament. However, the abolitionist Thomas Clarkson records that by 1788 Boswell "after having supported the cause... became inimical to it."Boswell's most prominent display of support for slavery was his 1791 poem 'No Abolition of Slavery; or the Universal Empire of Love,' which lampooned Clarkson, Wilberforce and Pitt. The poem also supports the common suggestion of the pro-slavery movement, that the slaves actually enjoyed their lot: "The cheerful gang! - the negroes see / Perform the task of industry."
Discovery of papers
In the 1920s a great part of Boswell's private papers, including intimate journals for much of his life, were discovered at Malahide Castle, north of Dublin. These provide a hugely revealing insight into the life and thoughts of the man. They were sold to the American collector Ralph H. Isham and have since passed to Yale University, which has published general and scholarly editions of his journals and correspondence. A second cache was discovered soon after and also purchased by Isham. A substantially longer edition of The Journal of a Tour to the Hebrides was published in 1936 based on his original manuscript. His London Journal 1762-63, the first of the Yale journal publications, appeared in 1950. The last, The Great Biographer, 1789-1795, was published in 1989.These detailed and frank journals include voluminous notes on the Grand Tour of Europe that he took as a young man and, subsequently, of his tour of Scotland with Johnson. His journals also record meetings and conversations with eminent individuals belonging to The Club, including Lord Monboddo, David Garrick, Edmund Burke, Joshua Reynolds and Oliver Goldsmith.
Works 

The Cub at Newmarket (1762, published by James Dodsley)
Dorando, a Spanish Tale (1767, anonymously)
Account of Corsica (1768)
The Hypochondriack (1777–1783, a monthly series in the London Magazine)
The Journal of a Tour to the Hebrides (1785)
Life of Samuel Johnson (1791, reprinted in Everyman's Library)
No Abolition of Slavery (1791) (poem)
Life of Samuel Johnson, Facsimile Reprint of First Issue of the First Edition, bound with The Principal Corrections and Additions to the First Edition, 2 volumes (ISBN 978-4-901481-69-4) www.aplink.co.jp/synapse/4-901481-69-X.htm


Published journals


Boswell's London Journal, 1762-1763
Boswell in Holland, 1763-1764, including his correspondence with Belle de Zuylen (ZeÌlide)
Boswell on the Grand Tour: Germany and Switzerland, 1764
Boswell on the Grand Tour: Italy, Corsica, and France, 1765-1766
Boswell in Search of a Wife, 1766-1769
Boswell for the Defence, 1769-1774
Boswell: the Ominous Years, 1774-1776
Boswell in Extremes, 1776-1778
Boswell: Laird of Auchinleck 1778-1782
Boswell, the Applause of the Jury, 1782-1785
Boswell, the English Experiment, 1785-1789
Boswell: The Great Biographer, 1789-1795


References


Notes

 

Bibliography



Pierce, Patricia. The Great Shakespeare Fraud: The Strange, True Story of William-Henry Ireland. Sutton Publishing, 2005.
 


Further reading

Boswell, James. Boswell's Book of Bad Verse (A Verse Self-Portrait) or 'Love Poems and Other Verses by James Boswell. Edited with Notes by Jack Werner. London. White Lion, 1974. ISBN 0-85617-487-4.
Boswell, James. Boswell's Column. Being his Seventy Contributions to The London Magazine under the pseudonym The Hypochondriack from 1777 to 1783 here First Printed in Book Form in England. Introduction and Notes by Margery Bailey. London. William Kimber, 1951.
Boswell, James. The Journal of a Tour to Corsica; and Memoirs of Pascal Paoli. Edited, with an Introduction, by Morchard Bishop. London. Williams & Norgate, 1951.
Boswell, James. Letters of James Boswell to the Rev. W. J. Temple. Introduction by Thomas Seccombe. London. Sidgwick & Jackson, 1908.
Finlayson, Iain. The Moth and the Candle. A Life of James Boswell. London. Constable, 1984. ISBN 0-09-465540-5.
Mclaren, Moray: The Highland Jaunt. A Study of James Boswell and Samuel Johnson upon their Highland and Hebridean Tour of 1773. London. Jarrolds,1954.
Mallory, George. Boswell the Biographer. London. Smith, Elder, 1912.
Pottle, Frederick A. Boswell and the Girl from Botany Bay. London. Heinemann, 1938.
Tinker, Chauncey Brewster. Young Boswell. Chapters on James Boswell the Biographer Based Largely on New Material. Boston. Atlantic Monthly, 1922.
Wyndham Lewis, D.B. The Hooded Hawk or The Case of Mr. Boswell. London. Eyre & Spottiswoode, 1946.


External links 
 

 
Essay on Johnson, Boswell and the Abolition of Slavery
Blog on Boswell's London Journal
Online catalogue (in progress) of James Boswell's library at LibraryThing
Works by James Boswell at Internet Archive
James Boswell - a Guide
James Boswell's "An Account of Corsica" - online book
Young Boswell, by Chauncey Brewster Tinker, Boston: Atlantic monthly press, 1922, University of Michigan Library (Digital Collection)
Boswell Book Festival celebrates the art of biography and memoir at Boswell's home, Auchinleck House, in Ayrshire, Scotland
 
 
Portraits of James Boswell and Dr. Johnson at the Scottish National Portrait Gallery
 
  
 
 
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Eddie Slovik
 
Edward Donald Slovik (February 18, 1920 – January 31, 1945) was a private in the United States Army during World War II and the only American soldier to be court-martialled and executed for desertion since the American Civil War.      Although over 21,000 American soldiers were given varying sentences for desertion during World War II, including 49 death sentences, Slovik's was the only death sentence carried out.       During World War II, 1.7 million courts-martial cases were tried, representing one third of all criminal cases tried in the United States during the same period. Most of these cases were minor, as were the sentences.   Some were serious. Nevertheless, a clemency board, appointed by the Secretary of War in the summer of 1945, reviewed all general court-martial cases where the accused was still in confinement.    That Board "remitted or reduced the sentence in 85 percent of the 27,000 serious cases reviewed."   The death penalty was rarely imposed, and those cases typically were for rapes and murders. Only one executed "had been convicted of a 'purely military offense.'" 
Early life and draftSlovik was born to a Polish-American family in Detroit, Michigan.  As a minor, he was arrested frequently. The first time, when he was 12 years old, he and some friends broke into a foundry to steal some brass.  Between 1932 and 1937, he was caught for several incidents of petty theft, breaking and entering, and disturbing the peace. In October 1937, he was sent to prison but was paroled in September 1938. After stealing and crashing a car with two friends while drunk, he was sent back to prison in January 1939.In April 1942, Slovik was paroled once more, and he obtained a job at Montella Plumbing and Heating in Dearborn, Michigan. There he met the woman who would become his wife, Antoinette Wisniewski, while she was working as a bookkeeper for James Montella. They married on November 7, 1942, and lived with her parents. Slovik's criminal record made him classified as unfit for duty in the U.S. military (4-F), but, shortly after the couple's first wedding anniversary, Slovik was reclassified as fit for duty (1-A) and subsequently drafted by the Army.  His service number was 36896415.Slovik arrived at Camp Wolters in Texas for basic military training on January 24, 1944. In August, he was dispatched to join the fighting in France. Arriving on August 20, he was one of 12 reinforcements assigned to Company G of the 109th Infantry Regiment, U.S. 28th Infantry Division.
Desertion
While en route to his assigned unit, Slovik and a friend he met during basic training, Private John Tankey, took cover during an artillery attack and became separated from their replacement detachment. This was the point at which Slovik later stated he found he "wasn't cut out for combat." The next morning, they found a Canadian military police unit and remained with them for the next six weeks. Tankey wrote to their regiment to explain their absence before he and Slovik reported to their unit for duty on October 7, 1944. The US Army's rapid advance through France had caused many replacement soldiers to have trouble finding their assigned units, and so no charges were filed against Slovik or Tankey.The following day on October 8, Slovik informed his company commander, Captain Ralph Grotte, that he was "too scared" to serve in a front-line rifle company and asked to be reassigned to a rear area unit. He told Grotte that he would run away if he were assigned to a rifle unit, and asked his captain if that would constitute desertion. Grotte confirmed that it would. He refused Slovik's request for reassignment and sent him to a rifle platoon. The next day, October 9, Slovik deserted from his infantry unit. His friend, John Tankey, caught up with him and attempted to persuade him to stay, but Slovik's only comment was that his "mind was made up". Slovik walked several miles to the rear and approached an enlisted cook at a headquarters detachment, presenting him with a note which stated: "I, Pvt. Eddie D. Slovik, 36896415, confess to the desertion of the United States Army. At the time of my desertion we were in Albuff [Elbeuf] in France. I came to Albuff as a replacement. They were shelling the town and we were told to dig in for the night. The following morning they were shelling us again. I was so scared, nerves and trembling, that at the time the other replacements moved out, I couldn’t move. I stayed there in my fox hole till it was quiet and I was able to move. I then walked into town. Not seeing any of our troops, so I stayed over night at a French hospital. The next morning I turned myself over to the Canadian Provost Corp. After being with them six weeks I was turned over to American M.R.  They turned me loose. I told my commanding officer my story. I said that if I had to go out there again I'd run away. He said their was nothing he could do for me so I ran away again AND I'LL RUN AWAY AGAIN IF I HAVE TO GO OUT THERE!"


—Signed PvI. Eddie D. Slovik A.S.N. 36896415”'    

The cook summoned his company commander and an MP, who read the note and urged Slovik to destroy it before he was taken into custody, which Slovik refused. He was brought before Lieutenant Colonel Ross Henbest, who again offered him the opportunity to tear up the note, return to his unit and face no further charges. After Slovik again refused, Henbest ordered Slovik to write another note on the back of the first one stating that he fully understood the legal consequences of deliberately incriminating himself with the note, and that it would be used as evidence against him in a court martial.Slovik was taken into custody and confined to the division stockade. The divisional judge advocate, Lieutenant Colonel Henry Sommer, again offered Slovik an opportunity to rejoin his unit and have the charges against him suspended. He offered to transfer Slovik to a different infantry regiment where no one would know of his past and he could start with a "clean slate". Slovik, convinced that he would face only jail time, which he had experienced and found preferable to combat, declined these offers, saying, "I've made up my mind. I'll take my court martial."
Court martial
The 28th Division was scheduled to begin an attack in the Hurtgen Forest. The coming attack was common knowledge in the unit, and casualty rates were expected to be very high, as the prolonged combat in the area had been unusually grueling. The Germans were determined to hold, and terrain and weather reduced the usual American advantages in armor and air support to almost nothing. A small minority of soldiers (less than 0.5%) indicated they preferred to be imprisoned rather than remain in combat, and the rates of desertion and other crimes had begun to rise.Slovik was charged with desertion to avoid hazardous duty and tried by court martial on 11 November 1944. Slovik had to be tried by a court martial composed of staff officers from other U.S. Army divisions, because all combat officers from the 28th Infantry Division were fighting on the front lines.   The prosecutor, Captain John Green, presented witnesses to whom Slovik had stated his intention to "run away." The defense counsel, Captain Edward Woods, announced that Slovik had elected not to testify. At the end of the day, the nine officers of the court found Slovik guilty and sentenced him to death. The sentence was reviewed and approved by the division commander, Major General Norman Cota. General Cota’s stated attitude was. "Given the situation as I knew it in November, 1944, I thought it was my duty to this country to approve that sentence. If I hadn’t approved it—if I had let Slovik accomplish his purpose— I don’t know how I could have gone up to the line and looked a good soldier in the face." On 9 December, Slovik wrote a letter to the Supreme Allied commander, General Dwight D. Eisenhower, pleading for clemency. However, desertion had become a systemic problem in France, and the surprise German offensive through the Ardennes began on 16 December with severe U.S. casualties, pocketing several battalions and straining the morale of the infantry to the greatest extent yet seen during the war.Eisenhower confirmed the execution order on 23 December, noting that it was necessary to discourage further desertions. The sentence came as a shock to Slovik, who had expected a dishonorable discharge and a jail term (the latter of which he assumed would be commuted once the war was over), the same punishment he had seen meted out to other deserters from the division while he was confined to the stockade.
Execution
The execution by firing squad was carried out at 10:04 a.m. on 31 January 1945, near the village of Sainte-Marie-aux-Mines. The unrepentent Slovik said to the soldiers whose duty it was to prepare him for the firing squad before they led him to the place of execution, "They're not shooting me for deserting the United States Army, thousands of guys have done that. They just need to make an example out of somebody and I'm it because I'm an ex-con. I used to steal things when I was a kid, and that's what they are shooting me for. They're shooting me for the bread and chewing gum I stole when I was 12 years old."Slovik, wearing a uniform stripped of all insignia with a GI blanket across his shoulders against the cold, was led into the courtyard of a house chosen for the execution because it had a high masonry wall. The commanders did not want the local French civilians to witness the proceedings. Soldiers stood him against a six by six post. The soldiers strapped him to the post using web belts. One went around and under his arms and hung on a spike on the back side of the post to prevent his body from slumping following the volley. The others went around his knees and ankles. Just before a soldier placed a black hood over his head, the attending chaplain said to Slovik, "Eddie, when you get Up There, say a little prayer for me."  Slovik answered, "Okay, Father. I'll pray that you don't follow me too soon." Those were his last words.Twelve picked soldiers were detailed for the firing squad from the 109th Regiment. The weapons used were standard issue M-1 rifles with just one bullet for each rifle. One rifle was loaded with a blank. On the command of "Fire", Slovik was hit by eleven bullets, at least four of them were fatal. The wounds ranged from high in the neck region out to the left shoulder, over the left chest, and under the heart. One bullet was in the left upper arm.  An Army physician quickly determined Slovik had not been immediately killed. The firing squad's rifles were reloaded in preparation for another volley. But before the reloading of the rifles was complete, Private Slovik died. He was 24 years of age. The whole process took 15 minutes. The military service record of Eddie Slovik, which is now a public archival record available from the Military Personnel Records Center, provides a detailed account of the actual execution of Slovik which took place in 1945 and it was upon this that most of the film The Execution of Private Slovik was based. Some dramatic license occurs, including during the execution. There is no evidence, for example, that the priest attending Slovik's execution shouted "Give it another volley if you like it so much" after the doctor indicated Slovik was still alive. 
Burial
Slovik was buried in Plot "E" of Oise-Aisne American Cemetery and Memorial in Fère-en-Tardenois, alongside 95 American soldiers executed for rape and/or murder. Their grave markers are hidden from view by shrubbery and bear sequential numbers instead of names, making it impossible to identify them individually without knowing the key. Antoinette Slovik unsuccessfully petitioned the Army for her husband's remains and his pension until her death in 1979. Slovik's case was taken up in 1981 by former Macomb County Commissioner Bernard V. Calka, a Polish-American World War II veteran, who continued to petition the Army to return Slovik’s remains. In 1987, he succeeded in convincing President Ronald Reagan to order their return.    Calka raised $8,000 to pay for their transfer from France to Detroit's Woodmere Cemetery, where Slovik was reburied next to his wife.Although Antoinette Slovik and others petitioned seven U.S. presidents for a pardon, none was granted.
Context and legacyIn militaries around the world courts-martial have imposed death sentences for offenses such as cowardice, desertion, insubordination, and mutiny.  During World War I from 1917 to 1918, the United States Army executed 35 soldiers, but all were convicted of rape and/or murder of civilians and not for military offenses.     During World War II in all theaters of the war, the United States military executed 102 soldiers for rape and/or murder of civilians, but only Slovik was executed for the military offense of desertion.  Colonel Robert C. Bard of the Judge Advocate General's office noted that of the 2864 Army personnel tried for desertion for the period January 1942 through June 1948, 49 were convicted and sentenced to death, and 48 of those sentences were voided by higher authority.  One of the members of the tribunal now believes that Slovik's execution was an injustice in light of all the circumstances, and was an example of disparate treatment from a flawed process. In 1960, Frank Sinatra announced his plan to produce a movie titled The Execution of Private Slovik, to be written by blacklisted Hollywood 10 screenwriter Albert Maltz. This announcement provoked great outrage, and Sinatra was accused of being a Communist sympathizer. As Sinatra was campaigning for John F. Kennedy for President, the Kennedy camp was naturally concerned, and ultimately persuaded Sinatra to cancel the project. However, Slovik's execution was the basis for a 1954 book by William Bradford Huie.  In 1974, the book was adapted for a TV movie starring Martin Sheen and also called The Execution of Private Slovik. In addition, Eisenhower's execution orders and Slovik's death by firing squad are included in a scene in the 1963 film The Victors.Kurt Vonnegut mentions Slovik's execution in his novel Slaughterhouse-Five. Vonnegut also wrote a companion libretto to Igor Stravinsky's Histoire du soldat, or A Soldier's Tale, which tells Slovik's story. Slovik also appears in Nick Arvin's 2005 novel Articles of War, in which the fictional protagonist, Private George (Heck) Tilson, is one of the members of Slovik's firing squad. The British rock band IQ also mentioned Slovik in their song "For the Taking".
References 
External links 

  Retrospective from one of the judges at Slovik's trial.
 
 

 
 
DEFAULTSORT



 











 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Irene van Dyk
 
 
 Irene van Dyk, MNZM (born 21 June 1972 in Vereeniging, Gauteng, South Africa) is one of the world's best-known netball players and the most capped player of all time. She formerly captained the South African national netball team, representing them a total of 72 times, but moved to New Zealand in 2000 where she plays for the national team, the Silver Ferns. She became a citizen of New Zealand in 2005. She won the Halberg award as the New Zealand Sportswoman of the Year in 2003 and was again nominated in 2005. Her move to New Zealand and almost immediate placement in their national team caused some minor controversy, as the only rule in netball at the time for players switching between nations was a ban on playing for more than one nation in a calendar year.  She lives in Wellington, but played for the Waikato/Bay of Plenty Magic in the National Bank Cup, New Zealand's former domestic netball competition which ended in 2007. She plays for the same team in the ANZ Championship which replaced the National Bank Cup in 2008. She is a primary school teacher, and has one daughter named Bianca with her husband, Christie. Irene van Dyk is a Christian and supported the "Lifeathon" fund-raising event for Christian music radio network Life FM.
Netball techniqueA 2003 biography about her is called Changing Colours by Russell Gray. She shoots 300 goals a day just for fun. Her husband Christie analyses her play.As a player Irene van Dyk is renowned for her peerless and consistent shooting volume and accuracy boasting shooting percentages that have rarely been seen in netball before.  Her commanding height (said to be 190 cm but suspected to be a few cm taller) combines well with her natural athleticism and strong hands enabling her to dominate her opponents.Perhaps the most striking weapon in her arsenal is the extremely wide split of her legs on receiving the ball.  She uses this in order to manoeuvre herself closer to the goalpost thus increasing her chances of making the shot or rebounding upon a missed shot.
South African careerShe made her debut for the South African national side in 1994 and went on to captain the side and represent them a total of 72 times. She was part of the silver medal winning South African team who beat New Zealand preliminary rounds of the 1995 Netball World Championships and went on to lose to Australia in the final.
NZ career 
Since moving to NZ Irene's game has grown dramatically with notable improvements in her ball handling/security, movement and space awareness.  She is also much stronger physically than she used to be and this has only added to the nightmare image she often presents to opposing players and fans alike
2002 Commonwealth GamesVan Dyk received a silver medal as part of the New Zealand team that lost in the final against Australia at the 2002 Commonwealth Games held in Manchester, England after double overtime.
2004On 5 July 2004 she came on at the start of the 3rd quarter of the third test match in a series against Australia and scored 24/24 to turn the match around. And then she went to Australia in November 2004 where the Silver Ferns were defeated 2-1 by a determined Australian team.  Features of that series were the apparently poor quality of the umpiring, the loss of Australian Captain and Goal Keeper Liz Ellis from part of the 1st Test and all of the 2nd Test after being injured during a clash with van Dyk, and the noticeable increase of calls going against van Dyk penalising her for stepping and contacting other players.
2005In the winter of 2005 a one off Test was played in Sydney where the Silver Ferns would gain revenge over their old rivals from Australia.  Irene van Dyk would once again be a dominant factor in the win and would cement her position as the world's greatest goal shooter especially against Australia's own formidable shooting weapon — Catherine Cox whose own form fell away after being worn down by New Zealand's Goal Keeper Vilimaina Davu.  Once again the standard of the umpiring was questioned this time mainly by the Australian team and coach.  Final score—50-43.  Both teams then went on to prepare for their next clash scheduled for October in Auckland New Zealand.In recent years Irene has played national league netball for the Waikato Magic and in 2005 spearheaded them to their first National Bank Cup title.  Incidentally their win broke the six year stranglehold the Southern Sting had held over the competition.In October 2005 Irene would once again rise to the occasion and help in presenting Australia with a debilitating loss.  In a match notable for the loss of Australian Captain Liz Ellis for three quarters of the match, New Zealand were simply too good for Australia with their speed, ball handling, uncompromising defence and shooting accuracy.  Partnered with impressive Goal Attack - Jodi Te Huna, Irene's composure, class and athleticism came to the fore and Australia appeared to have no response to this and the overall effort of New Zealand which was at once scintillating and merciless.  Final score—61-36.  New Zealand would go on to record an undefeated year for 2005 including a successful end of year tour to the Caribbean where they would trounce Barbados and Jamaica and blood several newer players.
2006 Commonwealth GamesNew Zealand faced Australia, the defending champions, in the finals of 2006 Commonwealth Games held in Melbourne. In that Final, Van Dyk once again performed with skill and determination in what was an enthralling battle against Australian Goal Keeper and home town girl Bianca Chatfield who gave a sterling, if ultimately unsuccessful performance, against the World's most recognisable netball player. (Liz Ellis wasn't available due to injury.) New Zealand went on to win the final 60–55, avenging their defeat in the 2002 Commonwealth Games final and claim a famous victory over the rivals. Van Dyk played an important role with her 90% plus shooting percentage steering New Zealand home. When she moved back from South Africa she had a daughter named Bianca, she was born in 1997 and has followed her mother in netball.
Subsequent milestonesOn September the 23rd 2009, Irene played in her 100th test for New Zealand, a 52-36 win over Australia although New Zealand lost the series 3-2 overall.
In 2010, van Dyk was chosen to lead the New Zealand team in the Opening Ceremony of the 2010 Commonwealth Games in Delhi.  The 2010 Games also saw Irene van Dyk become the most capped player in Silver Ferns history, surpassing the previous number of 110 attained by Lesley Rumball. 
In June 2012 Irene celebrated her 40th birthday on National TV and announced she has no plans to retire.
See also

List of nationality transfers in sport


References 
External links  
DEFAULTSORT

















	J. B. S. Haldane
 
 
 
John Burdon Sanderson Haldane FRS (5 November 1892 – 1 December 1964 ), known as Jack (but who used 'J.B.S.' in his printed works), was a British-born geneticist and evolutionary biologist generally credited with a central role in the development of neo-Darwinian thinking (popularized by Richard Dawkins' 1976 work titled The Selfish Gene). A staunch Marxist, he was critical of Britain's role in the Suez Crisis, and chose to leave Britain, move to India and become an Indian citizen. He was also one of the founders (along with Ronald Fisher and Sewall Wright) of population genetics.
Biography

Aristocratic familyHaldane was born in Oxford to physiologist John Scott Haldane and Louisa Kathleen Haldane (née Trotter), and descended from an aristocratic intellectual Scottish family (See Haldane family).    His younger sister, Naomi, became a writer. His uncle was Richard Haldane, 1st Viscount Haldane, politician and one time Secretary of State for War; his aunt was the author Elizabeth Haldane. His father was a scientist, a philosopher and a Liberal, and his mother was a Conservative. Haldane took an interest in his father’s work very early in childhood. It was the result of this lifelong study of the natural world and his devotion to empirical evidence that he became an atheist. He felt that atheism was the only rational deduction available in light of all the evidence, saying, "My practice as a scientist is atheistic. That is to say, when I set up an experiment I assume no god, angel or devil is going to interfere with its course... I should therefore be intellectually dishonest if I were not also atheistic in the affairs of the world." Haldane was educated at Eton and New College, Oxford.  He served in the British Army during the First World War in the Black Watch regiment.
Pioneer geneticistBetween 1919 and 1922 he was a Fellow of New College, Oxford, then moved to the Cambridge University, where he accepted a Readership in Biochemistry at Trinity College and taught until 1932.  During his nine years at Cambridge, Haldane worked on enzymes and genetics, particularly the mathematical side of genetics.  Haldane wrote many popular essays on science; in 1927 these were collected and published in a volume titled Possible Worlds.  He then accepted a position as Professor of Genetics and moved to University College London, where he spent most of his academic career.  Four years later he became the first Weldon Professor of Biometry at University College London.   In 1923, in a talk given in Cambridge, Haldane, foreseeing the exhaustion of coal for power generation in Britain, proposed a network of hydrogen-generating windmills. This is the first proposal of the hydrogen-based renewable energy economy.  
Population genetics and the Briggs–Haldane equationIn 1925, G. E. Briggs and Haldane derived a new interpretation of the enzyme kinetics law described by Victor Henri in 1903, different from the 1913 Michaelis–Menten equation. Leonor Michaelis and Maud Menten assumed that enzyme (catalyst) and substrate (reactant) are in fast equilibrium with their complex, which then dissociates to yield product and free enzyme. The Briggs–Haldane equation was of the same algebraic form, but their derivation is based on the quasi steady state approximation, that is the concentration of intermediate complex (or complexes) does not change. As a result, the microscopic meaning of the "Michaelis Constant" (K m ) is different. Although commonly referring it as Michaelis–Menten kinetics, most of the current models actually use the Briggs–Haldane derivation.Haldane made many contributions to human genetics and was one of the three major figures to develop the mathematical theory of population genetics. He is usually regarded as the third of these in importance, after R.A. Fisher and Sewall Wright. His greatest contribution was in a series of ten papers on "A Mathematical Theory of Natural and Artificial Selection", which was a major series of papers on the mathematical theory of natural selection. It treated many major cases for the first time, showing the direction and rates of changes of gene frequencies. It also pioneered in investigating the interaction of natural selection with mutation and with migration. Haldane's book, The Causes of Evolution (1932), summarized these results, especially in its extensive appendix. This body of work was a component of what came to be known as the "modern evolutionary synthesis", re-establishing natural selection as the premier mechanism of evolution by explaining it in terms of the mathematical consequences of Mendelian genetics.Haldane introduced many quantitative approaches in biology such as in his essay On Being the Right Size. His contributions to theoretical population genetics and statistical human genetics included the first methods using maximum likelihood for estimation of human linkage maps, and pioneering methods for estimating human mutation rates.  His was the first to calculate the mutational load caused by recurring mutations at a gene locus, and to introduce the idea of a "cost of natural selection".Haldane is also known for an observation from his essay, On Being the Right Size, which Jane Jacobs and others have since referred to as Haldane's principle.  This is that sheer size very often defines what bodily equipment an animal must have:  "Insects, being so small, do not have oxygen-carrying bloodstreams.  What little oxygen their cells require can be absorbed by simple diffusion of air through their bodies.  But being larger means an animal must take on complicated oxygen pumping and distributing systems to reach all the cells."   The conceptual metaphor to animal body complexity has been of use in energy economics and secession ideas.
Keen experimenterHaldane was a keen experimenter, willing to expose himself to danger to obtain data.  One experiment involving elevated levels of oxygen saturation triggered a fit which resulted in him suffering crushed vertebrae.  In his decompression chamber experiments, he and his volunteers suffered perforated eardrums, but, as Haldane stated in What is Life, "the drum generally heals up; and if a hole remains in it, although one is somewhat deaf, one can blow tobacco smoke out of the ear in question, which is a social accomplishment." 
AwardsIn 1952, he received the Darwin Medal from the Royal Society. In 1956, he was awarded the Huxley Memorial Medal of the Royal Anthropological Institute. Among other awards, he received the Feltrinelli Prize, an Honorary Doctorate of Science, an Honorary Fellowship at New College, and the Kimber Award of the U.S. National Academy of Sciences. He was awarded the Linnean Society of London's prestigious Darwin–Wallace Medal in 1958.
MarriageIn 1924, Haldane met Charlotte Burghes (née Franken), a young reporter for the Daily Express. So that they could marry, Charlotte divorced her husband Jack Burghes, causing some controversy. Haldane was almost dismissed from Cambridge for the way he handled his meeting with her, which led to the divorce. They married in 1926.  Following their separation in 1942, the Haldanes divorced in 1945. He later married Helen Spurway.
Political viewsHaldane became a socialist during World War I, supported the Spanish Republic during the Spanish Civil War, and finally became a Communist. He was an enthusiastic, dialectical materialist Marxist, and wrote many articles in the Communist Daily Worker. He was the chairman of the editorial board of the London edition for several years.  His vision of the Socialist principle can be considered pragmatic. In On Being the Right Size, Haldane doubted that socialism could be operated on the scale of the British Empire or the United States or, implicitly, the Soviet Union: "while nationalization of certain industries is an obvious possibility in the largest of states, I find it no easier to picture a completely socialized British Empire or United States than an elephant turning somersaults or a hippopotamus jumping a hedge."In 1937, Haldane became a Marxist and an open supporter of the Communist Party, although not a member of the party. In 1938, he proclaimed enthusiastically that "I think that Marxism is true." He joined the Communist Party of Great Britain in 1942. The first edition of his children's book My Friend Mr. Leakey contained an avowal of his Party membership which was removed from later editions.  Events in the Soviet Union, such as the rise of anti-Mendelian agronomist Trofim Lysenko and the crimes of Joseph Stalin, may have caused him to break with the Party later in life, although he showed a partial support of Lysenko and Stalin. Pressed to speak out about the rise of Lysenkoism and the persecution of geneticists in the Soviet Union as anti-Darwinist and the denouncement of genetics as incompatible with dialectical materialism, Haldane shifted the focus to the United Kingdom and a criticism of the dependence of scientific research on financial patronage.  In 1941, Haldane wrote about the Soviet trial of his friend and fellow geneticist Nikolai Vavilov: 
"The controversy among Soviet geneticists has been largely one between the academic scientist, represented by Vavilov and interested primarily in the collection of facts, and the man who wants results, represented by Lysenko. It has been conducted not with venom, but in a friendly spirit. Lysenko said (in the October discussions of 1939): 'The important thing is not to dispute; let us work in a friendly manner on a plan elaborated scientifically. Let us take up definite problems, receive assignments from the People's Commissariat of Agriculture of the USSR and fulfil them scientifically. Soviet genetics, as a whole, is a successful attempt at synthesis of these two contrasted points of view.'"
 His ambiguous attitude toward the persecution of Vavilov was explicable by the atmosphere of the period, where supporters of Communism needed to be unequivocal. His attitude changed dramatically at the end of World War II, when Lysenkoism reached a totalitarian influence in the Communist movement. He then become an explicit critic of the regime.  He left the Party in 1950, shortly after considering standing for Parliament as a Communist Party candidate. He continued to admire Stalin, describing him in 1962 as "a very great man who did a very good job."
IndiaIn 1956, Haldane left his post at University College London, and moved to Calcutta, where he joined the Indian Statistical Institute (ISI).  Haldane's move to India was influenced by a number of factors. Officially he stated that his chief political reason was in response to the Suez Crisis. He wrote: "Finally, I am going to India because I consider that recent acts of the British Government have been violations of international law." His interest in India was also because of his interest in biological research, belief that the warm climate would do him good, and that India offered him freedom and shared socialist dreams.   At the ISI, he headed the biometry unit and spent time researching a range of topics and guiding other researchers around him. He was keenly interested in inexpensive research and he wrote to Julian Huxley about his observations on Vanellus malabaricus, the Yellow-wattled Lapwing, boasting that he observed them from the comfort of his backyard. Haldane took an interest in anthropology, human genetics and botany. He advocated the use of Vigna sinensis (cowpea) as a model for studying plant genetics. He took an interest in the pollination of the common weed Lantana camara. The quantitative study of biology was his main focus and he lamented that Indian universities forced those who took up biology to give up on an education in mathematics.  Haldane took an interest in the study of floral symmetry. His wife, Helen Spurway, conducted studies on wild silk moths.  Unable to get along with the director, P.C. Mahalanobis, Haldane resigned in February 1961 and moved to a newly established biometry unit in Orissa. Haldane eventually became an Indian citizen. India After Gandhi: The History of the World's Largest Democracy, Ramachandra Guha, Pan Macmillan, 2008, pp. 769 - 770  He was also interested in Hinduism and after his arrival he became a vegetarian and started wearing Indian clothes.  In Kolkata, the busy connecting road from Eastern Metropolitan Bypass to Park Circus area on which the Science City is located, is named after him.  In 1961, Haldane described India as "the closest approximation to the Free World." His American friend, Jerzy Neyman, a professor of Statistics in the University of California, Berkeley, objected to this premise. Neyman gave his impression that "India has its fair share of scoundrels and a tremendous amount of poor unthinking and disgustingly subservient individuals who are not attractive."  Haldane retorted: Perhaps one is freer to be a scoundrel in India than elsewhere. So one was in the U.S.A in the days of people like Jay Gould, when (in my opinion) there was more internal freedom in the U.S.A than there is today. The "disgusting subservience" of the others has its limits. The people of Calcutta riot, upset trams, and refuse to obey police regulations, in a manner which would have delighted Jefferson. I don't think their activities are very efficient, but that is not the question at issue. When on June 25, 1962, six years after Haldane's move to India, he was described in print as a "Citizen of the World" by an American science writer named Groff Conklin, Haldane's response was as follows:  No doubt I am in some sense a citizen of the world. But I believe with Thomas Jefferson that one of the chief duties of a citizen is to be a nuisance to the government of his state. As there is no world state, I cannot do this. On the other hand, I can be, and am, a nuisance to the government of India, which has the merit of permitting a good deal of criticism, though it reacts to it rather slowly. I also happen to be proud of being a citizen of India, which is a lot more diverse than Europe, let alone the U.S.A, the U.S.S.R or China, and thus a better model for a possible world organisation. It may of course break up, but it is a wonderful experiment. So, I want to be labeled as a citizen of India. 
Author and a source of inspirationHaldane was a famous science populariser. His essay, Daedalus; or, Science and the Future (1924), was remarkable in predicting many scientific advances but has been criticised for presenting a too idealistic view of scientific progress. Haldane’s book shows the effect of the separation between sexual life and pregnancy as a satisfactory one on human psychology and social life. The book was regarded as shocking science fiction at the time, being the first book about ectogenesis (the development of foetuses in artificial wombs) - "test tube babies", brought to life without sexual intercourse or pregnancy. His book, A.R.P. (Air Raid Precautions) (1938) combined his physiological research into the effects of stress upon the human body with his experience of air raids during the Spanish Civil War to provide a scientific explanation of the air raids that Britain was to endure during the Second World War, then imminent.Haldane was a friend of the author Aldous Huxley, who parodied him in the novel Antic Hay (1923) as Shearwater, "the biologist too absorbed in his experiments to notice his friends bedding his wife". Haldane's discourse in Daedalus on ectogenesis was an influence on Huxley's Brave New World (1932) which features a eugenic society.Haldane was one of those, along with Olaf Stapledon, Charles Kay Ogden, I.A. Richards, and H.G. Wells, whom C.S. Lewis accused of scientism, "the belief that the supreme moral end is the perpetuation of our own species, and that this is to be pursued even if, in the process of being fitted for survival, our species has to be stripped of all those things for which we value it—of pity, of happiness, and of freedom." Shortly after the third book of the Ransom Trilogy appeared, J.B.S. Haldane criticised all three of them in an article titled "Auld Hornie, F.R.S.". The title reflects the sarcastic tone of the article, Auld Hornie being the pet name given to the devil by the Scots and F.R.S. standing for "Fellow of the Royal Society". Lewis’s response, "A Reply to Professor Haldane", was never published during his lifetime and apparently never seen by Haldane. In it, Lewis claims that he was attacking scientism, not scientists, by challenging the view of some that the supreme goal of our species is to perpetuate itself at any expense.Haldane wrote a popular book for children titled My Friend Mr Leakey (first published in 1937) which contained the stories "A Meal With a Magician", "A Day in the Life of a Magician", "Mr Leakey's Party", "Rats", "The Snake with the Golden Teeth", and "My Magic Collar Stud". It was reprinted several times – in 1944, 1971, and 1972 with illustrations by Quentin Blake. When he appears as a character in the stories, several of which are written in the first person, he describes his job as a professor, or: "Doing sums to make new kinds of primroses and cats".
DeathShortly before his death from cancer, Haldane wrote a comic poem while in the hospital, mocking his own incurable disease; it was read by his friends, who appreciated the consistent irreverence with which Haldane had lived his life: 
"Cancer’s a Funny Thing: 
I wish I had the voice of Homer 
To sing of rectal carcinoma, 
This kills a lot more chaps, in fact, 
Than were bumped off when Troy was sacked..."
 The poem ends: 
"...I know that cancer often kills, 
But so do cars and sleeping pills; 
And it can hurt one till one sweats, 
So can bad teeth and unpaid debts. 
A spot of laughter, I am sure, 
Often accelerates one’s cure; 
So let us patients do our bit 
To help the surgeons make us fit." 
 Haldane died on 1 December 1964. He willed that his body be used for study at the Rangaraya Medical College, Kakinada. 
 
"My body has been used for both purposes during my lifetime and after my death, whether I continue to exist or not, I shall have no further use for it, and desire that it shall be used by others. Its refrigeration, if this is possible, should be a first charge on my estate." 
 
Quotations

He is famous for the (possibly apocryphal) response that he gave when some theologians asked him what could be inferred about the mind of the Creator from the works of His Creation: "An inordinate fondness for beetles."   This is in reference to there being over 400,000 known species of beetles in the world, and that this represents 40% of all known insect species (at the time of the statement, it was over half of all known insect species). 
Often quoted for saying, "My own suspicion is that the universe is not only queerer than we suppose, but queerer than we can suppose." 
"It seems to me immensely unlikely that mind is a mere by-product of matter. For if my mental processes are determined wholly by the motions of atoms in my brain I have no reason to suppose that my beliefs are true. They may be sound chemically, but that does not make them sound logically. And hence I have no reason for supposing my brain to be composed of atoms." 
"Teleology is like a mistress to a biologist: he cannot live without her but he's unwilling to be seen with her in public."  
"I had [gastritis] for about fifteen years until I read Lenin and other writers, who showed me what was wrong with our society and how to cure it...Since then I have needed no magnesia." 
"Theories have four stages of acceptance.  i) this is worthless nonsense; ii) this is an interesting, but perverse, point of view, iii) this is true, but quite unimportant; iv) I always said so." 


Publications

Daedalus; or, Science and the Future (1924), E. P. Dutton and Company, Inc., a paper read to the Heretics, Cambridge, on February 4, 1923
second edition (1928), London: Kegan Paul, Trench & Co.
see also Haldane's Daedalus Revisited (1995), ed. with an introd. by Krishna R. Dronamraju, Foreword by Joshua Lederberg; with essays by M.F. Perutz, Freeman Dyson, Yaron Ezrahi, Ernst Mayr,Elof Axel Carlson, D.J. Weatherall, N.A. Mitchison and the editor. Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-854846-X
A Mathematical Theory of Natural and Artificial Selection, a series of papers beginning in 1924
G.E. Briggs and J.B.S. Haldane (1925). A note on the kinetics of enzyme action, Biochem. J., 19: 338–339
Callinicus: A Defence of Chemical Warfare (1925), E. P. Dutton
Possible Worlds and Other Essays (1928), Harper and Brothers. 1937 edition London: Chatto & Windus. 2001 edition Transaction Publishers:  ISBN 0-7658-0715-7 (includes On Being the Right Size)
Animal Biology (1929) Oxford: Clarendon
Enzymes (1930), MIT Press 1965 edition with new preface by the author written just prior to his death: ISBN 0-262-58003-9
The Inequality of Man, and Other Essays (1932)
The Causes of Evolution (1932)
Science and Human Life (1933), Harper and Brothers, Ayer Co. reprint: ISBN 0-8369-2161-5
Science and the Supernatural: Correspondence with Arnold Lunn (1935), Sheed & Ward, Inc,
Fact and Faith (1934), Watts Thinker's Library 
"A Contribution to the Theory of Price Fluctuations", The Review of Economic Studies , 1:3, 186-195 (1934).
My Friend Mr Leakey (1937), Vigyan Prasar 2001 reprint: ISBN 81-7480-029-8
Air Raid Precautions (A.R.P.) (1938), Victor Gollancz
Marxist Philosophy and the Sciences (1939), Random House, Ayer Co. reprint: ISBN 0-8369-1137-7
Science and Everyday Life (1940), Macmillan, 1941 Penguin, Ayer Co. 1975 reprint: ISBN 0-405-06595-7
Science in Peace and War (1941), Lawrence & Wishart Ltd
New Paths in Genetics (1941), George Allen & Unwin
Heredity & Politics (1943), George Allen & Unwin
Why Professional Workers should be Communists (1945), London: Communist Party (of Great Britain) In this four page pamphlet, Haldane contends that Communism should appeal to professionals because Marxism is based on the scientific method and Communists hold scientists as important; Haldane subsequently disavowed this position
Adventures of a Biologist (1947)
Science Advances (1947), Macmillan
What is Life? (1947), Boni and Gaer, 1949 edition: Lindsay Drummond
Everything Has a History (1951), Allen & Unwin—Includes "Auld Hornie, F.R.S."; C.S. Lewis's "Reply to Professor Haldane" is available in "On Stories and Other Essays on Literature," ed. Walter Hooper (1982), ISBN 0-15-602768-2.
"The Origins of Life", New Biology, 16, 12–27 (1954). Suggests that an alternative biochemistry could be based on liquid ammonia.
"Origin of Man", Nature, 176, 169 (1955)
"Cancer's a Funny Thing", New Statesman, 21 February 1964


See also

List of independent discoveries ("primordial soup" theory of the evolution of life from carbon-based molecules, ca. 1924)
Timeline of hydrogen technologies
Experiments in the Revival of Organisms, a 1940 Soviet film featuring Haldane in the introduction.
Haldane's Rule


Bibliography

Bryson, Bill (2003) A Short History of Nearly Everything pp. 300–302; ISBN 0-552-99704-8
Clark, Ronald (1968) JBS: The Life and Work of J.B.S. Haldane ISBN 0-340-04444-6
Dronamraju, K. R. (editor) (1968) Haldane and Modern Biology Johns Hopkins University Press, Baltimore, Maryland.
Dronamraju, K. R. (1985) Haldane. The life and work of J B S Haldane with special reference to India. Aberdeen University Press. Foreword by Naomi Mitchison.
Geoffrey Zubay et al., Biochemistry (2nd ed., 1988), enzyme kinetics, pp. 266–272; MacMillan, New York ISBN 0-02-432080-3


References 
External links 
 

An online copy of Daedalus or Science and the Future
A review (from a modern perspective) of The Causes of Evolution
Unofficial SJG Archive – People – JBS Haldane (1892–1964) Accessed 22 February 2006. Useful text but the likeness is not of JBS but of his father John Scott Haldane.
Haldane's contributions to science in India
Marxist Writers: J.B.S. Haldane
There are photographs of Haldane at

JBS Haldane, on the Portraits of Statisticians page.
The biography on the Marxist Writers page has a photograph of Haldane when younger.

My Friend Mr. Leakey – text – Haldane's most amusing imaginary acquaintance

 
 
 
   
 
DEFAULTSORT































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	John Walker (athlete)
 
 
Sir John George Walker, KNZM, CBE, (born 12 January 1952 in Papakura) is a former middle distance runner from New Zealand.Walker was the first person to run the mile in under 3:50. He won the Olympic Games 1500m in Montreal in 1976.
1974 Commonwealth Games
Walker achieved world prominence in 1974 when he ran second to Filbert Bayi in the 1500 meter run at the Commonwealth Games in Christchurch, New Zealand. In one the greatest 1500 m races held to that time, Walker and Bayi both broke the existing world record, and others in the race recorded the fourth, fifth, and seventh fastest performances ever. Additionally, Walker won the bronze medal in the 800 metres in 1:44.92, his lifetime best for the distance, and still the second-fastest New Zealander ever, behind Peter Snell.Throughout his career as a world-class miler Walker was coached by Arch Jelley, a school principal, and a middle distance runner himself, whose work with runners has been typified by meticulous training programmes on a scientific basis and effective communications in person.
World record breaking runsWalker broke the World Record in the mile run with a time of 3:49.4 minutes set at Göteborg, Sweden, on 12 August 1975, bettering the previous time of 3:51.0 set earlier that year by Filbert Bayi. It was the first time that the Three minutes and 50 seconds barrier had been broken, and it was a full 10 seconds faster than Roger Bannister's historic sub-Four-Minute Mile of 3:59.4 that was run twenty-one years previous. He was named Athlete of the Year by Track and Field News the same year.Walker's new record lasted until 17 July 1979, when it was lowered by the Briton Sebastian Coe.The following year Walker broke the world record for the 2000 metres, running 4:51.4 in Oslo, Norway, on 30 June 1976. He smashed the existing ten-year-old record held by Michel Jazy by nearly five seconds; Walker regarded this run as the best he ever ran. Steve Cram would not better Walker's record until 4 August 1985, running 4:51.39 at Budapest, Hungary.  Indoors, Walker broke the 1500 metre world record with a time of 3:37.4 in 1979.
1976 Montreal Olympic GamesIn the 800 metres Walker failed to advance to the semi-finals missing the top two qualifying spots in his heat running a time of 1:47.63.However Walker was a favourite to win the 1500 metres due to the African boycott of the Games weakening the field. The 1500 metres final started at a slow pace going through 800 metres in 2:03. The race would come down to a fast finish. In a bid to out-sprint runners that were quicker over 800 metres, Walker started his finishing sprint 300 metres from the finish, fading in the last 20 metres holding out Ivo Van Damme and Paul-Heinz Wellmann to win the gold medal. 
Although it seemed that the boycott denied Bayi (who was Walker's main rival) the opportunity to challenge for the 1500 metre title, Bayi likely would not have competed, anyway, because of an attack of malaria that he suffered. Walker would justify his Olympic Gold over several record-breaking years.
New Zealand recordsDuring 1981 he set a New Zealand all-comers' mile record of 3:50.6 in Auckland.In 1982 in Oslo, Norway, Steve Scott (3:47.69), John Walker (3:49.08), and Ray Flynn (3:49.77) took the top three spots in The Dream Mile, establishing American, New Zealand, and Irish national records for the mile in the same race.  All three national records stood for 25 years until 21 July 2007, when Alan Webb broke Scott's American record. Walker and Flynn's times remain national records.
Running twilightAt the 1982 Commonwealth Games in Brisbane he won the silver medal in the 1500 metres finishing behind Steve Cram. He moved up up to the 5000 metres distance for both the 1984 Olympic Games and the 1986 Commonwealth Games with limited success. He raced at the 1990 Commonwealth Games competing in both the 800 and 1500 metres, where he was tripped early on in the latter.Walker became the first man in history to run 100 sub-4 minute miles in 1985, achieving that feat just before fellow miler Steve Scott of the U.S. There was some controversy around this as Scott claimed there was an agreement that the two would race each other, with the winner being the first to claim 100 sub-4 minute miles. Walker denied such an agreement existed.As his career wore on, leg injuries and stomach cramps started to affect his training. In the early 1990s he aimed to be the first runner aged over 40 to run a mile under four minutes, but his attempts failed due to a leg injury. At this point his international career had shown remarkable longevity - spanning almost two decades. Walker ended his racing career with an astonishing 135 sub-four-minute miles.He was inducted into the New Zealand Sports Hall of Fame in 1990, and in 1996 the Olympic Committee awarded him with the Olympic Bronze Order.
After running 
Also in 1996, Walker announced that he was suffering from Parkinson's disease. He now operates an equestrian shop in Newmarket in Auckland, New Zealand with his wife, Helen, and was a Manukau City Councillor, after which he became a councillor for the merged Auckland Council.  Walker and his wife have four children: Elizabeth, Richard, Timothy, and Caitlin.On 1 June 2009 in the Queen's Birthday Honours List, Walker was appointed Knight Companion of the New Zealand Order of Merit 
Personal bests

Distance Time Place Date 
800 m 1:44.92  Christchurch 1974 
1000 m 2:16.6 NR  Oslo  1980 
1500 m 3:32.4 Oslo  1975 
Mile 3:49.08 NR  Oslo  1982 
2000 m 4:51.4 NR  Oslo  1976 
3000 m 7:37.49 NR  London  1982 

References 
External links

Biography New Zealand Olympic Committee
Page with Photo, one of two at Sporting Heroes
IAAF Biography



Video links
Video Interview of John Walker talking about his Olympic Win

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   
DEFAULTSORT



















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Susan May Williams
Susan May Williams (2 April 1812 - 15 September 1881) was the daughter of Benjamin Williams, a prominent Baltimore merchant originally from Roxbury, Massachusetts, and his wife, Sarah Copeland, widow of Nathaniel Morton.  In response to the opening of the Erie Canal, which was in direct competition with the port of Baltimore, Benjamin Williams became one of the founders of the first railroad company in the United States, the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad, chartered on 24 April 1827.In November 1829, Susan married Jérôme Napoleon Bonaparte (1805–1870), son of the King of Westphalia, and a nephew of Napoleon I. He had refused to wait for an arranged marriage to a European princess, opting instead for the promise of the $200,000 fortune Susan brought to the marriage. The groom's maternal grandfather, William Patterson, one of the wealthiest men in Maryland, gave the couple a mansion (now Montrose Mansion) as a wedding gift in an attempt to match the bride's dowery.Their children were:

Charles Joseph Bonaparte; United States Attorney General and Secretary of the Navy. 
Jerome Napoleon Bonaparte II; served as an officer in the armies of both the United States and France.


External links
 
DEFAULTSORT




	Willie Mays
 
 
 
Willie Howard Mays, Jr. (born May 6, 1931) is a retired American professional baseball player who spent the majority of his major league career with the New York and San Francisco Giants before finishing with the New York Mets. He was elected to the Baseball Hall of Fame in 1979 in his first year of eligibility. Mays was nicknamed The Say Hey Kid.Mays won two MVP awards and tied Stan Musial's record with 24 appearances in the All-Star Game. Mays ended his career with 660 home runs, third at the time of his retirement, and currently fourth all-time. He was a center fielder and won a record-tying 12 Gold Gloves starting the year the award was introduced six seasons into his career. Willie Mays' unquestionable career statistics and longevity in the pre-PED era, the more recent acknowledgement of Mays as perhaps the finest Five-tool player ever, and the overwhelming consensus of many surveys and other expert analyses carefully examining Mays' relative performance, have led to a growing opinion that Mays was possibly the greatest all-around baseball player of all-time         
In 1999, Mays placed second on The Sporting News s "List of the 100 Greatest Baseball Players", making him the highest-ranking living player. Later that year, he was also elected to the Major League Baseball All-Century Team. Mays is one of five National League players to have had eight consecutive 100-RBI seasons, along with Mel Ott, Sammy Sosa, Chipper Jones and Albert Pujols. Mays hit over 50 home runs in 1955 and 1965, representing the longest time span between 50-plus home run seasons for any player in Major League Baseball history.Ted Williams said, "They invented the All-Star Game for Willie Mays."  
Early lifeMays was born in Westfield, Alabama, just outside of Bessemer, Alabama. His father, who was named after president William Howard Taft, was a talented baseball player with the Negro team for the local iron plant.    His mother, Annie Satterwhite, was a gifted basketball and track star in high school. Hirsch, p. 12  His parents never married each other.  As a baby, Mays was cared for by his mother's younger sisters Sarah and Ernestine. Sarah became the primary female role model in Mays' life.  His father exposed him to baseball at an early age, and by the age of five he was playing catch with his father.  At age 10, Mays was allowed to sit on the bench of his father's Industrial League games. Hirsch, p. 15 Mays played multiple sports at Fairfield Industrial High School, averaging a then-record 17 points a game in basketball and more than 40 yards a punt in football, while also playing quarterback.  Mays graduated from Fairfield in 1950. 
Early professional career

Negro leaguesMays' professional baseball career began in 1947, while he was still in high school and played briefly with the Chattanooga Choo-Choos in Tennessee during the summer. A short time later, Mays left the Choo-Choo and returned to his home state to join the Birmingham Black Barons of the Negro American League. Mays helped them win their pennant and advance to the 1948 Negro League World Series, where they lost the series 4-1 to the Homestead Grays. Mays hit .226 for the season, but it was said his excellent fielding and baserunning made him a useful player. By playing professionally with the Black Barons, Mays jeopardized his opportunities to play high school sports in Alabama. This created some problems for him with high school administrators at Fairfield, who wanted him to help the teams and ticket sales. Over the next several years, a number of Major League baseball franchises sent scouts to watch him play. The first was the Boston Braves. The scout who discovered him, Bud Maughn, had been following him for over a year and referred him to the Braves, who then packaged a deal which called for $7,500 down and $7,500 in 30 days.  They also planned to give Mays $6,000.  The obstacle in the deal was that Tom Hayes, owner of the Birmingham Black Barons, wanted to keep Mays for the balance of the season. Had the team been able to act more quickly, the Braves franchise might have had both Mays and Hank Aaron in their outfield from 1954 to 1973. The Brooklyn Dodgers also scouted him and wanted Ray Blades to negotiate a deal, but were too late. The New York Giants had already signed Mays for $4,000 and assigned him to their Class-B affiliate in Trenton, New Jersey. 
Minor leaguesAfter Mays had a batting average of .353 in Trenton, N.J., he began the 1951 season with the class AAA Minneapolis Millers of the American Association. During his short time span in Minneapolis, Mays played with two other future Hall of Famers: Hoyt Wilhelm and Ray Dandridge. Batting .477 in 35 games and playing excellent defense, Mays was called up to the Giants on May 24, 1951. He appeared in his first major league game the next day in Philadelphia. Mays moved to Harlem, New York, where his mentor was a New York State Boxing Commission official and former Harlem Rens basketball legend Frank "Strangler" Forbes.
Major leagues

New York Giants (1951–57)Mays began his major league career with no hits in his first 12 at bats. On his 13th at bat, he hit a homer over the left field fence of the Polo Grounds off future Hall of Famer Warren Spahn.  Spahn later joked, "I'll never forgive myself. We might have gotten rid of Willie forever if I'd only struck him out."  Mays' average improved steadily throughout the rest of the season. Although his .274 average, 68 RBI and 20 homers (in 121 games) were among the lowest of his career, he still won the 1951 Rookie of the Year Award. During the Giants' comeback in August and September 1951 to overtake the Dodgers in the 1951 pennant race, Mays' fielding, and strong arm were often instrumental to several important Giants victories.  Mays ended the regular season in the on-deck circle when Bobby Thomson hit the Shot Heard 'Round the World against the Brooklyn Dodgers to win the three-game playoff 2-1 after the teams had tied at the end of the regular season.
The Giants went on to meet the New York Yankees in the 1951 World Series. Mays was part of the first all-African-American outfield in major league history, along with Hank Thompson and Hall of Famer Monte Irvin in game one of the 1951 World Series.  Mays hit poorly, while the Giants lost the series 4-2. The six-game set was the only time that Mays and the aging Joe DiMaggio would play on the same field. Mays was a popular figure in Harlem. Magazine photographers were fond of chronicling his participation in local stickball games with kids. It was said that in the urban game of hitting a rubber ball with an adapted broomstick handle, Mays could hit a shot that measured "six sewers" (the distance of six consecutive New York City manhole covers, nearly 300 feet).  The United States Army drafted Mays in 1952 and he subsequently missed most of the that season and all of the 1953 season. Despite the Korean War, Mays spent most of his time in the Army playing baseball at Fort Eustis, Virginia.  Mays missed about 266 games due to military service.Mays returned to the Giants in 1954, hitting for a league-leading .345 batting average and slugging 41 home runs. Mays won the National League Most Valuable Player Award and the Hickok Belt as top professional athlete of the year. In addition, the Giants won the National League pennant and the 1954 World Series, sweeping the Cleveland Indians in four games. The 1954 series is perhaps best remembered for "The Catch", an over-the-shoulder running grab by Mays in deep center field of the Polo Grounds of a long drive off the bat of Vic Wertz during the eighth inning of game 1. Considered the iconic image of Mays' playing career and one of baseball's most memorable fielding plays,    the catch prevented two Indian runners from scoring, preserving a tie game.  The Giants won the game in the 10th inning, with Mays scoring the winning run. The Giants went on to win the 1954 World Series, the team's last championship while based in New York. The next time was 56 years later when the San Francisco Giants won the World Series in 2010.
Mays went on to perform at a high level each of the last three years the Giants were in New York. In 1956, he hit 36 homers and stole 40 bases, being only the second player, and first National League player, to join the "30-30 club". In 1957, the first season the Gold Glove award was presented, he won the first of 12 consecutive Gold Glove Awards. At the same time, Mays continued to finish in the National League's top-five in a variety of offensive categories. Mays, Roberto Clemente (also with 12), Al Kaline, Andruw Jones, and Ken Griffey, Jr. are the only outfielders to have ten or more career Gold Gloves. In 1957, Mays become the fourth player in Major League history to join the 20–20–20 club (2B, 3B, HR), something no player had accomplished since 1941. Mays also stole 38 bases that year, making him the second player in baseball history (after Frank Schulte in 1911) to reach 20 in each of those four categories (doubles, triples, homers, steals) in the same season.
San Francisco Giants (1958–72)After the 1957 season, the Giants franchise and Mays relocated to San Francisco, California. Mays bought two homes in San Francisco, then lived in nearby Atherton.   As he did in 1954, Mays vied for the National League batting title in 1958 until the final game of the season. Mays collected three hits in the game to finish with a career-high .347, but Philadelphia Phillies' Richie Ashburn won the title with a .350 average. In 1959 the Giants led by two games with only eight games to play, but only won two of their remaining games and finished fourth, as their pitching staff collapsed due to overwork of their top hurlers. The Dodgers won the pennant following a playoff with the Milwaukee Braves.  As he did in New York, Mays would "play around" with kids playing sandlot ball in San Francisco. On three occasions in 1959 or 1960, he visited Julius Kahn Playground, five blocks from where he lived, including one time Giant players Jim Davenport and Tom Haller. Alvin Dark was hired to manage the Giants before the start of the 1961 season and named Mays team captain. The improving Giants finished 1961 in third place and won 85 games, more than any of the previous six campaigns. Mays had one of his best games on April 30, 1961, hitting four home runs against the Milwaukee Braves in County Stadium. Mays went four for five at the plate and was on deck for a chance to hit a record fifth home run when the Giants' half of the ninth inning ended.   Mays is the only Major Leaguer to have both three triples in a game and four home runs in a game.  The Giants won the National League pennant in 1962, with Mays leading the team in eight offensive categories. The team finished the regular season in a tie for first place with the Los Angeles Dodgers, and went on to win a three-game playoff series against the Dodgers, advancing to play in the World Series. The Giants lost to the Yankees in seven games, and Mays batted .250 with two extra-base hits. It was his last World Series appearance as a member of the Giants.In the 1963 and 1964 seasons Mays batted in over 100 runs and hit 85 total home runs. On July 2, 1963, Mays played in a game when future Hall of Fame members Warren Spahn and Juan Marichal each threw 15 scoreless innings. In the bottom of the 16th inning, Mays hit a home run off Spahn for a 1–0 Giants victory. Mays won his second MVP award in 1965 behind a career-high 52 home runs. On September 13, 1965, he hit his 500th career home run on off Don Nottebart. Warren Spahn, off whom Mays hit his first career home run, was his teammate at the time. After the home run, Spahn greeted Mays in the dugout, asking "Was it anything like the same feeling?" Mays replied "It was exactly the same feeling. Same pitch, too."  On August 22, 1965, Mays and Sandy Koufax acted as peacemakers during a 14-minute brawl between the Giants and Dodgers after San Francisco pitcher Juan Marichal had bloodied Dodgers catcher John Roseboro with a bat. Mays played in over 150 games for 13 consecutive years (a major-league record) from 1954 to 1966. In 1966, his last with 100 RBIs, Mays finished third in the National League MVP voting. It was the ninth and final time he finished in the top five in the voting for the award.  In 1970, the Sporting News named Mays as the 1960s "Player of the Decade."Mays hit his 600th home run off of San Diego's Mike Corkins in September 1969. Plagued by injuries that season, he managed only 13 home runs. Mays enjoyed a resurgence in 1970, hitting 28 homers, and got off to a fast start in 1971, the year he turned 40. He had 15 home runs at the All-Star break, but faded down the stretch and finished with 18. Mays helped the Giants win the division title that year, but they lost the NLCS to the Pittsburgh Pirates.During his time on the Giants, Mays was friends with fellow player Bobby Bonds. When Bobby's son, Barry Bonds, was born, Bobby asked Willie Mays to be Barry's godfather. Mays and the younger Bonds have maintained a close relationship ever since. 
New York Mets (1972–73)In May 1972, the 41-year-old Mays was traded to the New York Mets for pitcher Charlie Williams and $50,000 ($  today).     At the time, the Giants franchise was losing money. Owner Horace Stoneham could not guarantee Mays an income after retirement and the Mets offered Mays a coaching position upon his retirement. Mays had remained popular in New York long after the Giants had left for San Francisco, and the trade was seen as a public relations coup for the Mets. Mets owner Joan Whitney Payson, who was a minority shareholder of the Giants when the team was in New York, had long desired to bring Mays back to his baseball roots and was instrumental in making the trade.  On May 14, 1972, in his Mets debut, Mays put New York ahead to stay with a fifth-inning home run against Don Carrithers and his former team, the Giants, on a rainy Sunday afternoon at Shea Stadium. Then on August 17, 1973, in a game against the Cincinnati Reds with Don Gullett on the mound, Willie hit a fourth inning solo home run over the right-center field fence. It was the 660th, and last, home run of his major league career.Mays played a season and a half with the Mets before retiring, appearing in 133 games. The New York Mets honored him on September 25, 1973, (Willie Mays' Night) where he thanked the New York fans and said goodbye to America. He finished his career in the 1973 World Series, which the Mets lost to the Oakland Athletics in seven games. Mays got the first hit of the Series, but had only seven at-bats (with two hits). He also fell down in the outfield during a play where he was hindered by the glare of the sun and by the hard outfield. Mays later said, "growing old is just a helpless hurt." In 1972 and 1973, Mays was the oldest regular position player in baseball. He became the oldest position player to appear in a World Series game. Willie's Time, by Charles Einstein Mays retired after the 1973 season with a lifetime batting average of .302 and 660 home runs. His lifetime total of 7,095 outfield fielding putouts remains the major league record. Mays is the only Major League player to have hit a home run in every inning from the 1st through the 16th innings.  He finished his career with a record 22 extra-inning home runs.
Post-playing daysAfter Mays stopped playing baseball, he remained an active personality. Just as he had during his playing days, Mays continued to appear on various TV shows, in films and in other forms of non-sports-related media. He remained in the New York Mets organization as their hitting instructor until the end of the 1979 season.  It was there where he taught future Mets' star Lee Mazzilli his famous basket catch. On January 23, 1979, Mays was elected to the Baseball Hall of Fame in his first year of eligibility.  He garnered 409 of the 432 ballots cast (roughly 95 percent);  referring to the other 23 voters, acerbic New York Daily News columnist Dick Young wrote, "If Jesus Christ were to show up with his old baseball glove, some guys wouldn't vote for him. He dropped the cross three times, didn't he?" Mays took up golf a few years after his promotion to the major leagues and quickly became an accomplished player, playing to a handicap of about four. After he retired, he played golf frequently in the San Francisco area. Shortly after his Hall of Fame election, Mays took a job at the Park Place Casino (now Bally's Atlantic City) in Atlantic City, New Jersey. While there, he served as a Special Assistant to the Casino's President and as a greeter. Hall of Famer Mickey Mantle was also a greeter during that time. When Baseball Commissioner Bowie Kuhn heard of this, he suspended both men from involvement in organized baseball for violating the league's rules on gambling. Peter Ueberroth, Kuhn's successor, lifted the suspension in 1985.Since 1986, Willie Mays has served as Special Assistant to the President of the San Francisco Giants. Mays' number 24 is retired by the San Francisco Giants. AT&T Park, the Giants stadium, is located at 24 Willie Mays Plaza. In front of the main entrance to the stadium is a larger-than-life statue of Mays. He also serves on the advisory board of the Baseball Assistance Team, a 501(c)(3) non-profit organization dedicated to helping former Major League, Minor League, and Negro league players through financial and medical difficulties.On February 10, 2010, Mays appeared on The Daily Show, discussing his career and a new biography, Willie Mays: The Life, the Legend, by James S. Hirsch.A frequent traveler, Mays is one of 66 holders of American Airlines' lifetime passes. 
Special honors and tributes
 
When Mays' godson Barry Bonds tied him for third on the all-time home run list, Mays greeted and presented him with a diamond-studded Olympic torch (given to Mays when he carried the torch during its tour through the United States).  In 1992, when Bonds signed a free agent contract with the Giants, Mays personally offered Bonds his retired #24 (the number Bonds wore in Pittsburgh) but Bonds declined, electing to wear #25 instead, honoring his father Bobby Bonds who wore that number with the Giants. Willie Mays Day was proclaimed by former mayor Willie Brown and reaffirmed by mayor Gavin Newsom to be every May 24 in San Francisco, paying tribute not only to his birth in the month (May 6), but also to his name (Mays) and jersey number (24). The date is also the anniversary of his call-up to the major leagues. On May 24, 2004, during the 50-year anniversary of The Catch, Mays received an honorary Doctorate of Humane Letters degree from Yale University. On December 6, 2005, he received the Bobby Bragan Youth Foundation Lifetime Achievement Award for his accomplishments on and off the field.On July 30, 2006, he was the Tee Ball Commissioner at 2006 White House Tee Ball Initiative [2]On June 10, 2007, Mays received an honorary doctorate from Dartmouth College.At the 2007 All-Star Game in San Francisco, Mays received a special tribute for his legendary contributions to the game and threw out the ceremonial first pitch.On December 5, 2007, California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger and First Lady Maria Shriver inducted Mays into the California Hall of Fame, located at The California Museum for History, Women and the Arts. 
On June 4, 2008, Community Board 10 in Harlem voted unanimously to name an eight-block service road that connects to the Harlem River Drive from 155th Street to 163rd Street running adjacent to his beloved Polo Grounds—Willie Mays Drive. On May 23, 2009, Mays gave the commencement address at San Francisco State University and received an honorary Doctor of Humane Letters.On July 14, 2009, he accompanied U.S. President Barack Obama to St. Louis aboard Air Force One for the Major League All-Star Game. On March 19, 2010, he was inducted into the African-American Ethnic Sports Hall of Fame On May 6, 2010, on the occasion of his 79th birthday, Mays appeared on the floor of the California State Senate where they proclaimed it Willie Mays Day in the state.On May 15, 2010, Mays was awarded the Major League Baseball Beacon of Life Award at the Civil Rights game at Great American Ballpark.The band Widespread Panic makes reference to Mays in the song One Arm Steve from their album 'Til the Medicine Takes.
1956 Willie Mays Major League Negro-American All-Stars TourIn 1956, Mays got many of Major League Baseball's biggest black stars to go on a tour around the country after the season had ended to play exhibition games.  While much of the tour was undocumented, one venue was Andrews Field,  located in Fort Smith, Arkansas, on October 16.  Among the players who played in that game were Mays, Frank Robinson, Hank Aaron, Elston Howard, Monte Irvin, Gene Baker, Charlie Johnson, Sam Jones, Hank Thompson and Joe Black.
Television appearancesIn addition to appearances in baseball documentaries and on talk shows, Mays has appeared in several sitcoms over the years, always as himself.  He appeared as the mystery guest during different incarnations of the long running game show What's My Line?.  He was in three episodes of The Donna Reed Show: "Play Ball" and "My Son the Catcher" (both 1964) and "Calling Willie Mays" (1966).  Also in 1966, he appeared in the "Twitch or Treat" episode of Bewitched, in which Darrin Stephens asks if Mays is a warlock, and Samantha Stephens replies, "The way he hits?  What else?"  In 1989, he appeared in My Two Dads, in the episode "You Love Me, Right?", and in the episode "The Field" of Mr. Belvedere.  Additionally, he performed "Say Hey: The Willie Mays Song" on episode 4.46 of The Colgate Comedy Hour in 1954.[3]
Personal lifeMays married Margherite Wendell Chapman (1926–2010) in 1956, and they adopted their son Michael, who was born in 1959.  The couple divorced in 1962 or 1963, varying by source. In November 1971, Mays married Mae Louise Allen.
"Say Hey Kid" and other nicknamesIt is not clear how Mays became known as the "Say Hey Kid." One story is that in 1951, Barney Kremenko, a writer for the New York Journal, proceeded to refer to Mays as the 'Say Hey Kid' after he overheard Mays say, "'Say who,' 'Say what,' 'Say where,' 'Say hey,'".  Another story is that Jimmy Cannon created the nickname because Mays didn't know everybody's names when he first arrived in the minors. "You see a guy, you say, 'Hey, man. Say hey, man,' " Mays said. "Ted [Williams] was the 'Splinter'. Joe [DiMaggio] was 'Joltin' Joe'. Stan [Musial] was 'The Man'. I guess I hit a few home runs, and they said 'There goes the 'Say Hey Kid." Years before he became the "Say Hey Kid", when he began his professional career with the Black Barons, Mays was called "Buck" by teammates and fans.    Some Giants players referred to him, their team captain, as "Cap."
See also 
 

Bay Area Sports Hall of Fame
500 home run club
List of Major League Baseball Home Run Records
List of top 300 Major League Baseball home run hitters
List of major league players with 2,000 hits
List of Major League Baseball players with 400 doubles
List of Major League Baseball players with 100 triples
List of Major League Baseball players with 1000 runs
List of Major League Baseball players with 1000 RBIs
List of Major League Baseball leaders in career stolen bases
3000 hit club
30-30 club
20–20–20 club
50 home run club
List of Major League Baseball batting champions
List of Major League Baseball home run champions
List of Major League Baseball runs scored champions
List of Major League Baseball stolen base champions
List of Major League Baseball triples champions
Batters with four home runs in one game
Major League Baseball titles leaders
 
References and notes 
References

David Pietrusza, Matthew Silverman & Michael Gershman, ed. (2000). Baseball: The Biographical Encyclopedia. Total/Sports Illustrated.
"Willie's Time: A Memoir Of Another America", by Charles Einstein
Willie Mays, by Arnold Hano, Tempo Books, Grosset & Dunlop, Inc. NY. copyright 1966, first printing, August 1966, Library of Congress Number 66-17205
The Series, an illustrated history of Baseball's postseason showcase, 1903–1993, The Sporting News, copyright 1993, The Sporting News publishing co. ISBN 0-89204-476-4


External links 
 
 
 
 

Willie Mays article, Encyclopedia of Alabama
May 1951: Minneapolis Tribune account of Mays' first home game as a Minneapolis Miller
Willie Mays: Say Hey! – slideshow by Life magazine

   
DEFAULTSORT




























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Louis Lucien Bonaparte
 
Louis Lucien Bonaparte (January 4, 1813 – November 3, 1891) was the third son of Napoleon's second surviving brother, Lucien Bonaparte.  He was born at Thorngrove, mansion in Grimley, Worcestershire, England, where his family were temporarily interned after having been captured by the British en route to America  British Library, Ibid. A philologist and politician, he spent his youth in Italy and did not go to France until 1848, when he served two brief terms in the Assembly as representative for Corsica (1848) and for the Seine départements (1849) before moving to London, where he spent most of the remainder of his life. His classification of dialects of the Basque language is still used.He also denounced William Pryce for having plagiarized the research of Edward Lhuyd into Cornish and other Celtic languages.Louis Lucien Bonaparte died at Fano, Italy. He is buried at St. Mary's Roman Catholic Cemetery, Kensal Green. 
References

Howard Louis Conard, Encyclopedia of the History of Missouri (New York: 1901), Vol. IV, p. 530
Out of the confusion of tongues: Louis-Lucien Bonaparte (1813–1891), British Library's detailed biography
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT













 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Georg Johannes von Trapp
 


Korvettenkapitän Georg Johannes, Ritter  von Trapp (April 4, 1880 – May 30, 1947), known as Baron von Trapp, was an Austro-Hungarian Navy officer.       His exploits at sea during World War I earned him numerous decorations, including the prestigious Military Order of Maria Theresa. The story of his family served as the inspiration for the musical The Sound of Music. 
Birth and naval careerGeorg Johannes Ritter von Trapp was born in Zara, Kingdom of Dalmatia, then a Crown Land of the Austro-Hungarian Empire, now Zadar in Croatia. His father, Fregattenkapitän August Trapp, was a naval officer who had been elevated to the Austrian nobility in 1876 which entitled him and his descendants to the style of Ritter (Knight) von in the case of male and von in the case of female offspring. August Ritter von Trapp died in 1884, when Georg was four. His mother was Hedwig Wepler. Von Trapp's older sister was the Austrian artist Hede von Trapp. His brother, Werner von Trapp, died in World War I in 1915. In 1894, von Trapp followed in his father's footsteps and entered the Austro-Hungarian Navy, entering the naval academy at Fiume (Rijeka).  He graduated four years later and completed two years of follow-on training voyages including a trip to Australia. In 1900 he was assigned to the armored cruiser Kaiserin und Königin Maria Theresia and was decorated for his performance during the Boxer Rebellion. In 1902 he passed the officer's examination. He was fascinated by submarines, and in 1908 he seized the opportunity to be transferred to the newly-formed U-boot-Waffe. In 1910 he was given command of the newly-constructed U-6, which was christened by Agathe Whitehead, granddaughter of the Englishman Robert Whitehead, inventor of the torpedo.  He commanded U-6 until 1913.On April 17, 1915, von Trapp took command of U-5 and conducted nine combat patrols. While in command of the U-5 he sank the following:-

the French armored cruiser   at 39.30N, 18.15E on April 21, 1915,   south of Cape Santa Maria di Leuca,
the Italian submarine   at 42.23N, 16.16E on August 5, 1915, 250 metres off Pelagosa (Palagruža) Island.

He captured:

the Greek steamer Cefalonia off Durazzo on August 29, 1915.

He is sometimes credited with sinking the Italian troop transport Principe Umberto, but in reality, this was sunk by U-5 under von Trapp's successor Friedrich Schlosser (1885–1959) on June 8, 1916, after von Trapp was transferred to the U-14.On October 14, 1915, he was transferred to the captured French submarine Curie, which the Austrian Navy redesignated U-14.
While in command of U-14, he sank:

the British tanker Teakwood at 36.39N, 21.10E on April 28, 1917,
the Italian steamer Antonio Sciesa at 36.39N, 21.15E on May 3, 1917,
the Greek steamer Marionga Goulandris at 35.38N, 22.36E on July 5, 1917,
the French steamer Constance at 36.51N, 17.25E on August 23, 1917,
the British steamer Kilwinning at 35.26N, 16.30E on August 24, 1917,
the British steamer Titian at 34.20N, 17.30E on August 26, 1917,
the British steamer Nairn at 34.05N, 19.20E on August 28, 1917,
the Italian steamer   at 34.44N, 19.16E on August 29, 1917,
the British steamer Good Hope at 35.53N, 17.05E on October 18, 1917,
the British steamer Elsiston at 35.40N, 17.28E on October 18, 1917,
the Italian steamer Capo Di Monte at 34.53N, 19.50E on October 23, 1917.

He conducted ten more war patrols, until, in May 1918, he was promoted to Korvettenkapitän (equal to Lieutenant Commander) and given command of the submarine base in the Gulf of Kotor.At the end of World War I, von Trapp's wartime record stood at 19 war patrols; 11 cargo vessels totalling 45,669 tons sunk, plus the Léon Gambetta and Nereide and 1 cargo vessel captured. Among other honors, he received the Knight's Cross of the Military Order of Maria Theresa.The end of the First World War saw the defeat and collapse of the Austro-Hungarian Empire. In the process, Austria was reduced in size to its German-speaking core – losing its seacoast – and had no further need for a navy, leaving von Trapp without a job.
First marriageVon Trapp was first married to Agathe Whitehead, who was a niece of St John Brodrick, 1st Earl of Midleton and a granddaughter of Robert Whitehead, the inventor of the first modern torpedo.    It was she who had christened the U-boat U-6, his first command.  Agathe's inherited wealth sustained the couple and permitted them to start a family. Their first child, Rupert, Social Security Death Index as "Rupert Vontrapp" 1 November 1911 – 22 February 1992; 05672 (Stowe, Lamoille, VT); 127-14-1082; Social Security issued in New York  was born on November 1, 1911, at Pola. The family lived at Pina Budicina 11.  The Villa Trapp is at Pina Budicina 11 at    The marriage produced six more children: Agathe, also born at Pola; Maria Franziska; Werner;    Hedwig; and Johanna; all born at Zell am See at the family home—the Erlhof The Erlhof is at   --and Martina, born at Klosterneuburg at the family home, the Martinsschlössel. The Martinsschlössel is at   On September 3, 1922, Agathe Whitehead died of scarlet fever contracted from her daughter Agathe.  The family purchased a villa in Aigen, a suburb of Salzburg, and moved in 1924.  The family villa in Aigen is at    About 1926 Maria Franziska was recovering from an illness and was unable to attend school, so von Trapp hired Maria Augusta Kutschera, from the nearby Nonnberg Abbey, as a tutor.
Second marriageVon Trapp, 47, married Maria, 22, on November 26, 1927.     They had three children: Rosmarie, born February 8, 1929,   in Salzburg, Austria; Eleonore, born May 14, 1931, in Salzburg; and Johannes, born January 17, 1939, in Philadelphia, bringing the total number of von Trapp's children to ten.      
Later lifeIn 1935, von Trapp's money, inherited from his first wife, was invested in a bank in England. At that time, however, Austria was under economic pressure from a hostile Germany, and Austrian banks were in a precarious position. To help a friend in the banking business, Auguste Caroline Lammer (1885–1937), von Trapp withdrew most of his money from London and deposited it in an Austrian bank; unfortunately, it failed, wiping out most of the family's fortune.  As Maria further indicates in her book, von Trapp was thoroughly demoralized and depressed at this turn of events, but was unable to engage in other gainful activities, believing that it was beneath the dignity of the family to sing in public or otherwise work for a living. Prior to the loss of the family fortune, the family had engaged in singing as a hobby.Faced with an impossible situation of little or no money and a husband incapable of providing for her or for the family, Maria took charge and began to make arrangements for the family to sing at various events as a way of earning a livelihood. At about that time, a Catholic priest, Franz Wasner, around Maria's age, came to live with them and became the group's musical director.  Maria also entrusted the priest with management of the family's finances as treasurer of the Trapp Family Austrian Relief fund.Around 1936 Lotte Lehmann heard the family sing, and she suggested they perform paid concerts. When the Austrian Chancellor Kurt von Schuschnigg heard them on the radio, he invited them to perform in Vienna. According to Maria von Trapp's memoirs, Captain von Trapp found himself in an awkward situation in 1936. He had been offered a prestigious commission in Germany's naval forces. Already anti-Nazi, he chanced to observe Adolf Hitler and other Nazi luminaries behaving crudely in a Munich restaurant, which sealed his decision to turn down the offer. Contrary to the plot of The Sound of Music, von Trapp was in no danger of being forced to join the Navy of the Third Reich as Austria was not yet under German control.  The incident still drew the Trapps' attention to the growing political situation and they decided to leave Austria.In another separation of real life and drama, since the Captain had been born into what later became the Italian territory of Zara, the family were all Italian citizens as a result. Therefore, the family left Austria for Italy by train in broad daylight, rather than by hiking 300km over the mountains outside Salzburg to Switzerland in the middle of the night as in the The Sound of Music. The family then sailed to the United States for their first concert tour, then went back to Europe to tour Scandinavia in 1939.    During this time, they went back to Salzburg for a few months before returning to Sweden to finish the tour. From there, they traveled to Norway to begin the trip back to the United States in September 1939. After living for a short time in Merion, Pennsylvania, where they welcomed their youngest child, Johannes, the family settled in Stowe, Vermont, in 1941. They purchased a   farm in 1942 and converted it into the Trapp Family Lodge.  They built a home which they named Cor Unum (One Heart).In January 1947, Major General Harry J. Collins turned to the von Trapp family in the USA pleading for help for the Austrian people, having seen the residents of Salzburg suffer when he had arrived there with the famed 42nd Rainbow Division after World War II. The Trapp Family founded the Trapp Family Austrian Relief, Inc.Von Trapp died of lung cancer on May 30, 1947, in Stowe, Vermont. 
Children

Name  Mother  Birth  Death  Notes 
Rupert  Agathe Whitehead  November 1, 1911       He married Henriette Lajoie (1927) in 1947 and had two sons and four daughters; they later divorced. He later married Janice Tyre (1920–1994), and had no children with her.  He was a physician.  Social Security Death Index as "Janice T. Vontrapp" 26 June 1920; 21 December 1994 (V) 05672 (Stowe, Lamoille, VT); 05672 (Stowe, Lamoille, VT) 169-14-4569; Social Security issued in Pennsylvania  
Agathe  March 12, 1913       She worked as a singer and an artist, and lived in Baltimore, Maryland. Agatha also ran a kindergarten with her longtime friend of 50 years, Mary Louise Kane, at the Sacred Heart Catholic parish in Glyndon, Maryland. She had no children.    
         She worked as a singer and missionary in Papua New Guinea, now lives in Vermont, no children. In 2008 she visited the ancestral home.   
Werner       Social Security Death Index as "Werner Vontrapp" 21 December 1915; 11 October 2007 (V) 05673 (Waitsfield, Washington, VT); 127-14-1139; Social Security issued in New York       He married Erika Klambauer in 1948 and had four sons and two daughters, including Elisabeth von Trapp.    
Hedwig  July 28, 1917       She worked as a teacher, lived in Austria and died of asthma, no children. 
Johanna  September 7, 1919    She married Ernst Florian Winter in 1948 and had three sons, one died, and four daughters. She lived in Vienna and died there.  
Martina  February 17, 1921      In 1949, she married Jean Dupiere (died before 1998). She died of complications during childbirth and had a stillborn daughter. 
Rosmarie  Maria Kutschera   or 1929   Rosmarie worked as a singer and missionary in Papua New Guinea. She most recently lived in Pittsburgh, and had no children.  
Eleonore      She married Hugh David Campbell in 1954 and has seven daughters. She lives with her family in Waitsfield, Vermont.   
Johannes       Married 1969 to Lynne Peterson and has one son, Sam von Trapp, and one daughter, Kristina von Trapp-Frame. Johannes manages the family resort in Stowe, Vermont, with his son Sam.     

References 
Map locations  

 
 
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Shevonne Durkin
Shevonne Durkin is an American actress. Born in 1969.  She starred in the 1994 horror movie Leprechaun 2 among other movies and television shows.Filmography :2001 Folly Island
Brianne 1999 Speedway Junky
Bridget 1998 La croisière s'amuse, nouvelle vague (TV series)
Joan
– All Aboard (1998) … Joan 1998 Beverly Hills (TV series)
Fay
– Reunion (1998) … Fay 1994 Tammy and the T-Rex
Wendy 1994 Magic Kid II
Venus 1994 Les dessous de Palm Beach (TV series)
Schoo
– Ask the Dust (1994) … Schoo 1994 Dead at 21 (TV series)
Fire
– Hotel California (1994) … Fire 1994 Leprechaun 2
Bridget 1994 Huck and the King of Hearts
Mavis 1993 Le tueur du futur
Carol Maibaum 1993 The Liars' Club
Marla Matthews 1992 Rage and Honor
Groupie 1992 Les années coup de coeur (TV series)
Inga Finnstrom
– Double Double Date (1992) … Inga Finnstrom 
External links

 

 
DEFAULTSORT



 
 
	Lee Armstrong
 
 
Lee Armstrong (born January 2, 1970) is an American actress. She starred in two movies in 1995, Magic Island and Leprechaun 3. She had an uncredited role in the 40 minute family short "Classic Stories for Children" in 1992. According to IMDB she appeared in a commercial for Ocean Spray. She also served as an intern on the Howard Stern radio show.
External links

 
 

 
DEFAULTSORT


 
 
 
 
 
	Michelle Pfeiffer
 
 
Michelle Marie Pfeiffer ( ;  born April 29, 1958) is an American actress. She made her film debut in 1980 in The Hollywood Knights, but first garnered mainstream attention with her performance in Scarface (1983). Pfeiffer received Academy Award nominations as Best Supporting Actress for Dangerous Liaisons (1988) and Best Actress in The Fabulous Baker Boys (1989) and Love Field (1992). She has had her greatest commercial successes with Batman Returns (1992), What Lies Beneath (2000), and Hairspray (2007). Her other films include Ladyhawke (1985),  The Witches of Eastwick (1987), Married to the Mob (1988), The Age of Innocence (1993), Wolf (1994), Dangerous Minds (1995), I Am Sam (2001), Cheri (2009), New Year's Eve (2011), and Dark Shadows (2012).
Early lifePfeiffer was born in Santa Ana, California, the second of four children of Richard Pfeiffer, a heating and air-conditioning contractor,  and Donna (née Taverna), a housewife. She has one elder brother, Rick (born 1955), and two younger sisters, Dedee Pfeiffer, a television and film actress,  and Lori Pfeiffer (born 1965).  Her father was of German, Dutch, and Irish descent, and her mother was of Swiss and Swedish ancestry.    The family moved to Midway City, where Pfeiffer spent her childhood.  She attended Fountain Valley High School, graduating in 1975.  She worked as a check-out girl at Vons supermarket, and attended Golden West College.  After a short stint training to be a court stenographer, she decided upon an acting career.  She won the Miss Orange County beauty pageant in 1978, and participated in Miss California the same year, finishing in sixth position.  Following her participation in these pageants, she acquired an acting agent and began to audition for television and films. 
Career

First television and film appearancesPfeiffer's early acting appearances included television roles in Fantasy Island,    Delta House and BAD Cats, and small film roles in Falling in Love Again (1980) with Susannah York, The Hollywood Knights (1980) opposite Tony Danza, and Charlie Chan and the Curse of the Dragon Queen (1981), none of which met with much critical or box office success. Pfeiffer later said of her early screen work: "I needed to learn how to act... in the meantime, I was playing bimbos and cashing in on my looks."  She appeared in a television commercial for Lux soap,  and took acting lessons at the Beverly Hills Playhouse,  before appearing in three further television movies – Callie and Son (1981) with Lindsay Wagner, The Children Nobody Wanted (1981), and a remake of Splendor in the Grass. She then landed her first major film role as Stephanie Zinone in Grease 2 (1982), the sequel to the smash-hit musical Grease (1978).  The film was a critical and commercial failure, although Pfeiffer herself received some positive attention, notably from the New York Times, which said "although she is a relative screen newcomer, Miss Pfeiffer manages to look much more insouciant and comfortable than anyone else in the cast."  Despite escaping the critical mauling, Pfeiffer's agent later admitted that her association with the film meant that "she couldn't get any jobs. Nobody wanted to hire her."   
Mainstream attentionDirector Brian De Palma, having seen Grease 2, refused to audition Pfeiffer for Scarface (1983), but relented upon the producer's insistence. She was cast as cocaine-addicted trophy wife Elvira Hancock.    The film was considered excessively violent by most critics, but became a commercial hit and gained a large cult following in subsequent years.  Pfeiffer received positive reviews for her supporting turn; Richard Corliss of Time Magazine wrote, "most of the large cast is fine: Michelle Pfeiffer is better..."  while Dominick Dunne, in an article for Vanity Fair titled "Blonde Ambition", wrote, "[s]he is on the verge of stardom. In the parlance of the industry, she is hot." Following Scarface, she accepted the roles of Isabeau d'Anjou in Richard Donner's fantasy film Ladyhawke (1985) opposite Rutger Hauer and Matthew Broderick, Diana in John Landis' comedy Into the Night (1985) opposite Jeff Goldblum, Faith Healy in Alan Alda's Sweet Liberty (1986) opposite Michael Caine, and Brenda Landers in a segment of the 1950s sci-fi parody Amazon Women on the Moon (1987), all of which, despite achieving only modest commercial success, helped to establish her as an actress. She finally scored a major box-office hit as Sukie Ridgemont in the 1987 adaptation of John Updike's novel The Witches of Eastwick, alongside Jack Nicholson, Cher and Susan Sarandon. The film grossed $63,766,510 domestically (equivalent to $  million in 2016 dollars  ). 
Critical acclaim
Pfeiffer was cast against type, as a murdered gangster's widowed moll on the run, in Jonathan Demme's mafia comedy Married to the Mob (1988), opposite Matthew Modine, Dean Stockwell and Mercedes Ruehl. For the role of Angela de Marco, she donned a curly brunette wig and a Brooklyn accent,    and received her first Golden Globe Award nomination as Best Actress in a Motion Picture Musical or Comedy, beginning a six-year streak of consecutive Best Actress nominations at the Golden Globes.   Pfeiffer then appeared as chic restauranteuse Jo Ann Vallenari in Tequila Sunrise (1988) opposite Mel Gibson and Kurt Russell, but experienced creative and personal differences with director Robert Towne, who later described her as the "most difficult" actress he has ever worked with. At Demme's personal recommendation,  Pfeiffer joined the cast of Stephen Frears's Dangerous Liaisons (1988) alongside Glenn Close and John Malkovich, playing the virtuous victim of seduction, Madame Marie de Tourvel. Her performance won her widespread acclaim; Hal Hinson of the Washington Post saw Pfeiffer's role as "the least obvious and the most difficult. Nothing is harder to play than virtue, and Pfeiffer is smart enough not to try. Instead, she embodies it. Her porcelain-skinned beauty, in this regard, is a great asset, and the way it's used makes it seem an aspect of her spirituality."  She won the BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Supporting Role  and received a nomination for the Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress. Pfeiffer then accepted the role of Susie Diamond, a hard-edged former call girl turned lounge singer, in The Fabulous Baker Boys (1989), which co-starred Jeff Bridges and Beau Bridges as the eponymous Baker Boys. She underwent intensive voice training for the role for four months, and performed all of her character's vocals.  The film was a modest success, grossing $18,428,904 domestically (equivalent to $  million in 2016 dollars  ).  Pfeiffer's portrayal of Susie, however, drew raves from critics. Janet Maslin, from The New York Times, wrote of the performance "[...]she proves to be electrifyingly right. Introducing Ms. Pfeiffer's furiously hard-boiled, devastatingly gorgeous Susie into the Bakers' world affects the film the way a match might affect a fuse,"  while Roger Ebert compared her to Rita Hayworth in Gilda and Marilyn Monroe in Some Like It Hot, and described the film as "one of the movies they will use as a document, years from now, when they begin to trace the steps by which Pfeiffer became a great star."  Variety singled out her performance of 'Makin' Whoopee', writing that Pfeiffer "hits the spot in the film's certain-to-be-remembered highlight... crawling all over a piano in a blazing red dress. She's dynamite."  During the 1989–1990 awards season, Pfeiffer dominated the Best Actress category at every major awards ceremony, winning awards at the Golden Globes, the National Board of Review, the National Society of Film Critics, the New York Film Critics Circle, the Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress and the Chicago Film Critics Association. At the Academy Awards, she was favored to win the Best Actress Oscar,  but the award went to Jessica Tandy for Driving Miss Daisy in what was considered a surprise upset.  The only other major acting award for which she was nominated that she did not take home for The Fabulous Baker Boys was the BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role, which also went to Tandy. 
International success
Pfeiffer continued to build on her A-list status in Hollywood, accepting and also turning down many high-profile roles, beginning with the title role in Pretty Woman (1990), which earned Julia Roberts a nomination for the Academy Award for Best Actress.  She took the part of the Soviet book editor Katya Orlova in the 1990 film adaptation of John le Carré's The Russia House, opposite Sean Connery, a role that required her to adopt a Russian accent. For her efforts, she was rewarded with a Golden Globe nomination for Best Performance by an Actress in a Motion Picture - Drama.  Pfeiffer then landed the role of damaged waitress Frankie in Garry Marshall's Frankie and Johnny (1991), a film adaptation of Terrence McNally's Broadway play Frankie and Johnny in the Clair de Lune, which reunited her with her Scarface co-star, Al Pacino. The casting was seen as controversial by many, as Pfeiffer was considered far too beautiful to play an "ordinary" waitress;  Kathy Bates, the original Frankie on Broadway, also expressed disappointment over the producers' choice.  Pfeiffer herself stated that she took the role because it "wasn't what people would expect of [her]."  Pfeiffer was once again nominated for a Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama for her performance. During this period, she turned down the role of Clarice Starling in The Silence of the Lambs (1991), which won Jodie Foster the Academy Award for Best Actress, the role of Catherine Tramell in Basic Instinct (1992), ultimately played by Sharon Stone,   and the role of Louise in Ridley Scott's Thelma & Louise, that went to the twelve-years-older Susan Sarandon. Pfeiffer earned an Academy Award nomination for Actress in a Leading Role and a Golden Globe nomination for Best Performance by an Actress in a Motion Picture Drama for her performance as Lurene Hallett in the nostalgic independent drama Love Field (1992). This film had been temporarily shelved by the financially troubled Orion Pictures. It was finally released in late 1992, in time for Oscar consideration. The New York Times review wrote of Pfeiffer as "again demonstrating that she is as subtle and surprising as she is beautiful." Rich, Frank. "Review/Theater; Night of Stars, and Also Shakespeare." New York Times. July 10, 1989.  For her portrayal of the eccentric Dallas housewife, she won the Silver Bear Best Actress award at the Berlin Film Festival.      
Pfeiffer took the role of Catwoman (Selina Kyle) in Tim Burton's Batman Returns (1992) opposite Michael Keaton and Danny DeVito. For the role of Catwoman, she trained in martial arts and kickboxing. One co-star stated that "Michelle had four stunt doubles – but she did all her own whippin'."  Peter Travers of Rolling Stone praised her for giving the "feminist avenger a tough core of intelligence and wit" and called her a "classic dazzler."  Premiere retrospectively lauded her performance: "Arguably the outstanding villain of the Tim Burton era, Michelle Pfeiffer's deadly kitten with a whip brought sex to the normally neutered franchise. Her stitched-together, black patent leather costume, based on a sketch of Burton's, remains the character's most iconic look. And Michelle Pfeiffer overcomes Batman Returns heavy-handed feminist dialogue to deliver a growling, fierce performance."  The movie met a big box office success, grossing over $266 million worldwide (equivalent to $  million). The following year, she played Countess Ellen Olenska in Martin Scorsese's film adaptation of Edith Wharton's The Age of Innocence (1993) opposite Daniel Day-Lewis and Winona Ryder. For this role she received the Elvira Notari Prize at the Venice Film Festival, and a Golden Globe nomination for Best Performance by an Actress in a Motion Picture.   That same year she was awarded the Women in Film Los Angeles' Crystal Award for outstanding women who, through their endurance and the excellence of their work, have helped to expand the role of women within the entertainment industry. Pfeiffer's subsequent career choices have met with varying degrees of success. After The Age of Innocence, she played the role of Laura Alden opposite Jack Nicholson in Wolf (1994), a horror film that garnered a mixed critical reception.  The New York Times wrote: "Ms. Pfeiffer's role is underwritten, but her performance is expert enough to make even diffidence compelling".  The movie engrossed US$65 million (equivalent to $  million) in the domestic box office and US$131 million worldwide (equivalent to $  million).  Her next role was that of high school teacher and former US Marine LouAnne Johnson in the surprise box office hit Dangerous Minds (1995).  She appeared as her character in the music video for the soundtrack's lead single, 'Gangsta's Paradise' by Coolio (featuring L.V.), which was used by the producer Jerry Bruckheimer for television advertising. A 60-second version was aired on music channels, while a 30-second cut was aired in the rest of the networks.  The song won the 1996 Grammy Award for Best Rap Solo Performance,  and the video won the MTV Video Music Award for Best Rap Video. 
In 1996, she turned down the Golden Globe Award-winning role of Eva Perón in the biopic Evita, which went to Madonna.  Pfeiffer then portrayed Sally Atwater in the romantic drama Up Close & Personal (1996) opposite Robert Redford.  The film's screenplay, co-written by husband and wife team John Gregory Dunne and Joan Didion, was intended to be a biographical account of the career of news anchor Jessica Savitch, but the final version had almost nothing to do with Savitch's life, leading Dunne to write an exposé of his eight-year battle with the Hollywood producers, Monster: Living Off the Big Screen. She took the role of Gillian Lewis in To Gillian on Her 37th Birthday (1996), which was adapted by her husband David Kelley from Michael Brady's play of the same name.  She served as an executive producer and starred as the divorced single mother architect Melanie Parke in the romantic comedy One Fine Day (1996) opposite George Clooney,  Subsequent performances included Rose Cook Lewis in the film adaptation of Jane Smiley's Pulitzer Prize-winning novel A Thousand Acres (1997) with Jessica Lange and Jennifer Jason Leigh,  Beth Cappadora in The Deep End of the Ocean (1998) about a married couple who found their son who was kidnapped nine years ago,  Titania the Queen of the Fairies in A Midsummer Night's Dream (1999) with Kevin Kline, Rupert Everett and Stanley Tucci,  and Katie Jordan in Rob Reiner's comedy-drama The Story of Us (1999) opposite Bruce Willis. During the 1990s, Pfeiffer attracted comment in the media for her beauty. In 1990, she appeared on the cover of People magazine's first 50 Most Beautiful People In The World issue. She was again featured on the cover of the annual issue in 1999, having made the "Most Beautiful" list a record six times during the decade (1990, 1991, 1992, 1993, 1996, 1999). Pfeiffer is the first celebrity to have appeared on the cover of the annual issue twice, and the only person to be featured on the cover twice during the 1990s. The Hitchcockian thriller What Lies Beneath (2000) with Harrison Ford, was a commercial success, opening number one at the box office in July 2000.  She then accepted the role of highly strung lawyer Rita Harrison in I Am Sam (2001) opposite Sean Penn.  The movie received unfavorable reviews,  The Seattle Post-Intelligencer wrote: "Pfeiffer, apparently stymied by the bland clichés that prop up her screechy role, delivers her flattest, phoniest performance ever". For her performance as murderous artist Ingrid Magnussen in White Oleander (2002), alongside Alison Lohman in her film début, Renée Zellweger and Robin Wright Penn, Pfeiffer garnered a substantial amount of critical praise. Stephen Holden of the New York Times wrote that "Ms. Pfeiffer, giving the most complex screen performance of her career, makes her Olympian seductress at once irresistible and diabolical."  Kenneth Turan of the Los Angeles Times described her as "incandescent," bringing "power and unshakable will to her role as mother-master manipulator" in a "riveting, impeccable performance."  She earned Best Supporting Actress Awards from the San Diego Film Critics Society and the Kansas City Film Critics Circle, as well as a Screen Actors Guild Award nomination.Pfeiffer also did voice work in two animated films during this period, voicing Tzipporah in The Prince of Egypt (1998), in which she introduced the Academy Award–winning song, 'When You Believe', and Eris in Sinbad: Legend of the Seven Seas (2003).
Return to filmAfter a four-year hiatus, during which she remained largely out of the public eye to devote time to her husband and children,  she turned down the role of the White Witch in the 2005 fantasy film The Chronicles of Narnia: The Lion, The Witch and The Wardrobe, which went to Tilda Swinton.  Pfeiffer returned to the screen in 2007 with villainous roles in two major summer blockbusters, as Velma Von Tussle in the film adaptation of the Broadway musical Hairspray (2007) with John Travolta, Christopher Walken and Queen Latifah,  and as ancient witch Lamia in fantasy adventure Stardust (2007) opposite Claire Danes, Charlie Cox and Robert De Niro. Pfeiffer then accepted the roles of Rosie in Amy Heckerling's I Could Never Be Your Woman (2007) with Paul Rudd and Saoirse Ronan,  and Linda in Personal Effects (2009), which she starred opposite Ashton Kutcher and Kathy Bates, and was premiered at Iowa City's Englert Theatre.  Her next film, an adaptation of Colette's Chéri (2009), reunited her with the director (Stephen Frears) and screenwriter (Christopher Hampton) of Dangerous Liaisons (1988), a film for which all three were nominees for (and, in Hampton's case, recipient of) an Academy Award. Pfeiffer played the role of Léa de Lonval opposite Rupert Friend in the title role, with Kathy Bates as his mother. Chéri premiered at the Berlin Film Festival in February 2009, and received a nomination for the Golden Bear award.  The Times of London reviewed the film favorably, describing Hampton's screenplay as a "steady flow of dry quips and acerbic one-liners" and Pfeiffer's performance as "magnetic and subtle, her worldly nonchalance a mask for vulnerability and heartache."  Roger Ebert in the Chicago Sun-Times wrote that it was "fascinating to observe how Pfeiffer controls her face and voice during times of painful hurt."  Kenneth Turan in the Los Angeles Times praised the "wordless scenes that catch Léa unawares, with the camera alone seeing the despair and regret that she hides from the world. It's the kind of refined, delicate acting Pfeiffer does so well, and it's a further reminder of how much we've missed her since she's been away." 
After another short break from film, Pfeiffer appeared in Garry Marshall's 2011 romantic comedy New Year's Eve (Marshall also directed Pfeiffer in 1991's Frankie and Johnny), and had a role with Chris Pine in People Like Us (2012). She appeared in an adaptation of former television series Dark Shadows, directed by Tim Burton (who Pfeiffer had previously worked with, in 1992's Batman Returns), alongside Johnny Depp, Helena Bonham Carter, and Chloë Grace Moretz. In the film, she plays the family Matriarch, Elizabeth Collins Stoddard. Pfeiffer is set to play the "tough mother" and wife of actor Robert De Niro's character  in Luc Besson's mob-comedy Malavita which started production in August 2012. The film is set for a 2013 release. 
TheaterIn 1989, Pfeiffer made her stage debut in the role of Olivia in Twelfth Night, a New York Shakespeare Festival production staged in Central Park. Other film actors appearing in the play included Jeff Goldblum as Malvolio and Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio as Viola.   Frank Rich's review in the New York Times was extremely critical of the production, stating "Ms. Pfeiffer offers an object lesson in how gifted stars with young careers can be misused by those more interested in exploiting their celebrity status than in furthering their artistic development."  Rich praised Pfeiffer's performance in what was then her most recent film, the screwball comedy Married to the Mob, but stating it was "unfortunate that the actress has been asked to make both her stage and Shakespearean comic debut in a role chained to melancholy and mourning." 
Personal life
While taking acting classes in Los Angeles, Pfeiffer was taken in by a friendly couple who ran a metaphysics and vegetarian cult. While they helped Pfeiffer to no longer drink, smoke, or do drugs, the couple took control of her entire life. Much of her money went to the group. "I was brainwashed... I gave them an enormous amount of money." Pfeiffer, insecure, felt that she could no longer live without them. At an acting class taught by Milton Katselas in Los Angeles, Pfeiffer met fellow budding actor, Peter Horton. Pfeiffer and Horton began dating. The actor took notice of the young actress' plight, and decided to try to help her. Horton was cast in a film called Split Image. His character in the film is enrolled in Peter Fonda's cult. He is then de-programmed by James Woods. While doing research in San Francisco for the role, Horton took Pfeiffer along to meet real-life cult de-programmers. It was due to this experience that Pfeiffer finally felt strong enough to leave the couple.  Pfeiffer and Horton eventually married in Santa Monica in 1981, and it was on their honeymoon that she discovered she had won the lead role in Grease 2.  Horton directed Pfeiffer in a 1985 ABC TV special, One Too Many, in which she played the high school girlfriend of an alcoholic student (Val Kilmer);  and in 1987, the real-life couple played an on-screen couple in the 'Hospital' segment of John Landis's comedy skit compilation, Amazon Women on the Moon. However, they decided to separate in 1988, and were divorced two years later; Horton later blamed the split on their devotion to their work rather than their marriage. After her marriage to Horton, Pfeiffer had a three-year relationship with actor/producer Fisher Stevens. They met when Pfeiffer was starring in the New York Shakespeare Festival production of Twelfth Night, in which Stevens played the part of Sir Andrew Aguecheek.  In January 1993, Pfeiffer was set up on a blind date with television writer and producer David E. Kelley, who took her to the movies to see Bram Stoker's Dracula the following week, and they began dating seriously.    They married on November 13, 1993. Since then, she has made an uncredited cameo appearance in one episode of Kelley's television series Picket Fences and played the title character in To Gillian On Her 37th Birthday, for which Kelley wrote the screenplay.  Pfeiffer and Kelley have two children, Claudia and John. Pfeiffer had entered into private adoption proceedings before she met Kelley.  In March 1993, she adopted a newborn daughter, Claudia Rose,  who was christened on  Pfeiffer and Kelley's wedding day.  In August 1994, Pfeiffer gave birth to a son, John Henry. Having been a smoker for ten years and having a niece who suffered from leukemia for ten years, she decided to support the American Cancer Society.  Her charity work also includes her support for the Humane Society.   Pfeiffer is vegan. 
Filmography

Year Title Role Notes 
1980   Suzie Q  
1980 Falling in Love Again Sue Wellington  
1981 Charlie Chan and the Curse of the Dragon Queen Cordelia Farenington  
1982 Grease 2 Stephanie Zinone Nominated—Young Artist Award for Best Young Motion Picture Actress 
1983 Scarface Elvira Hancock  
1985 Into the Night Diana  
1985 Ladyhawke Isabeau d'Anjou Nominated—Saturn Award for Best Actress 
1986 Sweet Liberty Faith Healy  
1987   Sukie Ridgemont  
1987 Amazon Women on the Moon Brenda Landers  
1988 Married to the Mob Angela de Marco Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actress - Motion Picture Musical or Comedy 
1988 Tequila Sunrise Jo Ann Vallenari  
1988 Dangerous Liaisons Madame Marie de Tourvel BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Supporting Role Nominated—Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated—Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated—National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Supporting Actress 
1989   Susie Diamond Golden Globe Award for Best Actress - Motion Picture Drama Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress National Board of Review Award for Best Actress National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actress New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated—BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated—American Comedy Award for Funniest Actress in a Motion Picture (Leading Role) 
1990   Katya Orlova Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actress - Motion Picture Drama 
1991 Frankie and Johnny Frankie Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actress - Motion Picture Musical or Comedy 
1992 Batman Returns Selina Kyle/Catwoman Nominated—MTV Movie Award for Most Desirable Female Nominated—MTV Movie Award for Best Kiss  (with Michael Keaton)  
1992 Love Field Lurene Hallett Silver Bear for Best Actress Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actress - Motion Picture Drama Nominated—New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress 
1993   Countess Ellen Olenska Elvira Notari Prize Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actress - Motion Picture Drama Nominated—Dallas-Fort Worth Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated—David di Donatello for Best Foreign Actress (Migliore Attrice Straniera) 
1994 Wolf Laura Alden Nominated—Saturn Award for Best Actress 
1995 Dangerous Minds LouAnne Johnson Blockbuster Entertainment Award for Favorite Actress - Drama Nominated—MTV Movie Award for Best Female Performance Nominated—MTV Movie Award for Most Desirable Female 
1996 Up Close & Personal Sally 'Tally' Atwater  
1996 To Gillian on Her 37th Birthday Gillian Lewis  
1996 One Fine Day Melanie Parker Blockbuster Entertainment Award for Favorite Actress - Comedy/Romance Nominated—Kids' Choice Award for Favorite Movie Actress Executive producer 
1997   Rose Cook Lewis Verona Love Screens Film Festival Award for Best Actress  (with Jessica Lange and Jennifer Jason Leigh)  Producer (uncredited) 
1998   Tzipporah Voice 
1999   Beth Cappadora  
1999   Titania  
1999   Katie Jordan  
2000 What Lies Beneath Claire Spencer Blockbuster Entertainment Award for Favorite Actress - Suspense Nominated—Saturn Award for Best Actress 
2001 I Am Sam Rita Harrison Williams  
2002 White Oleander Ingrid Magnussen Kansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best Supporting Actress San Diego Film Critics Society Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated—Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Supporting Role Nominated—Washington D.C. Area Film Critics Association Award for Best Supporting Actress 
2003 Sinbad: Legend of the Seven Seas Eris Voice 
2007 Stardust Lamia Nominated—Saturn Award for Best Supporting Actress 
2007 Hairspray Velma Von Tussle Broadcast Film Critics Association Award for Best Cast Hollywood Film Festival Award for Ensemble of the Year Palm Springs International Film Festival Award for Ensemble Cast Nominated—Screen Actors Guild Award for Best Cast in a Motion Picture 
2007 I Could Never Be Your Woman Rosie  
2009 Personal Effects Linda  
2009 Cheri Lea de Lonval  
2011 New Year's Eve Ingrid  
2012 Dark Shadows Elizabeth Collins Stoddard  
2012 People Like Us Lillian  
2013 Malavita Maggie Blake filming 


Television credits
Year Title Role Notes 
1978 Fantasy Island Athena Episode: "The Island of Lost Women/The Flight of Great Yellow Bird" 
1979 Delta House The Bombshell 2 episodes ("Hoover and the Bomb", "The Legacy") 
1979   Tricia  
1979 CHiPs Jobina Episode: "The Watch Commander" 
1980 Enos Joy 1 episode 
1980 B.A.D. Cats Samantha "Sunshine" Jensen  
1981 Fantasy Island Deborah Dare Episode: "Elizabeth's Baby/The Artist and the Lady" 
1981 Callie & Son Sue Lynn Bordeaux credited as Michele Pfeiffer 
1981 Splendor in the Grass Ginny Stamper  
1981   Jennifer Williams  
1985 One Too Many Annie ABC Afterschool Special 
1987 Tales from the Hollywood Hills: Natica Jackson Natica Jackson  
1993   Mindy Simmons Episode: "The Last Temptation of Homer" 
1993 Picket Fences Client Episode: "Freezer Burn" 
1996 Muppets Tonight Herself 1 episode 

References 
External links 
 

 
 
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT

















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	A. P. J. Abdul Kalam
 
 
 
 
 Avul Pakir Jainulabdeen Abdul Kalam ( ; born 15 October 1931) usually referred to as Dr. A. P. J. Abdul Kalam, is an Indian scientist and administrator who served as the 11th President of India. Kalam was born and raised in Rameswaram, Tamil Nadu, studied physics at the St. Joseph's College, Tiruchirappalli, and aerospace engineering at the Madras Institute of Technology (MIT), Chennai. Before his term as President, he worked as an aerospace engineer with Defence Research and Development Organisation (DRDO) and Indian Space Research Organisation (ISRO).  Kalam is popularly known as the Missile Man of India for his work on the development of ballistic missile and launch vehicle technology.  He played a pivotal organizational, technical and political role in India's Pokhran-II nuclear tests in 1998, the first since the original nuclear test by India in 1974. Some scientific experts have however called Kalam a man with no authority over nuclear physics but who just carried on the works of Homi J. Bhabha and Vikram Sarabhai.  Kalam was elected the President of India in 2002, defeating Lakshmi Sahgal and was supported by both the Indian National Congress and the Bharatiya Janata Party, the major political parties of India. He is currently a visiting professor at Indian Institute of Management Ahmedabad and Indian Institute of Management Indore, Chancellor of the Indian Institute of Space Science and Technology Thiruvananthapuram, a professor of Aerospace Engineering at Anna University (Chennai), JSS University (Mysore) and an adjunct/visiting faculty at many other academic and research institutions across India. Kalam advocated plans to develop India into a developed nation by 2020 in his book India 2020. Books authored by him have received considerable demands in South Korea for the translated versions.  He has received several prestigious awards, including the Bharat Ratna, India's highest civilian honour. Kalam is known for his motivational speeches and interaction with the student community in India.  He launched his mission for the youth of the nation in 2011 called the What Can I Give Movement with a central theme to defeat corruption in India. Kalam was also criticized for inaction as a president on the pending mercy plea petitions, that delayed prosecution of the convicts.
Early life and educationKalam was born on 15 October 1931 to Jainulabdeen, a boat owner and Ashiamma, a housewife, at Rameswaram, located in the South Indian state of Tamil Nadu.           He came from a poor background and started working at an early age to supplement his family's income.    He was brought up in a multi-religious environment but did follow a religious routine.  After completing school, Kalam distributed newspapers in order to financially contribute to his father's income.   In his school years, he had average grades, but was described as a bright and hardworking student who had a strong desire to learn and spend hours on his studies, especially mathematics.  After completing his school education at the Rameshwaram Elementary School, Kalam went on to attend Saint Joseph's College, Tiruchirappalli where he graduated in physics in 1954.  Towards the end of the course, he was not enthusiastic about the subject and would later regret the four years he studied it. He then moved to Madras in 1955 to study aerospace engineering.  While Kalam was working on a senior class project, the Dean was dissatisfied with the lack of progress and threatened revoking his scholarship unless the project was finished within the next two days. He worked tirelessly on his project and met the deadline, impressing the Dean who later said, "I [Dean] was putting you [Kalam] under stress and asking you to meet a difficult deadline". 
Career as scientist 
After graduating from Madras Institute of Technology (MIT – Chennai) in 1960, Kalam joined Aeronautical Development Establishment of Defense Research and Development Organization (DRDO) as a chief scientist. Kalam started his career by designing a small helicopter for the Indian Army, but remained unconvinced with the choice of his job at DRDO.     Kalam was also part of the INCOSPAR committee working under Vikram Sarabhai, the renowned space scientist.  In 1969, Kalam was transferred to the Indian Space Research Organization (ISRO) where he was the project director of India's first indigenous Satellite Launch Vehicle (SLV-III) which successfully deployed the Rohini satellite in near earth orbit in July 1980. Joining ISRO was one of Kalam's biggest achievements in life and he is said to have found himself when he started to work on the SLV project. Kalam first started work on an expandable rocket project independently at DRDO in 1965.    In 1969, Kalam received the government's approval and expanded the program to include more engineers. 
In 1963–64, he visited Nasa's Langley Research Center in Hampton Virginia, Goddard Space Flight Center in Greenbelt, Maryland and Wallops Flight Facility situated at Eastern Shore of Virginia.      
During the period between the 1970s and 1990s, Kalam made an effort to develop the Polar SLV and SLV-III projects, both of which proved to be success.Kalam was invited by Raja Ramanna to witness the country's first nuclear test Smiling Buddha as the representative of TBRL, even though he had not participated in the development, test site preparation and weapon designing. In the 1970s, a landmark was achieved by ISRO when the locally built Rohini-1 was launched into space, using the SLV rocket.  In the 1970s, Kalam also directed two projects, namely, Project Devil and Project Valiant , which sought to develop ballistic missiles from the technology of the successful SLV programme.  Despite the disapproval of Union Cabinet, Premier Indira Gandhi allotted secret funds for these aerospace projects through her discretionary powers under Kalam's directorship.  Kalam played an integral role convincing the Union Cabinet to conceal the true nature of these classified aerospace projects.   
His research and educational leadership brought him great laurels and prestige in 1980s, which prompted the government to initiate an advanced missile program under his directorship.  Kalam and Dr. V. S. Arunachalam, metallurgist and scientific adviser to the Defense Minister, worked on the suggestion by the then Defense Minister, R. Venkataraman on a proposal for simulataneous development of a quiver of missiles instead of taking planned missiles one by one.    R Venkatraman was instrumental in getting the cabinet approval for allocating 388 crore rupees for the mission, named Integrated Guided Missile Development Program (I.G.M.D.P) and appointed Kalam as the Chief Executive.  Kalam played a major part in developing many missiles under the mission including Agni, an intermediate range ballistic missile and Prithvi, the tactical surface-to-surface missile, although the projects have been criticised for mismanagement and cost and time overruns.     He was the Chief Scientific Adviser to the Prime Minister and the Secretary of Defence Research and Development Organisation from July 1992 to December 1999. The Pokhran-II nuclear tests were conducted during this period where he played an intensive political and technological role. Kalam served as the Chief Project Coordinator, along with R. Chidambaram during the testing phase.     Photos and snapshots of him taken by the media elevated Kalam as the country's top nuclear scientist. In 1998, along with cardiologist Dr.Soma Raju, Kalam developed a low cost Coronary stent. It was named as "Kalam-Raju Stent" honouring them.   In 2012, the duo, designed a rugged tablet PC for health care in rural areas, which was named as "Kalam-Raju Tablet". 
PresidencyAbdul Kalam served as the 11th President of India, succeeding K. R. Narayanan. He won the 2002 presidential election with an electoral vote of 922,884, surpassing 107,366 votes won by Lakshmi Sahgal. He served from 25 July 2002 to 25 July 2007. On 10 June 2002, the National Democratic Alliance (NDA) which was in power at the time, expressed to the leader of opposition, Indian National Congress president Sonia Gandhi that they would propose Kalam for the post of President.  The Samajwadi Party and the Nationalist Congress Party backed his candidacy.   After the Samajwadi Party announced its support for him, President K. R. Narayanan chose not to seek a second term in office and hence left the field clear for Kalam to become the 11th President of India.  On 18 June, Kalam filed his nomination papers in the Parliament of India, accompanied by Vajpayee and his senior Cabinet colleagues. 
The polling for the presidential election began on 15 July 2002 in the Parliament and the state assemblies with media claiming that the election was a one-sided affair and Kalam's victory was a foregone conclusion. The counting was held on 18 July.  Kalam won the presidential election in a highly one-sided contest. He became the 11th president of the Republic of India.  He moved into the Rashtrapati Bhavan after he was sworn in on 25 July.  Kalam was the third President of India to have been honoured with a Bharat Ratna, India's highest civilian honour, before becoming the President. Dr. Sarvapali Radhakrishnan (1954) and Dr. Zakir Hussain (1963) were the earlier recipients of Bharat Ratna who later became the President of India.  He was also the first scientist and the first bachelor to occupy Rashtrapati Bhawan. During his term as President, he was affectionately known as the People's President.      In his words, signing the Office of Profit Bill was the toughest decision he had taken during his tenure. Kalam is criticized for inaction as a President in deciding the fate of 20 out of the 21 mercy petitions.  Article 72 of the Constitution of India empowers the President of India to grant pardon, suspend and remit death sentences and commute the death sentence of convicts on death row.   Kalam acted on only one mercy plea in his 5 year tenure as a President, rejecting the plea of rapist Dhananjoy Chatterjee, who was hanged thereafter.    The most important of the 20 pleas is thought to be that of Afzal Guru, a Kashmiri terrorist who was convicted of conspiracy in the December 2001 attack on the Indian Parliament and was sentenced to death by the Supreme Court of India in 2004.    While the sentence was scheduled to be carried out on 20 October 2006, the pending action on the mercy plea resulted in him continuing in the death row. At the end of his term, on 20 June 2007, Kalam expressed his willingness to consider a second term in office provided there was certainty about his victory in the 2007 presidential election.  However, two days later, he decided not to contest the Presidential election again stating that he wanted to avoid involving Rashtrapati Bhavan from any political processes.  He did not have the support of the Left parties, Shiv Sena and UPA constituents to receive a renewed mandate.     Nearing the term expiry of the 12th President Pratibha Patil, whose tenure ends on 24 July 2012, media reports in April claimed that Kalam was likely to be nominated for his second term.    After the reports, social networking sites were abuzz with activities extending their support for his candidature.   BJP potentially backed his nomination, saying that the party will lend their support if Trinamool Congress, Samajwadi Party and Indian National Congress proposes his name for the 2012 presidential election.   Just a month ahead of the election, Mulayam Singh Yadav and Mamata Banerjee also expressed their support to Kalam and revealed that they both would suggest his name.  Days after expressing support, Mulayam Singh Yadav backed out, leaving Mamata Banerjee as a solitary supporter.    
On 18 June 2012, Kalam refused to contest 2012 presidential poll after much speculations.   
 
Criticisms and controversiesThe controversy that surrounds Kalam's role as a nuclear scientist, is the lack of reliable and factual reporting of the yield of Pokhran-II tests.    The director of the site test, K. Santhanam, publicly admitted that the thermonuclear bomb was a "fizzle" test, criticising Kalam for issuing the wrong report.  However, Kalam dismissed the claims and R. Chidambaram, a key associate of Pokhran-II, also described these claims as incorrect.  
Personal attacksIn spite of his leading role in the development of Indian nuclear programme, Kalam has received criticism from many of his  peers who claimed that he had "no authority" over nuclear science.    Homi Sethna, a chemical engineer criticised Kalam claiming that Kalam had no background in publishing articles in nuclear science, even in nuclear physics. Sethna maintained that Kalam received his masters degree in aerospace engineering, which is a completely different discipline from nuclear engineering, and what various universities awarded him for his achievements had nothing to do with nuclear physics. Sethna, in his last interview, maintained that in the 1950s, Kalam had failed advanced physics courses during his college life and quoted "What does he know (about [nuclear] physics)....?", on the national television. Homi Sethna also accused Kalam of using his presidency to gain a national stature of a nuclear scientist.  Others felt that Kalam had never worked in any of the Indian nuclear power plants and had no role in developing the nuclear weapon which was completed under Raja Ramanna.   Kalam worked as an aerospace engineer in a SLV project in the 1970s and from the 1980s onwards, as a project director before he moved to Defence Research and Development Organisation, Sethna concluded. The prestigious IISc,Bangalore rejected Kalam's application as they felt that he lacked scientific credentials.   In 2008, Indian media questioned his claims about his personal contributions to missile inventions  while working in a classified missile programme.  Kalam had taken credit of inventing the Agni, Prithvi and Aakash missile system.  All of these were developed, researched and designed by other scientists whereas Kalam was involved in getting the funds and other logistic tasks.  As a director of DRDO, a lot of credit had gone to Kalam. R. N. Agarwal, former director, Advanced System Laboratory and former Program Director of Agni missile was considered to be the real architect behind the successful design of Agni Missile.   In his own biography,  Kalam credited the development of Agni missile to Dr Ram Narayan Agarwal, an alumnus of MIT. For the Prithvi missile project, he named Col VJ Sundaram as the brain behind this project and for the Trishul missile, he gave credit to Commander SR Mohan.    In 2006, senior media correspondent Praful Bidwai, in the The Daily Star, wrote that two aerospace projects, Project Valiant and Project Devil, which were authorised by former Premier Indira Gandhi under the directorship of Abdul Kalam, resulted in "total failure". In the 1980s, these projects were ultimately cancelled by the government under the pressure of the Indian Army.   Kalam was also criticised by civil groups over his stand on the Koodankulam Nuclear Power Plant, where he supported setting up of the nuclear power plant and never spoke with the local people.  The protesters were hostile to his visit as they perceived to him to be a pro-nuclear scientist and were unimpressed by the assurance provided by him on the safety features of the plant. 

Frisking by American security authorities
Abdul Kalam was frisked at the JFK Airport in New York, while boarding a plane on 29 September 2011. He was subjected to "private screening" as he does not come under the category of dignitaries exempt from security screening procedures under American guidelines. He was frisked again after boarding the Air India aircraft with the US security officials asking for his jacket and shoes, claiming that these items were not checked according to the prescribed procedures during the "private screening", despite protests from the airline crew confirming him as India's president.      The incident was not reported until 13 November 2011.  India threatened retaliatory action as there was a "general sense of outrage" around the country.  The Indian Ministry of External Affairs protested over this incident and a statement by the ministry said that the US Government had written a letter to Kalam, expressing its deep regret for the inconvenience. Kalam was previously frisked by the ground staff of the Continental Airlines at the Indira Gandhi International Airport, New Delhi in July 2009 and was treated like an ordinary passenger, despite him being on the Bureau of Civil Aviation Security's list of people exempted from security screening in India. 
Future India: 2020
In his book India 2020, Kalam strongly advocates an action plan to develop India into a knowledge superpower and a developed nation by the year 2020. He regards his work on India's nuclear weapons program as a way to assert India's place as a future superpower.It was reported that, there was a considerable demand in South Korea for translated versions of books authored by him.   Kalam continues to take an active interest in other developments in the field of science and technology. He has proposed a research program for developing bio-implants. He is a supporter of Open Source over proprietary solutions and believes that the use of free software on a large scale will bring the benefits of information technology to more people. Kalam set a target of interacting with 100,000 students during the two years after his resignation from the post of scientific adviser in 1999.  In his own words, "I feel comfortable in the company of young people, particularly high school students. Henceforth, I intend to share with them experiences, helping them to ignite their imagination and preparing them to work for a developed India for which the road map is already available."    He continued to interact with students during his term as a President and also during his post-presidency period as a visiting professor at Indian Institute of Management Ahmedabad  and Indian Institute of Management Indore,  Chancellor of Indian Institute of Space Science and Technology Thiruvananthapuram,  a professor of Aerospace Engineering at Anna University (Chennai),  JSS University (Mysore),  and an adjunct/visiting faculty at many other academic and research institutions across India.
Popular culture
In May 2011, Kalam launched his mission for the youth of the nation called the What Can I Give Movement with a central theme to defeat corruption.   He also has interests in writing Tamil poetry and in playing veenai, a South Indian string instrument. He was nominated for the MTV Youth Icon of the Year award in 2003   and in 2006. 
In the 2011 Hindi film I Am Kalam, Kalam is portrayed as an extremely positive influence to a poor but bright Rajasthani boy named Chhotu, who renames himself Kalam in honour of his idol. 
Awards and honoursA. P. J. Abdul Kalam's 79th birthday was recognised as World Students' Day by United Nations.  He has also received honorary doctorates from 40 universities.   The Government of India has honoured him with the Padma Bhushan in 1981 and the Padma Vibhushan in 1990 for his work with ISRO and DRDO and his role as a scientific advisor to the Government.  In 1997, Kalam received India's highest civilian honour, the Bharat Ratna, for his immense and valuable contribution to the scientific research and modernisation of defence technology in India. 

Year of award or honour  Name of award or honour  Awarding organisation 
2012 Doctor of Laws (Honoris Causa) Simon Fraser University  
2011 IEEE Honorary Membership IEEE  
2010 Doctor of Engineering University of Waterloo  
2009 Hoover Medal ASME Foundation, USA  
2009 International von Kármán Wings Award California Institute of Technology, U.S.A  
2008 Doctor of Engineering (Honoris Causa) Nanyang Technological University, Singapore  
2007 King Charles II Medal Royal Society, U.K   
2007 Honorary Doctorate of Science University of Wolverhampton, U.K  
2000 Ramanujan Award Alwars Research Centre, Chennai    
1998 Veer Savarkar Award Government of India  
1997 Indira Gandhi Award for National Integration Government of India   
1997 Bharat Ratna Government of India     
1990 Padma Vibhushan Government of India     
1981 Padma Bhushan Government of India   

Books and documentaries

Kalam's writings
 Turning Points: A journey through challenges by A. P. J Abdul Kalam; Harper Collins India, 2012. 
Wings of Fire: An Autobiography by A. P. J Abdul Kalam, Arun Tiwari; Universities Press, 1999. 
India 2020: A Vision for the New Millennium by A. P. J Abdul Kalam, Y. S. Rajan; New York, 1998. 
Ignited Minds: Unleashing the Power Within India by A. P. J. Abdul Kalam; Viking, 2002. 
The Luminous Sparks by A. P. J. Abdul Kalam; Punya Publishing Pvt Ltd, 2004. 
Mission India by A. P. J. Abdul Kalam, Paintings by Manav Gupta; Penguin Books, 2005 
Inspiring Thoughts by A. P. J. Abdul Kalam; Rajpal & Sons, 2007 
Developments in Fluid Mechanics and Space Technology by A. P. J. Abdul Kalam and Roddam Narasimha; Indian Academy of Sciences, 1988 
Biographies
Eternal Quest: Life and Times of Dr. Kalam by S. Chandra; Pentagon Publishers, 2002.   
President A. P. J. Abdul Kalam by R. K. Pruthi; Anmol Publications, 2002.   
A. P. J. Abdul Kalam: The Visionary of India by K. Bhushan, G. Katyal; A.P.H. Pub. Corp, 2002.   
A Little Dream (documentary film) by P. Dhanapal; Minveli Media Works Private Limited, 2008. 
The Kalam Effect: My Years with the President by P.M. Nair; Harper Collins, 2008.   
My Days With Mahatma Abdul Kalam by Fr.A.K. George; Novel Corporation, 2009.   


See also

List of Presidents of India


References 
External links 

Official website
Dr. A. P. J. Abdul Kalam: Former President of India
Dr APJ Abdul Kalam Quotes
Profile of Dr. A. P. J. Abdul Kalam
  
 
 
 
   
DEFAULTSORT



















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Maarten Tromp
Maarten Harpertszoon Tromp (23 April 1598 – 10 August 1653) was an officer and later admiral in the Dutch navy. His first name is also spelled as Maerten.
Early lifeBorn in Brill, Tromp was the first son of Harpert Maertensz, a naval officer who became captain of the Olifantstromp, from the name of which ship probably the family name "Tromp" is derived, first appearing in documents in 1607. His mother washed sailor's shirts to supplement the family income. At the age of nine, Tromp went to sea with his father and was in 1607 present in a squadron covering the Dutch main fleet fighting the Battle of Gibraltar. Three years later, his father having been discharged from service because of a navy reorganisation, they sailed together on their merchantman to Guinea, when they were attacked by seven ships of the English pirate Peter Easton. Tromp's father was slain by a cannonball. According to legend the 12-year-old boy rallied the crew of the ship with the cry "Won't you avenge my father's death?" But the pirates seized him and sold him on the slave market of Salé. Two years later however, Easton, moved by pity, ordered his redemption. Set free, he supported his mother and three sisters by working in a Rotterdam shipyard, went to sea again at 19, briefly worked for the navy, but having rejoined the merchant fleet was captured once more in 1621—this time by Barbary corsairs off Tunis. He was kept as a slave until the age of 24, and by then had so impressed the Bey of Tunis and corsair John Ward, with his skills in gunnery and navigation that the latter offered him a position in his fleet. When Tromp refused, the Bey was even more impressed by this show of character and allowed him to leave as a free man. He joined the Dutch navy as a lieutenant in July 1622, entering service with the Admiralty of the Maze based in Rotterdam. On 7 May 1624 he married Dignom Cornelisdochter de Haes, the daughter of a merchant; the same year he became captain of the advice yacht St. Antonius. His first distinction was as Lieutenant-Admiral Piet Hein's flag captain on the Vliegende Groene Draeck during the fight with Ostend privateers in 1629 in which Hein was killed. That year and in 1630, when he was appointed full captain on initiative of stadtholder Frederick Henry himself, Tromp was very successful in fighting the Dunkirkers as a squadron commander, functioning as a commandeur and still using the Vliegende Groene Draeck. Despite receiving four honorary golden chains, he was not further promoted. The Vliegende Groene Draeck foundered and new heavy vessels were reserved for the flag officers, while Tromp was relegated to the old Prins Hendrik. Disappointed, after the death of his first wife  in 1633, Tromp in 1634 left the naval service for a few years to become a deacon and remarried on 12 September 1634 with Alijth Jacobsdochter Arckenboudt, the daughter of a wealthy schepen and tax collector at Brill.
Supreme commander of the confederate fleetTromp was promoted from captain to Lieutenant-Admiral of Holland and West Frisia in 1637, when Lieutenant-Admiral Philips van Dorp and other flag officers were removed for incompetence. Although formally under the Admiral-General Frederick Henry of Orange, he was in fact supreme commander of the Dutch fleet, as the stadtholders never fought at sea. Tromp was mostly occupied in blockading the privateer port of Dunkirk.In 1639, during the Dutch struggle for independence from Spain, Tromp defeated a large Spanish fleet bound for Flanders at the Battle of the Downs, marking the end of Spanish naval power. In a preliminary battle, the Action of 18 September 1639, Tromp was the first fleet commander known to deliberately use line of battle tactics. His flagship in this period was the Aemilia.In the First Anglo-Dutch War of 1652–1653 Tromp commanded the Dutch fleet in the battles of Dover, Dungeness, Portland, the Gabbard and Scheveningen.  In the last of these, he was killed by a sharpshooter in the rigging of William Penn's ship. His acting flag captain, Egbert Bartholomeusz Kortenaer, on the Brederode kept up fleet morale by not lowering Tromp's standard, pretending Tromp was still alive.The death of Maarten Tromp was not only a severe blow to the Dutch navy, but also to the Orangists who sought the defeat of the Commonwealth of England and restoration of the Stuart monarchy; Republican influence strengthened after Scheveningen, which led to peace negotiations with the Commonwealth, culminating in the Treaty of Westminster.During his career, his main rival was Vice-Admiral Witte de With, who also served the Admiralty of Rotterdam (de Maze) from 1637. De With temporarily replaced him as supreme commander for the Battle of Kentish Knock. Tromp's successor was Lieutenant-Admiral Jacob van Wassenaer Obdam.Tromp, a "sea hero", was immensely popular with the common people, a sentiment expressed by the greatest of Dutch poets, Joost van den Vondel in a famous poem describing his marble grave monument in Delft showing the admiral on his moment of death with a burning British fleet on the foreground:

Here rests the hero Tromp, the brave protector
of shipping and free sea, serving free land
his memory alive in artful spectre
as if he had just died at his last stand
His knell the cries of death, guns' thunderous call
a burning Brittany too Great for sea alone
He's carved himself an image in the hearts of all
more lasting than grave's splendour and its marble stone

Also the second son of Tromp and his first wife, Dignom Cornelisdochter de Haes, Cornelis Tromp, became later  commander of the Dutch navy, as Lieutenant-Admiral-General, and he commanded earlier the Danish navy.
LegendsIn traditional British histories, Tromp is often wrongly called "Van Tromp".  There is also a story that, after his victory at Dungeness, Tromp attached a broom to his mast as a symbol that he had swept the British from the sea.  The following year, the British admiral Robert Blake supposedly attached a whip to his mast as a symbol that he had whipped the Dutch off the sea. The legend inspired a song The Admiral's Broom, famously covered by Australian baritone Peter Dawson. This is now regarded by historians as dubious.
References

Roger Hainsworth and Christine Churches, The Anglo Dutch Naval Wars 1652-1674, Sutton Pub Ltd, 1998
Oliver Warner, Great Sea Battles, Spring Books London, 1973
R. Prud’homme van Reine, Schittering en Schandaal. Dubbelbiografie van Maerten en  Cornelis Tromp, Arbeidspers, 2001
Warnsinck, JCM, Twaalf doorluchtige zeehelden, PN van Kampen & Zoon NV, 1941
Warnsinck, JCM, Van Vlootvoogden en Zeeslagen, PN van Kampen & Zoon, 1940


External links

 

 
 
 
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Wilhelm Ackermann
 Wilhelm Friedrich Ackermann (29 March 1896 – 24 December 1962) was a German mathematician best known for the Ackermann function, an important example in the theory of computation.Ackermann was born in Herscheid municipality, Germany, and was awarded a Ph.D. by the University of Göttingen in 1925 for his thesis Begründung des "tertium non datur" mittels der Hilbertschen Theorie der Widerspruchsfreiheit, which was a consistency proof of arithmetic apparently without full Peano induction (although it did use e.g. induction over the length of proofs). From 1929 until 1948, he taught at the Arnoldinum Gymnasium in Burgsteinfurt, and then at Lüdenscheid until 1961. He was also a corresponding member of the Akademie der Wissenschaften (Academy of Sciences) in Göttingen, and was an honorary professor at the University of Münster.In 1928, Ackermann helped David Hilbert turn his 1917 – 22 lectures on introductory mathematical logic into a text, Principles of Mathematical Logic. This text contained the first exposition ever of first-order logic, and posed the problem of its completeness and decidability  (Entscheidungsproblem). Ackermann went on to construct consistency proofs for set theory (1937), full arithmetic (1940), type-free logic (1952), and a new axiomatization of set theory (1956).Although Ackermann did not choose a university career and rather continued as a high school teacher, he was continually engaged in research and published many contributions to the foundations of mathematics until the end of his life.  He died in Lüdenscheid, Germany.
See also

Ackermann coding
Ackermann ordinal
Ackermann set theory
Inverse Ackermann function


Bibliography

1928. "On Hilbert's construction of the real numbers" in Jean van Heijenoort, ed., 1967. From Frege to Godel: A Source Book in Mathematical Logic, 1879-1931. Harvard Univ. Press: 493-507.
1940. Zur Widerspruchtfreisheit der Zahlentheorie, Mathematische Annalen, vol. 117, pp 162–194.
1950 (1928).  (with David Hilbert) Principles of Mathematical Logic. Chelsea. Translation of 1938 German edition.
1954. Solvable cases of the decision problem. North Holland.


External links

 
 
Erich Friedman's page on Ackermann at Stetson University
Hermes, In memoriam WILHELM ACKERMANN 1896-1962 (pdf 945 KB)

 
DEFAULTSORT









 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	H. A. Rey

Hans Augusto "H.A." Rey (born  Hans Augusto Reyersbach; September 16, 1898 – August 26, 1977), worked with his wife Margret Rey as authors and illustrators of children's books.  They were best known for their Curious George series. Rothstein, Edward. "Monkey Business in a World of Evil," The New York Times, Friday, March 26, 2010.  
Curious George book seriesHans and Margret were both Jewish and of German birth. Hans was born in Hamburg, Germany.  They met in Brazil, where Hans was working as a salesman and Margret had gone to escape the rise of Nazism. They married in 1935 and moved to Paris that same year.While in Paris, Hans's animal drawings came to the attention of a French publisher, who commissioned him to write a children's book. The result, Cecily G. and the Nine Monkeys, is little remembered today, but one of its characters, an adorably impish monkey named Curious George, was such a success that the couple considered writing a book just about him. Their work was interrupted with the outbreak of World War II. As Jews, the Reys decided to flee Paris before the Nazis seized the city. Hans assembled two bicycles, and they fled Paris just a few hours before it fell. Among the meager possessions they brought with them was the illustrated manuscript of Curious George.      The Reys' odyssey brought them to Bayonne, France where they were issued life-saving visas signed by Vice-Consul Manuel Vieira Braga (following instructions from Aristides de Sousa Mendes) in Bayonne, France on June 20, 1940. They crossed the Spanish border, where they bought train tickets to Lisbon. From there they returned to Brazil, where they had met five years earlier, but this time they continued to New York. The Reys escaped Europe carrying the manuscript to the first Curious George book, which they then published in New York by Houghton Mifflin in 1941. Hans and Margret originally planned to use watercolor illustrations, but since they were responsible for the color separation, he changed these to the cartoon-like images that continue to be featured in each of the books. (A collector's edition with the original watercolors has since been released.)   Curious George was an instant success, and the Reys were commissioned to write more adventures of the mischievous monkey and his friend, the Man in the Yellow Hat. They wrote seven stories in all, with Hans mainly doing the illustrations and Margret working mostly on the stories, though they both admitted to sharing the work and cooperating fully in every stage of development. At first, however, Margret's name was left off the cover, ostensibly because there was already a glut of children's fiction written by women. In later editions this was changed, and Margret now receives full credit for her role in developing the stories.Curious George Takes a Job won the Lewis Carroll Shelf Award in 1960.The Reys relocated to Cambridge, Massachusetts during 1963, in a house near Harvard Square, and lived there until Hans's death in 1977.
A children's bookstore named Curious George & Friends (formerly Curious George Goes to Wordsworth) was founded in the 1990s by friends of the Reys, and operated in the Square until 2011.   
Star charts
 
Image:Gemini_constellation_map.svg|Traditional diagram of the Gemini constellation.
Image:Gemini constellation map visualization 1.PNG| Rey's alternative diagram of Gemini: twins are shown holding hands.
File:Leo_constellation_map.svg| Traditional diagram of the Leo constellation.
File:Leo_constellation_map_visualization.PNG| Rey's alternative diagram of Leo: A lion walking.
File:Virgo_constellation_map.svg|Traditional diagram of the Virgo constallation.
File:Virgo_constellation_map_visualization.PNG | Rey's alternative diagram of Virgo: A lying woman.
 Before the 1952 publication of Rey's The Stars: A New Way to See Them, (ISBN 0-395-24830-2) star charts used a conventional set of diagrams that were difficult to remember and relied on dim stars that are difficult to see in modern populated areas. Rey invented a new set of constellation diagrams that could be seen as cartoonish depictions of the creature or character the constellations was supposed to represent—- or, at least, were memorable. His constellation diagrams were adopted widely and now appear in many astronomy guides, such as Menzel's A Field Guide to the Stars and Planets. As of 2003 The Stars: A New Way to See Them, and a simplified presentation for children called Find the Constellations, are still in print.  A new edition of Find the Constellations was released in 2008, updated with modern fonts, the new status of Pluto, and some more current measurements of planetary sizes and orbital radii. [1], School Library Journal, February 2009 Dr. Lena Y. de Grummond, a professor in the field of library science (specializing in children's literature) at The University of Southern Mississippi in Hattiesburg, Miss. contacted the Reys in 1966 about the university's new children's literature collection. H.A. and Margret made a donation of a pair of sketches at the time. In 1996, after Margret's death, it was revealed in her will that the entire literary estate of the Reys were to be donated to the de Grummond Children's Literature Collection at Southern Mississippi.
Books written by H.A. Rey

Cecily G. and the Nine Monkeys
Curious George
Curious George Takes a Job
Curious George Rides a Bike
Curious George Gets a Medal
Curious George Flies a Kite
Curious George Learns the Alphabet
Curious George Goes to the Hospital
Feed the Animals
Find the Constellations
Elizabite - Adventures of a Carnivorous Plant
How Do You Get There?
Pretzel
The Stars: A New Way to See Them
Where's My Baby?
See the Circus
Whiteblack the Penguin Sees the World
Au Clair de la Lune and other French Nursery Songs (1941)
Spotty (1945)


Books illustrated by H.A. Rey

Zebrology (1937)
Katy No-Pocket (1944)


References 

New York Times: "How Curious George Escaped the Nazis"
[2]
Jaeger, Roland: H.A. und Margret Rey; in: Spalek, John M. / Feilchenfeldt, Konrad / Hawrylchak, Sandra H. (ed.): Deutschsprachige Exilliteratur seit 1933, vol. 3, USA, part 2; Bern/München 2000, p. 351−360
Jaeger, Roland: Collecting Curious George. Children's Books Illustrated by H.A. Rey; in: Firsts. The Book Collector's Magazine, vol. 8, 1998, no. 12 (Dec.), p. 50-57
Jaeger, Roland: Der Schöpfer von "Curious George": Kinderbuch-Illustrator H.A. Rey; in: Aus dem Antiquariat, 1997, No. 10, A543−A551


External links

 
Margret and H.A.Rey Interactive Timeline: Life in Paris and a Narrow Escape
Guide to the H.A. Rey papers at the University of Oregon
Guide to the H. A. and Margret Rey Collection, part of the de Grummond Children's Literature Collection at the University of Southern Mississippi
Curious George Saves the Day: The Art of Margret and H.A. Rey, The Jewish Museum (New York), March 14, 2010 - August 1, 2010.

  
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
	Margret Rey

Margret Elizabeth Rey (May 16, 1906 – December 21, 1996), born Margarete Elisabeth Waldstein, Rothstein, Edward. "Monkey Business in a World of Evil," The New York Times, Friday, March 26, 2010.  was (with her husband H. A. Rey), the co-author and illustrator of children's books, the most famous of which are the Curious George series.Margarete Waldstein was born in Hamburg in 1906; her father was a member of the Reichstag. She studied art at Bauhaus in Dessau, Kunstakademie Düsseldorf, and the University of Munich, and afterwards worked in advertising. In 1935, she left Germany for Rio de Janeiro, Brazil to escape Nazism. While there, she met her future husband Hans (who was a salesman and also from Hamburg). They married in 1935 and moved to Paris, France, in 1936.  While in Paris, Hans's animal drawings came to the attention of French publisher, who commissioned him to write a children's book. The result, Cecily G. and the Nine Monkeys, is little remembered today, but one of its characters, an adorably impish monkey named Curious George, was such a success that the couple considered writing a book just about him. Their work was interrupted with the outbreak of World War II. As Jews, the Reys decided to flee Paris before the Nazis seized the city. Hans built two bicycles, and they fled Paris just a few hours before it fell. Among the meager possessions they brought with them was the illustrated manuscript of Curious George.The Reys' odyssey brought them to the Spanish border, where they bought train tickets to Lisbon. From there they returned to Brazil, where they had met five years earlier, but this time they continued to New York, New York, USA. The books were published by Houghton Mifflin in 1941, though certain changes had to be introduced because of the technology of the time. Hans and Margret originally planned to use watercolors to illustrate the books, but since they were responsible for the color separation, he changed these to the cartoon-like images that continue to feature in each of the books. (A collector's edition with the original watercolors was released in 1998.)   Curious George was an instant success, and the Reys were commissioned to write more adventures of the mischievous monkey and his friend, the Man with the Yellow Hat. They wrote seven stories in all, with Hans mainly doing the illustrations and Margret working mostly on the stories, though they both admitted to sharing the work and cooperating fully in every stage of development. At first, however, Margret's name was left off the cover, ostensibly because there was a glut of women already writing children's fiction. In later editions, this was corrected, and Margret now receives full credit for her role in developing the stories.Margret and her husband moved to Cambridge, Massachusetts in 1963, in a house close to Harvard Square. Following her husband's death in 1977, Margret continued writing, and in 1979, became a Professor of Creative Writing at Brandeis University in Waltham, Massachusetts. Starting in 1980, she also began to collaborate with Alan Shalleck on a series of short films featuring Curious George and more than two dozen additional books.In 1989 Margret Rey established the Curious George Foundation to help creative children and prevent cruelty to animals. In 1996, she made major donations to the Boston Public Library and Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center. She was also a long-time supporter of the Longy School of Music.Dr. Lena Y. de Grummond, a professor in the field of library science (specializing in children's literature) at The University of Southern Mississippi in Hattiesburg, Miss. contacted the Reys in 1966 about the university's new children's literature collection. H.A. and Margret made a donation of a pair of sketches at the time. In 1996, after Margret's death, it was revealed in her will that the entire literary estate of the Reys was to be donated to the de Grummond Children's Literature Collection at Southern Miss.
References 
External links

 
[   The H. A. and Margret Rey Collection], The University of Southern Mississippi.
Dinitia Smith, "How Curious George Escaped the Nazis", New York Times, September 13, 2005.
Margret and H.A.Rey Interactive Timeline: Life in Paris and a Narrow Escape
Curious George Saves the Day: The Art of Margret and H.A. Rey, The Jewish Museum (New York), March 14, 2010 - August 01, 2010.
 

  
DEFAULTSORT













 
 
 
 
	Abdel-Razak al-Yehiyeh
Lieutenant General Abdel-Razak al-Yehiyeh or Abdul-Razzaq Al-Yahya (born March 15, 1929 in Tantura, near Haifa, then in the British Mandate of Palestine), also known as Abu Anas, is the Interior Minister of the Palestinian National Authority.Al-Yehiyeh trained as a military strategist and served as chief operations officer and then deputy chief-of-staff of the PLA brigade in Syria before 1967. In August 1968, he led an attempt to make PLA Syria brigades more independent of Syrian control, and was made PLA chief-of-staff by the Palestine Liberation Organisation (PLO) Executive Committee. But with Syria opposed, he resigned to become military advisor to the PLO Executive Committee from 1969 and chief-of-staff of the Palestinian Armed Struggle Command (PASC) in February 1969. He was reappointed to the PLA as commander-in-chief by the PLO Executive Committee in June 1969. Then when Yasser Arafat took on that role in September 1970, al-Yehiyeh became chief-of-staff of all Palestinian forces. Due to Syrian pressure, he was replaced in 1971, becoming director of the PLO's political department from 1971 to 1976, He was a member of the PLO Executive Committee from 1984 to 1991. Al-Yehiyeh headed security committees in talks with Israel from 1993, including final status talks, and also headed negotiations on Hebron security arrangements and safe passage. He was appointed as Interior Minister of the Palestinian Authority in June 2002, charged with overhauling Palestinian security forces. He was a member of the three-man delegation to Washington in August 2000. He was involved in security talks with Israel, and headed a centralized security apparatus for the Palestinian Authority. Al-Yehiyeh left the PA cabinet in late 2002, feeling that Arafat had prevented him from making any significant reforms. He published his book Between militarism and politics in 2006, and he is now working on publishing a new book about peace negotiations between the Palestinian National Authority PNA and Israel.He was appointed Interior Minister on June 15, 2007. 
External links and references

Sedan, Gil, "Israel doubts Arafat will deliver on reform efforts". Jewish Telegraphic Agency, Friday June 7, 2002.
"New Palestinian interior minister a retired military man", CNN. June 10, 2002. (Name misspelt)
" Palestinian Personalities".
" Jewish Virtual Library ".
" Times Magazine ".

 
DEFAULTSORT




 
	Henry Benedict Stuart
 
 Henry Benedict Thomas Edward Maria Clement Francis Xavier Stuart, Cardinal Duke of York (6 March 1725 – 13 July 1807) was a Roman Catholic Cardinal, as well as the fourth and final Jacobite heir to claim the thrones of England, Scotland, France and Ireland publicly. Unlike his father, James Francis Edward Stuart, and brother, Charles Edward Stuart, Henry made no effort to seize the throne. After Charles's death in January 1788 the Papacy did not recognise Henry as the lawful ruler of England, Scotland and Ireland, but referred to him as the Cardinal Duke of York. He spent his life in the Papal States and had a long career in the clergy of the Roman Catholic Church, rising to become the Dean of the College of Cardinals and Cardinal-Bishop of Ostia and Velletri. At the time of his death he was (and still is) one of the longest serving Cardinals in the Church's history.In his youth, Henry's father made him Duke of York (in the Jacobite peerage), and it was by this title that he was best known. Upon the death of his brother in 1788 Henry became known by Jacobites, and within his personal entourage, as Henry IX of England and Ireland and I of Scotland, although publicly he referred to himself as Cardinal-Duke of York  .
Early life
Henry was born in exile at the Palazzo Muti in Rome on 6 March 1725 and baptized on the same day by Pope Benedict XIII,  37 years after his grandfather James II and VII lost the throne, and ten years after his father's failed attempt to regain it. His father was James Francis Edward Stuart, known to his opponents as "the Old Pretender". His mother was the Princess Maria Klementyna Sobieska,  granddaughter of the Polish King, John III Sobieski.

Henry went to France in 1745 to help his brother, Prince Charles Edward Stuart ("Bonnie Prince Charlie", or "the Young Pretender") prepare the Jacobite campaign of that year. After its defeat, Henry Stuart returned to Italy. On 30 June 1747 Pope Benedict XIV conferred him with tonsure and created him Cardinal-Deacon of S. Maria in Portico in special consistory held on the 3 July 1747. On 27 August 1747 he was promoted to the four minor orders by the Pope. He received the subdiaconate on 18 August 1748 and diaconate on 25 August 1748. He was ordained priest on 1 September 1748 and consecrated titular Archbishop of Corinth on 2 October 1758.He was advanced to the order of Cardinal Priest in 1748, maintaining title to S. Maria in Portico. In 1752 he transferred to the titulus of Ss. XII Apostoli. He was made Cardinal-Bishop of Frascati on 13 July 1761, and eventually succeeded to the See of Ostia and Velletri on his appointment as Dean of the Sacred College of Cardinals on 26 September 1803.  He lived and worked in Frascati for many years, descending each afternoon in his carriage to Rome, where his position as vice-chancellor entitled him to the Palazzo della Cancelleria.
 Henry was the last claimant to the British throne to touch for the King's Evil.
French Revolution and later lifeAt the time of the French Revolution, he lost his French Royal benefices and sacrificed many other resources to assist Pope Pius VI. This, in addition to the seizure of his Frascati property by the French, caused him to descend into poverty.  The British Minister in Venice arranged for Henry to receive an annuity of £4,000 from King George III of Great Britain. Although the British government represented this as an act of charity, Henry and the Jacobites considered it to be a first installment on the money which was legally owed to him. (For many years the British government had promised to return the English dowry of his grandmother, Mary of Modena, but had never actually done so.)Henry returned to Frascati in 1803. In September of that year he became the Dean of the College of Cardinals and hence Cardinal Bishop of Ostia and Velletri, though he still lived in the episcopal palace at Frascati. He died there on 13 July 1807, aged 82.
Personal relationships
Historians have drawn upon contemporary perceptions to explore the suggestion that Henry was homosexual.  These accounts include the writings of Hester Lynch Thrale  (1741–1821), and the diplomat and writer Giuseppe Gorani  (1740–1819). However, Gorani admitted to having gathered evidence insufficient to confirm his suspicions either way.The writer Gaetano Moroni  provides the lengthiest account of Henry’s close attachment with Monsignor Lercari, his majordomo. This led to tensions between the cardinal and his father who tried to have Lercari dismissed from service and sent from Rome. A public scandal was only narrowly avoided after the personal intervention of Pope Benedict XIV.From 1769 onwards Henry remained close to Monsignor Angelo Cesarini, a nobleman from Perugia, who thanks to Henry’s protection, won various honours, was made canon of the cathedral in Frascati, and finally in 1801 became Bishop of Milevi. When Henry died, Cesarini was still at his side, as he had been for 40 years. Caution should be given, however, against assuming any active sexual relationships, because equally clear in contemporary sources is York's proper and virtuous nature, and horror of all impropriety. 
Post mortem
Under his will, which he signed as "Henry R", he was succeeded in all his claimed British rights by his friend and nearest blood-relative, Charles Emmanuel IV of Sardinia.  But Charles never asserted nor renounced his Jacobite claims, nor have any of his successors to this day.Contrary to popular belief, he did not leave the Crown Jewels to the Prince of Wales, afterwards George IV of the United Kingdom. All his property was entrusted to Monsignor Angelo Cesarini, for distribution. Cesarini sent the Prince of Wales several jewels from Henry's private collection. These included a "Lesser George" (thought to have been worn by Charles I at his execution, and now at Windsor Castle) and a St Andrew's Cross (now at Edinburgh Castle), which are insignia of the orders of the Garter and the Thistle, and also a ruby ring.Henry Benedict, his brother, his father and his mother are buried in the crypt of St. Peter's Basilica in the Vatican. There is a monument to the Royal Stuarts designed by Antonio Canova in the basilica to their memory on one of the columns in the basilica proper. This was restored within living memory at the expense of Queen Elizabeth the Queen Mother.
Titles, styles, honours and arms 
Cardinalatial titles 
During his life, Cardinal Stuart was assigned the following Diaconia and Tituli:

13 July 1747 Cardinal Deacon of Santa Maria in Portico
16 September 1748 Cardinal Priest of Santa Maria in Portico
18 December 1752 Cardinal Priest of Santi XII Apostoli
12 February 1759 Cardinal Priest of Santa Maria in Trastevere
13 July 1761 Cardinal Bishop of Frascati
14 January 1763 Comendatario of San Lorenzo in Damaso (proper of the cardinal vice-chancellor, held in addition to the suburbicarian sees)
26 September 1803 Cardinal Bishop of Ostia e Velletri (proper of the dean of the Sacred College of Cardinals)

In March 1774 he became Sub-dean, and on 15 September 1803 - Dean of the Sacred College of Cardinals.He was a cardinal elector in the papal conclaves of 1758, 1769, 1774-75 and 1799-1800.
ArmsDuring the pretence of his father and brother, Henry claimed a coat of arms consisting of those of the kingdom, differenced by a crescent argent  or white crescent.
Ancestors 
  
  
See also

Touch pieces


External links

Henry Benedict Maria Clement Stuart Catholic Encyclopedia article
 


Notes 
References

Angeli, Diego (1931) Storia romana di trent'anni, 1770-1800, Milano : Treves, 276 p.
Gorani, Giuseppe, Count (1793) Mémoires secrets et critiques des cours, des gouvernemens, et des mœurs des principaux états de l'Italie, v. 2, Paris
Piozzi, Hester Lynch (1951) Thraliana : the diary of Mrs. Hester Lynch Thrale (later Mrs. Piozzi), 1776-1809, (Katharine C.Balderston; ed.), v. 2: 1784-1809, 2nd ed., Oxford : Clarendon Press in co-operation with the Huntingdon Library, 611-1191p.
Bindelli Pietro ed. 1982 "Enrico Stuart Cardinale duca di York" Frascati, Associazione tuscolana Amici di Frascati - Stampa Poligrafica Laziale.
Schofield, N. (ed.) (2002) A Roman miscellany : the English in Rome, 1550-2000, Leominster : Gracewing, ISBN 0-85244-575-X
MacLeod, John (1999) Dynasty, the Stuarts, 1560–1807, London : Hodder and Stoughton, ISBN 0-340-70767-4.
Marshall, Rosalind K. (2006) '‘Henry Benedict (1725–1807)’', Oxford Dictionary of National Biography, Oxford University Press,   [accessed 30 November 2008]

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   
DEFAULTSORT



















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Soybean
 
 
 
 
 The soybean (US) or soya bean (UK) (Glycine max)  is a species of legume native to East Asia, widely grown for its edible bean which has numerous uses. The plant is classed as an oilseed rather than a pulse by the UN Food and Agricultural Organization (FAO).Fat-free (defatted) soybean meal is a significant and cheap source of protein for animal feeds and many prepackaged meals;    soy vegetable oil is another product of processing the soybean crop. For example, soybean products such as textured vegetable protein (TVP) are ingredients in many meat and dairy analogues.    Soybeans produce significantly more protein per acre than most other uses of land.   Traditional nonfermented food uses of soybeans include soy milk, and from the latter tofu and tofu skin. Fermented foods include soy sauce, fermented bean paste, natto, and tempeh, among others. The oil is used in many industrial applications. The main producers of soy are the United States (35%), Argentina (27%), Brazil (19%), China (6%) and India (4%).    Today, the United States is also the world's largest consumer of soybeans, with an average annual consumption of 45,313 TMT.   The beans contain significant amounts of phytic acid, alpha-linolenic acid, and isoflavones.
NameThe plant is sometimes referred to as greater bean (大豆 – Chinese dàdòu and Japanese daizu). Both the immature soybean and its dish are called edamame in Japan,   but in English, edamame refers only to a specific dish. 
Classification
The genus name Glycine was originally introduced by Carl Linnaeus (1737) in his first edition of Genera Plantarum. The word glycine is derived from the Greek – glykys (sweet) and likely refers to the sweetness of the pear-shaped (apios in Greek) edible tubers produced by the native North American twining or climbing herbaceous yambean legume, Glycine apios, now known as Apios americana. The cultivated soybean first appeared in Species Plantarum, by Linnaeus, under the name Phaseolus max L. The combination Glycine max (L.) Merr., as proposed by Merrill in 1917, has become the valid name for this useful plant.The genus Glycine Willd. is divided into two subgenera, Glycine and Soja. The subgenus Soja (Moench) F.J. Herm. includes the cultivated soybean, Glycine max (L.) Merr., and the wild soybean, Glycine soja Sieb. & Zucc. Both species are annuals. Glycine soja is the wild ancestor of Glycine max, and grows wild in China, Japan, Korea, Taiwan and Russia.  The subgenus Glycine consists of at least 16 wild perennial species: for example, Glycine canescens F.J. Herm. and G. tomentella Hayata, both found in Australia and Papua New Guinea. 
   Like some other crops of long domestication, the relationship of the modern soybean to wild-growing species can no longer be traced with any degree of certainty. It is a cultural variety with a very large number of cultivars.
Description and physical characteristicsSoy varies in growth and habit. The height of the plant varies from less than  .The pods, stems, and leaves are covered with fine brown or gray hairs. The leaves are trifoliolate, having three to four leaflets per leaf, and the leaflets are   long and   broad. The leaves fall before the seeds are mature. The inconspicuous, self-fertile flowers are borne in the axil of the leaf and are white, pink or purple.
The fruit is a hairy pod that grows in clusters of three to five, each pod is 3–8 cm long (1–3 in) and usually contains two to four (rarely more) seeds 5–11 mm in diameter.Soybeans occur in various sizes, and in many hull or seed coat colors, including black, brown, blue, yellow, green and mottled. The hull of the mature bean is hard, water-resistant, and protects the cotyledon and hypocotyl (or "germ") from damage. If the seed coat is cracked, the seed will not germinate. The scar, visible on the seed coat, is called the hilum (colors include black, brown, buff, gray and yellow) and at one end of the hilum is the micropyle, or small opening in the seed coat which can allow the absorption of water for sprouting.Remarkably, seeds such as soybeans containing very high levels of protein can undergo desiccation, yet survive and revive after water absorption. A. Carl Leopold, son of Aldo Leopold, began studying this capability at the Boyce Thompson Institute for Plant Research at Cornell University in the mid 1980s. He found soybeans and corn to have a range of soluble carbohydrates protecting the seed's cell viability.  Patents were awarded to him in the early 1990s on techniques for protecting "biological membranes" and proteins in the dry state. Compare to tardigrades.
Chemical composition of the seed 
Together, soybean oil and protein content account for about 60% of dry soybeans by weight (protein at 40% and oil at 20%). The remainder consists of 35% carbohydrate and about 5% ash. Soybean cultivars comprise approximately 8% seed coat or hull, 90% cotyledons and 2% hypocotyl axis or germ.Most soy protein is a relatively heat-stable storage protein. This heat stability enables soy food products requiring high temperature cooking, such as tofu, soy milk and textured vegetable protein (soy flour) to be made.The principal soluble carbohydrates of mature soybeans are the disaccharide sucrose (range 2.5–8.2%), the trisaccharide raffinose (0.1–1.0%) composed of one sucrose molecule connected to one molecule of galactose, and the tetrasaccharide stachyose (1.4 to 4.1%) composed of one sucrose connected to two molecules of galactose. While the oligosaccharides raffinose and stachyose protect the viability of the soybean seed from desiccation (see above section on physical characteristics) they are not digestible sugars, so contribute to flatulence and abdominal discomfort in humans and other monogastric animals, comparable to the disaccharide trehalose. Undigested oligosaccharides are broken down in the intestine by native microbes, producing gases such as carbon dioxide, hydrogen, and methane.Since soluble soy carbohydrates are found in the whey and are broken down during fermentation, soy concentrate, soy protein isolates, tofu, soy sauce, and sprouted soybeans are without flatus activity. On the other hand, there may be some beneficial effects to ingesting oligosaccharides such as raffinose and stachyose, namely, encouraging indigenous bifidobacteria in the colon against putrefactive bacteria.The insoluble carbohydrates in soybeans consist of the complex polysaccharides cellulose, hemicellulose, and pectin. The majority of soybean carbohydrates can be classed as belonging to dietary fiber.Within soybean oil or the lipid portion of the seed is contained the phytosterols: stigmasterol (17–21%), sitosterol(53–56%) and campesterol (20–23%) accounting for 2.5% of the lipid fraction.Saponins, a class of natural surfactants (soaps), are sterols that are present naturally in a wide variety of food-plants: vegetables, legumes, and cereals–ranging from beans and spinach to tomatoes, potatoes and oats. Whole soybeans contain from 0.17 to 6.16% saponins, 0.35 to 2.3% in defatted soy flour and 0.06 to 1.9% in tofu. Legumes such as soybean and chickpeas are the major source of saponins in the human diet.  Sources of non-dietary saponins include alfalfa, sunflower, herbs and barbasco. Recent studies have shown that saponins are potential functional food ingredients because of their physiological properties. Soy contains isoflavones like genistein and daidzein. It also contains glycitein, an O-methylated isoflavone which accounts for 5–10% of the total isoflavones in soy food products. Glycitein is a phytoestrogen with weak estrogenic activity, comparable to that of the other soy isoflavones. 
Nutrition 
For human consumption, soybeans must be cooked with "wet" heat to destroy the trypsin inhibitors (serine protease inhibitors). Raw soybeans, including the immature green form, are toxic to humans, swine, chickens, and in fact, all monogastric animals. Soybeans are considered by many agencies to be a source of complete protein. 
   A complete protein is one that contains significant amounts of all the essential amino acids that must be provided to the human body because of the body's inability to synthesize them. For this reason, soy is a good source of protein, amongst many others, for vegetarians and vegans or for people who want to reduce the amount of meat they eat. According to the US Food and Drug Administration:
 Soy protein products can be good substitutes for animal products because, unlike some other beans, soy offers a 'complete' protein profile. ... Soy protein products can replace animal-based foods—which also have complete proteins but tend to contain more fat, especially saturated fat—without requiring major adjustments elsewhere in the diet.  The gold standard for measuring protein quality, since 1990, is the Protein Digestibility Corrected Amino Acid Score (PDCAAS) and by this criterion soy protein is the nutritional equivalent of meat, eggs, and casein for human growth and health. Soybean protein isolate has a biological value of 74, whole soybeans 96, soybean milk 91, and eggs 97.   Soy protein is essentially identical to the protein of other legume seeds and pulses. 
      Moreover, soybeans can produce at least twice as much protein per acre than any other major vegetable or grain crop besides hemp, five to 10 times more protein per acre than land set aside for grazing animals to make milk, and up to 15 times more protein per acre than land set aside for meat production. Consumption of soy may also reduce the risk of colon cancer, possibly due to the presence of sphingolipids. 
Comparison of Soybean to other major staple foodsThe following table shows the nutrient content of green soybean and other major staple foods, each in respective raw form. Raw staples, however, aren't edible and can not be digested. These must be sprouted, or prepared and cooked for human consumption. In sprouted and cooked form, the relative nutritional and anti-nutritional contents of each of these grains is remarkably different from that of raw form of these grains reported in this table. The nutritional value of soybean and each cooked staple depends on the pre-processing and the method of cooking: boiling, frying, roasting, baking, etc.
 
Cultivation
 
Soybeans are an important global crop, providing oil and protein. In the United States, the bulk of the harvest is solvent-extracted with hexane, and the "toasted" defatted soymeal (50% protein) then makes possible the raising of farm animals (e.g. chicken, hog, turkey) on an industrial scale never before seen in human history. A very small proportion of the crop is consumed directly by humans. Soybean products do, however, appear in a large variety of processed foods.During World War II, soybeans became important in both North America and Europe chiefly as substitutes for other protein foods and as a source of edible oil. During World War II, the soybean was discovered as fertilizer by the United States Department of Agriculture. In the 1960-1 Dillon round of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT), the United States secured tariff-free access for its soybeans to the European market. In the 1960s, the United States exported over 90% of the world's soybeans.   By 2005, the top soybeans exporters were Argentina (39% of world soybean exports), United States (37%) and Brazil (16%), while top importers were China (41% of world soybean imports), European Union (22%), Japan (6%) and Mexico (6%). Cultivation is successful in climates with hot summers, with optimum growing conditions in mean temperatures of  ; temperatures of below 20 °C and over 40 °C (68 °F, 104 °F) retard growth significantly. They can grow in a wide range of soils, with optimum growth in moist alluvial soils with a good organic content. Soybeans, like most legumes, perform nitrogen fixation by establishing a symbiotic relationship with the bacterium Bradyrhizobium japonicum (syn. Rhizobium japonicum; Jordan 1982). For best results, though, an inoculum of the correct strain of bacteria should be mixed with the soybean (or any legume) seed before planting. Modern crop cultivars generally reach a height of around  , and take 80–120 days from sowing to harvesting.The U.S., Argentina, Brazil, China and India are the world's largest soybean producers and represent more than 90% of global soybean production.  The U.S. produced 75 million tons of soybeans in 2000, of which more than one-third was exported. In the 2010–2011 production year, this figure is expected to be over 90 million tons.  Other leading producers are Argentina, Brazil, Paraguay, China, and India.The average worldwide yield for soybean crops, in 2010, was 2.5 tonnes per hectare. The three largest producers had an average nationwide soybean crop yields of about 3 tonnes per hectare. The most productive soybean farms in the world in 2010 were in Turkey, with a nationwide average farm yield of 3.7 tonnes per hectare.  The world record for soybean yield is 10.8 tonnes per hectare, demonstrated in 2010 by Kip Cullers, a farmer in Purdy, Missouri.  Kip Cullers claims the secret to his record breaking soybean crop yields year after year is attention to detail, proactive management style, irrigation, herbicides, keeping plants healthy and stress free for the entire growing season.Environmental groups, such as Greenpeace and the WWF, have reported soybean cultivation and the probability of increased soybean cultivation in Brazil has destroyed huge areas of Amazon rainforest, and is encouraging further deforestation.  American soil scientist Dr. Andrew McClung, who first showed that the ecologically biodiverse savannah of the Cerrado region of Brazil could grow profitable soybeans, was awarded the 2006 World Food Prize on October 19, 2006.  In the USA human sewage sludge can be used as fertilizer to grow soybeans. Soybeans grown in sewage sludge likely contain elevated concentrations of metals.   Soybean plants are vulnerable to a wide range of bacterial diseases, fungal diseases, viral diseases and parasites. Soybeans can be grown organically, that is, without the use of synthetic pesticides and fertilizers.    
HistorySoybeans were a crucial crop in eastern Asia long before written records.  They remain a major crop in China, Japan, and Korea. Prior to fermented products such as soy sauce, tempeh, natto, and miso, soy was considered sacred for its use in crop rotation as a method of fixing nitrogen. The plants would be plowed under to clear the field for food crops.  Soy was first introduced to Europe in the early 18th century and to British colonies in North America in 1765, where it was first grown for hay. Benjamin Franklin wrote a letter in 1770 mentioning sending soybeans home from England. Soybeans did not become an important crop outside of Asia until about 1910. In America, soy was considered an industrial product only, and was not used as a food prior to the 1920s. Soy was introduced to Africa from China in the late 19th century, and is now widespread across the continent.
AsiaThe wild ancestor of the soybean is Glycine soja (previously called G. ussuriensis), a legume native to central China.    The soybean has been used in China for 5,000 years as a food and a component of drugs. According to the ancient Chinese myth, in 2853 BCE, the legendary Emperor Shennong of China proclaimed that five plants were sacred: soybeans, rice, wheat, barley, and millet.  Cultivation of soybeans was long confined chiefly to China, but gradually spread to other countries. The oldest preserved soybeans were found in archaeological sites in Korea dated about 1000 BCE, though it is uncertain if they were wild, or cultivated strains – though the size of cultivated beans, the main difference between the two, is a genetic alteration that determines whether the wild pods burst to scatter seeds, and neither feature could be determined from the remains. Wild-size soybeans have been found in the Yellow River basin of China.    Radiocarbon dating of soybean samples recovered through flotation during excavations at the Early Mumun period Okbang site in Korea indicated soybean was cultivated as a food crop in around 1000–900 BCE. From about the first century CE to the Age of Discovery (15–16th century), soybeans were introduced into several countries, such as India, Japan, Indonesia, the Philippines, Vietnam, Thailand, Cambodia, Malaysia, Burma, Taiwan and Nepal. This spread was due to the establishment of sea and land trade routes. The best current evidence on the Japanese Archipelago suggests soybean cultivation occurred in the early Yayoi period. The earliest Japanese textual reference to the soybean is in the classic Kojiki (Records of Ancient Matters), which was completed in 712 BC.Many people have claimed soybeans in Asia were historically only used after a fermentation process, which lowers the high phytoestrogens content found in the raw plant. However, terms similar to "soy milk" have been in use since 82 CE,  and there is evidence of tofu consumption that dates to 220. 
United StatesSoybeans were introduced to America in 1765 by Samuel Bowen, a sailor who had visited China. He grew soy near Savannah, Georgia, and even made soy sauce for sale to England. Soy took on a very important role in the United States after World War I. During the Great Depression, the drought-stricken (Dust Bowl) regions of the United States were able to use soy to regenerate their soil because of its nitrogen-fixing properties. Farms were increasing production to meet with government demands, and Henry Ford was a great leader of the soybean industry.In 1932–33, the Ford Motor Company spent approximately $1,250,000 on soybean research. By 1935, every Ford car had soy involved in its manufacture. For example, soybean oil was used to paint the automobiles,    as well as fluid for shock absorbers. Ford's involvement with the soybean opened many doors for agriculture and industry to be linked more strongly than ever before.Henry Ford promoted the soybean, helping to develop uses for it both in food and in industrial products, even demonstrating auto body panels made of soy-based plastics. Ford's interest led to two bushels (120 pounds)   of soybeans being used in each Ford car, as well as products like the first commercial soy milk, ice cream and all-vegetable nondairy whipped topping. The Ford development of so-called soy-based plastics was based on the addition of soybean flour and wood flour to phenol formaldehyde plastics.  
  A prototype vehicle, colloquially titled the "Soybean Car", was built in 1941 out of such plastics. In 1931, Ford hired chemists Robert Boyer and Frank Calvert to produce artificial silk. They succeeded in making a textile fiber of spun soy protein fibers, hardened or tanned in a formaldehyde bath, which was given the name Azlon. It was usable in the making of suits, felt hats, and overcoats. Though pilot production of Azlon reached 5000 pounds per day in 1940, it never reached the commercial market; Dupont's nylon was the winner in the quest to produce artificial silk.
South AmericaThe soybean first arrived in South America in Argentina in 1882. 
AfricaThe soybean first arrived in Africa in Egypt in 1857. 
AustraliaWild soybeans were discovered in northeastern Australia in 1770 by explorers Banks and Solander. In 1804, the first soyfood product ("Fine India Soy" [sauce]) was sold in Sydney. In 1879, the first domesticated soybeans arrived in Australia, a gift of the Minister of the Interior Department, Japan. 
CanadaIn 1831, the first soy product ("A few dozen India Soy" [sauce]) arrived in Canada. Soybeans were probably first cultivated in Canada by 1855, and definitely in 1895 at Ontario Agricultural College. A comprehensive history of soy in Canada (1,060 p., 2,336 references) is available online. 
Caribbean and West IndiesThe soybean arrived in the Caribbean in the form of soy sauce made by Samuel Bowen in Savannah, Georgia, in 1767. It remains only a minor crop there, but its uses for human food are growing steadily. A comprehensive history of soybeans and soyfoods in this region is available free online. 
Central AsiaThe soybean is first in cultivated Transcaucasia in Central Asia in 1876, by the Dungans. This region has never been important for soybean production. A comprehensive history of soybeans and soyfoods in this region is available online. 
Mexico and Central AmericaThe first reliable reference to the soybean in this region dates from Mexico in 1877. A comprehensive history of soybeans and soyfoods in this region is available online. 
Southeast AsiaBy the 13th century, the soybean had arrived in Indonesia; it probably arrived much earlier, carried by traders or merchants from southern China. 
South Asia and Indian SubcontinentBy the 1600s, soy sauce was being disseminated from southern Japan throughout this region by the Dutch East India Co. (VOC). The soybean probably arrived from southern China, moving southward into northern India. 
Genetic modification 

Soybeans are one of the "biotech food" crops that have been genetically modified, and genetically modified soybeans are being used in an increasing number of products. In 1995, Monsanto Company introduced Roundup Ready (RR) soybeans that have been genetically modified to be resistant to Monsanto's herbicide Roundup through substitution of the Agrobacterium sp. (strain CP4) gene EPSP (5-enolpyruvyl shikimic acid-3-phosphate) synthase. The substituted version is not sensitive to glyphosate. In 1997, about 8% of all soybeans cultivated for the commercial market in the United States were genetically modified. In 2010, the figure was 93%.  As with other "Roundup Ready" crops, concern is expressed over damage to biodiversity.  A 2003 study  concluded the RR gene had been bred into so many different soybean cultivars, there had been little decline in genetic diversity, but "diversity was limited among elite lines from some companies".The widespread use of such types of GM soybeans in the Americas has caused problems with exports to some regions. GM crops require extensive certification before they can be legally imported into the European Union, where there is considerable supplier and consumer reluctance to use GM products for consumer or animal use. Difficulties with coexistence and subsequent traces of cross-contamination of non-GM stocks have caused shipments to be rejected and have put a premium on non-GM soy. A 2006 United States Department of Agriculture report found the adoption of genetically engineered (GE) soy, corn and cotton reduced the amount of pesticides used overall, but did result in a slightly greater amount of herbicides used for soy specifically. The use of GE soy was also associated with greater conservation tillage, indirectly leading to better soil conservation, as well as increased income from off-farming sources due to the greater ease with which the crops can be managed. Most farmers adopted the GE crops to improve yields, save time and reduce the amount of money spent on pesticides. The use of GE soy also permits the use of a herbicide that is less toxic to humans.  Though the overall estimated benefits of the adoption of GE soybeans in the United States was $310 million, the majority of this benefit was experienced by the companies selling the seeds (40%), followed by biotechnology firms (28%) and farmers (20%). In 2010, a team of American scientists announced they had decoded the genome of the soybean – the first legume to be sequenced.  
Uses



Approximately 85% of the world's soybean crop is processed into soybean meal and vegetable oil.  Soybeans can be broadly classified as "vegetable" (garden) or field (oil) types. Vegetable types cook more easily, have a mild, nutty flavor, better texture, are larger in size, higher in protein, and lower in oil than field types. Tofu and soy milk producers prefer the higher protein cultivars bred from vegetable soybeans originally brought to the United States in the late 1930s. The "garden" cultivars are generally not suitable for mechanical combine harvesting because there is a tendency for the pods to shatter upon reaching maturity.Among the legumes, the soybean, also classed as an oilseed, is preeminent for its high (38–45%) protein content as well as its high (20%) oil content. Soybeans are the second-most valuable agricultural export in the United States behind corn. The bulk of the soybean crop is grown for oil production, with the high-protein defatted and "toasted" soy meal used as livestock feed. A smaller percentage of soybeans are used directly for human consumption.Immature soybeans may be boiled whole in their green pods and served with salt, under the Japanese name  . In English, these soybeans are generally known as "edamame" or "green vegetable soybeans".In China, Japan, and Korea, the bean and products made from it are a popular part of the diet. The Chinese invented tofu (豆腐 dòufu), and also made use of several varieties of soybean paste as seasonings. Japanese foods made from soya include miso (味噌), nattō (納豆), kinako (黄粉) and edamame (枝豆). Also many kinds of food are produced using tofu such as atsuage, aburaage, and so on. In Korean cuisine, soybean sprouts, called kongnamul (콩나물), are also used in a variety of dishes, and are also the base ingredient in doenjang, cheonggukjang and ganjang. In Vietnam, soybeans are used to make soybean paste- tương in the North with the most popular products are tương Bần, tương Nam Đàn, tương Cự Đà as a garnish for phở and gỏi cuốn dishes), tofu (đậu hũ or đậu phụ or tàu hũ), soya sauce (nước tương, literally: soya water), soya milk (nước đậu in the North or sữa đậu nành in the South), and đậu hũ nước đường (tofu sweet soup).The beans can be processed in a variety of ways. Common forms of soy (or soya) include soy meal, soy flour, soy milk, tofu, textured vegetable protein (TVP, which is made into a wide variety of vegetarian foods, some of them intended to imitate meat), tempeh, soy lecithin and soybean oil. Soybeans are also the primary ingredient involved in the production of soy sauce (shoyu).Archer Daniels Midland (ADM) is among the largest processors of soybeans and soy products. ADM, along with Dow Chemical Company, DuPont and Monsanto Company, support the industry trade associations United Soybean Board and Soyfoods Association of North America. These trade associations have increased the consumption of soy products dramatically in recent years.
Oil 
Soybean seed contains about 19% oil. To extract soybean oil from seed, the soybeans are cracked, adjusted for moisture content, rolled into flakes and solvent-extracted with commercial hexane. The oil is then refined, blended for different applications, and sometimes hydrogenated. Soybean oils, both liquid and partially hydrogenated, are exported abroad, sold as "vegetable oil", or end up in a wide variety of processed foods. The remaining soybean meal is used mainly as animal feed.
Meal 
Soybean meal is the material remaining after solvent extraction of oil from soybean flakes, with a 50% soy protein content. The meal is 'toasted' (a misnomer because the heat treatment is with moist steam) and ground in a hammer mill. Soybean meal is an essential element of the American production method of growing farm animals, such as poultry and swine, on an industrial scale that began in the 1930s; and more recently the aquaculture of catfish. Ninety-eight percent of the U.S. soybean crop is used for livestock feed.  Soybean meal is also used in lower-end dog foods.
FlourSoy flour refers to defatted soybeans ground finely enough to pass through a 100-mesh or smaller screen where special care was taken during desolventizing (not toasted) to minimize denaturation of the protein to retain a high Protein Dispersibility Index (PDI), for uses such as extruder cooking of textured vegetable protein. It is the starting material for production of soy concentrate and soy protein isolate.

Defatted soy flour is obtained from solvent extracted flakes, and contains less than 1% oil.
Full-fat soy flour is made from unextracted, dehulled beans, and contains about 18% to 20% oil. Due to its high oil content, a specialized Alpine Fine Impact Mill must be used for grinding rather than the more common hammer mill.
Low-fat soy flour is made by adding back some oil to defatted soy flour. The lipid content varies according to specifications, usually between 4.5% and 9%.
High-fat soy flour can also be produced by adding back soybean oil to defatted flour at the level of 15%.
Lecithinated soy flour is made by adding soybean lecithin to defatted, low-fat or high-fat soy flours to increase their dispersibility and impart emulsifying properties. The lecithin content varies up to 15%.
Reference: Soybeans: Chemistry and Technology. page 442. A.K. Smith and S.J. Circle. The AVI Publishing Company,1972.
Infant formulaSoy-based infant formula (SBIF) is used for infants who are allergic to pasteurized cow milk proteins. It is sold in powdered, ready-to-feed, and concentrated liquid forms.Some reviews have expressed the opinion that more research is needed to determine what effect the phytoestrogens in soybeans may have on infants.  Diverse studies have concluded there are no adverse effects in human growth, development, or reproduction as a result of the consumption of soy-based infant formula.      One of these studies, published in the Journal of Nutrition,  concludes that there are: ...no clinical concerns with respect to nutritional adequacy, sexual development, neurobehavioral development, immune development, or thyroid disease. SBIFs provide complete nutrition that adequately supports normal infant growth and development. FDA has accepted SBIFs as safe for use as the sole source of nutrition. 
Meat and dairy substitutes and extendersSoybeans can be processed to produce a texture and appearance similar to many other foods. For example, soybeans are the primary ingredient in many dairy product substitutes (e.g., soy milk, margarine, soy ice cream, soy yogurt, soy cheese, and soy cream cheese) and meat substitutes (e.g. veggie burgers). These substitutes are readily available in most supermarkets. Soy milk does not naturally contain significant amounts of digestible calcium. Many manufacturers of soy milk sell calcium-enriched products, as well. Soy is also used in tempeh: the beans (sometimes mixed with grain) are fermented into a solid cake.Soy products also are used as a low-cost substitute in meat and poultry products.   Food service, retail and institutional (primarily school lunch and correctional) facilities regularly use such "extended" products. Extension may result in diminished flavor, but fat and cholesterol are reduced. Vitamin and mineral fortification can be used to make soy products nutritionally equivalent to animal protein; the protein quality is already roughly equivalent. The soy-based meat substitute textured vegetable protein has been used for more than 50 years as a way of inexpensively extending ground beef without reducing its nutritional value.    
Other productsSoybeans with black hulls are the beans used in Chinese fermented black beans, douchi, not the sometimes confused black turtle beans.Soybeans are also used in industrial products, including oils, soap, cosmetics, resins, plastics, inks, crayons, solvents, and clothing. Soybean oil is the primary source of biodiesel in the United States, accounting for 80% of domestic biodiesel production.  Soybeans have also been used since 2001 as fermenting stock in the manufacture of a brand of vodka.  In 1936, Ford Motor Company developed a method where soybeans and fibers were rolled together producing a soup which was then pressed into various parts for their cars, from the distributor cap to knobs on the dash board. Ford also informed in public relation releases that in 1935 over  s was dedicated to growing soybeans in the United States. 
Cattle feed
Cattle are often fed soy. Spring grasses are rich in omega-3 fatty acids, whereas soy is predominantly omega-6.
Health benefits
CancerSeveral large population studies have shown, that consumption of soy foods is associated with a reduction in prostate cancer risk in men,  is significantly associated with decreased risk of death and recurrence of breast cancer among women  and may reduce the risk of colorectal cancer in postmenopausal women. 
BrainRecent studies have shown improvement in cognitive function, particularly verbal memory,  and in frontal lobe function  with the use of soy supplements.
Omega-3 fatty acids
Omega-3 fatty acids, for example, alpha-linolenic acid C18-3, all cis, 9,12,15 octadecatrienoic acid (where the omega-3 refers to carbon number 3 counting from the hydrocarbon tail, whereas C-15 refers to carbon number 15 counting from the carboxyl acid head) are special fat components that benefit many body functions. Some beneficial effects are associated mainly with the longer-chain fatty acids eicosapentaenoic acid (20:5n-3, EPA) and docosahexaenoic acid (22:6n-3, DHA) found in some algae and oily fish. For instance, EPA and DHA inhibit blood clotting, while there is no evidence alpha-linolenic acid (18:3n−3, aLNA) can do this. Nevertheless, soybean oil is one of the few common vegetable oils that contain a significant amount of aLNA (others include canola, walnut, hemp, and flax). Soybean oil has a better omega-3:omega-6 ratio of 1:7, much higher than other vegetable cooking oils. While flaxseed is even higher with a ratio of 3:1, it is not practical for cooking.
Natural phenols
Isoflavones 
Soybeans also contain the isoflavones genistein and daidzein, types of phytoestrogen, that are considered by some dietitians and physicians to be useful in the prevention of cancer and by others to be carcinogenic    and endocrine disruptive.   
Soy's content of isoflavones are as much as 3 mg/g dry weight.  Isoflavones are polyphenol compounds, produced primarily by beans and other legumes, including peanuts and chickpeas. Isoflavones are closely related to the antioxidant flavonoids found in other plants, vegetables and flowers. Isoflavones such as genistein and daidzein are found in only some plant families, because most plants do not have an enzyme, chalcone isomerase which converts a flavone precursor into an isoflavone.In contradiction to well known benefits of isoflavones, genistein acts as an oxidant (stimulating nitrate synthesis),  and blocks formation of new blood vessels (antiangiogenic effect).  Some studies show that genistein acts as inhibitor of substances that regulate cell division and cell survival (growth factors).A review of the available studies by the United States Health and Human Services Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality (AHRQ) found little evidence of substantial health improvements and no adverse effects, but also noted that there was no long-term safety data on estrogenic effects from soy consumption.   
GlyceollinsGlyceollins are molecules belonging to the pterocarpans family. They are also found in the soybean and have been found to have an antifungal activity against Aspergillus sojae, the fungal ferment used to produce soy sauce.  They are phytoalexins with an antiestrogenic activity. 
Cholesterol and heart diseasesThe dramatic increase in soyfood sales is largely credited to the Food and Drug Administration's (FDA) approval of soy as an official cholesterol-lowering food, along with other heart and health benefits.    A 2001 literature review argued that these health benefits were poorly supported by the available evidence, and noted that disturbing data on soy's effect on the cognitive function of the elderly existed.  In 2008, an epidemiological study of 719 Indonesian elderly found that tofu intake was associated with worse memory, but tempeh (a fermented soy product) intake was associated with better memory.    This study replicated other studies.In 1995, the New England Journal of Medicine (Vol. 333, No. 5) published "Meta-analysis of the effects of soy protein intake on serum lipids",  financed in part by DuPont Protein Technologies International (PTI), which produces and markets soy through The Solae Company (see external links). The meta-analysis concluded that soy protein is correlated with significant decreases in serum cholesterol, LDL (bad cholesterol) and triglycerides. However, HDL (good cholesterol) did not increase by a significant amount. Soy phytoestrogens (isoflavones: genistein and daidzein) adsorbed onto the soy protein were suggested as the agent reducing serum cholesterol levels. On the basis of this research PTI filed a petition with FDA in 1998 for a health claim that soy protein may reduce cholesterol and the risk of heart disease.The FDA granted the following health claim for soy: "25 grams of soy protein a day, as part of a diet low in saturated fat and cholesterol, may reduce the risk of heart disease."  One serving, (1 cup or 240 mL) of soy milk, for instance, contains 6 or 7 grams of soy protein. Solae resubmitted their original petition, asking for a more vague health claim, after their original was challenged and highly criticized. Solae also submitted a petition for a health claim that soy can help prevent cancer. They quickly withdrew the petition for lack of evidence and after more than 1,000 letters of protest were received. On February 18, 2008 Weston A. Price Foundation submitted a petition for removal of this health claim.     25 g/day soy protein was established as the threshold intake because most trials used at least this much protein and not because less than this amount is inefficacious. In fact, there is evidence suggesting that lower amounts are indeed efficacious. An American Heart Association review of a decade long study of soy protein benefits casts doubt on the FDA allowed "Heart Healthy" claim for soy protein and does not recommend isoflavone supplementation. The review panel also found that soy isoflavones have not been shown to reduce post menopause "hot flashes" in women and the efficacy and safety of isoflavones to help prevent cancers of the breast, uterus or prostate is in question. However, AHA concludes that "many soy products should be beneficial to cardiovascular and overall health because of their high content of polyunsaturated fats, fiber, vitamins, and minerals and low content of saturated fat". Importantly, however, the AHA did not conduct a formal statistical analysis of the 22 studies upon which they based their estimate of the potency of soy protein. When such an analysis was conducted, Jenkins et al.  found that the AHA had considerably underestimated the hypocholesterolemic effects of soy protein. Further, when the analysis was limited to the 11 studies that provided evidence that the control and soy diets were matched, soy protein was found to lower LDL by 5.2 percent. This estimate is in line with the results of other recently published meta-analyses.    Furthermore, recent research suggests that soy protein decreases postprandial triglyceride levels, which is increasingly viewed as important for reducing CHD risk. 
Phytic acid 
Soybeans contain a high level of phytic acid, which has many effects including acting as an antioxidant and a chelating agent. The beneficial claims for phytic acid include reducing cancer,  minimizing diabetes,  and reducing inflammation.  However, phytic acid is also criticized for reducing vital minerals due to its chelating effect, especially for diets already low in minerals. 
Health risks 
Allergy 
Allergy to soy is common, and the food is listed with other foods that commonly cause allergy, such as milk, eggs, peanuts, tree nuts, shellfish. The problem has been reported among younger children, and the diagnosis of soy allergy is often based on symptoms reported by parents and/or results of skin tests or blood tests for allergy. Only a few reported studies have attempted to confirm allergy to soy by direct challenge with the food under controlled conditions.  It is very difficult to give a reliable estimate of the true prevalence of soy allergy in the general population. To the extent that it does exist, soy allergy may cause cases of urticaria and angioedema, usually within minutes to hours of ingestion. In rare cases, true anaphylaxis may also occur. The reason for the discrepancy is likely that soy proteins, the causative factor in allergy, are far less potent at triggering allergy symptoms than the proteins of peanut and shellfish.  An allergy test that is positive demonstrates that the immune system has formed IgE antibodies to soy proteins. However, this is only a factor when soy proteins reach the blood without being digested, in sufficient quantities to reach a threshold to provoke actual symptoms.Soy can also trigger symptoms via food intolerance, a situation where no allergic mechanism can be proven. One scenario is seen in very young infants who have vomiting and diarrhoea when fed soy-based formula, which resolves when the formula is withdrawn. Older infants can suffer a more severe disorder with vomiting, diarrhoea that may be bloody, anemia, weight loss and failure to thrive. The most common cause of this unusual disorder is a sensitivity to cow's milk, but soy formulas can also be the trigger. The precise mechanism is unclear and it could be immunologic, although not through the IgE-type antibodies that have the leading role in urticaria and anaphylaxis. Fortunately it is also self-limiting and will often disappear in the Toddler Years. 
Phytoestrogen Soybeans contain isoflavones called genistein and daidzein, which are one source of phytoestrogens in the human diet. Because most naturally occurring estrogenic substances show weak activity, normal consumption of foods that contain these phytoestrogens should not provide sufficient amounts to elicit a physiological response in humans.   Plant lignans associated with high fiber foods such as cereal brans and beans are the principal precursor to mammalian lignans which have an ability to bind to human estrogen sites. Soybeans are a significant source of mammalian lignan precursor secoisolariciresinol containing 13–273 µg/100 g dry weight.  Another phytoestrogen in the human diet with estrogen activity is coumestans, which are found in beans, split-peas, with the best sources being alfalfa, clover, and soybean sprouts. Coumestrol, an isoflavone coumarin derivative is the only coumestan in foods.  Soybeans and processed soy foods are among the richest foods in total phytoestrogens (wet basis per 100g), which are present primarily in the form of the isoflavones daidzein and genistein. 
WomenA 2001 literature review suggested that women with current or past breast cancer should be aware of the risks of potential tumor growth when taking soy products, based on the effect of phytoestrogens to promote breast cancer cell growth in animals.  A 2006 commentary reviewed the relationship with soy and breast cancer. They stated that soy may decrease the risk of breast cancer, but cautioned that the impact of isoflavones on breast tissue needs to be evaluated at the cellular level in women at high risk for breast cancer.   A high consumption of omega-6 polyunsaturated fatty acids, which are found in most types of vegetable oil including soybean oil, may increase the likelihood that postmenopausal women will develop breast cancer.    Another analysis suggests an inverse association between total polyunsaturated fatty acids and breast cancer risk.  A 2011 analysis of the literature concluded that:- "Our study suggests soy isoflavones intake is associated with a significant reduced risk of breast cancer incidence in Asian populations, but not in Western populations." In a recent (August 2011) trial the daily administration of tablets containing 200 mg of soy isoflavones for 2 years did not prevent bone loss or menopausal symptoms.  
MenBecause of the phytoestrogen content, some studies have suggested that soybean ingestion may influence testosterone levels in men. However, a 2010 meta-analysis of 15 placebo controlled studies showed that neither soy foods nor isoflavone supplements alter measures of bioavailable testosterone or estrogen concentrations in men.  It has been hypothesized that soy foods and enterolactone may increase the development of prostate cancer although no significant associations were observed for the soy isoflavones.  Furthermore, soy consumption has been shown to have no effect on the levels and quality of sperm.  A 2009 meta-analysis of the research on the association between soy consumption and prostate cancer risk in men concluded that "consumption of soy foods is associated with a reduction in prostate cancer risk in men." 
BrainThough there is some evidence that estrogen can help protect and repair the brain after injury in rats,  there is also evidence that phytoestrogens may be harmful for the recovery of rats in other situations  that have sustained brain injury.Similarly, epidemiological evidence of humans eating soya products is currently divided: a study of Japanese men between 1965 and 1999 demonstrated a positive correlation between brain atrophy and consumption of tofu meals,    and a study on elderly Indonesian men and women found that high tofu intake was associated with poorer memory, but the consumption of tempeh was associated with better memory. So it may be that the type of soya bean used, or its preparation or additional ingredients are relevant factors, there is not yet definitive evidence known. 
CarcinogenicityThough raw soy flour is known to cause pancreatic cancer in rats    the cooked flour has not been found carcinogenic.       Whether soy might promote pancreatic cancer in humans is unknown because studies have not yet attempted to single out soy intake and the incidence of pancreatic cancer in humans, and the amount of soy fed to the rats is proportionately far larger than what humans would normally consume. However, the soy isoflavone genistein has been suggested as a chemopreventive agent against pancreatic cancer, by interfering with the chemical pathways that promote the creation and growth of tumors. The Cancer Council of New South Wales, Australia has released a statement saying scientific research suggests that overall the moderate consumption of soy products does not appear to present a risk to women with breast cancer, and there is equivocal evidence that consuming large amounts of soy products may have a protective effect against developing breast and prostate cancer. However, the Council does not recommend taking soy dietary supplements as there is no evidence they are either effective or safe at preventing or treating cancers.
GoutFor people who suffer from gout, purine can make the condition worse, and the U.S. National Institutes of Health (NIH) recommends gout sufferers limit consumption of soy products (although also suggesting that soy may have health benefits by reducing the risk for heart disease).   However, other researchers have found little or no association between consumption of purine rich vegetables (including beans) and gout.  
Soybean politicsThe American Soybean Association represents soy farmers, that claims as its mission, "To serve farmers by protecting and increasing the market value and opportunities for soybean farmers." Policies have included pushing to pass the Estate Tax Provisions, as well as pushing for free trade agreements with South Korea, Colombia, and Panama. 
Soybean futuresSoybean futures are traded on the Chicago Board of Trade and have delivery dates in January (F), March (H), May (K), July (N), August (Q), September (U), November (X).It is also traded on other commodity futures exchanges under different contract specifications:

SAFEX: The South African Futures Exchange 
DC: Dalian Commodity Exchange 
KEX: Kansai Commodities Exchange in Japan 
TGE: Tokyo Grain Exchange in Japan 
KCX: Fukuoka Commodity Exchange in Japan that was absorbed by the KEX
NCDEX: National Commodity and Derivatives Exchange, India.
ROFEX: Rosario Grain Exchange in Argentina


See also

Edamame
Soy milk
Soy cheese
Tofu
Cash crop
Nutrition
Isoflavones
Soy allergy
Soy molasses
Soybean wars of Paraguay
Soybean management practices


References 
External links 
 
 

 
 
New Crop Resource Online Program – Large collection of Soybean information
The Solae Company, producer and marketer of soy; a joint venture of DuPont and Bunge Limited.  
  
 
 






 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Warren Beatty
 Warren Beatty (    ;  born March 30, 1937) is an American actor, producer, screenwriter and director. He has been nominated for 15 Academy Awards, and has won the Best Director Award and its highest honor, the Irving G. Thalberg Award. He has been nominated for 16 Golden Globe Awards and won six, including the Cecil B. DeMille Award, which he received in 2007. Only Beatty and Orson Welles have been nominated for producer, director, writer and actor in the same film. Welles did it once (for Citizen Kane), and Beatty did it twice (for Heaven Can Wait and Reds).
Early life and educationBeatty was born Henry Warren Beaty in Richmond, Virginia. His mother, Kathlyn Corinne (née MacLean), was a Nova Scotia-born teacher, and his father, Ira Owens Beaty, was a PhD. of educational psychology, a public school administrator, and dealt in real estate.  Beatty's grandparents were also educators. The family was Baptist.   In 1945, the family moved from Richmond to Arlington, Virginia. Beatty's elder sister is actress/dancer/writer Shirley MacLaine.Beatty was a star football player at Washington-Lee High School in Arlington. Encouraged to act by the success of his sister, who had recently established herself as a Hollywood star, he decided to work as a stagehand at the National Theatre in Washington, D.C., during the summer prior to his senior year. Upon graduation from high school, he reportedly rejected ten football scholarships to study liberal arts at Northwestern University (1954–1955). While at Northwestern, he became a member of the Sigma Chi fraternity but left after his freshman year to move to New York City, where he studied acting with Stella Adler. He received a Tony Award nomination for Best Actor and received a 1960 Theatre World Award for his performance in William Inge's A Loss of Roses. This role marked his sole appearance on Broadway.  
Military serviceUnder his original name of Henry W. Beaty, Warren Beatty enlisted in the California Air National Guard on February 11, 1960. On January 1, 1961, Beatty was discharged from the Air National Guard due to physical disability.  He was simultaneously discharged from the United States Air Force Reserve (USAF), and served on inactive duty only.  
Career

1950s and 1960s
Beatty started his career making appearances on television shows such as Studio One (1957), Kraft Television Theatre (1957), and Playhouse 90 (1959). He was a regular on The Many Loves of Dobie Gillis during its first season ('59-'60). He made his film debut in Elia Kazan's Splendor in the Grass (1961), opposite Natalie Wood. The film was a critical and box office success and Beatty was nominated for a Golden Globe Award for Best Actor, and received the award for New Star of the Year - Actor.  He followed his initial film in Tennessee Williams' The Roman Spring of Mrs. Stone (1961), with Vivien Leigh and Lotte Lenya, directed by Jose Quintero; All Fall Down (1962), with Angela Lansbury, Karl Malden and Eva Marie Saint, directed by John Frankenheimer; Lilith (1963), with Jean Seberg, directed by Robert Rossen; Promise Her Anything (1964), with Leslie Caron, Bob Cummings and Keenan Wynn, directed by Arthur Hiller; Mickey One (1965), with Alexandra Stewart and Hurd Hatfield, directed by Arthur Penn; and Kaleidoscope (1966), with Susannah York and Clive Revill, directed by Jack Smight. In 1967, he produced and acted in Bonnie and Clyde at age 29. He assembled writers Robert Benton and David Newman and director Arthur Penn, and took full responsibility for the production, including the cast (Faye Dunaway, Gene Hackman and Estelle Parsons in lead roles), the script and the delivery of the film. It was a critical and commercial success and was nominated for 10 Academy Awards, including Best Picture and Best Actor, and 7 Golden Gobe Award nominations, including Best Picture and Best Actor.  
1970s and 1980sAfter making Bonnie and Clyde, Beatty acted in The Only Game In Town (1970), directed by George Stevens; McCabe & Mrs. Miller (1971), directed by Robert Altman; Dollars (1971), directed by Richard Brooks; The Parallax View (1974), directed by Alan Pakula; and The Fortune (1975), directed by Mike Nichols. Beatty produced, co-wrote and acted in Shampoo (1975), directed by Hal Ashby, which was nominated for four Academy Awards, including Best Screenplay, as well as  five Golden Globe Awards, including Best Picture and Best Actor. In 1978, Beatty directed, produced, wrote and acted in Heaven Can Wait (1978). The film was nominated for nine Academy Awards, including Best Picture, Director, Actor, and Screenplay. It also won three Golden Globe Awards, including Best Picture and Best Actor.Beatty's next film was Reds (1981), an historical epic about the Communist journalist John Reed who observed the Russian October Revolution – a project Beatty had begun researching and filming for as far back as 1970. It was a critical and commercial success (made all the more noticeable considering it was an American film about an American Communist made and released at the height of the Cold War). It received 12 Academy Award nominations, including four for Beatty for Best Picture, Director, Actor, and Screenplay, winning three: Beatty won for Best Director, Maureen Stapleton won for Best Supporting Actress (playing anarchist Emma Goldman), and Vittorio Storaro won for Best Cinematography. The film received 7 Golden Globe nominations, including Best Picture, Director, Actor and Screenplay. Beatty won the Golden Globe for Best Director. Following Reds, Beatty did not appear in a film for five years until his comeback in 1987's Ishtar, written and directed by Elaine May. Following severe criticism in press reviews by the new British studio chief David Puttnam just prior to its release, the film received mixed reviews and was commercially unsuccessful. Puttnam attacked several other overbudget U.S. films greenlit by his predecessor, and was fired shortly thereafter.  
1990s and 2000sIn 1990, Beatty produced, directed and played the title role as comic strip based detective Dick Tracy in the film of the same name. The film was critically acclaimed and one of the highest grossers of the year. It received 7 Academy Award nominations and 4 Golden Globe Award nominations, including for Best Picture. In 1991, he produced and starred as the real-life gangster Bugsy Siegel in the critically and commercially acclaimed Bugsy, directed by Barry Levinson, which was nominated for 10 Academy Awards, including Best Picture and Best Actor. The film also received eight Golden Globe Award nominations, including Best Picture and Best Actor. It won for Best Picture. His next film, Love Affair (1994), directed by Glenn Caron, received mixed reviews and was unimpressive commercially. In 1998, he wrote, produced, directed and starred in the political satire Bulworth, which was critically acclaimed and was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Screenplay. The film also received three Golden Globe Award nominations, for Best Picture, Actor, and Screenplay. In 2001, he made his last film appearance to date in Town and Country, directed by Peter Chelsom and produced by Simon Fields, which received mixed reviews and did not fare well commercially.  Beatty has appeared briefly in numerous documentaries, including: Arthur Penn, 1922-: Themes and Variants (1970), Year of the Woman (1973), George Stevens: A Filmmaker's Journey (1984), Dick Tracy: Behind the Badge, Behind the Scenes (1990), Madonna: Truth or Dare (1991), Bugsy: The Dark Passion of an American Dreamer (1991), Victory & Valor: Special Olympics World Games (1991), Writing With Light: Vittorio Storaro (1992), The First 100 Years: A Celebration of American Movies (1995), Forever Hollywood (1999), Dean Tavoularis: The Magician of Hollywood (2003), One Bright Shining Moment (2005), The Road to Damascus: The Reinvention of Bugsy Siegel (2006), In Search of Puppy Love (2007), American Masters (2008), and Revolution! The Making of Bonnie and Clyde (2008).
Tribune lawsuitIn May 2005, Beatty sued Tribune Co., claiming he still maintains the rights to Dick Tracy. On March 25, 2011, U.S. District Judge Dean Pregerson ruled in Beatty's favor. 
Political work
Since the 1960s, Beatty has been active in the Democratic Party. In multiple forums he has addressed campaign finance reform, the increasing disparity of wealth, universal health care, gun control, and the need for the Democratic Party to return to its roots. In 1968, he campaigned with Senator Robert F. Kennedy in his bid for the Democratic nomination. That same year, Beatty traveled throughout the United States speaking in favor of gun control and against the war in Vietnam.  In 1972, Beatty was part of the "inner circle" of Senator George McGovern's presidential campaign.  He traveled extensively and was instrumental in organizing fundraising.  In 1976 with California Governor Jerry Brown, and in 1984 and 1988 with Colorado Senator Gary Hart, Beatty played a similar role in their presidential campaigns. Beatty was rumored to be considering becoming a candidate for the Democratic Presidential nomination during the summer of 1999. He never publicly expressed an interest in doing so. When a recall of California Governor Gray Davis was set in motion, Beatty campaigned against the 2003 special election. In 2005, he was the keynote speaker at the California Nurses Association's convention, gave the commencement speech at the Goldman School of Public Policy at the University of California, Berkeley, and campaigned against Governor Schwarzenegger's ballot propositions. The propositions were defeated, increasing speculation that Beatty might run against Schwarzenegger in the 2006 election, but Beatty denied he would seek the Democratic gubernatorial nomination.  
HonorsHe has received the Eleanor Roosevelt Award from the Americans for Democratic Action, the Brennan Legacy Award from the Brennan Center for Justice at the New York University School of Law, the Philip Burton Public Service Award from the Foundation for Taxpayer and Consumer Rights, and the Spirit of Hollywood Award from the Associates for Breast and Prostate Cancer Studies. Beatty was a founding board member of the Center for National Policy, a founding member of the Progressive Majority, a member of the Council on Foreign Relations, has served as the Campaign Chair for the Permanent Charities Committee, and has participated in the World Economic Forum at Davos, Switzerland. He is on the Board of Trustees at the Scripps Research Institute and the Board of Directors of the Motion Picture and Television Fund Foundation. He was named Honorary Chairman of the Stella Adler Studio of Acting in 2006.He was nominated twice for the Directors Guild of America Award for Best Director, and received the award for Reds. He was nominated four times for the Writers Guild of America Award for Best Screenplay, which he received three times for Shampoo, Heaven Can Wait, and Reds (film). The National Association of Theatre Owners awarded him with the Star of the Year Award in 1975, and in 1978 the Director of the Year Award and the Producer of the Year Award. He was nominated six times and received the Saturn Award three times for Best Film, Actor, and Screenplay. He received two Photoplay Awards for Best Actor and Best Film. He received an American Movie Award in 1981. He was nominated for three Golden Laurel Awards, winning Best Action-Drama for Bonnie and Clyde. In 1999, Beatty was nominated for the Golden Satellite Award for Best Actor. He has received awards from numerous critic organizations, including sixteen nominations and ten awards for producing, writing, acting, and directing from the New York and the Los Angeles Film Critics, the National Board of Review, and the National Society of Film Critics.   Beatty received numerous awards and nominations for Bulworth, including the Los Angeles Film Critics Award for Best Screenplay, and nominations for the Academy, Writers Guild, Golden Globe, and the Chicago Film Critics Association Awards for Best Screenplay. The film also received Golden Globe nominations for Best Picture and Best Actor, the Venice Film Festival Golden Lion Award for Best Film, and a Satellite Award for Best Actor.He received the Alan J. Pakula Memorial Award from the National Board of Review in 1998. He received the Akira Kurosawa Lifetime Achievement Award in 2002 from the San Francisco International Film Festival. He has received the Board of Governors Award from the American Society of Cinematographers, the Distinguished Director Award from the Costume Designers Guild, the Life Achievement Award from the Publicists Guild, and the Outstanding Contribution to Cinematic Imagery Award from the Art Directors Guild. In 2004, he received the Kennedy Center Honors in Washington, D.C., and the Milestone Award from the Producers Guild of America. He was honored with the American Film Institute's Life Achievement Award in 2008. Beatty has received a number of international awards: Commander of the Order of Arts and Letters (France, 1992); David di Donatello Award twice, for Best Actor and Best Producer, from the Academy of Italian Cinema and its Lifetime Achievement Award (Italy, 1998). In 1998, he was also nominated for a Golden Lion Award for Best Film for Bulworth and received a Career Golden Lion Award from the Venice Film Festival. He was also nominated for the Italian National Syndicate of Film Journalists Award for Best Director for Dick Tracy. He received the Donostia Lifetime Achievement Award from the San Sebastián International Film Festival (2001, Spain). He was nominated for two BAFTA awards for Best Actor, and he received the British Academy Fellowship from BAFTA (2002) and the Stanley Kubrick Britannia Award (2011).  
Personal lifeBeatty married actress Annette Bening on March 12, 1992. With his wife, Beatty received the Champion of Children Award from the Children's Institute International, the Caritas Award from the Saint John's Health Center, the Stem Cell Champions Award from the Juvenile Diabetes Research Foundation, and the In The Line of Duty Award from the Los Angeles Police Protective League's Eagle and Badge Foundation. They have four children: Stephen (born January 8, 1992), Benjamin (born August 23, 1994), Isabel (born January 11, 1997), and Ella (born April 8, 2000).   
Filmography

Year Film Role Notes 
1961 Splendor in the Grass Bud Stamper Golden Globe for Best New Star – Actor Nominated – Golden Globe for Best Actor 
The Roman Spring of Mrs. Stone Paolo di Leo  
1962 All Fall Down Berry-Berry Willart  
1964 Lilith Vincent Bruce  
1965 Mickey One Mickey One  
Promise Her Anything Harley Rummell  
1966 Kaleidoscope Barney Lincoln  
1967 Bonnie and Clyde Clyde Barrow David di Donatello Award for Best Actor Photoplay Award for Best Actor Photoplay Award for Best Film Golden Laurel Award for Best Action-Drama Kansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best Film Nominated – Academy Award for Best Actor Nominated – Academy Award for Best Picture Nominated – Golden Globe for Best Picture Nominated – Golden Globe for Best Actor Nominated – BAFTA for Best Actor Nominated – National Society of Film Critics for Best Film 
1970 The Only Game in Town Joe Grady  
1971 McCabe & Mrs. Miller John McCabe 
$ Joe Collins  
1974 The Parallax View Joseph Frady  
1975 Shampoo George Roundy WGA Award for Best Screenplay National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Screenplay Nominated – Academy Award for Best Screenplay Nominated – Golden Globe for Best Actor Nominated – Golden Globe for Best Picture 
The Fortune Nicky Wilson  
1978 Heaven Can Wait Joe Pendleton Golden Globe for Best Picture Golden Globe for Best Actor WGA Award for Best Screenplay Saturn Award for Best Film Saturn Award for Best Actor Saturn Award for Best Writing Nominated – Academy Award for Best Actor Nominated – Academy Award for Best Picture Nominated – Academy Award for Best Director Nominated – Academy Award for Best Screenplay Nominated – DGA Award for Best Director Nominated – Saturn Award for Best Direction 
1981 Reds John Reed Academy Award for Best Director DGA Award for Best Director Golden Globe for Best Director WGA Award for Best Screenplay David di Donatello for Best Producer Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Director New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Film National Board of Review Award for Best Director National Board of Review Award for Top Ten Film American Movie Award for Excellence in Film Nominated – Academy Award for Best Actor Nominated – Academy Award for Best Picture Nominated – Academy Award for Best Screenplay Nominated – Golden Globe for Best Actor Nominated – Golden Globe for Best Screenplay Nominated – Golden Globe for Best Picture Nominated – BAFTA for Best Actor Nominated – Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Film Nominated – Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Screenplay 
1987 Ishtar Lyle Rogers  
1990 Dick Tracy Dick Tracy Nominated – Golden Globe for Best Picture Nominated – Italian National Syndicate of Film Journalists Award for Best Director Nominated – Saturn Award for Best Actor Nominated – Saturn Award for Best Film 
1991 Bugsy Bugsy Siegel Golden Globe for Best Picture Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Film National Board of Review Award for Best Actor National Board of Review for Top Ten Film Nominated – Academy Award for Best Actor Nominated – Academy Award for Best Picture Nominated – Golden Globe for Best Actor Nominated – Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Actor Nominated – New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actor Nominated – National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actor 
1994 Love Affair Mike Gambril  
1998 Bulworth Sen. Jay Billington Bulworth Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Screenplay Nominated – Academy Award for Best Screenplay Nominated – WGA Award for Best Screenplay Nominated – Golden Globe for Best Screenplay Nominated – Golden Globe for Best Picture Nominated – Golden Globe for Best Actor Nominated – Venice Film Festival Golden Lion Award for Best Film Nominated – Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Screenplay Nominated – Satellite Award for Best Actor 
2001 Town & Country Porter Stoddard  

References 
Further reading

Ellis Amburn, The Sexiest Man Alive : A Biography of Warren Beatty, HarperCollins Publishers Inc., New York, 2002. ISBN 0-06-018566-X
Suzanne Finstad, Warren Beatty : A Private Man, Random House, Inc., New York, 2005. ISBN 1-4000-4606-8
Mark Harris, "Pictures at a Revolution: Five Movies and the Birth of New Hollywood", Penguin Press, New York, 2008. ISBN 978-1-59420-152-3
Suzanne Munshower, "Warren Beatty: His Life, His Loves, HIs Work", St. Martin's Press, New York, 1990. ISBN 0-8065-0670-9
Lawrence Quirk, "The Films of Warren Beatty", Citadel Press, New Jersey, 1979. ISBN 0-8065-0670-9
Stephen J. Ross, "Hollywood Left and Right: How Movie Stars Shaped American Politics", Oxford Press, New York, 2011. ISBN 978-0-19-518172-2
Peter Swirski, "1990s That Dirty Word, Socialism: Warren Beatty's Bulworth."  Ars Americana Ars Politica.  Montreal, London: McGill-Queen's University Press, 2010.  ISBN 978-0-7735-3766-8
David Thomson, "Warren Beatty: A Life and Story", Secker and Warburg, London, 1987. ISBN 0-436-52015-X
David Thomson, "Warren Beatty and Desert Eyes", Doubleday and Co., Inc., New York, 1987. ISBN 0-385-18707-6
Peter Biskind, Star: How Warren Beatty Seduced America, Simon & Schuster, Inc. New York, 2010. ISBN 978-0-7432-4658-3
Peter Biskind, "Easy Riders, Raging Bulls: How the Sex-drugs-and-rock-'n'-roll Generation Saved Hollywood", Simon & Schuster, Inc. New York, 1998. ISBN 0-684-80996-6


External links

 
 
 
 
The Carolyn Jackson Collection, no. 13 - Interview with Warren Beatty, from the Texas Archive of the Moving Image

 
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT

























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Walter Matthau
 
Walter Matthau (October 1, 1920 – July 1, 2000) was an American actor best known for his role as Oscar Madison in The Odd Couple and his frequent collaborations with Odd Couple star Jack Lemmon, as well as his role as Coach Buttermaker in the 1976 comedy The Bad News Bears. He won an Academy Award for his performance in the 1966 Billy Wilder film The Fortune Cookie.
Early lifeMatthau was born Walter John Matthow       in New York City's Lower East Side on October 1, 1920, the son of Rose (née Berolsky; from Lithuania), who worked in a sweatshop, and Milton Matthow, an electrician and peddler (from Russia), both Jewish immigrants.    His surname has often incorrectly been listed as Matuschanskayasky (see below for a detailed discussion). As a young boy, Walter attended a Jewish non-profit sleepaway camp, Tranquillity Camp, where he first began acting in the shows the camp would stage on Saturday nights. He also attended Surprise Lake Camp. His high school was Seward Park High School. 
CareerDuring World War II, Matthau served in the U.S. Army Air Forces with the Eighth Air Force in England as a B-24 Liberator radioman-gunner, in the same 453rd Bombardment Group as James Stewart. He reached the rank of staff sergeant and became interested in acting. He took classes in acting at the Dramatic Workshop of The New School in New York with the influential German director Erwin Piscator. He often joked that his best early review came in a play where he posed as a derelict. One reviewer said, "The others just looked like actors in make-up, Walter Matthau really looks like a skid row bum!" Matthau was a respected stage actor for years in such fare as Will Success Spoil Rock Hunter? and A Shot in the Dark. He won the 1962 Tony Award for Best Featured Actor in a play.In 1952, Matthau appeared in the pilot of Mr. Peepers with Wally Cox. For reasons unknown he used the name Leonard Elliot. His role was of the gym teacher Mr. Wall. In 1955, he made his motion picture debut as a whip-wielding bad guy in The Kentuckian opposite Burt Lancaster.

Matthau appeared as a villain in subsequent movies, such as 1958's King Creole (in which he is beaten up by Elvis Presley). That same year, he made a western called Ride a Crooked Trail with Audie Murphy and Onionhead starring Andy Griffith and Erin O'Brien, which was a flop. Matthau had a featured role opposite Griffith in the well received drama A Face in the Crowd, directed by Elia Kazan. Matthau also directed a low-budget 1960 movie called The Gangster Story. In 1962, he was a sympathetic sheriff in Lonely are the Brave, which starred Kirk Douglas. He appeared opposite Audrey Hepburn in Charade.

Appearances on television were common too, including two on ABC's police drama, Naked City, as well as the 1963 episode "A Tumble from a Tall White House" of The Eleventh Hour. He appeared eight times between 1962 and 1964 on The DuPont Show of the Week and as Franklin Gaer in 1964 in the episode "Man Is a Rock" on Dr. Kildare. Lastly, he starred in the syndicated crime drama Tallahassee 7000, as a Florida-based state police investigator, in the 1961-1962 season.Comedies were rare in Matthau's work at that time. He was cast in a number of stark dramas, such as 1964's Fail-Safe, in which he portrayed Pentagon adviser Dr. Groeteschele, who urges all out nuclear attack on the Soviet Union in response to an accidental transmission of an attack signal to U.S. Air Force bombers, in the tense, and timely cold-war thriller.In 1965, however, a plum comedy role came Matthau's way when Neil Simon cast him in the hit play The Odd Couple playing the slovenly sportswriter Oscar Madison opposite Art Carney as Felix Unger. Matthau would later join Jack Lemmon in the movie version. Also in 1965, he played detective Ted Casselle in the Hitchcockian thriller Mirage, with Gregory Peck and Diane Baker, a film directed by Edward Dmytryk, based on a novel by Howard Fast.He achieved great film success in a 1966 comedy as a shyster lawyer called "Whiplash Willie" Gingrich starring opposite Lemmon in The Fortune Cookie, the first of numerous collaborations with Billy Wilder, and a role that would earn him an Oscar for Best Supporting Actor. Filming had to be placed on a five-month hiatus after Matthau suffered a heart attack.Matthau was visibly banged up during the Oscar telecast, having been involved in a bicycle accident, nonetheless he scolded actors who had not bothered to come to the ceremony, especially the other major award winners that night: Elizabeth Taylor, Sandy Dennis and Paul Scofield.Oscar nominations would come Matthau's way again for 1972's Kotch, directed by Lemmon, and 1975's The Sunshine Boys, another Simon vehicle transferred from the stage, this one about a pair of former vaudeville stars. For the latter role he won a Golden Globe award for Best Actor in a Musical or Comedy.Broadway hits turned into films continued to cast Matthau in the leads with 1969's Hello, Dolly! and that same year's Cactus Flower, for which co-star Goldie Hawn received an Oscar. He played three different roles in the 1971 film version of Simon's Plaza Suite and was in the cast of its followup California Suite in 1978.

Matthau starred in three crime dramas in the mid-1970s, as a detective investigating a mass murder on a bus in The Laughing Policeman, as a bank robber on the run from the Mafia and the law in Charley Varrick and as a New York transit cop in the action-adventure The Taking of Pelham One Two Three. A change of pace about misfits on a Little League baseball team turned out to be a solid hit in 1976 when Matthau starred as coach Morris Buttermaker in the comedy The Bad News BearsIn 1982, Matthau portrayed Herbert Tucker in I Ought to Be in Pictures. There he worked with Ann-Margret and Dinah Manoff, the daughter of the actress whom Matthau starred with in Plaza Suite, Lee Grant.Matthau played Albert Einstein in the film "IQ", also starring Tim Robbins and Meg Ryan.

His partnership with Lemmon became one of the most successful pairings in Hollywood. They became lifelong friends after making The Fortune Cookie and would make a total of 10 movies together—11 counting Kotch, in which Lemmon has a cameo as a sleeping bus passenger. Apart from their many comedies, the two appeared (though not on screen together) in the 1991 Oliver Stone drama about the presidential assassination, JFK.Matthau played the role of Mr. Wilson in the 1993 movie Dennis the Menace.They had a surprise box-office hit in the comedy Grumpy Old Men, reuniting for a sequel, Grumpier Old Men, that co-starred Sophia Loren and Ann-Margret. That led to more pairings late in their careers, notably Out to Sea and a Simon-scripted sequel to one of their great successes, The Odd Couple II. Hanging Up, I'm Not Rappaport (1996) was also one of his best and a 2000 film directed by Diane Keaton, was Matthau's final appearance on screen.
Personal life
MarriagesMatthau was married twice; first to Grace Geraldine Johnson from 1948 to 1958, and then from 1959 until his death in 2000 to Carol Marcus. He had two children, Jenny and David, by his first wife, and a second son, Charlie Matthau, with his second wife. David is a radio news reporter, currently at WKXW "New Jersey 101.5" in Trenton, New Jersey. Jenny is president of the Natural Gourmet Institute in New York City. Matthau also helped raise his stepchildren, Aram Saroyan and Lucy Saroyan. His grandchildren include William Matthau, an engineer, and Emily Rose Roman, a student at SUNY Binghamton. Charlie Matthau directed his father in The Grass Harp (1995).
Death
Matthau died of a heart attack in Santa Monica on July 1, 2000. He was 79 years old. After undergoing heart surgery years earlier, doctors discovered that he had colon cancer, which, by the time of his death, had spread to his liver, lungs, and brain. His remains are interred in the Westwood Village Memorial Park Cemetery in Los Angeles.Less than a year later, remains of Jack Lemmon (who died of colon and bladder cancer) were buried at the same cemetery. After Matthau's death, Lemmon as well as other friends and relatives had appeared on Larry King Live in an hour of tribute and remembrance; many of those same people appeared on the show one year later, reminiscing about Lemmon.Carol Marcus, also a native of New York, died of a brain aneurysm in 2003. Her remains are buried next to Matthau's.The remains of actor George C. Scott are also buried next to those of Walter Matthau, in an unmarked grave.
Jokey pseudonymsThere have been persistent but erroneous beliefs about Matthau's birth name. Among the names that have been incorrectly asserted as having been the name he was born under are Matuschanskayasky, Matashansky and Matansky. As reported by the authors of Matthau: A Life by Rob Edelman and Audrey Kupferberg (along with Charlie Matthau), Walter Matthau often told tall tales. In his youth, he found that the joy of embellishment lifted a story (and the listener) to such enjoyable heights that he could not resist trying to pass off the most bogus of information, just to see who was gullible enough to believe it. Matthau told many stories to many reputable people, including, reportedly, the Social Security Administration. When he registered for a number, he was amazed that they only wanted him to write his name, and offer no proof of his identity. So, as another of his traditional goofs, he wrote that his true name was "Walter Foghorn Matthau". The rumor that his birth name was "Matuschanskayasky" was given additional credence by the release of the 1974 film Earthquake in which Matthau had agreed to provide a cameo performance without compensation on the condition that he not be credited under his real name. His character was credited to Walter Matuschanskayasky. Though this was a jokey pseudonym, its appearance in the film's end credits contributed to the urban legend that this was his real name. As recently as 2009, this erroneous information appeared in the World Almanac section on "Original Names of Selected Entertainers" (p. 278).
Work
Filmography 
 

Atomic Attack (1950) (short subject)
The Kentuckian (1955)
The Indian Fighter (1955)
Bigger Than Life (1956)
A Face in the Crowd (1957)
Slaughter on Tenth Avenue (1957)
King Creole (1958)
Voice in the Mirror (1958)
Ride a Crooked Trail (1958)
Onionhead (1958)
Gangster Story (1960) (also director)
Strangers When We Meet (1960)
Lonely are the Brave (1962)
Who's Got the Action? (1962)
Island of Love (1963)
Charade (1963)
Ensign Pulver (1964)
Fail-Safe (1964)
Goodbye Charlie (1964)
Mirage (1965)
The Fortune Cookie (1966)
A Guide for the Married Man (1967)
The Odd Couple (1968)
The Secret Life of an American Wife (1968)
Candy (1968)
Hello, Dolly! (1969)
Cactus Flower (1969)
A New Leaf (1971)
Plaza Suite (1971)
Kotch (1971)
Pete 'n' Tillie (1972)
The Laughing Policeman (1973)
Charley Varrick (1973)
The Taking of Pelham One Two Three (1974)
 

Earthquake (1974) (credited as "Walter Matuschanskayasky")
The Front Page (1974)
The Lion Roars Again (1975) (short subject)
The Gentleman Tramp (1975) (documentary)
The Sunshine Boys (1975)
The Bad News Bears (1976)
Casey's Shadow (1978)
House Calls (1978)
California Suite (1978)
Portrait of a 60% Perfect Man (1980) (documentary)
Little Miss Marker (1980)
Hopscotch (1980)
First Monday in October (1981)
Buddy Buddy (1981)
I Ought to Be in Pictures (1982)
The Survivors (1983)
Movers & Shakers (1985)
Pirates (1986)
The Little Devil (1988)
The Couch Trip (1988)
JFK (1991) as Senator Russell B. Long
Beyond 'JFK': The Question of Conspiracy (1992) (documentary)
How the Grinch Stole Christmas! (1992)
Dennis the Menace (1993)
Grumpy Old Men (1993)
I.Q. (1994)
The Grass Harp (1995)
Grumpier Old Men (1995)
I'm Not Rappaport (1996)
Out to Sea (1997)
The Odd Couple II (1998)
Love After Death (1998)
The Life and Times of Hank Greenberg (1998) (documentary)
Hanging Up (2000)
  
 
Stage

Anne of the Thousand Days (1948)
The Liar (1950)
Twilight Walk (1951)
Fancy Meeting You Again (1952)
One Bright Day (1952)
In Any Language (1952)
The Grey-Eyed People (1952)
The Ladies of the Corridor (1953)
The Burning Glass (1953)
Will Success Spoil Rock Hunter? (1955)
Guys and Dolls (1955)
Once More, with Feeling! (1958)
Once There Was a Russian (1961)
A Shot in the Dark (1961)
My Mother, My Father and Me (1963)
The Odd Couple (1965)

 
Television

Justice (1954)
Dry Run, episode of Alfred Hitchcock Presents series (1959)
Juno and the Paycock (1960)
Cop for a Day, episode of Alfred Hitchcock Presents, appears with Carol Grace (1961)
Route 66 (1961)
Tallahassee 7000 (cast member in 1961)
Target: The Corruptors! (1961–1962), two episodes
Awake and Sing! (1972)
Actor (1978)
The Stingiest Man in Town (1978) (voice)
The Incident (1990)
Mrs. Lambert Remembers Love (1991)
Against Her Will: An Incident in Baltimore (1992)
Incident in a Small Town (1994) as Harmon Cobb
The Marriage Fool (1998)

 
References 
Further reading

 


External links

 
 
 

 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT


















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	George McGovern
 
 
 
George Stanley McGovern (July 19, 1922 – October 21, 2012) was an American historian, author and U.S. Representative, U.S. Senator, and the Democratic Party presidential nominee in the 1972 presidential election.McGovern grew up in Mitchell, South Dakota, where he was a renowned debater. He volunteered for the U.S. Army Air Forces upon the country's entry into World War II and as a B-24 Liberator pilot flew 35 missions over German-occupied Europe. Among the medals bestowed upon him was a Distinguished Flying Cross for making a hazardous emergency landing of his damaged plane and saving his crew. After the war he gained degrees from Dakota Wesleyan University and Northwestern University, culminating in a PhD, and was a history professor. He was elected to the U.S. House of Representatives in 1956 and re-elected in 1958. After a failed bid for the U.S. Senate in 1960, he was elected there in 1962.As a senator, McGovern was an exemplar of modern American liberalism. He became most known for his outspoken opposition to the growing U.S. involvement in the Vietnam War. He staged a brief nomination run in the 1968 presidential election as a stand-in for the assassinated Robert F. Kennedy. The subsequent McGovern–Fraser Commission fundamentally altered the presidential nominating process, by greatly increasing the number of caucuses and primaries and reducing the influence of party insiders. The McGovern–Hatfield Amendment sought to end the Vietnam War by legislative means but was defeated in 1970 and 1971. McGovern's long-shot, grassroots-based 1972 presidential campaign found triumph in gaining the Democratic nomination but left the party badly split ideologically, and the failed vice-presidential pick of Thomas Eagleton undermined McGovern's credibility. In the general election McGovern lost to incumbent Richard Nixon in one of the biggest landslides in American electoral history. Re-elected Senator in 1968 and 1974, McGovern was defeated in a bid for a fourth term in 1980.Throughout his career, McGovern was involved in issues related to agriculture, food, nutrition, and hunger. As the first director of the Food for Peace program in 1961, McGovern oversaw the distribution of U.S. surpluses to the needy abroad and was instrumental in the creation of the United Nations-based World Food Programme. As sole chair of the Senate Select Committee on Nutrition and Human Needs during 1968–1977, McGovern publicized the problem of hunger within the United States and issued the "McGovern Report" that led to a new set of nutritional guidelines for Americans. McGovern later served as U.S. Ambassador to the United Nations Agencies for Food and Agriculture from 1998–2001 and was appointed the first UN Global Ambassador on World Hunger by the World Food Programme in 2001. The McGovern-Dole International Food for Education and Child Nutrition Program has provided school meals for millions of children in dozens of countries since 2000 and resulted in McGovern's being named World Food Prize co‑laureate in 2008.
Early years and early educationMcGovern was born in the 600‑person farming community of Avon, South Dakota. Current Year Biography 1967, p. 265.   His father, Rev. Joseph C. McGovern, born in 1868, was pastor of the local Wesleyan Methodist Church there.     Joseph – the son of an alcoholic who had immigrated from Ireland  – had grown up in several states, working in coal mines from the age of nine and parentless from the age of thirteen.  He was then a professional baseball player in the minor leagues, but had given it up due to his teammates' heavy drinking, gambling and womanizing, and entered the seminary instead. Ambrose, The Wild Blue, pp. 27, 29.  George's mother was the former Frances McLean, born c. 1890 in Dundas, Toronto, Canada; her family had later moved to Calgary and then she came to South Dakota looking for work as a secretary.       George was the second oldest of four children.  Joseph McGovern's salary never reached $100 per month, and he often received compensation in the form of potatoes, cabbages, or other food items.  Ambrose, The Wild Blue, p. 30.  Joseph and Frances McGovern were both firm Republicans, but were not politically active or doctrinaire.  

When George was about three years old, the family moved to Calgary for a while to be near Frances' ailing mother, and he formed memories of events such as the Calgary Stampede.     While the McGoverns were living there, Charles Lindbergh's solo transatlantic flight in 1927 made a great impression upon George, as it did upon many members of his generation.  When George was six, the family returned to the United States and moved to Mitchell, South Dakota, a community of 12,000.  McGovern attended public schools there  and was an average student.  He was painfully shy as a child and was afraid to speak in class during first grade.  His only unapproved behavior was going to see movies, which were among the worldly amusements forbidden to good Wesleyan Methodists.  Otherwise he had a normal childhood marked by visits to the renowned Mitchell Corn Palace  and "a sense of belonging to a particular place and knowing your part in it".  He would, however, long remember the Dust Bowl storms and grasshopper plagues that swept the prairie states during the Great Depression.  The McGovern family lived on the edge of the poverty line for much of the 1920s and 1930s.  Growing up amid that lack of affluence gave young George a lifelong sympathy for underpaid workers and struggling farmers.    He was influenced by the currents of populism and agrarian unrest and by the "practical divinity" teachings of cleric John Wesley that sought to fight poverty, injustice, and ignorance. Mann, A Grand Delusion, pp. 292–293. When he was in seventh grade, a gym teacher called him a "physical coward" for being afraid to dive headfirst and somersault over a gymnastics vaulting horse; the incident troubled him psychologically. Ambrose, The Wild Blue, p. 31.  George attended Mitchell High School,  where he was a solid but unspectacular member of the track team.  A turning point came when his tenth-grade English teacher recruited him for the debate team, where he became quite active.  His high-school debate coach proved to be a great influence in his life, and McGovern spent many hours honing his meticulous, if colorless, forensic style. Anson, McGovern, pp. 27–31.  McGovern and his debating partner won events in his area and gained renown in a state where debating was passionately followed by the general public.   Debate changed McGovern's life, giving him a chance to explore ideas to their logical end, broadening his perspective, and instilling a sense of personal and social confidence.   He graduated in 1940 in the top ten percent of his class.  McGovern enrolled at small Dakota Wesleyan University in Mitchell  and became a star student there. Ambrose, The Wild Blue, p. 46.  He supplemented a forensic scholarship by working a variety of odd jobs. Anson, McGovern, pp. 32–33.  With World War II underway overseas, McGovern still felt insecure about his own courage. To prove himself, McGovern took flying lessons in an Aeronca aircraft and received a pilot's license through the government's Civilian Pilot Training Program.   McGovern recalled: "Frankly, I was scared to death on that first solo flight. But when I walked away from it, I had an enormous feeling of satisfaction that I had taken the thing off the ground and landed it without tearing the wings off."    In April 1941, McGovern began dating fellow student Eleanor Stegeberg, who had grown up in Woonsocket, South Dakota. Ambrose, The Wild Blue, p. 45.   They had first encountered each other during a high school debate in which Eleanor and her twin sister Ila defeated McGovern and his partner. McGovern was listening to a radio broadcast of the New York Philharmonic Orchestra for a sophomore-year music appreciation class when he heard the news of the December 7, 1941, attack on Pearl Harbor. Ambrose, The Wild Blue, pp. 42–43.  Within days he drove to Omaha, Nebraska, and volunteered to join the United States Army Air Forces.   The military accepted him, but they did not yet have enough airfields, aircraft, or instructors to start training all the volunteers, so McGovern stayed at Dakota Wesleyan.  George and Eleanor became engaged, but initially decided not to marry until the war was over.  During his sophomore year, McGovern won the statewide intercollegiate South Dakota Peace Oratory Contest with a speech called "My Brother's Keeper", which was later selected by the National Council of Churches as one of the nation's twelve best orations of 1942.   McGovern was also elected president of his sophomore and junior classes.  In February 1943, during his junior year, he and a partner won a national debate tournament at North Dakota State University that featured competitors from over one hundred schools; upon his return to campus, he discovered that the Army had finally called him up. 
Military serviceSoon thereafter McGovern was sworn in as a private at Fort Snelling in Minnesota. Ambrose, The Wild Blue, p. 49.  He spent a month at Jefferson Barracks Military Post in Missouri and then five months at Southern Illinois Normal University in Carbondale, Illinois, for ground school training; McGovern later maintained that both the academic work and physical training were the toughest he ever experienced. Ambrose, The Wild Blue, pp. 54, 56–57.  He spent two months at a base in San Antonio, Texas, and then went to Hatbox Field in Muskogee, Oklahoma, for basic flying school, training in a single-engined PT‑19.   McGovern married Eleanor Stegeberg on October 31, 1943 during a three-day leave (lonely and in love, the couple had decided to not wait any longer); his father presided over the ceremony at the small Methodist church in Woonsocket. Ambrose, The Wild Blue, pp. 65–66.  McGovern, Terry, p. 43.  After three months in Muskogee, McGovern went to Coffeyville Army Airfield in Kansas for a further three months of training on the BT‑13. Ambrose, The Wild Blue, pp. 68–70, 73–74.  Around April 1944, McGovern went on to advanced flying school at Pampa Army Airfield in Texas for twin-engine training on the AT‑17 and AT‑9.  Throughout, Air Cadet McGovern showed skill as a pilot, with his exceptionally good depth perception aiding him.  Eleanor McGovern followed him to these different duty stations, and was present when he received his wings and was commissioned a Second Lieutenant. McGovern was assigned to Liberal Army Airfield in Kansas and its transition school to learn to fly the B‑24 Liberator, an assignment he was pleased with.  McGovern recalled later: "Learning how to fly the B‑24 was the toughest part of the training. It was a difficult airplane to fly, physically, because in the early part of the war, they didn't have hydraulic controls. If you can imagine driving a Mack truck without any power steering or power brakes, that's about what it was like at the controls. It was the biggest bomber we had at the time."  Eleanor was constantly afraid of her husband's suffering an accident while training, which claimed a huge toll of airmen during the entire war.  This schooling was followed by a stint at Lincoln Army Airfield in Nebraska, where McGovern met his B-24 crew. Ambrose, The Wild Blue, pp. 94, 96, 99.  Traveling around the country and mixing with people from different backgrounds proved to be a broadening experience for McGovern and others of his generation.  The USAAF sped up training times for McGovern and others due to the heavy losses that bombing missions were suffering over Europe.  Despite, and partly because of, the risk that McGovern might not come back from combat, the McGoverns decided to have a child and Eleanor became pregnant.  In June 1944, McGovern's crew received final training at Mountain Home Army Air Field in Idaho.  They then shipped out via Camp Patrick Henry in Virginia, where McGovern found history books with which to fill downtime, especially during the trip overseas on a slow troopship. 
In September 1944, McGovern joined the 741st Squadron of the 455th Bombardment Group of the Fifteenth Air Force, stationed at San Giovanni Airfield near Cerignola in the Apulia region of Italy. Ambrose, The Wild Blue, pp. 124, 128–130.  There he and his crew found a starving, disease-ridden local population wracked by the ill fortunes of war and far worse off than anything they had seen back home during the Depression.   Those sights would form part of his later motivation to fight hunger.  Starting on November 11, 1944, McGovern flew 35 missions over enemy territory from San Giovanni, the first five as co-pilot for an experienced crew and the rest as pilot for his own plane, known as the Dakota Queen after his wife Eleanor.  His targets were in Austria; Czechoslovakia; Germany; Hungary; Poland; and northern, German-controlled Italy, and were often either oil refinery complexes or rail marshalling yards, all as part of the U.S. strategic bombing campaign in Europe. The eight- or nine-hour missions were grueling tests of endurance for pilots and crew, and while German fighter aircraft were a diminished threat by this time as compared to earlier in the war, his missions often faced heavy anti-aircraft artillery fire that filled the sky with flak bursts. On McGovern's December 15 mission over Linz, his second as pilot, a piece of shrapnel from flak came through the windshield and missed fatally wounding him by only a few inches.  The following day on a mission to Brüx, he nearly collided with another bomber during close-formation flying in complete cloud cover.  The following day, he was recommended for a medal after surviving a blown wheel on the always-dangerous B-24 take-off, completing a mission over Germany, and then landing without further damage to the plane.  On a December 20 mission against the Škoda Works at Pilsen, Czechoslovakia, McGovern's plane had one engine out and another in flames after being hit by flak. Unable to return to Italy, McGovern flew to a British airfield on Vis, a small island in the Adriatic Sea off the Yugoslav coast that was controlled by Josip Broz Tito's Partisans. The short field, normally used by small fighter planes, was so unforgiving to four-engined aircraft that many of the bomber crews who tried to make emergency landings there perished. But McGovern successfully landed, saving his crew, a feat for which he was awarded the Distinguished Flying Cross. Ambrose, The Wild Blue, pp. 192–196.  Schlesinger, A Thousand Days, p. 176. In January 1945, McGovern used R&R time to see every sight that he could in Rome, and to participate in an audience with the Pope.  Bad weather prevented many missions from being carried out during the winter, and during such downtime McGovern spent much time reading and discussing how the war had come about. He resolved that if he survived it, he would become a history professor.  In February, McGovern was promoted to First Lieutenant.  On March 14, McGovern had an incident over Austria in which he accidentally bombed a family farmhouse when a jammed bomb improvidentally released above the structure and destroyed it, an event which haunted McGovern. Ambrose, The Wild Blue, pp. 228–233.  (Four decades later, after a McGovern public appearance in that country, the owner of the farm approached the media to let the Senator know that he was the victim of that incident but that no one had been hurt and the farmer felt that it had been worth the price if that event helped achieve the defeat of Nazi Germany in some small way. McGovern was greatly relieved.  ) On returning to base from the flight, McGovern was told his first child Ann had been born four days earlier.  April 25 saw McGovern's 35th mission, which marked the fulfillment the Fifteenth Air Force requirement for a combat tour, against heavily defended Linz. The sky turned black and red with flak – McGovern later said "Hell can't be any worse than that" – and the Dakota Queen was hit multiple times, resulting in 110 holes in its fuselage and wings and an inoperative hydraulic system. McGovern's waist gunner was injured, and his flight engineer was so unnerved by his experience that he would subsequently be hospitalized with battle fatigue, but McGovern managed to bring back the plane safely with the assistance of an improvised landing technique.  Ambrose, The Wild Blue, pp. 240–245. In May and June 1945, following the end of the European war, McGovern flew food relief flights to northern Italy, then flew back to the United States with his crew.  McGovern was discharged from the Army Air Forces in July 1945, with the rank of First Lieutenant.  He was also awarded the Air Medal with three oak leaf clusters,  one instance of which was for the safe landing on his final mission. 
Later education and early careerUpon coming home, McGovern returned to Dakota Wesleyan University, aided by the G.I. Bill, and graduated from there in June 1946 with a B.A. degree magna cum laude.  Anson, McGovern, pp. 50–53.  For a while he suffered from nightmares about flying through flak barrages or his plane being on fire.  He continued with debate, again winning the state Peace Oratory Contest with a speech entitled "From Cave to Cave" that presented a Christian-influenced Wilsonian outlook.  The couple's second daughter, Susan, was born in March 1946. McGovern switched from Wesleyan Methodism to less fundamental regular Methodism.  Influenced by Walter Rauschenbusch and the Social Gospel movement,  McGovern began divinity studies at Garrett Theological Seminary in Evanston, Illinois, near Chicago.    He preached as a Methodist student supply minister at Diamond Lake Church in Mundelein, Illinois, during 1946 and 1947, but became dissatisfied by the minutiae of his pastoral duties.   In late 1947, McGovern left the ministry and enrolled in graduate studies at Northwestern University in Evanston, where he also worked as a teaching assistant. Anson, McGovern, pp. 55–56.  He received an M.A. in history in 1949.  McGovern then returned to his alma mater, Dakota Wesleyan, and became a professor of history and political science.  With the assistance of a Hearst fellowship for 1949–1950, he continued pursuing graduate studies during summers and other free time.  The couple's third daughter, Teresa, was born in June 1949.  Eleanor McGovern began to suffer from bouts of depression, but continued to assume the large share of household and child-rearing duties. McGovern, Terry, pp. 44–46, 49.  McGovern earned a PhD in history from Northwestern University in 1953.   His 450-page dissertation, The Colorado Coal Strike, 1913–1914, was a sympathetic account of the miners' revolt against Rockefeller interests in the Colorado Coalfield War.   His thesis advisor, noted historian Arthur S. Link, later said he had not seen a better student than McGovern in 26 years of teaching. Nominally a Republican growing up, McGovern began to admire Democratic President Franklin Delano Roosevelt during World War II. White, The Making of the President 1972, pp. 40–41. In his autobiography, McGovern described his reaction upon hearing of Roosevelt's death in April 1945 while stationed in Italy during the war: "Most of us had never really known the United States except with FDR as President. We did not think of him as a politician. He was that magnificent voice of the fireside chat, who, along with Winston Churchill, inspired all those who stood for freedom and decency in the war. What would the United States be like without him?"  At Northwestern, his exposure to the work of China scholars John King Fairbank and Owen Lattimore had convinced him that unrest in Southeast Asia was homegrown and that U.S. foreign policy towards Asia was counterproductive.  Discouraged by the onset of the Cold War, McGovern was attracted to the 1948 presidential campaign of former Vice President and Secretary of Agriculture Henry A. Wallace. Anson, McGovern, pp. 58–61.  He volunteered for Wallace in South Dakota and attended the Wallace Progressive Party's first national convention as a delegate.  Dionne, E. J.. Why Americans Hate Politics, pg. 57 (1991)  After deciding there that Wallace was in the control of "fanatics", Communist and otherwise, he did not vote in the general election,   although he supported the re-election of President Harry Truman. Four years later, in 1952, he heard a radio broadcast of Governor Adlai Stevenson's speech accepting the presidential nomination of the Democratic Party. McGovern, Grassroots, pp. 49–51.  He immediately dedicated himself towards Stevenson's campaign, publishing seven articles in Mitchell's Daily Republic newspaper outlining the historical issues that separated the Democratic Party from the Republicans.  The McGoverns named their only son Steven, born immediately after the 1952 Democratic National Convention, after his new hero.  McGovern's admiration for Stevenson was lined with his antipathy towards his eventual antagonist: "I have loathed Richard Nixon since he first came on the national scene wielding his red brush in 1946, but I especially resented his cheap insults to Adlai Stevenson – my first genuine political hero".  Although Stevenson lost the election, McGovern remained active in politics, believing that "the engine of progress in our time in America is the Democratic Party".  In early 1953, McGovern left teaching to become executive secretary of the South Dakota Democratic Party E. McGovern, Uphill, p. 86.  Current Year Biography 1967, p. 266.  the state chair having recruited him after reading his articles.  Democrats in the state were at a low, holding no statewide offices and only 2 of the 110 seats in the state legislature.  Friends and political figures had counseled McGovern against making the move, but despite his mild, unassuming manner, McGovern had an ambitious nature and was intent upon starting a political career of his own. The decision to enter politics was not uncommon among those of what was later dubbed "The Greatest Generation"; it was a natural destination for those who made sacrifices and learned lessons during the war, and was not limited to those of any particular political ideology. McGovern spent the following years rebuilding and revitalizing the party, building up a large list of voter contacts via frequent travel around the state.  Democrats showed improvement in the 1954 elections, winning 25 seats in the state legislature. Anson, McGovern, pp. 73–75.  From 1954 to 1956 he also was on a political organization advisory group for the Democratic National Committee.  The McGoverns' fifth and final child, Mary, was born in 1955. 
U.S. House of Representatives
In 1956, McGovern sought elective office himself, and ran for the House of Representatives from South Dakota's 1st congressional district, which consisted of the counties east of the Missouri River.  He faced four-term incumbent Republican Party Representative Harold O. Lovre. Aided by the voter lists he had earlier accumulated,  he ran a low-budget campaign, spending $12,000 while borrowing $5,000.   McGovern's quiet personality appealed to voters he met, while Lovre suffered from a general unhappiness over Eisenhower administration farm policy.   When polls showed McGovern gaining, Lovre's campaign implied that McGovern's support for admitting People's Republic of China to the United Nations and his past support for Henry Wallace meant that McGovern was a Communist appeaser or sympathizer. Anson, McGovern, pp. 81–84.  In his closing speech, McGovern responded: "I have always despised communism and every other ruthless tyranny over the mind and spirit of man."  McGovern staged an upset victory, gaining 116,516 votes to his opponent's 105,835, and became the first Democrat elected to Congress from South Dakota in 22 years.  The McGoverns established a home in Chevy Chase, Maryland. Entering the 85th United States Congress, McGovern became a member of the House Committee on Education and Labor.  As a representative, McGovern was attentive to his district.  He became a staunch supporter of higher commodity prices,  farm price supports, grain storage programs, and beef import controls,  believing that such stored commodities programs guarded against drought and similar emergencies.  He favored rural development, federal aid to small business and to education, and medical coverage for the aged under Social Security.   In 1957, he traveled and studied conditions in the Middle East under a fellowship from the American Christian Palestine Committee.  McGovern first allied with the Kennedy family by supporting a House version of Senator John F. Kennedy's eventually unsuccessful labor reform bill. In his 1958 reelection campaign, McGovern faced a strong challenge from South Dakota's two-term Republican Governor and World War II Medal of Honor recipient Joe Foss,  who was initially considered the favorite to win. Anson, McGovern, pp. 87–90.  But McGovern ran an effective campaign and was the
superior politician, possessing an acute sense of his political beliefs and the talent to articulate them.  Brokaw, The Greatest Generation, p. 121.  He prevailed with a slightly larger margin than two years before.  In the 86th United States Congress, McGovern was assigned to the House Committee on Agriculture.  The longtime chair of the committee, Harold D. Cooley, would subsequently say, "I cannot recall a single member of Congress who has fought more vigorously or intelligently for American farmers than Congressman McGovern."  He helped pass a new food-stamp law.  He was one of nine representatives from Congress to the NATO Parliamentary Assembly conferences of 1958 and 1959.  Along with Senator Hubert H. Humphrey, McGovern strongly advocated a reconstruction of the Agricultural Trade Development Assistance Act that had started under Eisenhower, with a greater emphasis on feeding the hungry around the world and the establishment of an executive office to run it.   During his time in the House, McGovern was regarded as a liberal overall,   and voted in accordance with the rated positions of Americans for Democratic Action (ADA) 34 times and against 3 times. . Voting records for years 1957 through 1960. At the time the ADA did not give a "score", although by their later methods, his score for the House years would be 87, as McGovern was also absent for two rated votes. Two of the themes of his House career, improvements for rural America and the war on hunger, would be defining ones of his legislative career and public life.   In 1960, McGovern decided to run for the U.S. Senate and challenge the Republican incumbent Karl Mundt,    a formidable figure in South Dakota politics whom McGovern loathed as an old-style McCarthyite.    Anson, McGovern, pp. 92–94.  The race centered mostly around rural issues, but John F. Kennedy's Catholicism was a drawback at the top of the ticket in the mostly Protestant state.  McGovern made careless charges during the campaign and the press turned against him; he would say eleven years later, "It was my worst campaign. I hated [Mundt] so much I lost my sense of balance."  McGovern was defeated in the November 1960 election, gaining 145,217 votes to Mundt's 160,579, but the margin was one-third of Kennedy's loss to Vice President Richard M. Nixon in the state's presidential contest.  
Food for Peace director
Having relinquished his House seat to run for the Senate, McGovern was available for a position in the new Kennedy administration.McGovern first indicated his interest in becoming Secretary of Agriculture, and gained the backing of some farm groups as well as the support of Robert F. Kennedy. The president-elect wanted to appoint him, but others felt that McGovern at age 38 lacked sufficient seniority. By the time of Kennedy's selection, McGovern was happy with the lesser position of Food for Peace director, as he had come to realize that Secretary of Agriculture was usually a difficult job and a dead end for political careers.   McGovern was picked to become a Special Assistant to the President and first director of Kennedy's high-priority Food for Peace program, which realized what McGovern had been advocating in the House.  McGovern assumed the post on January 21, 1961. As director, McGovern urged the greater use of food to enable foreign economic development, saying "We should thank God that we have a food abundance and use the over-supply among the under-privileged at home and abroad."  He found space for the program in the Executive Office Building rather than be subservient to either the State Department or Department of Agriculture.  McGovern worked with deputy director James W. Symington and Kennedy advisor Arthur M. Schlesinger, Jr. in visiting South America to discuss surplus grain distribution, and attended meetings of the United Nations' Food and Agriculture Organization.  In June 1961, McGovern became seriously ill with hepatitis, contracted from an infected White House dispensary needle used to give him inoculations for his South American trip; he was hospitalized and out of action for two months. Anson, McGovern, pp. 110–113. By the close of 1961, the Food for Peace program was operating in a dozen countries  and 10 million more people had been fed with American surplus than the year before.  In February 1962, McGovern visited India and oversaw a greatly expanded school lunch program thanks to Food for Peace; subsequently one in five Indian schoolchildren would be fed from it.  During an audience in Rome, Pope John XXIII praised McGovern's work  and the distribution program was also popular among South Dakota's wheat farmers.  In addition, McGovern was instrumental in the creation of the United Nations-based World Food Programme in December 1961; it started distributing food to stricken regions of the world the following year and would go on to become the largest humanitarian agency fighting hunger worldwide.  Administration was never McGovern's strength, however, and he was restless for another try at the Senate.  With the approval of President Kennedy, McGovern resigned his post on July 18, 1962.   Kennedy said that under McGovern, the program had "become a vital force in the world", improving living conditions and economies of allies and creating "a powerful barrier to the spread of Communism".    Schlesinger would later write that Food for Peace had been "the greatest unseen weapon of Kennedy's third-world policy". 
U.S. Senator

1962 election and early years as a senatorIn April 1962, McGovern announced he would run for election to South Dakota's other Senate seat, intending to face incumbent Republican Francis H. Case.  Case died in June, however, and McGovern instead faced an appointed senator, former Lieutenant Governor Joseph H. Bottum.  Much of the campaign revolved around policies of the Kennedy administration and its New Frontier; Current Year Biography 1967, p. 267.  Bottum accused the Kennedy family of trying to buy the Senate seat.    McGovern appealed to those worried about the outflux of young people from the state, and had the strong support of the Farmers Union.  Polls showed Bottum slightly ahead throughout the race and McGovern was hampered by a recurrence of his hepatitis problem in the final weeks of the campaign  (during this hospitalization, McGovern read Theodore H. White's classic The Making of the President, 1960 and for the first time began thinking about running for the office someday).  Eleanor McGovern campaigned for her ailing husband and may well have saved his chances.  The November 1962 election result was very close and required a recount, but McGovern's 127,458 votes prevailed by a margin of 597, making him the first Democratic senator from the state in 26 years  and only the third since statehood in 1889. When he joined the Senate in January 1963 for the 88th Congress, McGovern was seated on the Senate Agriculture and Forestry Committee and Senate Interior and Insular Affairs Committee.  On the Agriculture Committee, McGovern supported high farm prices, full parity, and controls on beef importation, as well as the administration's Feed Grains Acreage Diversion Program. Anson, McGovern, p. 135.  McGovern had a fractious relationship with Secretary of Agriculture Orville Freeman, who was less sympathetic to farmers; McGovern's 1966 resolution to informally scold Freeman made the senator popular back in his home state.  Fellow new senator Edward M. Kennedy saw McGovern as a serious voice on farm policy and often sought McGovern's guidance on agriculture-related votes.  McGovern was largely inactive on the Interior Committee until 1967, when he was given chair of the Subcommittee on Indian Affairs. Anson, McGovern, pp. 143–144.  However, Interior chair Henry M. Jackson, who did not get along with McGovern personally or politically, refused to allow McGovern his own staff, greatly limiting his effectiveness.  McGovern regretted not accomplishing more for South Dakota's 30,000 Sioux Indians, although after a McGovern-introduced resolution on Indian self-determination passed in 1969, the Oglala Sioux named McGovern "Great White Eagle". In his first speech on the Senate floor in March 1963, McGovern praised Kennedy's Alliance for Progress initiative, but spoke out against U.S. policy towards Cuba, saying that it suffered from "our Castro fixation".  In August 1963, McGovern advocated reducing the $53 billion defense budget by $5 billion; influenced by advisor Seymour Melman, he held a special antipathy towards the doctrine of nuclear "overkill". Anson, McGovern, pp. 129–131.  McGovern would try to reduce defense appropriations or limit military expenditures in almost every year during the 1960s. Anson, McGovern, p. 133.  He also voted against many weapons programs, especially missile and anti-missile systems, and also opposed military assistance to foreign nations.  In 1964 McGovern published his first book, War Against Want: America's Food for Peace Program.  In it he argued for expanding his old program, and a Senate measure he introduced was eventually passed, adding $700 million to the effort's funding. Preferring to focus on broad policy matters and speeches, McGovern was not a master of Senate legislative tactics, and developed a reputation among some other senators for "not doing his homework".  Anson, McGovern, pp. 138–139.  Described as "a very private, unchummy guy", he was not a member of the Senate "club" nor did he want to be, turning down in 1969 a chance to join the powerful Senate Rules Committee.   Relatively few pieces of legislation would bear his name and his legislative accomplishments were generally viewed as modest, although he would try to influence the contents of others' bills.   In terms of ideology, McGovern fit squarely within modern American liberalism; through 1967 his ADA senate score was 92, and when lacking specific knowledge on a particular matter, he would ask his staff, "What are the liberals doing?"   
Opposition to Vietnam War
In a speech on the Senate floor in September 1963, McGovern became the first member to challenge the growing U.S. military involvement in Vietnam.  Weil, The Long Shot, pp. 16–17.  Bothered by the Buddhist crisis and other recent developments, and with concerns influenced by Vietnam historian Bernard Fall, McGovern said:
 However, the speech was little noticed, and McGovern backed away from saying anything publicly for over a year afterward, partly because of the November 1963 assassination of President Kennedy and partly to not appear strident. Anson, McGovern, pp. 152–154.  Though more skeptical about it than most senators, Mann, A Grand Delusion, pp. 357, 366–368.  McGovern voted in favor of the August 1964 Gulf of Tonkin Resolution, which turned out to be an essentially unbounded authorization for President Lyndon B. Johnson to escalate U.S. involvement in the war.  McGovern thought the commander-in-chief should be given limited authority to retaliate against an attack;  subsequently he said his instinct had been to vote no, but that he had voted yes based on Senator J. William Fulbright's urging to stand behind Johnson politically.   Indeed, the day after the resolution vote, McGovern spoke concerning his fears that the vote would lead to greater involvement in the war;  Wayne Morse, one of only two senators to oppose the resolution, sardonically noted that this fell into the category of "very interesting, but very belated".  This would become the vote that McGovern most bitterly regretted.  In January 1965, McGovern made his first major address on Vietnam, saying that "We are not winning in South Vietnam ... I am very much opposed to the policy, now gaining support in Washington, of extending the war to the north."  Anson, McGovern, pp. 154–157.  McGovern instead proposed a five-point plan advocating a negotiated settlement involving a federated Vietnam with local autonomy and a UN presence to guarantee security and fair treatment.  The speech gave McGovern national visibility as one of the "doves" in the debate over Vietnam.  However, McGovern made moderate-to-hawkish statements at times too, flatly rejecting unconditional withdrawal of U.S. forces and criticizing anti-war draft-card burnings as "immature, impractical, and illegal". Anson, McGovern, pp. 160–164.  In November 1965, McGovern travelled to South Vietnam for three weeks. Mann, A Grand Delusion, p. 486.  The human carnage he saw in hospital wards deeply upset him, and he became increasingly outspoken about the war upon his return, more convinced than ever that Vietnam was a political not military problem.    Now he was ready, as he later said, "not merely to dissent, but to crusade" against the war. McGovern voted in favor of Vietnam military appropriations in 1966 through 1968, not wanting to deprive U.S. forces of necessary equipment.  Nevertheless, his anti-war rhetoric increased throughout 1967. Anson, McGovern, pp. 165–166.  Over the years, Johnson had invited McGovern and other Senate doves to the White House for attempts to explain the rationale for his actions in Vietnam; McGovern came away from the final such visit, in August 1967, shaken by the sight of a president "tortured and confused ... by the mess he has gotten into in Vietnam." 
1968 presidential and Senate campaignsIn August 1967, activist Allard K. Lowenstein founded the Dump Johnson movement, and soon they were seeking a Democratic Party figure to make a primaries campaign challenge against Johnson in the 1968 presidential election. White, The Making of the President 1968, pp. 72–74.  Their first choice was Senator Robert Kennedy, who declined, as did another, and by late September 1967 they approached McGovern.   After much deliberation McGovern declined, largely because he feared such a run would significantly damage his own chances for reelection to his Senate seat in 1968.   A month later the anti-Johnson forces were able to convince Senator Eugene McCarthy to run,  who was one of the few "dove" senators not up for reelection that year. Anson, McGovern, pp. 2–8. In the 1968 Democratic primary campaign, McCarthy staged a strong showing. Robert Kennedy entered the race, President Johnson withdrew and Vice President Hubert Humphrey ran instead. While McGovern privately favored Kennedy, McCarthy and Humphrey were both from the neighboring state of Minnesota and publicly McGovern remained neutral. Anson, McGovern, pp. 188–192.  McGovern hosted all three as they campaigned for the June 4 South Dakota Democratic primary, which resulted in a strong win by Kennedy to go along with his win in the crucial California primary that night.  McGovern spoke with Kennedy by phone minutes before Kennedy was assassinated in Los Angeles.  The death of Bobby Kennedy left McGovern the most emotionally distraught he had ever been to that point in his life. Within days, some of Kennedy's aides were urging McGovern to run in his place; their antipathy towards McCarthy and ideological opposition to Humphrey made them unwilling to support either candidate.  McGovern delayed making a decision, making sure that Bobby's brother Ted Kennedy did not want to enter, and with his staff still concerned about the senator's own reelection prospects. Anson, McGovern, pp. 192–199.  Indeed McGovern's voting had changed during 1968, with his ADA rating falling to 43 as he sought more middle-of-the-road stances.  In late July, McGovern's decision became more complicated when his daughter Teresa was arrested in Rapid City on marijuana possession charges.  She had led a troubled life since her teenage years, developing problems with alcohol and depression and suffering the consequences of a relationship with an unstable neighborhood boy.  Based on a recently enacted strict state drugs law, Terry now faced a minimum five-year prison sentence if found guilty. McGovern, Terry, pp. 71–74.  McGovern was also convinced that the socially conservative voters of South Dakota would reject him due to his daughter's arrest.  Charges against her were subsequently dropped due to a technically invalid search warrant. McGovern formally announced his candidacy on August 10, 1968, in Washington, two weeks in advance of the 1968 Democratic National Convention, committing himself to "the goals for which Robert Kennedy gave his life".  Asked why he was a better choice than McCarthy, he said, "Well – Gene really doesn't want to be President, and I do."  At the convention in Chicago, Humphrey was the near-certain choice while McGovern became the initial rallying point for around 300 leaderless Kennedy delegates. White, The Making of the President 1968, pp. 265–266.  The chaotic circumstances of the convention found McGovern denouncing as "police brutality" the Chicago police tactics against demonstrators. Anson, McGovern, pp. 207–211.  Given the internal politics of the party, it was very difficult for McGovern to gain in delegate strength, and black protest candidate Channing E. Phillips drew off some of his support.  In the actual roll call, McGovern came in third with 146½ delegates, far behind Humphrey's 1760¼ and McCarthy's 601. McGovern endorsed Humphrey at the convention, to the dismay of some anti-war figures who considered it a betrayal.  Humphrey went on to lose the general election to Richard Nixon. McGovern returned to his Senate reelection race, facing Republican former Governor Archie M. Gubbrud. While South Dakota voters sympathized with McGovern over his daughter's arrest, McGovern, Terry, pp. 76, 79.  he initially suffered a substantial drop in popularity over the events in Chicago. Anson, McGovern, pp. 213–216.  However, McGovern conducted an energetic campaign that focused on his service to the state, while Gubbrud ran a lackluster effort.  In November, McGovern won 57 percent of the vote in what he would consider the easiest and most decisive victory of his career. 
Middle Senate years and continued opposition to the Vietnam WarDuring the 1968 Democratic Convention, a motion had been passed to establish a commission to reform the Democratic Party nomination process.  In 1969, McGovern was named chairman of the Commission on Party Structure and Delegate Selection, also known as the  McGovern–Fraser Commission; due to the influence of former McCarthy and Kennedy supporters on the staff, the commission significantly reduced the role of party officials and insiders in the nomination process, increased the role of caucuses and primaries, and mandated quotas for proportional black, female, and youth delegate representation.   A somewhat unintended consequence of the commission's reforms was a massive increase in the number of presidential primaries; this became true for the Republican Party as well.  The U.S. presidential nominating process has been different ever since, with scholars and politicians debating whether all the changes are for the better. Reichley, The Life of the Parties, pp. 283, 285–287.    In the wake of several high-profile reports about hunger and malnutrition in the United States, the Senate Select Committee on Nutrition and Human Needs had been created in July 1968, with McGovern as its chair.  Seeking to dramatize the problem, in March 1969 McGovern took the committee to Immokalee, Florida, the base for 20,000 mostly black or Hispanic migrant farm workers. Anson, McGovern, pp. 225–229.  They saw graphic examples of hunger and malnutrition firsthand, but also encountered resistance and complaints about bad publicity from local and state officials.   McGovern battled the Nixon administration and Southerners in Congress during much of the next year over an expanded food stamp program; he had to compromise on a number of points, but legislation signed in 1970 established the principles of free food stamps and a nationwide standard for eligibility. McGovern generally lacked both interest and expertise in economics, but was outspoken in reaction to Nixon's imposition of wage and price controls in 1971.  McGovern declared: "This administration, which pledged to slow inflation and reduce unemployment, has instead given us the highest rate of inflation and the highest rate of unemployment in a decade." 
A 1971 60 Minutes detailed the Senator's support of desegregation busing.  Meanwhile  the Washington, D.C., resident was paying tuition for his own daughter to attend Bethesda, Maryland, public schools, which were only 3 percent black.    
But most of all, McGovern was known for his continued opposition to the Vietnam War. In March 1969, he became the first senator to explicitly criticize the new president's policy there, an action that was seen as a breach of customary protocol by other Senate doves. Anson, McGovern, pp. 167–169.  By the end of 1969, McGovern was calling for an immediate cease-fire and a total withdrawal of all American troops within a year.  In October 1969, McGovern was a featured speaker before 100,000 demonstrators in Boston at the Moratorium to End the War in Vietnam, and in November he spoke before 350,000 at Moratorium/Mobilization's anti-war march to the Washington Monument. Anson, McGovern, pp. 169–174.  Afterward, he decided that radicalized peace demonstrations were counterproductive and criticized anti-war figures such as Rennie Davis, Tom Hayden, Huey Newton, Abby Hoffman, and Jerry Rubin as "reckless" and "irresponsible". Instead, McGovern focused on legislative means to bring the war to an end.  The McGovern–Hatfield Amendment to the annual military procurement bill, co-sponsored by Republican Mark Hatfield of Oregon, required via funding cutoff a complete withdrawal of all American forces from Indochina by the end of 1970.    It underwent months of public discussion and alterations to make it acceptable to more senators, including pushing the deadline out to the end of 1971.  In May 1970, McGovern obtained a second mortgage on his Washington home in order to fund a half-hour televised panel discussion on the amendment on NBC.  The broadcast brought in over $500,000 in donations that furthered work on passage,  and eventually the amendment gained the support of the majority of the public in polls.  The effort was denounced by opposition groups organized by White House aide Charles Colson, which called McGovern and Hatfield "apostles of retreat and defeat" and "salesmen of surrender" and maintained that only the president could conduct foreign policy.  The amendment was defeated in September 1970 by a 55–39 vote, just short of what McGovern had hoped would constitute at least a moral victory. Anson, McGovern, pp. 174–178.  During the floor debate McGovern criticized his colleagues opposing the measure:
 The Senate reacted in startled, stunned silence, and some faces showed anger and fury;  when one member told McGovern he had been personally offended by the speech, McGovern said, "That's what I meant to do." Mann, A Grand Delusion, pp. 666–670.  McGovern believed Vietnam an immoral war that was destroying much of what was pure, hopeful, and different about America's character as a nation. The defeat of the amendment left McGovern embittered and somewhat more radicalized. Anson, McGovern, pp. 179–180.  He accused Vice President of South Vietnam Nguyen Cao Ky of running a heroin trafficking operation that was addicting American soldiers.  In a retort to the powerful Senate Armed Services Committee chairman John Stennis' suggestion that U.S. troops might have to return to Cambodia, McGovern declared, "I'm tired of old men dreaming up wars for young men to fight. If he wants to use American ground troops in Cambodia, let him lead the charge himself."  He denounced Nixon's policy of Vietnamization as "subsidiz[ing] the continued killing of the people of Indochina by technology and mercenaries".  In a Playboy interview, he said that Ho Chi Minh was the North Vietnamese George Washington. McGovern–Hatfield was put up for a vote again in 1971, with somewhat weaker provisions designed to gain more support. Weil, The Long Shot, pp. 21–22.  In polls, a large majority of the public now favored its intent, and McGovern took his name off a final form of it, as some senators were just objecting to him.  Nevertheless, in June 1971, it failed to pass again, gaining only a few more votes than the year before. Mann, A Grand Delusion, pp. 682–684.  McGovern was now certain that the only way the war would come to a quick end was if there was a new president. 
1972 presidential campaign 
 
McGovern announced his candidacy on January 18, 1971, during a televised speech from the studios of KELO-TV in Sioux Falls, South Dakota. Anson, McGovern, pp. 267–268.  At the time of his announcement, McGovern ranked fifth among Democrats in a presidential preference Gallup Poll.  The earliest such entry since Andrew Jackson  was designed to give him time to overcome the large lead of the front-runner, Senator Edmund Muskie.   Nevertheless, by January 1972, McGovern had only 3 percent national support among Democrats in the Gallup Poll, and had not attracted significant press coverage. 
McGovern's campaign manager, Gary Hart, decided on a guerrilla-like insurgency strategy of battling Muskie in only selected primaries, not everywhere, so as to focus the campaign's organizational strength and resources. Muskie fell victim to inferior organizing, an over-reliance on party endorsements, and Nixon's "dirty tricks" operatives, Witcover, Party of the People, pp. 578–580.    and in the March 7, 1972, New Hampshire primary, did worse than expected with McGovern coming in a close second.  As Muskie's campaign funding and support dried up, Hubert Humphrey, who had rejoined the Senate, became McGovern's primary rival for the nomination,  with George Wallace also in the mix after dominating the March 14 primary in Florida.  McGovern won a key breakthrough victory over Humphrey and Wallace on April 4 in Wisconsin,  where he added blue-collar economic populism to his appeal.  He followed that by dominating the April 25 primary in Massachusetts. White, The Making of the President 1972, pp. 106–107, 110–112.   At that point, McGovern had become the front runner.   A late decision to enter the May 2 Ohio primary, considered a Humphrey stronghold, paid dividends when McGovern managed a very close second there amid charges of election fraud by pro-Humphrey forces.    The other two leading candidates for the nomination also won primaries, but Wallace's campaign effectively ended when he was seriously wounded in a May assassination attempt,  and McGovern's operation was effective in garnering delegates in caucuses states.  The climactic contest took place in California, with Humphrey attacking McGovern in several televised debates; in the June 6 vote, McGovern defeated him by five percentage points and claimed all the delegates due to the state's winner-take-all rules.  He then appeared to clinch the nomination with delegates won in the New York primary on June 20. Witcover, Party of the People, pp. 580–582.   However, Humphrey's attacks on McGovern as being too radical began a downward slide in the latter's poll standing against Nixon. 
McGovern became tagged with the label "amnesty, abortion and acid," supposedly reflecting his positions.The label's origins later turned out to come from Thomas Eagleton, several months before he became the vice presidential nominee.  During his primary victories, McGovern used an approach that stressed grassroots-level organization while bypassing conventional campaign techniques and traditional party power centers.      He capitalized on support from anti-war activists and reform liberals;  thousands of students engaged in door-to-door campaigning for him.   He benefited by the eight primaries he won being those the press focused on the most; he showed electoral weakness in the South and industrial Midwest, and actually received fewer primary votes overall than Humphrey and had only a modest edge over Wallace. Cook, The Presidential Nominating Process, pp. 51, 53. McGovern ran on a platform that advocated withdrawal from the Vietnam War in exchange for the return of American prisoners of war  and amnesty for draft evaders who had left the country. 
McGovern's platform also included an across-the-board, 37-percent reduction in defense spending over three years.   He proposed a "demogrant" program that would give a $1,000 payment to every citizen in America. White, The Making of the President 1972, pp. 119–120.  Based around existing ideas such as the negative income tax and intended to replace the welfare bureaucracy and complicated maze of existing public-assistance programs, it nonetheless garnered considerable derision as a poorly thought out "liberal giveaway" (and was dropped from the platform in August).     An "Anybody But McGovern" coalition, led by southern Democrats and organized labor, formed in the weeks following the final primaries.  McGovern's nomination did not become assured until the first night of the 1972 Democratic National Convention in Miami Beach, Florida, where, following intricate parliamentary maneuverings led by campaign staffer Rick Stearns, a Humphrey credentials challenge regarding the California winner-take-all rules was defeated.    Divisive arguments over the party platform then followed; what resulted was arguably the most liberal one of any major U.S. party.   On July 12, 1972, McGovern officially won the Democratic nomination.  In doing so and in taking over the party's processes and platform, McGovern produced what the New York Times termed "a stunning sweep".   The convention distractions led to a hurried process to pick a vice presidential running mate; turned down by his first choice, Ted Kennedy, and with virtually no vetting, McGovern selected Missouri Senator Thomas Eagleton. 
However, one of the most memorable of the failings of McGovern's campaign was that, on the final night of the convention, procedural arguments matters such as a new party charter, and a prolonged vice presidential nomination process that descended into farce, delayed the nominee's acceptance speech.   As a result, McGovern delivered his speech, "Come home America!", at three o'clock in the morning, reducing his television audience from about 70 million people to about 15 million. Just over two weeks after the convention, it was revealed that Eagleton had received electroshock therapy for clinical depression during the 1960s. McGovern initially supported Eagleton, in part because he saw parallels with his daughter Terry's battles with mental illness,   and on July 26, stated publicly, "I am 1,000 percent for Tom Eagleton and have no intention of dropping him from the ticket."   Though many people still supported Eagleton's candidacy, an increasing number of influential politicians and newspapers questioned his ability to handle the office of vice president and, potentially, president.  The resulting negative attention, combined with McGovern's consultation with preeminent psychiatrists, including Karl Menninger, prompted McGovern to accept, and announce on August 1, Eagleton's offer to withdraw from the ticket.  Five prominent Democrats publicly turned down McGovern's offer of the vice presidential slot. White, The Making of the President 1972, p. 207–210.  Finally, he named United States Ambassador to France Sargent Shriver, a brother-in-law of John F. Kennedy.  McGovern's 1,000 percent statement and subsequent reneging made him look both indecisive and an opportunist, and has since been considered one of the worst gaffes in presidential campaign history. Miroff, The Liberals' Moment, pp. 89, 93.   McGovern himself would long view the Eagleton affair as having been "catastrophic" for his campaign. The general election campaign did not go well for McGovern. Nixon did little campaigning;  he was buoyed by the success of his his visit to China and arms-control-signing summit meeting in the Soviet Union earlier that year and, shortly before the election, Henry Kissinger's somewhat premature statement that "peace is at hand" in Vietnam.  Top Republican figures attacked McGovern for being weak on defense issues and "encouraging the enemy";  Nixon asserted that McGovern was for "peace at any price" in Vietnam, rather than the "peace with honor" that Nixon said he would bring about.  McGovern chose to not emphasize his own war record during the campaign. The McGovern Commission changes to the convention rules marginalized the influence of establishment Democratic Party figures, and McGovern struggled to get endorsements from figures such as former President Johnson and Chicago mayor Richard J. Daley.  The AFL–CIO remained neutral, after having always endorsed the Democratic presidential candidate in the past.  Some southern Democrats, led by former Texas governor John Connally, switched their support to the incumbent President Nixon through a campaign effort called "Democrats for Nixon".   Nixon outspent McGovern by a more than two-to-one. Nixon directly requested that his aides use government records to try to dig up dirt on McGovern and his top contributors.   McGovern was publicly attacked by Nixon surrogates,  and was the target of various operations of the Nixon "dirty tricks" campaign. Miroff, The Liberals' Moment, pp. 241–243.  The infamous Watergate break-in of the Democratic National Committee headquarters in June 1972 was an alternate target after bugging McGovern's headquarters was explored.   The full dimensions of the subsequent Watergate scandal did not emerge during the election, however;  the vast majority of the press focused on McGovern's difficulties and other news, rather than the break-in or who was behind it, and a majority of voters were unaware of Watergate.   In the end, Nixon's covert operations had little effect in either direction on the election outcome.    By the final week of the campaign, McGovern knew he was going to lose.  While he was appearing in Battle Creek, Michigan, on November 2, a Nixon admirer heckled him. McGovern told the heckler, "I've got a secret for you," then said softly into his ear, "Kiss my ass."  The incident was overheard and reported in the press, and became part of the legend of the campaign.By one tale, "KMA" buttons were being worn by people in the crowds at McGovern rallies in the days after the incident. Some observers felt it showed a forcefulness that his campaign had theretofore lacked.  Several years later, McGovern observed Mississippi Senator James Eastland, not a big supporter of his, looking at him from across the Senate floor and chuckling to himself. He subsequently approached McGovern and asked, "Did you really tell that guy in '72 to kiss your ass?" When McGovern smiled and nodded, Eastland replied, "That was the best line in the campaign."  McGovern later wrote, "I don't know whether the incident won or lost me votes. It probably did both ... Some staff members frantically insisted that I issue a denial or retraction immediately. I did no such thing. I went to bed and slept soundly."In the general election on November 7, 1972, the McGovern–Shriver ticket suffered a 61-percent to 37-percent defeat to Nixon – at the time, the second biggest landslide in American history, with an Electoral College total of 520 to 17. McGovern's two electoral vote victories came in Massachusetts and Washington, D.C.; McGovern failed to win his home state of South Dakota (which had gone Democratic in only three of the previous eighteen presidential elections). 
Remaining Senate years
After this loss, McGovern remained in the Senate. He was scarred by the enormous defeat, Miroff, The Liberals' Moment, p. 293.  and his wife Eleanor took it even worse; during the winter of 1972–1973, the couple seriously considered moving to England.  His allies were replaced in positions of power within the Democratic Party leadership and the McGoverns did not get publicly introduced at party affairs they attended.  On January 20, 1973, a few hours after Richard Nixon was re-inaugurated, McGovern gave a speech at the Oxford Union that talked about the abuses of Nixon's presidency; it brought criticism, including from some Democrats, for being ill-mannered.  In order to get past the "bitterness and self-pity" he felt, McGovern forced himself to deal with the defeat humorously before audiences; starting at the March 1973 Gridiron Dinner, he frequently related his campaign misadventures in a self-deprecating fashion, such as saying, "For many years, I wanted to run for the Presidency in the worst possible way – and last year I sure did."    Nevertheless, emotions surrounding the loss would remain with McGovern for decades, as it did with some other defeated presidential nominees.  Nixon resigned in August 1974 due to the Watergate scandal. McGovern said President Gerald R. Ford's subsequent September 1974 pardon of Nixon was difficult to understand given that Nixon's subordinates were going to prison. McGovern displayed the political resiliency he had shown in the past.  In the 1974 U.S. Senate elections, McGovern faced possible political peril due to having neglected the state during his long presidential campaign, and by May 1973, he had already begun campaigning for reelection.    An Air Force pilot and Medal of Honor winner, Leo K. Thorsness, had just been repatriated after six years as a prisoner of war in North Vietnam; he publicly accused McGovern of having given aid and comfort to the enemy and of having prolonged his time as a POW.  McGovern replied that if there had been no war, there would have been no POWs, and that everything he had done had been towards the goal of ending the war sooner.  Thorsness became the Republican nominee against McGovern, but despite the two men's different roles in it, the war did not become a significant issue.    Instead, the campaign was dominated by farm policy differences and economic concerns over the 1973–75 recession.   Thorsness charged McGovern with being a "part-time senator" more concerned with national office and with spending over $2 million on his re‑election bid, while McGovern labelled Thorsness a carpetbagger due to his having grown up in Minnesota.  In a year in which Democrats were advantaged by the aftereffects of the Watergate scandal,  McGovern won re-election in November 1974 with 53 percent of the vote.Following the victory, McGovern harbored thoughts of running in the 1976 presidential election, but given the magnitude of his presidential defeat, the Democratic Party wanted nothing to do with him then or later.   Unfamiliar and uncomfortable with Democratic nominee Jimmy Carter, McGovern secretly voted for Ford instead.McGovern's Select Committee on Nutrition and Human Needs expanded its scope to include national nutrition policy. In 1977 it issued a new set of nutritional guidelines for Americans that sought to combat leading killer health conditions.      Titled Dietary Goals for the United States, but also known as the "McGovern Report",    it suggested that Americans eat less fat, less cholesterol, less refined and processed sugars, and more complex carbohydrates and fiber.  While many public health officials had said all of this for some time, the committee's issuance of the guidelines gave it higher public profile.  The recommendations proved controversial with the cattle, dairy, egg, and sugar industries, including from McGovern's home state.    The McGovern committee guidelines led to reorganization of some federal executive functions  and became the predecessor to the more detailed Dietary Guidelines for Americans later issued twice a decade by the Center for Nutrition Policy and Promotion. In the 1980 Senate election in South Dakota, McGovern was one of several liberal Democratic senators targeted for defeat by the National Conservative Political Action Committee (NCPAC), which put out a year's worth of negative portrayals of McGovern.  They and other pro-life groups especially focused on McGovern's support for pro-choice abortion laws.    McGovern faced a Democratic primary challenge for the first time, from a pro-life candidate.  McGovern's Republican opponent was James Abdnor, a four-term incumbent congressman who held identical positions to McGovern's on farm issues, was solidly conservative on national issues, and was well liked within the state.   Abdnor's campaign focused on both McGovern's liberal voting record and what it said was McGovern's lack of involvement in South Dakota affairs.  McGovern made an issue of NCPAC's outside involvement, and that group eventually withdrew from the campaign after Abdnor denounced a letter they had sent out.  Far behind in the polls earlier, McGovern outspent Abdnor 2-to-1 and repeatedly criticized Abdnor's refusal to debate him, thereby drawing attention to a slight speech defect Abdnor had.  Marano, Vote Your Conscience, p. 32.   Showing the comeback pattern of some of his past races in the state, McGovern closed the gap for a while.  However, in November 1980 McGovern was solidly defeated for re-election, getting only 39 percent of the vote to Abdnor's 58 percent.  McGovern became one of many Democratic casualties of that year's Republican sweep,    which became known as the "Reagan Revolution".
Post-Senate life and 1984 presidential campaign
McGovern did not mourn leaving the Senate.  Although being rejected by his own state stung, intellectually he could accept that South Dakotans wanted a more conservative representative; he and Eleanor felt out of touch with the country and in some ways liberated by the loss.  Nevertheless, he refused to believe that American liberalism was dead in the time of Reagan;    remaining active in politics, in January 1981 he founded the political organization Americans for Common Sense.  The group sought to rally liberals, encourage liberal thinking, and combat the Moral Majority and other new Christian right forces.    In 1982, he turned the group into a political action committee, which raised $1.2 million for liberal candidates in the 1982 U.S. Congressional elections.    McGovern shut the committee down when he decided to run for president again. McGovern also began teaching and lecturing at a number of universities in the U.S. and Europe, accepting one-year contracts or less.      From 1981 to 1982, McGovern replaced historian Stephen Ambrose as a professor at the University of New Orleans. McGovern also began making frequent speeches, earning several hundred thousand dollars a year. McGovern attempted another presidential run in the 1984 Democratic Presidential nomination primaries.  Friends and political admirers of McGovern initially feared the effort would prove an embarrassment, and McGovern knew himself that his chances of winning were remote, but he felt compelled to try to influence the intraparty debate in a liberal direction.  Miroff, The Liberals' Moment, p. 270.  Freed from the practical concerns of trying to win, McGovern outlined a ten-point program of sweeping domestic and foreign policy changes; not seen as a threat, fellow competitors did not attack his positions and media commentators praised him as the "conscience" of the Democratic Party. While having name recognition, McGovern had little funding or staff,  although he did garner critical funding from some prominent celebrities and statesmen.  He won a surprise third-place showing in the Iowa caucuses amidst a crowded field of candidates, but finished fifth in the New Hampshire primary.  He announced he would drop out unless he finished first or second in the Massachusetts primary, and when he came in third behind his former campaign manager Gary Hart and former Vice President Walter Mondale, he made good on his promise.  He later endorsed Mondale, the eventual Democratic nominee.  McGovern hosted Saturday Night Live on April 14, 1984. McGovern addressed the party's platform committee  and his name was placed in nomination at the 1984 Democratic National Convention, where he delivered a speech that strongly criticized President Reagan and praised Democratic unity.  He received the votes of four delegates.    He went on to actively support the Mondale-Geraldine Ferraro ticket, whose eventual landslide defeat bore some similarities to his own in 1972.  During the 1980s, McGovern was a fellow at the Institute for Policy Studies, a think tank in Washington, D.C. McGovern had made several real estate investments in the D.C. area and became interested in hotel operations.  In 1988, using the money he had earned from his speeches, the McGoverns bought, renovated, and began running a 150-room inn in Stratford, Connecticut, with the goal of providing a hotel, restaurant and public conference facility.     It went into bankruptcy in 1990 and closed the following year.  In 1992, McGovern's published reflections on the experience appeared in Wall Street Journal and the Nation's Restaurant News.   He attributed part of the failure to the early 1990s recession, but also part to the cost of dealing with federal, state and local regulations that were passed with good intentions but made life difficult for small businesses, and to the cost of dealing with frivolous lawsuits.  McGovern wrote, "I ... wish that during the years I was in public office I had had this firsthand experience about the difficulties business people face every day. That knowledge would have made me a better U.S. senator and a more understanding presidential contender." After briefly exploring in early 1991 another presidential run in the 1992 contest,
Instead, in July 1991, McGovern became president of the Middle East Policy Council,  having previously served on its board since 1986, a non-profit organization that seeks to educate American citizens and policy makers about the political, economic and security issues impacting U.S. national interests in the Middle East. He held this position until 1997 when he was replaced by Charles W. Freeman, Jr. On the night of December 12–13, 1994, McGovern's daughter Teresa fell into a snowbank in Madison, Wisconsin, while heavily intoxicated and died of hypothermia. McGovern, Terry, pp. x–xi.   Heavy press attention followed, and McGovern revealed his daughter had battled her alcoholism for years and had been in and out of many treatment programs while having had one extended period of sobriety.   He authored an account of her life, Terry: My Daughter's Life-and-Death Struggle with Alcoholism; published in 1996, it presented a harrowing, unsparing view of the depths to which she had descended, the torment that he and the rest of his family had experienced in trying unsuccessfully to help her, and his ongoing thoughts and guilt about whether the demands of his political career and the time he had spent away from the family had made things worse for her.     The book was a modest best-seller, and with the proceeds, he founded the Teresa McGovern Center in Madison to help others suffering from the combination of alcoholism and mental health problems.   He would later say that Terry's death was by far the most painful event in his life: "You never get over it, I'm sure of that. You get so you can live with it, that's all." 
Ambassador to food agencies and other later activitiesIn April 1998, McGovern returned to public service when he began a three-year stint as United States Ambassador to the United Nations Agencies for Food and Agriculture, serving in Rome, Italy, after having been named to the post by President Bill Clinton.   In an effort to meet the UN's goal of reducing the number of hungry people in the world by half, he urged delivery of more surplus food to foreign school-lunch programs and the establishment of specific targets such as had been done in old American programs.  He began working again with fellow former Senator Bob Dole to convince the Senate to support this effort, as well as expanded school lunch, food stamps, and nutritional help for pregnant women and poor children in the U.S.    The George McGovern–Robert Dole International Food for Education and Nutrition Program that was created in 2000, and funded largely through the Congress, would go on to provide more than 22 million meals to children in 41 countries over the next eight years.    It was also credited with improving school attendance, especially among girls, who were more likely to be allowed to go to school if a meal was being provided.  In August 2000, President Clinton presented McGovern with the Presidential Medal of Freedom, the nation's highest civilian honor, in recognition of McGovern's humanitarian service in the effort to eradicate world hunger.  McGovern's book The Third Freedom: Ending Hunger In Our Time was published in January 2001; with its title making reference to Roosevelt's Four Freedoms speech, it proposed a plan whereby chronic world hunger could be eliminated within thirty years.  In January 2001, McGovern was asked to stay on at the UN post for a while by the incoming George W. Bush administration,   then concluded his stint in September 2001.  In October 2001, McGovern was appointed as the first UN Global Ambassador on World Hunger by the World Food Programme,    the agency he had helped found forty years earlier. He remained in this Goodwill Ambassador position as of 2011.  McGovern was an honorary life member of the board of Friends of the World Food Program.  McGovern also served as a Senior Policy Advisor at Olsson Frank Weeda, a food and drug regulatory counseling law and lobbying firm in Washington, D.C., where he specialized on issues of food, nutrition, and agriculture.   McGovern's wartime story was at the center of Ambrose's 2001 best-selling profile of the men who flew B‑24s over Germany in World War II, The Wild Blue.  It was the first time much of the public became familiar with that part of his life; throughout his political career, McGovern had rarely mentioned his war service or the medals he had won. McGovern continued to lecture and make public appearances, sometimes appearing with Dole on college campuses.    McGovern and Dole contributed essays to the 2005 volume Ending Hunger Now: A Challenge to Persons of Faith. From around 2003 to 2005, McGovern owned a bookstore in his summer home of Stevensville in Montana's Bitterroot Valley,    until deciding to sell it due to lack of sufficient market.  In 2003, the McGoverns became part-time residents of Marco Island, Florida; by then, Eleanor was struggling with heart disease.   In October 2006, the $8.5 million George and Eleanor McGovern Library and Center for Leadership and Public Service was dedicated at Dakota Wesleyan University. The couple had helped raise the funds for it.   It seeks to prepare the college's best students for future careers in public service through classes, seminars, research, and internships, and also to raise the visibility of the university.    The dignitaries in attendance were led by former President Clinton.   
McGovern's wife Eleanor was too ill to attend the ceremony  and she died of heart disease on January 25, 2007, at their home in Mitchell.   
Later in 2007, several events were held at Dakota Wesleyan and in Washington, D.C., to celebrate McGovern's 85th birthday and the 35th anniversary of his nomination for president. Hundreds of former staff, volunteers, supporters and friends attended, along with public officials.
McGovern still sought to have his voice heard in the American political scene. 
He became an outspoken opponent of the Iraq War, likening U.S. involvement in that country to that of the failed Vietnam effort, and in 2006 co-wrote the book Out of Iraq: A Practical Plan for Withdrawal Now.   
In January 2008, McGovern wrote an op‑ed in the Washington Post calling for the impeachment of President George W. Bush and Vice-President Dick Cheney, saying they had violated the U.S. Constitution, transgressed national and international law, and repeatedly lied to the American people. The subtitle of the article read "Nixon Was Bad. These Guys Are Worse." 
In the tumultuous 2008 Democratic Party presidential nomination campaign, he first endorsed U.S. Senator Hillary Rodham Clinton, then later switched to Senator Barack Obama after concluding Clinton could no longer win.In October 2007, McGovern endorsed U.S. Senator Hillary Rodham Clinton for the 2008 Democratic Party presidential nomination. 
In early May 2008, McGovern switched his endorsement to Senator Barack Obama, on the grounds that Clinton could no longer win.  He then published an op-ed article for The New York Times that said that Clinton's persistence in the campaign was perfectly allowable, but that the two candidates should discontinue criticizing each other and instead focus on presumptive Republican nominee John McCain, lest a repetition of his own experiences with a split party in 1972 occur. On October 16, 2008, McGovern and Dole were made World Food Prize laureates for their for their efforts to curb hunger in the world and in particular for their joint program for school feeding and enhanced school attendance.  
Final years and deathBy 2009, McGovern had moved to St. Augustine Beach, Florida.    McGovern's seventh book (as author, co-author, or contributing editor) issued in decade of the 2000s, Abraham Lincoln, was published by Times Books and released at the close of 2008. Throughout 2009, McGovern embarked on a book tour, including a prominent visit to the Nixon Presidential Library and Museum. He was treated for exhaustion during 2011  and then was hospitalized after a serious fall in December 2011 prior to a live C-SPAN broadcast about his 1972 presidential campaign.    By January 2012, he was promoting his latest book, What It Means to Be a Democrat.  He was hospitalized again in April 2012 due to fainting spells.   
McGovern's 90th birthday was celebrated on July 19, 2012, with a Washington event hosted by World Food Program USA and attended by many liberal Democratic politicians, along with (as the Washington Post termed it) "one respectful conservative", South Dakota's Republican Senator John Thune. 
On July 27, 2012, McGovern's son Steven died at age 60. McGovern's daughter Ann said, "Steve had a long struggle with alcoholism. We will all miss him deeply, but are grateful that he is now at peace." 
In August 2012, McGovern moved back to Sioux Falls, South Dakota, to be nearer to his family.  His final public appearance was on October 6, 2012, when he introduced his recorded narration for Aaron Copland's "Lincoln Portrait" with the South Dakota Symphony Orchestra. On October 15, 2012, McGovern's family announced he had entered Dougherty Hospice House, a Sioux Falls hospice; his daughter Ann said, "He's coming to the end of his life".        A family spokesperson confirmed that McGovern was unresponsive. On the morning of October 21, 2012, McGovern died at age 90 at the Sioux Falls hospice, surrounded by family and lifelong friends. 
The family released this statement: "We are blessed to know that our father lived a long, successful and productive life advocating for the hungry, being a progressive voice for millions and fighting for peace. He continued giving speeches, writing and advising all the way up to and past his 90th birthday, which he celebrated this summer."   In addition to his three remaining children, he was survived by ten grandchildren and eight great-grandchildren.   President Obama paid tribute to him as "a champion for peace" and a "statesman of great conscience and conviction". 
Legacy
Due to his resounding loss to Nixon in the 1972 election and the causes behind it, "McGovernism" became a label that a generation of Democratic politicians tried to avoid.  In 1992, nationally syndicated Chicago Tribune columnist Bob Greene wrote, "Once again politicians – mostly Republicans, but some Democrats, too – are using his name as a synonym for presidential campaigns that are laughable and out of touch with the American people."    Conservatives used McGovern's name as a ready synonym for what they saw as liberal failures.  Indeed, according to Daniel McCarthy of The American Conservative, the Republican Party began to act after 1972 as if "every Democratic leader, no matter how Southern, how pro-war, how middle-of-the-road, is really a McGovernite. Indeed, for nearly 40 years the conservative movement has defined itself in opposition to the Democratic standard-bearer of 1972. Anti-McGovernism has come to play for the Right the unifying role that anticommunism once played, much to the detriment of older principles such as limited government, fiscal continence, and prudence in foreign policy."    The association with dovishness and weakness on defense has been especially prevalent, Miroff, The Liberals' Moment, pp. 1–2.  although McGovern publicly stated in 1972 that he was not a pacifist and that use of force was sometimes necessary, such as in World War II.  McGovern later said in 2001 that his political image had been exaggerated: "I am a liberal and always have been – just not the wild-eyed character the Republicans made me out to be."  He continued to feel that he was marginalized with his views miscast.   He saw himself as a son of the prairie, in 2005 reciting his traditional upbringing and family values, culminating with "I'm what a normal, healthy, ideal American should be like,"  and in 2006 said, "How the hell do you get elected in South Dakota for twenty years if you're a wild-eyed radical?"  He remained a symbol, or standard-bearer, of the political left, particularly in relation to the turbulent 1960s and early 1970s when the country was torn by U.S. involvement in the Vietnam War and the corruption and abuse of power of the Nixon administration.    McGovern recognized the mixed results of his 1972 candidacy, saying, "We made a serious effort to open the doors of the Democratic Party – and as soon as we did, half the Democrats walked out."  As chair of the McGovern–Fraser Commission in 1969–1970, McGovern instituted major changes in Democratic party rules that continue to this day and, to a large degree, were ultimately adopted by the Republican Party as well, with large institutional changes taking place in both.  Among those was the centralization of decisions about the nominating process at the national party level, rather than with the states. Cook, The Presidential Nominating Process, pp. 43–44.  His 1972 campaign followed to fundamentally alter how presidential primary campaigns were waged. Miroff, The Liberals' Moment, pp. 2–3.   Within the Democratic Party, power shifted from the New Deal coalition to younger, more affluent, issue-oriented activists; the women's movement and gay rights movement found a place; skepticism about military buildups and foreign interventions took hold; and the 1960s "New Politics" found its culmination in McGovern's nomination.   In turn, the overwhelming defeat of McGovern in the general election led to the liberal wing of the party's being stigmatized for decades to come and a turn in the party towards centrist directions.   SUNY Albany political scientist Bruce Miroff wrote in 2007 that the McGovern campaign was the last time in presidential politics that liberals had "their chance to speak of their goals with enthusiasm and their dreams with fire ... Yet almost at the instant that the insurgents successfully stormed the heights of American politics, they found themselves on the brink of one of the worst free falls on record." Staffers who worked on McGovern's 1972 campaign later became influential within the Democratic Party. Miroff, The Liberals' Moment, pp. 290–293.   Campaign manager Gary Hart staged his own presidential runs in 1984 and 1988.  Future president Bill Clinton, with assistance from his future wife and politician Hillary Rodham, had managed the McGovern campaign's operations in Texas.   Hart both embraced and moved away from aspects of his past affiliation with McGovern,   while Clinton, and the Democratic Leadership Council movement of which he was a part, explicitly rejected McGovern's ideology.   But there was still a legacy in terms of staffing, as the Clinton White House would be full of former "McGovernites". McGovern's post-political career generally enhanced his reputation; Tom Brokaw, who included him among his notion of the "Greatest Generation", wrote in 1998 that "He remains one of the country's most decent and thoughtful public servants." 
McGovern's legacy also includes his commitment to combating hunger both in the United States and around the globe. He said, "After I'm gone, I want people to say about me: He did the best he could to end hunger in this country and the world."  Overall, when confronted with the Serenity Prayer's desire to "grant me the serenity to accept the things I cannot change", McGovern said simply that he rejected that notion: "I keep trying to change them." 
Awards and honors 
McGovern received many awards and honors, especially once he was no longer running for office, including the Presidential Medal of Freedom. 
In popular culture 
Since his loss in the 1972 presidential election, there have been numerous allusions to McGovern in American popular culture. 
Electoral history 
Writings

McGovern, George S., War Against Want: America's Food for Peace Program, Walker & Co., 1964.
McGovern, George S., Agricultural Thought in the Twentieth Century, Bobbs-Merrill, 1966.
McGovern, George S., A Time of War! A Time of Peace, Vintage Books, 1968. ISBN 0-394-70481-9.
McGovern, George S., Guttridge, Leonard F. The Great Coalfield War, Houghton Mifflin, 1972.
McGovern, George S., Grassroots: The Autobiography of George McGovern, Random House, 1977. ISBN 0-394-41941-3.
McGovern, George S., Terry: My Daughter's Life-And-Death Struggle With Alcoholism, New York: Villard, 1996. ISBN 0-679-44797-0,  .
McGovern, George S., The Third Freedom: Ending Hunger in Our Time, Simon & Schuster, 2001. ISBN 0-684-85334-5.
McGovern, George S., The Essential America: Our Founders and the Liberal Tradition, Simon & Schuster, 2004. ISBN 0-7432-6927-6.
McGovern, George S., Social Security and the Golden Age: An Essay on the New American Demographic, Speaker's Corner Books, 2005. ISBN 1-55591-589-2.
McGovern, George S., Bob Dole and Donald E. Messer, Ending Hunger Now: A Challenge to Persons of Faith, Augsburg Fortress, 2005. ISBN 0-8006-3782-8.
McGovern, George S. and Polk, William R., Out of Iraq: A Practical Plan for Withdrawal Now, Simon & Schuster, 2006. ISBN 1-4165-3456-3.
McGovern, George S., Donald C. Simmons, Jr. and Daniel Gaken (eds.) Leadership and Service: An Introduction, Kendall Hunt Publishing, 2008. ISBN 0-7575-5109-2.
McGovern, George S., Abraham Lincoln, Times Books, 2008. ISBN 0-8050-8345-6,  .
McGovern, George S., What It Means to Be a Democrat, Blue Rider Press, 2011. ISBN 0-399-15822-7.


Bibliography

Ambrose, Stephen, The Wild Blue : The Men and Boys Who Flew the B-24s Over Germany 1944–45, Simon & Schuster, 2001. ISBN 0-7432-0339-9.
Anson, Robert Sam, McGovern: A Biography, New York: Holt, Rinehart and Winston, 1972. ISBN 0-03-091345-4.
Brokaw, Tom, The Greatest Generation, New York: Random House, 1998.
Clinton, Bill, My Life, Vintage, 2005. ISBN 1-4000-3003-X.
Cook, Rhodes, The Presidential Nominating Process: A Place for Us?, Lanham, Maryland: Rowman & Littlefield, 2004 (paperback). ISBN 0-7425-2594-5.
Dougherty, Richard, Goodbye, Mr. Christian: A Personal Account of McGovern's Rise and Fall, Garden City, New York: Doubleday & Company, 1973. ISBN 0-385-01546-1.
Giglio, James N. "The Eagleton Affair: Thomas Eagleton, George McGovern, and the 1972 Vice Presidential Nomination", Presidential Studies Quarterly, Dec 2009, Vol. 39 Issue 4, pp 647–676
Hart, Gary, Right from the Start: A Chronicle of the McGovern Campaign, New York: Quadrangle, 1973. ISBN 0-8129-0372-2.
Lauck, Jon K. "George S. Mcgovern and the Farmer: South Dakota Politics, 1953–1962", South Dakota History, Winter 2002, Vol. 32 Issue 4, pp 331–353
Mann, Robert, A Grand Delusion: America's Descent Into Vietnam, New York: Basic Books, 2001. ISBN 0-465-04369-0.
Marano, Richard Michael, Vote Your Conscience: The Last Campaign of George McGovern, Praeger Publishers, 2003. ISBN 0-275-97189-9.
McGovern, Eleanor, Uphill: A Personal Story, Boston: Houghton Mifflin Company, 1974. ISBN 0-395-19414-8.
Miroff, Bruce, The Liberals' Moment: The McGovern Insurgency and the Identity Crisis of the Democratic Party, University Press of Kansas, 2007. ISBN 0-7006-1546-9 .
Moritz, Charles (ed.), Current Biography Yearbook 1967, H. W. Wilson Company, 1968.  
Reeves, Richard, President Nixon: Alone in the White House, New York: Simon and Schuster, 2001 (paperback).  ISBN 0-7432-2719-0.
Reichley, A. James, The Life of the Parties: A History of American Political Parties, Lanham, Maryland: Rowman & Littlefield Publishers, 2000 (paperback). ISBN 0-7425-0888-9.
Schlesinger Jr., Arthur M., A Thousand Days: John F. Kennedy in the White House, Houghton Mifflin, 1965. ISBN 0-618-21927-7.
Thompson, Hunter S., Fear and Loathing on the Campaign Trail '72, Warner Books, 1973. ISBN 0-446-31364-5.
Watson, Robert P. (ed.), George McGovern: A Political Life, A Political Legacy, South Dakota State Historical Society Press, 2004. ISBN 0-9715171-6-9.
Wayne, Stephen J., The Road to the White House 2008: The Politics of Presidential Elections (8th edition), Boston: Thomson Wadsworth, 2008. ISBN 0-495-09632-6.
Weil, Gordon L., The Long Shot: George McGovern Runs for President, New York: W. W. Norton & Company, 1973. ISBN 0-393-05498-5.
White, Theodore H., The Making of the President 1968, Antheneum Publishers, 1969.  
White, Theodore H., The Making of the President 1972, Antheneum Publishers, 1973. ISBN 0-689-10553-3.
Witcover, Jules, Party of the People: A History of the Democrats, New York: Random House, 2003. ISBN 0-375-50742-6.


Notes 
References 
External links 

 
"George McGovern, Presidential Contender" from C-SPAN's The Contenders
George McGovern – Goodwill Ambassador at World Food Programme
McGovern-Dole International Food for Education and Child Nutrition Program
George and Eleanor McGovern Center for Leadership and Public Service at Dakota Wesleyan University
McGovern Legacy Museum at McGovern Center
McGovern Library at Dakota Wesleyan University
The Senator George S. McGovern Collection at Dakota Wesleyan University
George S. McGovern Papers at the Seeley G. Mudd Manuscript Library, Princeton University
McGovern nomination acceptance speech, July 10, 1972

 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT







































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Stuart Kauffman
 
 
Stuart Alan Kauffman (b. September 28, 1939) is an American  theoretical biologist and complex systems researcher who studies the origin of life on Earth.In 1971, Kauffman proposed the self-organized emergence of collectively autocatalytic sets of polymers, specifically peptides, for the origin of molecular reproduction.   Reproducing peptide, DNA, and RNA collectively autocatalytic sets have now been made experimentally.   He is best known for arguing that the complexity of biological systems and organisms might result as much from self-organization and far-from-equilibrium dynamics as from Darwinian natural selection, as well as for applying models of Boolean networks to simplified genetic circuits. His hypotheses stating that cell types are attractors of such networks, and that genetic regulatory networks are "critical" have found experimental support.  
BiographyKauffman graduated from Dartmouth in 1960, was awarded the BA (Hons) by Oxford University (where he was a Marshall Scholar) in 1963, and completed a medical degree (M.D.) at the University of California, San Francisco in 1968. After completing his residency in Emergency Medicine, he moved into developmental genetics of the fruitfly, holding appointments first at the University of Chicago, then at the University of Pennsylvania from 1975 to 1995, where he rose to Professor of Biochemistry and Biophysics. Kauffman held a MacArthur Fellowship, 1987–1992.Kauffman rose to prominence through his association with the Santa Fe Institute (a non-profit research institute dedicated to the study of complex systems), where he was faculty in residence from 1986 to 1997, and through his work on models in various areas of biology. These included autocatalytic sets in origin of life research, gene regulatory networks in developmental biology, and fitness landscapes in evolutionary biology. Kauffman holds the founding broad biotechnology patents in combinatorial chemistry and applied molecular evolution. In 1996, Kauffman started BiosGroup, a Santa Fe, New Mexico-based for-profit company that applied complex systems methodology to business problems. BiosGroup was acquired by NuTech Solutions  in early 2003. NuTech was bought by Netezza in 2008.From 2004 to 2009 Kauffman held a joint appointment at the University of Calgary in Biological Sciences and Physics and Astronomy. He is also an Adjunct Professor in the Department of Philosophy at the University of Calgary. He is an iCORE (Informatics Research Circle of Excellence)   chair and the director of the Institute for Biocomplexity and Informatics.In January 2009 Kauffman became a Finland Distinguished Professor (FiDiPro) at Tampere University of Technology, Department of Signal Processing. The appointment is until the end of 2012. The subject of the FiDiPro research project is the development of delayed stochastic models of genetic regulatory networks based on gene expression data at the single molecule level.   In January 2010 Kauffman joined the University of Vermont faculty where he will continue his work with UVM's Complex Systems Center.    He is also an adviser to the Microbes Mind Forum.
WorkKauffman is best known for arguing that the complexity of biological systems and organisms might result as much from self-organization and far-from-equilibrium dynamics as from Darwinian natural selection.Some biologists and physicists working in Kauffman's area reserve judgment on Kauffman's claims about self-organization and evolution. A case in point is the introduction to the 2002 book "Self Organization in Biological Systems".  Roger Sansom's Ingenious Genes: How Gene Regulation Networks Evolve to Control Development (MIT Press, 2011) is an extended criticism of Kauffman's models. Kauffman's recent work translates his biological findings to the mind body problem and issues in neuroscience, proposing attributes of a new "poised realm" that hovers indefinitely between quantum coherence and classicality . Kauffman published on this topic in Answering Descartes: Beyond Turing.  With colleagues Giuseppe Longo and Maël Montévil, Stuart Kauffman wrote (January 2012) "No entailing laws, but enablement in the evolution of the biosphere,"  which aims to show that evolution is not law entailed, as is physics, and that, without selection, evolution enables its own future possibilities.
PublicationsSelect bibliography

1993, Origins of Order: Self-Organization and Selection in Evolution, Oxford University Press, Technical monograph. ISBN 0-19-507951-5
1995, At Home in the Universe：The Search for Laws of Self-Organization and Complexity. Oxford University Press.
2000, Investigations. Oxford University Press.
2008, Reinventing the Sacred: A New View of Science, Reason, and Religion.  [Basic Books] - ISBN 0-465-00300-1

Selected articles

1969, "Metabolic stability and epigenesis in randomly constructed genetic nets," in: Journal of Theoretical Biology, 22:437–467, 1969.
1991, "Antichaos and Adaptation," in: Scientific American, August 1991.
2004, "Prolegomenon to a General Biology", in William A. Dembski, Michael Ruse, eds., Debating Design: From Darwin to DNA, Cambridge University Press.
2004, "Autonomous Agents", in John D. Barrow, P.C.W. Davies, and C.L. Harper Jr., eds., Science and Ultimate Reality: Quantum Theory, Cosmology, and Complexity, Cambridge University Press.

About Stuart Kauffman

MacKenzie, Dana (2002).  "The Science of Surprise", Discover Magazine, Vol. 23, No. 2, 59–63, February 2002.
Kauffman about Kauffman: (Video)
Goldstein, Jeffrey A. (2008). Book Review of "Reinventing the Sacred: A New View of Science, Reason, and Religion", by Stuart Kauffman. In Emergence: Complexity & Organization, 10(3), 117–130.
Di Bernardo, M., I sentieri evolutivi della complessità biologica nell'opera di S. A. Kauffman, Mimesis, Milano 2011.


References 
External links

An online chat with Stuart Kauffman on a complexity organization website.
Video presentation "The adjacent possible" by Kauffman on autonomous agents.
Biocomplexity and Informatics iCORE Chair.
Beyond reductionism: Reinventing The Sacred, paper by Kauffman on reductionism.
Video presentation "Reinventing The Sacred" Stuart Kauffman on his new book. Video talk for a Conference in Doha, Katar, produced, May 17.2008
SYNCD.org Stuart Kauffman  about the need of a "transnational mythic structure"
Tech Nation discussion with Dr. Moira Gunn on his book "Reinventing the Sacred" (recorded June 6, 2008).
"God enough" by Steve Paulson Interview with Stuart Kauffman (2008).
Stuart Kauffman homepage at Tampere University of Technology
Kauffman's lecture videos at Tampere in April 2010
"From physics to semiotics" (Kauffman's seminar in the Dept. of Semiotics of the University of Tartu on April 27, 2012)

  
DEFAULTSORT









 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Sonny Carter
 
 
Manley Lanier "Sonny" Carter, Jr. (August 15, 1947–April 5, 1991) was an American physician, professional soccer player, United States Navy officer, and NASA astronaut who flew on STS-33.  
Early lifeSonny Carter was born in Macon, Georgia, but considered Warner Robins, Georgia, to be his hometown. He graduated from Lanier High School in Macon in 1965. He received a bachelor of arts degree in chemistry from Emory University in Atlanta in 1969 and a doctor of medicine degree from there in 1973.  During his time at Emory, Carter was a brother in the Alpha Tau Omega Fraternity.  After completing medical school in 1973, Carter completed internship in internal medicine at Grady Memorial Hospital in Atlanta.
Athletic careerCarter played collegiate soccer and ran track while an undergraduate at Emory University. During his senior season he was captain and most valuable player of the soccer team.  In addition to his intercollegiate athletic career, Carter was an intramural wrestling champion.  Carter played professional soccer while he attended medical school. In 1970 he signed with the Atlanta Chiefs of the North American Soccer League, for whom he played three seasons. 
Military careerIn 1974 he entered the U.S. Navy and completed flight surgeon school in Pensacola, Florida. After serving tours as a flight surgeon with the 1st and 3rd Marine Aircraft Wings, he returned to flight training at Beeville, Texas, and was designated a Naval Aviator on April 28, 1978. He was assigned as the senior medical officer of the USS Forrestal, and in March 1979 completed F-4 training at VMFAT-101 in Marine Corps Air Station Yuma, Arizona. He was subsequently reassigned as a fighter pilot, flying F-4 Phantoms with Marine Fighter Attack Squadron 333 (VMFA-333) at MCAS Beaufort, South Carolina. In 1981 he completed a nine-month Mediterranean cruise aboard USS Forrestal with VMFA-115. In September 1982 he attended U.S. Navy Fighter Weapons School (TOPGUN) and then served as the 2nd Marine Aircraft Wing standardization officer and F-4 combat readiness evaluator at MCAS Cherry Point, North Carolina. He then attended the U.S. Naval Test Pilot School, graduating in June 1984. He has logged 3,000 flying hours and 160 carrier landings.
AstronautSelected by NASA in May 1984, Dr. Carter became an astronaut in June 1985, qualified for assignment as a mission specialist on future Space Shuttle flight crews. He was assigned as Extra-vehicular activity (EVA) Representative for the Mission Development Branch of the Astronaut Office when selected to the crew of STS-33. The STS-33 crew launched from Kennedy Space Center, Florida, at night on November 22, 1989, aboard the Space Shuttle Discovery. The mission carried Department of Defense payloads and other secondary payloads. After 79 orbits of the earth, this five-day mission concluded on November 27, 1989 with a hard surface landing on Runway 04 at Edwards Air Force Base, California. Carter logged 120 hours in space. At the time of his death, Carter was assigned as a mission specialist on the crew of STS-42, the first International Microgravity Laboratory (IML-1).
DeathCarter died in the April 5, 1991 crash of Atlantic Southeast Airlines Flight 2311 in Brunswick, Georgia. He was aboard the commercial airplane traveling for NASA.  Among the others who also died in the plane crash was former Senator John Tower of Texas.
LegacyHaving died in the line of duty for NASA, Carter's name was added to the Space Mirror Memorial at Kennedy Space Center Visitor Complex in Merritt Island, Florida. His name was the first added after the memorial's original construction.After his death, his name was given to the Sonny Carter Training Facility Neutral Buoyancy Laboratory, NASA's underwater astronaut training facility, for which he had developed training techniques.Sonny Carter Elementary School in Macon, Georgia, which opened in 1993, was named for Carter. The school motto is: "To Challenge the Edge of the Universe."In 1989, the school inducted him in its Athletic Hall of Fame.   The university holds The Sonny Carter Invitational each year in his honor. A plaque also honors his memory in the library of the Alpha Tau Omega fraternity house at Emory University, in which he was a Brother.
References 
External links

NASA Biography
Spacefacts biography of Sonny Carter
 
 

 
  
DEFAULTSORT




















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Claus von Stauffenberg
 Claus Philipp Maria Schenk Graf von Stauffenberg,  commonly referred to as Claus Schenk Graf von Stauffenberg ( ), Claus von Stauffenberg, or Colonel Claus von Stauffenberg (15 November 1907 – 21 July 1944), was a German army officer and aristocrat who was one of the leading members of the failed 20 July plot of 1944 to assassinate Adolf Hitler and remove the Nazi Party from power. Along with Henning von Tresckow and Hans Oster, he was one of the central figures of the German Resistance movement within the Wehrmacht. For his involvement in the movement he was shot shortly after the failed attempt known as Operation Valkyrie. 
Family nameStauffenberg's given name was Claus Philipp Maria Justinian, with the noble title at the end. He was born in the Stauffenberg castle of Jettingen between Ulm and Augsburg, in the eastern part of Swabia, at that time in the Kingdom of Bavaria, part of the German Empire. He was the third of four sons including the twins Berthold and Alexander and his own twin brother Konrad Maria, who died in Jettingen one day after birth on 16 November 1907. His father was Alfred Klemens Philipp Friedrich Justinian, the last Oberhofmarschall of the Kingdom of Württemberg. His mother was Caroline Schenk Gräfin von Stauffenberg, née Gräfin von Üxküll-Gyllenband, the daughter of Alfred Richard August Graf von Üxküll-Gyllenband and Valerie Gräfin von Hohenthal.The titles graf and gräfin mean count and countess, respectively. Schenk (i.e., cupbearer/butler) was an additional hereditary noble title.  The ancestral castle of the nobility was the last part of the title, which would be Schenk Graf von Stauffenberg and used as part of the name. The Stauffenberg family is one of the oldest and most distinguished aristocratic Catholic families of southern Germany. Among his maternal Protestant ancestors were several famous Prussians, including Field Marshal August von Gneisenau.On 11 November 1919, a new constitutional law, as part of the Weimar Republic, abolished the privileges of nobility. Article 109 also stated, "Legal privileges or disadvantages based on birth or social standing are to be abolished. Noble titles form part of the name only; noble titles may not be granted any more."  After this titles of nobility were incorporated as part of a surname.
Early lifeIn his youth, he and his brothers were members of the Neupfadfinder, a German Scout association and part of the German Youth movement.   
   
  Like his brothers, he was carefully educated and inclined toward literature, but eventually took up a military career. In 1926, he joined the family's traditional regiment, the Bamberger Reiter- und Kavallerieregiment 17 (17th Cavalry Regiment) in Bamberg. It was around this time that the three brothers were introduced by Albrecht von Blumenthal to poet Stefan George's influential circle, Georgekreis, from which many notable members of the German resistance would later emerge. George dedicated Das neue Reich ("the new Empire") in 1928, including the Geheimes Deutschland ("secret Germany") written in 1922, to Berthold.  The work outlines a new form of society ruled by a hierarchical spiritual aristocracy. George rejected any attempts to use it for political purposes, especially Nazism.Stauffenberg was commissioned as a Leutnant (second lieutenant) in 1930. He studied modern weapons at the Kriegsakademie in Berlin-Moabit, but remained focused on the use of horses—which continued to carry out a large part of transportation duties throughout World War II—in modern warfare. His regiment became part of the German 1st Light Division under General Erich Hoepner, who had taken part in the plans for the September 1938 German Resistance coup, cut short by Hitler's unexpected diplomatic success in the Munich Agreement. The unit was among the troops that moved into the Sudetenland, the part of Czechoslovakia that had a German-speaking majority, as agreed upon in Munich. However, Stauffenberg disliked the method by which the Sudetenland was annexed and strongly disapproved of the invasion of Prague.
Pre-war misgivingsAlthough Stauffenberg agreed with some of the Nazi Party's nationalistic aspects, he found many aspects of its ideology repugnant and never became a member of the party. Moreover, Stauffenberg remained a practicing Catholic. The Catholic Church had signed the Reichskonkordat in 1933, the year Hitler and the Nazi Party came to power. Stauffenberg vacillated between a strong personal dislike of Hitler's policies and a respect for what he perceived to be Hitler's military  . On top of this, the growing systematic ill-treatment of Jews and suppression of religion had offended Stauffenberg's strong personal sense of Catholic religious morality and justice.    “Claus Schenk Graf von Stauffenberg,” German Resistance Memorial Center. 2009. (Retrieved 2009-12-28.) 
World War II 
Conquest of Poland, 1939Following the outbreak of war in 1939, Stauffenberg and his regiment took part in the attack on Poland. He supported the occupation of Poland and its handling by the Nazi regime and the use of Poles as slave workers to achieve German prosperity   page 100: "He was endorsing both the tyrannical occupation of Poland and the use of its people as slave labourers"  as well as German colonization and exploitation of Poland. The deeply-rooted belief common in the German aristocracy was that the Eastern territories, populated predominantly by Poles and partly absorbed by Prussia in partitions of Poland, but taken from the German Empire after World War I, should be colonized as the Teutonic Knights had done in the Middle Ages. Stauffenberg said, "It is essential that we begin a systemic colonization in Poland. But I have no fear that this will not occur".    It is certain that in the early stages of the war, he still held the usual aristocratic beliefs typical of late imperial times.
Early appeals to join resistance, 1939While his uncle, Nikolaus Graf von Üxküll-Gyllenband, had approached him before to join the resistance movement against the Hitler regime, it was only after the Polish campaign that Stauffenberg began to consider it. Peter Yorck von Wartenburg and Ulrich Schwerin von Schwanenfeld urged him to become the adjutant of Walther von Brauchitsch, then Supreme Commander of the Army, in order to participate in a coup against Hitler. Stauffenberg declined at the time, reasoning that all German soldiers had pledged allegiance not to the institution of the presidency of the German Reich, but to the person of Adolf Hitler, due to the Führereid introduced in 1934.
Battle of France, 1940Stauffenberg's unit was reorganized into the 6th Panzer Division, and he served as an officer on its general staff in the Battle of France, for which he was awarded the Iron Cross First Class. Like many others, Stauffenberg was impressed by the overwhelming military success, which was attributed to Hitler.
Operation Barbarossa, 1941Operation Barbarossa, the German invasion of the Soviet Union, was launched on June 22, 1941. The mass executions of Russians, Ukrainians, Jews and others, as well as what he believed was an already apparent deficiency in military leadership (Hitler had assumed the role of supreme commander in late 1941 after firing Hoepner and others), finally convinced Stauffenberg in 1942 to join with resistance groups within the Wehrmacht, the only force that had a chance to overcome Hitler's Gestapo, SD, and SS. During the idle months of the so-called Phoney War, preceding the Battle of France (1939–40), he had already been transferred to the organizational department of the Oberkommando des Heeres, the German army high command, which directed the operations on the Eastern Front. Stauffenberg opposed the Commissar Order, which Hitler wrote and then cancelled after a year.  He tried to soften the German occupation policy in the conquered areas of the Soviet Union by pointing out the benefits of getting volunteers for the Ostlegionen which were commanded by his department. Guidelines were issued on 2 June 1942 for the proper treatment of prisoners of war from the Caucasus region who had been captured by Heeresgruppe A. The Soviet Union had not signed the 1929 Geneva Convention. However, a month after the German invasion in 1941, an offer was made for a reciprocal adherence to the Hague Conventions. This 'note' was left unanswered by Third Reich officials.  Stauffenberg did not engage in any coup plot at this time. The Stauffenberg brothers (Berthold and Claus) maintained contact with former commanders like Hoepner, and with the Kreisau Circle; they also included civilians and social democrats like Julius Leber in their scenarios for an administration after Hitler.According to Hoffman (p. 131, 1988) citing Brigadier (ret.) Oskar Alfred-Berger's letters, Stauffenberg had commented openly on the ill-treatment of the Jews when he "expressed outrage and shock on this subject to fellow officers in General Staff Headquarters in Vinnitsa (Ukraine) during the summer of 1942."   Being interrogated after his capture by the Red Army on September 2, 1944, Stauffenberg's friend, Major Joachim Kuhn stated that Stauffenberg had told him in August 1942 that "They are shooting Jews in masses. These crimes must not be allowed to continue."  After his arrest in July 1944, Stauffenberg’s older brother Berthold told the Gestapo that: “He and his brother had basically approved of the racial principle of National Socialism, but considered it to be exaggerated and excessive”. 
Tunisia, 1942In November 1942, the Allies landed in French North Africa, and the 10th Panzer Division occupied Vichy France (Case Anton) before being transferred to the Tunisian Campaign, as part of the Afrika Korps.In 1943, Stauffenberg was promoted to Oberstleutnant i.G.  (lieutenant-colonel of the general staff), and was sent to Africa to join the 10th Panzer Division as its Operations Officer in the General Staff (Ia). On 19 February, Rommel launched his counter-offensive against British, American and French forces in Tunisia. The Axis commanders hoped to break rapidly through either the Sbiba or Kasserine Pass into the rear of the British 1st Army. The assault at Sbiba was halted, so that Rommel concentrated on Kasserine Pass where primarily the Italians in the form of their 7th Bersaglieri Regiment and 131st Centauro Armoured Division had defeated the American defenders.  During the fighting, Stauffenberg drove up to be with the leading tanks and troops of the 10th Panzer Division.  The division, together with the 21st Panzer Division, took up defensive positions near Mezzouna on 8 April.On 7 April 1943, Stauffenberg was involved in driving from one unit to another, directing their movement.  Near Mezzouna, his vehicle was part of a column strafed by Kittyhawk (P-40) fighter bombers of the Desert Air Force – most likely from No. 3 Squadron, Royal Australian Air Force   – and he received severe, multiple wounds. Stauffenberg spent three months in a hospital in Munich, where he was treated by Ferdinand Sauerbruch. Stauffenberg lost his left eye, his right hand, and two fingers on his left hand.    He jokingly remarked to friends never to have really known what to do with so many fingers when he still had all of them. For his injuries, Stauffenberg was awarded the Wound Badge in Gold on 14 April and for his courage the German Cross in Gold on 8 May.
In the resistance, 1943–1944For rehabilitation, Stauffenberg was sent to his home, Schloss Lautlingen (today a museum), then still one of the Stauffenberg castles in southern Germany. Initially, he felt frustrated not to be in a position to stage a coup himself. But by the beginning of September 1943, after a somewhat slow recovery from his wounds, he was propositioned by the conspirators and was introduced to Henning von Tresckow as a staff officer to the headquarters of the Ersatzheer ("Replacement Army" – charged with training soldiers to reinforce first line divisions at the front), located on the Bendlerstrasse (later Stauffenbergstrasse) in Berlin.There, one of Stauffenberg's superiors was General Friedrich Olbricht, a committed member of the resistance movement. The Ersatzheer had a unique opportunity to launch a coup, as one of its functions was to have Operation Valkyrie in place. This was a contingency measure which would let it assume control of the Reich in the event that internal disturbances blocked communications to the military high command. Ironically, the Valkyrie plan had been agreed to by Hitler but was now secretly changed to sweep the rest of his regime from power in the event of his death.A detailed military plan was developed not only to occupy Berlin, but also to take the different headquarters of the German army and of Hitler in East Prussia by military force after the suicide assassination attempt by Axel von dem Bussche in late November 1943. Stauffenberg had von dem Bussche transmit these written orders personally to Major Kuhn once he had arrived at Wolfsschanze (Wolf's Lair) near Rastenburg, East Prussia. However, von dem Bussche had left the Wolfsschanze for the eastern front, after the meeting with Hitler was cancelled, and the attempt could not be made. Kuhn hid these compromising documents under a watch tower of the OKW, located not far from the Wolfsschanze.Kuhn became a prisoner of war of the Soviets after the 20 July plot. He led the Soviets to the hiding place of the documents in February 1945. In 1989, Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev presented these documents to then-German chancellor Dr. Helmut Kohl. These documents, produced by Stauffenberg and his fellow officers in 1943 in Berlin, evince the idealistic motivation of the resistance group. This had been doubted and was a matter of discussion for years in Germany after the war. Some thought the plotters wanted to kill Hitler in order to end the war and to avoid the loss of their privileges as professional officers and members of the nobility. On D-Day, June 6, 1944, the Allies had landed in France. Stauffenberg, like most other German professional military officers, had absolutely no doubt that the war was lost. Only an immediate armistice could avoid more unnecessary bloodshed and further damage to Germany, its people, and other European nations. However, in late 1943, he had written out demands with which he felt the Allies had to comply in order for Germany to agree to an immediate peace. These demands included Germany retaining its 1914 eastern borders, including the Polish territories of Wielkopolska and Poznań.  Other demands included keeping such territorial gains as Austria and the Sudetenland within the Reich, giving autonomy to Alsace-Lorraine, and even expansion of the current wartime borders of Germany in the south by annexing Tyrol as far as Bolzano and Merano. Non-territorial demands included such points as refusal of any occupation of Germany by the Allies, as well as refusal to hand over war criminals by demanding the right of "nations to deal with its own criminals". These proposals were only directed to the Western Allies – Stauffenberg wanted Germany only to retreat from western, southern and northern positions, while demanding the right to continue military occupation of German territorial gains in the east. Martyn Housden,"Resistance and Conformity in the Third Reich";Routledge 1997;page 109–110 
20 July plot 



From the beginning of September 1943 until 20 July 1944, von Stauffenberg was the driving force behind the plot to assassinate Hitler and take control of Germany. His resolve, organizational abilities, and radical approach put an end to inactivity caused by doubts and long discussions on whether military virtues had been made obsolete by Hitler's behaviour. With the help of his friend Henning von Tresckow, he united the conspirators and drove them into action. Stauffenberg was aware that, under German law, he was committing high treason. He openly told young conspirator Axel von dem Bussche in late 1943, "ich betreibe mit allen mir zur Verfügung stehenden Mitteln den Hochverrat..." ("I am committing high treason with all my might and means....").  He justified himself to Bussche by referring to the right under natural law ("Naturrecht") to defend millions of people's lives from the criminal aggressions of Hitler.Only after the conspirator General Helmuth Stieff on 7 July 1944 had declared himself unable to assassinate Hitler on a uniforms display at Klessheim castle near Salzburg, Stauffenberg decided to personally kill Hitler and to run the plot in Berlin. By then, Stauffenberg had great doubts about the possibility of success. Tresckow convinced him to go on with it even if it had no chance of success at all, "The assassination must be attempted. Even if it fails, we must take action in Berlin", as this would be the only way to prove to the world that the Hitler regime and Germany were not one and the same and that not all Germans supported the regime.Stauffenberg's part in the original plan required him to stay at the Bendlerstraße offices in Berlin, so he could phone regular army units all over Europe in an attempt to convince them to arrest leaders of Nazi political organizations such as the Sicherheitsdienst (SD) and the Gestapo. Unfortunately, when General Helmuth Stieff, Chief of Operation at Army High Command, who had regular access to Hitler, backtracked from his earlier commitment to assassinate Hitler, Stauffenberg was forced to take on two critical roles: kill Hitler far from Berlin and trigger the military machine in Berlin during office hours of the very same day. Beside Stieff, he was the only conspirator who had regular access to Hitler (during his briefings) by mid-1944, as well as being the only officer among the conspirators thought to have the resolve and persuasiveness to convince German military leaders to throw in with the coup once Hitler was dead. This requirement greatly reduced the chance of a successful coup.After several unsuccessful tries by Stauffenberg to meet Hitler, Göring and Himmler when they were together, he went ahead with the attempt at Wolfsschanze on 20 July 1944. Stauffenberg entered the briefing room carrying a briefcase containing two small bombs. The location had unexpectedly been changed from the subterranean Führerbunker to Albert Speer's wooden barrack/hut. He left the room to arm the first bomb with specially-adapted pliers, a task made difficult because he had lost his right hand and had only three fingers on his left. A guard knocked and opened the door, urging him to hurry as the meeting was about to begin. As a result, Stauffenberg was able to arm only one of the bombs. He left the second bomb with his aide-de-camp, Werner von Haeften, and returned to the briefing room, where he placed the briefcase under the conference table, as close as he could to Hitler. Some minutes later, he excused himself and left the room. After his exit, the briefcase was moved by Colonel Heinz Brandt.When the explosion tore through the hut, Stauffenberg was convinced that no one in the room could have survived. Although four people were killed and almost all survivors were injured, Hitler himself was shielded from the blast by the heavy, solid-oak conference table and was only slightly wounded.Stauffenberg and Haeften quickly left and drove to the nearby airfield. After his return to Berlin, Stauffenberg immediately began to motivate his friends to initiate the second phase: the military coup against the Nazi leaders. When Joseph Goebbels announced by radio that Hitler had survived and later, after Hitler himself personally spoke on the state radio, the conspirators realized  that the coup had failed. They were tracked to their Bendlerstrasse offices and overpowered after a brief shoot-out, during which Stauffenberg was wounded in the shoulder.
Execution
In an attempt to save his own life, co-conspirator Generaloberst Friedrich Fromm, Commander-in-Chief of the Replacement Army present in the Bendlerblock (Headquarters of the Army), charged other conspirators in an impromptu court martial and condemned the ringleaders of the conspiracy to death. Colonel Claus von Stauffenberg, his aide 1st Lieutenant Werner von Haeften, Colonel General Friedrich Olbricht, and Colonel Albrecht Mertz von Quirnheim were executed before 1:00 am that night (21 July 1944) by a makeshift firing squad in the courtyard of the Bendlerblock, which was lit by the headlights of a truck.Stauffenberg was third in line to be executed, with Lieutenant von Haeften after. However, when it was Stauffenberg's turn, Lieutenant von Haeften placed himself between the firing squad and Stauffenberg, and received the bullets meant for Stauffenberg.  When his turn came, Stauffenberg spoke his last words, "Es lebe unser heiliges Deutschland!" ("Long live our sacred Germany!")   Others say the last words were: "Es lebe das geheime Deutschland!" ("Long live the secret Germany!")    
  
Fromm ordered that the executed officers (his former co-conspirators) receive an immediate burial with military honors in the Matthäus Churchyard in Berlin's Schöneberg district. The next day, however, Stauffenberg's body was exhumed by the SS, stripped of his medals and insignia, and cremated.Another central figure in the plot was Stauffenberg's eldest brother, Berthold Schenk Graf von Stauffenberg. On 10 August 1944, Berthold was tried before Judge-President Roland Freisler in the special "People's Court" (Volksgerichtshof). This court was established by Hitler for political offenses. Berthold was one of eight conspirators executed by slow strangulation (reputedly with piano wire used as the garrote) in Plötzensee Prison, Berlin, later that day. Before he was killed, Berthold was strangled and then revived multiple times.     Allegedly, the entire execution and multiple resuscitations were filmed for Hitler to view at his leisure,   although there is no solid proof either that the events were filmed or that Hitler watched them. More than 200   were condemned in show trials and executed. Hitler used the July 20 Plot as an excuse to destroy anyone he feared would oppose him. The traditional military salute was replaced with the German Greeting. Eventually, over 20,000 Germans were killed or sent to concentration camps in the purge. 

Other viewsAmong the most active members of the German resistance and  one of its few survivors, Hans Bernd Gisevius portrays Colonel Stauffenberg, whom he met in July 1944, as a man driven by reasons which had little to do with Christian ideals or repugnance of Nazi ideology. In his autobiographical Bis zum bitteren Ende, "To the Bitter End", Gisevius writes: Richard J. Evans, Regius Professor of Modern History at Cambridge University, wrote three books on Third Reich,  and covers various aspects of Stauffenberg's beliefs and philosophy. He wrote an article originally published in Süddeutsche Zeitung, 23 January 2009  entitled "Why did Stauffenberg plant the bomb?" which states, "Was it because Hitler was losing the war? Was it to put an end to the mass murder of the Jews. Or was it to save Germany's honour? The overwhelming support, toleration, or silent acquiescence" from the people of his country for Hitler, that was also being heavily censored and constantly fed propaganda   meant any action must be swift and successful.  Evans writes, "Had Stauffenberg's bomb succeeded in killing Hitler, it is unlikely that the military coup planned to follow it would have moved the leading conspirators smoothly into power."However, Karl Heinz Bohrer, a cultural critic, literary scholar, publisher,  and visiting professor for German and Comparative Studies at Stanford University, criticized Evans' views in an article originally published in the Süddeutsche Zeitung, January 30, 2010.   Although agreeing that Evans is historically correct in much of his writing, Bohrer feels that Evans twists time lines and misrepresents certain aspects. He wrote of Evans, "In the course of his problematic argument he walks into two traps: 1. by contesting Stauffenberg's "moral motivation"; 2. by contesting Stauffenberg's suitability as role model." He further writes, "If then, as Evans notes with initial objectivity, Stauffenberg had a strong moral imperative – whether this stemmed from an aristocratic code of honour, Catholic doctrine or Romantic poetry – then this also underpinned his initial affinity for National Socialism which Stauffenberg misinterpreted as 'spiritual renewal.' "In 1980, the German government established a memorial for the failed anti-Nazi resistance movement in a part of the Bendlerblock, the remainder of which currently houses the Berlin offices of the German Ministry of Defense (whose main offices remain in Bonn). The Bendlerstrasse was renamed the Stauffenbergstrasse, and the Bendlerblock now houses the Memorial to the German Resistance, a permanent exhibition with more than 5,000 photographs and documents showing the various resistance organizations at work during the Hitler era. The courtyard where the officers were shot on 21 July 1944 is now a memorial site, with a plaque commemorating the events and a bronze figure of a young man with his hands symbolically bound which resembles Count von Stauffenberg.
FamilyStauffenberg married Nina Freiin von Lerchenfeld on 26 September 1933 in Bamberg. They had five children: Berthold; Heimeran; Franz-Ludwig; Valerie; and Konstanze, who was born in Frankfurt on the Oder after Stauffenberg's execution. Berthold, Heimeran, Franz-Ludwig and Valerie, who were not told of their father's deed,  were placed in a foster home for the remainder of the war and were forced to use new surnames, as Stauffenberg was now considered taboo. Nina died at the age of 92 on 2 April 2006 at Kirchlauter near Bamberg, and was buried there on 8 April. Berthold went on to become a general in West Germany's post-war Bundeswehr. Franz-Ludwig became a member of both the German and European parliaments, representing Bavaria. In 2008, Konstanze von Schulthess-Rechberg wrote a best-selling book about her mother, Nina Schenk Graefin von Stauffenberg.Describing her late husband, Nina von Stauffenberg said: He let things come to him, and then he made up his mind ... one of his characteristics was that he really enjoyed playing the devil's advocate. Conservatives were convinced that he was a ferocious Nazi, and ferocious Nazis were convinced he was an unreconstructed conservative. He was neither. 
 
Assignments, promotions and decorations
 

Assignments
1 January 1926 – 17th (Bavarian) Cavalry Regiment, Bamberg
17 October 1927 – Infantry School, Dresden
1 October 1928 – Cavalry School, Hannover
30 July 1930 – Pioneer Course
18 November 1930 – Mortar Course
1 October 1934 – Cavalry School, Hannover / Adjutant
6 October 1936 – War Academy, Berlin
1 August 1938 – 1st Light Division (renamed 6th Panzer Division 18 October 1939) / Second Staff Officer (Ib)
31 May 1940 – OKH / General Staff / Organization Branch / Section Head II
15 February 1943 – 10th Panzer Division / Senior Staff Officer (Ia)
7 April 1943 – Seriously wounded in Tunisia, assigned to Officer Reserve Pool
1 November 1943 – OKH / General Army Office / Chief of Staff
20 June 1944 – OKW / Chief of Replacement Army / Chief of General Staff
4 August 1944 – (Posthumous) Expelled from Wehrmacht by the Führer at the recommendation of the Army Court of Honour



Promotions
18 August 1927 – Fahnenjunker-Gefreiter
15 October 1927 – Fahnenjunker-Unteroffizier
1 August 1929 – Fähnrich
1 January 1930 – Leutnant
1 May 1933 – Oberleutnant
1 January 1937 – Rittmeister (Hauptmann i.G. from 1 November 1939)
1 January 1941 – Major i.G.
1 January 1943 – Oberstleutnant i.G.
1 April 1944 – Oberst i.G.



Decorations and awards
17 August 1929 – Sword of Honor
2 October 1936 – Distinguished Service Badge, IVth Class
1 April 1938 – Distinguished Service Badge, IIIrd Class
31 May 1940 – Iron Cross, Ist Class
25 October 1941 – Royal Bulgarian Order of Bravery, IVth Class
11 December 1942 – Finnish Liberty Cross, IIIrd Class
14 April 1943 – Wound Badge in Gold
20 April 1943 – Italian-German Remembrance Medal
8 May 1943 – German Cross in Gold


Popular culture
Films

1951: The Desert Fox: The Story of Rommel, played by Eduard Franz (the first movie to feature Stauffenberg as a character )
1955: Der 20. Juli, played by Wolfgang Preiss.  Directed by ex-resistance-fighter Falk Harnack.
1955: Es geschah am 20. Juli (It happened July 20), played by Bernhard Wicki.  Directed by Georg Wilhelm Pabst.
1967: The Night of the Generals, played by Gérard Buhr
1989: Stauffenberg. 13 Bilder über einen Täter, by Hans Bentzien and Erich Thiede, a documentary movie
1990: Stauffenberg – Verschwörung gegen Hitler
2004: Die Stunde der Offiziere, semi-documentary movie
2008: Valkyrie, Stauffenberg is the film's  protagonist and is played by Tom Cruise


Television

1966: Ohne Kampf kein Sieg, a DFF miniseries. Played by Alfred Struwe.
1971: Operation Walküre, played by Joachim Hansen in the docudrama part of the 199 min. documentary featuring Joachim Fest. 
1988: War and Remembrance, played by Sky Dumont in parts 6, 9–10.
1990: The Plot to Kill Hitler, played by Brad Davis
2004: Stauffenberg, played by Sebastian Koch.  TV movie by Jo Baier. 
2005: Stauffenberg, TV documentary
Highlander: "The Valkyrie".  Season 5 episode 10
Hogan's Heroes, episode entitled "Operation: Briefcase"
Red Dwarf series 3, episode 5, "Timeslides".


See also 

Assassination attempts on Adolf Hitler


Bibliography

Notes
 

References
  Christian Müller: Oberst i.G. Stauffenberg. Eine Biographie. Droste, Düsseldorf 1970, ISBN 3-7700-0228-8. (First great biography)
Hoffman, Peter (1995). Stauffenberg : A Family History, 1905–1944. McGill-Queen's University Press. ISBN 978-0-7735-3544-2. Translation of the German-language original, Claus Schenk Graf von Stauffenberg und seine Brüder.
Roger Moorhouse (2006), Killing Hitler, Jonathan Cape, ISBN 0-224-07121-1
Wheeler-Bennett, John; Overly, Richard (1968). The Nemesis of Power: German Army in Politics, 1918–1945. New York: Palgrave Macmillan Publishing Company (New Impression edition). ISBN 0-333-06864-5.
  Hoffmann, Peter (1998). Stauffenberg und der 20. Juli 1944. München: C.H.Beck. ISBN 3-406-43302-2.
      – Total pages: 208  
Burleigh, Michael (2000). The Third Reich: A New History. Macmillan. ISBN 0-333-64487-5.
Stig Dalager, Zwei Tage im Juli, documentary novel dealing with the 20th of July. Aufbau Taschenbuch-Verlag 2006.
Gerd Wunder, "Die Schenken von Stauffenberg". Stuttgart 1972, Mueller und Graeff
Claus Von Stauffenberg, the 20 July plot, and its aftermath are the subject of Paul West's novel The Very Rich Hours of Count von Stauffenberg, New York: Harper & Row, 1980, First Edition. (ISBN 0060145935).
Von Stauffenberg and other participants in the 20 July uprising are seen planning and executing the assassination attempt in Ethan Mordden's novel The Jewcatcher, published in 2008.
Claus Von Stauffenberg featured as a character in Justin Cartwright's 2007 novel, The Song Before It Is Sung.
Herman Wouk: War and Remembrance chronicles the attempted assassination of Hitler and von Stauffenberg's subsequent execution in his epic novel, which was also made into a television mini-series.
Christopher Ailsby: The Third Reich: Day by Day.
Alexander Stahlberg: Bounden Duty: The Memoirs of a German Office 1932-45 notes conversations between Stauffenberg and Fieldmarshall von Manstein.


External links

Timeline of Stauffenberg's life
Claus Graf Schenk von Stauffenberg (1934) From German History in Documents and Images a project of the German Historical Institute
  – BBC report of 60th anniversary of the 20 July plot; by Clare Murphy, BBC News Online
Photos of the 20th July 1944 Memorial in Berlin – Part of the photo collection of Ian J. Sanders
German Defense Minister bans Tom Cruise from playing Stauffenberg
Long Live our Sacred Germany: The Claus von Stauffenberg Story
  Stauffenberg-Memorial in Stuttgart inaugurated in presence of son
Photos from the German Stern magazine to the 20 July plot
Interview with Berthold Schenk Graf von Stauffenberg (the son) concerning the Tom-Cruise-movie
 
World at War Biography of Claus Von Stauffenberg
   
   
Stauffenberg and the Assassination Attempt of July 20, 1944 – Featured topic at the Memorial to the German Resistance's website
 

 
DEFAULTSORT




















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Chaim Soutine
 
Chaïm Soutine (January 13, 1893 – August 9, 1943) was a French painter of Russian Jewish origin. Soutine made a major contribution to the expressionist movement  while living in Paris. Inspired by classic painting in the European tradition, exemplified by the works of Rembrandt, Chardin  and Courbet, Soutine developed an individual style more concerned with shape, color, and texture over representation, which served as a bridge between more traditional approaches and the developing form of  Abstract Expressionism.
BiographySoutine was born in Smilavichy near Minsk, (modern day) Belarus (then part of the Russian Empire). He was the tenth of eleven children. From 1910–1913 he studied in Vilnius at the Vilna Academy of Fine Arts. In 1913, with his friends Pinchus Kremegne (1890–1981) and Michel Kikoine (1892–1968), he emigrated to Paris, where he studied at the École des Beaux-Arts under Fernand Cormon. He soon developed a highly personal vision and painting technique.For a time, he and his friends lived at La Ruche, a residence for struggling artists in Montparnasse where he became friends with Amedeo Modigliani (1884–1920). Modigliani painted Soutine's portrait several times, most famously in 1917, on a door of an apartment belonging to Léopold Zborowski (1889–1932), who was their art dealer.  Zborowski supported Soutine through World War I, taking the struggling artist with him to Nice to escape the German bombing of Paris. After the war Paul Guillaume, a highly influential art dealer, began to champion Soutine's work.  In 1923, in a showing arranged by Guillaume, the prominent American collector Albert C. Barnes (1872–1951), bought 60 of Soutine's paintings on the spot.  Soutine, who had been virtually penniless in his years in Paris, immediately took the money, ran into the street, hailed a Paris taxi, and ordered the driver to take him to Nice, on the French Riviera, nearly 200 miles away.  Soutine once horrified his neighbours by keeping an animal carcass in his studio so that he could paint it (Carcass of Beef). The stench drove them to send for the police, whom Soutine promptly lectured on the relative importance of art over hygiene. There's a story that Marc Chagall saw the blood from the carcass leak out onto the corridor outside Soutine's room, and rushed out screaming, 'Someone has killed Soutine.'  Soutine painted 10 works in this series, which have since became his most well-known. His carcass paintings were inspired by Rembrandt's still life of the same subject, which he discovered while studying the Old Masters in the Louvre. In February 2006, the oil painting of this series 'Le Boeuf Écorché' (1924) sold for a record £7.8 million ($13.8 million) to an anonymous buyer at a Christie's auction held in London - after it was estimated to fetch £4.8 million.Soutine produced the majority of his works from 1920 to 1929. From 1930 to 1935, the interior designer Madeleine Castaing and her husband  welcomed him home during the summer in their mansion of Lèves, becoming his patrons, so that Soutine could hold his first exhibition in Chicago in 1935. He seldom showed his works, but he did take part in the important exhibition The Origins and Development of International Independent Art held at the Galerie nationale du Jeu de Paume in 1937 in Paris, where he was at last hailed as a great painter. Soon thereafter France was invaded by German troops. As a Jew, Soutine had to escape from the French capital and hide in order to avoid arrest by the Gestapo. He moved from one place to another and was sometimes forced to seek shelter in forests, sleeping outdoors. Suffering from a stomach ulcer and bleeding badly, he left a safe hiding place for Paris in order to undergo emergency surgery, which failed to save his life.  On August 9, 1943, Chaim Soutine died of a perforated ulcer. Soutine was interred in Cimetière du Montparnasse, Paris.
Legacy
In February 2006, an oil painting of his controversial and iconic series Le Boeuf Ecorche (1924) sold for a record £7.8 million ($13.8 million) to an anonymous buyer at a Christie's auction held in London - after it was estimated to fetch £4.8 million. In February 2007, a 1921 portrait of an unidentified man with a red scarf (L'Homme au Foulard Rouge) by Chaim Soutine sold for $17.2 million - a new record - at Sotheby's London auction house.In May 2009, a unique and unusual settlement regarding Chaim Soutine's iconic painting entitled Piece de Boeuf (Piece of Beef c. 1923) was approved by Judge Laura Taylor Swain of the Southern District of New York. Pursuant to the settlement, the painting was returned to the Shefner Family in resolution of litigation commenced against the National Gallery of Art in Washington, D.C., Maurice Tuchman and Esti Dunow, the authors of the Soutine Catalogue Raisonnée. The settlement was believed to be the first time that the National Gallery of Art had deaccessioned a non-Holocaust work of art from its permanent collection. The parties agreed that the painting would remain on loan to the National Gallery of Art for the benefit of the American public for the near future. Some years after Soutine's death, Roald Dahl placed him as a character in his short story Skin. 
Paintings of Soutine by Modigliani
 
Image:Amadeo Modigliani 036.jpg|Portrait of Soutine, 1916
Amadeo Modigliani 037.jpg|Portrait of Chaim Soutine, 1916 
Paintings by Soutine, with gallery listings

Piece of Beef / Piece de Boeuf - (c.1923) 
Ceret Landscape - (c.1919)
Pastry Cook  - (1922), Louvre, Paris
Leves
Still Life with Rayfish - (1923), Cleveland Museum of Art, Cleveland, Ohio
Seated Woman - (c.1923-24),  Cleveland Museum of Art, Cleveland, Ohio
Street of Cagnes-sur-Mer - (c.1923-1924)
Carcass of Beef - (c.1925),  Albright-Knox Art Gallery, Buffalo, New York
Sinister Street - (c.1921), Kunstmuseum, Lucerne, Switzerland
Winding Road - (c.1939)
Large Poplars at Civery or After the Storm -  (c.1939)
Le chausseur de chez Maxim's


Footnotes 
References

 
 


External links

Hecht Museum
Amedeo Modigliani, "Chaim Soutine" (1917)
Record price for Soutine painting

  
DEFAULTSORT

















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Max Jacob
 
 Max Jacob (July 12, 1876 – March 5, 1944) was a French poet, painter, writer, and critic.
Life and careerAfter spending his childhood in Quimper, Brittany, France, he enrolled in the Paris Colonial School, which he left in 1897 for an artistic career. On the Boulevard Voltaire, he shared a room with Pablo Picasso who he became great friends with( and was included in his artwork 'Three Musicians'), who introduced him to Guillaume Apollinaire, who in turn introduced him to Georges Braque. He would become close friends with Jean Cocteau, Jean Hugo, Christopher Wood and Amedeo Modigliani, who painted his portrait in 1916.  He also befriended and encouraged the artist Romanin, otherwise known as French politician and future Resistance leader Jean Moulin.  Moulin's famous nom de guerre Max is presumed to be selected in honor of Jacob.
 
Jacob, who had Jewish origins, claimed to have had a vision of Christ in 1909, and converted to Catholicism.Max Jacob is regarded as an important link between the symbolists and the surrealists, as can be seen in his prose poems Le cornet à dés (The Dice Box, 1917 - the 1948 Gallimard edition was illustrated by Jean Hugo) and in his paintings, exhibitions of which were held in New York City in 1930 and 1938.His writings include the novel Saint Matorel (1911), the verses Le laboratoire central (1921), and Le défense de Tartuffe (1919), which expounds his philosophical and religious attitudes.
DeathEventually he would be forced to move to Saint-Benoît-sur-Loire, Loiret, where he was hiding during the German occupation of World War II. Jewish by birth, Jacob’s brother was deported to Auschwitz and then his sister Mirthé-Léa and her husband were deported where they were murdered by the Nazis. On February 24, 1944 Max Jacob too was arrested by the Gestapo and put into Orléans prison. He was then transferred to Drancy internment camp from which he was to be transported to a concentration camp in Germany. However, said to be suffering from bronchial pneumonia, Max Jacob died in Drancy  on March 5.   First interred in Ivry, after the war ended in 1949 his remains were transferred by his artist friends Jean Cassou, Pablo Picasso and René Iché (who sculpted the tomb of the poet) to the cemetery at Saint-Benoît-sur-Loire in the Loiret département.
PseudonymsAs well as his nom d'état civil, or regular name, Jacob worked under at least two pseudonyms, Léon David and Morven le Gaëlique.
See also 

Furniture music: Erik Satie's second set of furniture music was composed and performed in 1920 as Entr'acte music for one of Jacob's comedies (Ruffian toujours, truand jamais - text of this play is lost)
The Selected Poems of Max Jacob, trans. William Kulik (Oberlin College Press, 1999), ISBN 0-932440-86-X
Monsieur Max (2007), French TV movie starring Jean-Claude Brialy as Jacob, in Brialy's last film role


References 
External links
 

Marevna, "Homage to Friends from Montparnasse" (1962) Top left to right: Diego Rivera, Ilya Ehrenburg, Chaim Soutine, Amedeo Modigliani, his wife Jeanne Hébuterne, Max Jacob, gallery owner Leopold Zborowski. Bottom left to right: Marevna, Marika (Marevna and Diego Rivera's daughter), Moise Kisling.
Association les Amis de Max Jacob
English translations from Max Jacob's major collection of prose poetry The Dice Cup
Max Jacob at Find-A-Grave

 
DEFAULTSORT





















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Tsuguharu Foujita
 
  was a painter and printmaker born in Tokyo, Japan who applied Japanese ink techniques to Western style paintings.
Education
In 1910 when he was twenty-four years old Foujita graduated from what is now the Tokyo National University of Fine Arts and Music.
Paris
Three years later he went to Montparnasse in Paris, France. When he arrived there, knowing nobody, he met Amedeo Modigliani, Pascin, Chaim Soutine, and Fernand Léger and became friends with Juan Gris, Pablo Picasso and Henri Matisse. Foujita claimed in his memoir that he met Picasso less than a week after his arrival, but a recent biographer, relying on letters Foujita sent to his first wife in Japan, clearly shows that it was several months until he met Picasso. He also took dance lessons from the legendary Isadora Duncan. Foujita had his first studio at no. 5 rue Delambre in Montparnasse where he became the envy of everyone when he eventually made enough money to install a bathtub with hot running water. Many models came over to Foujita's place to enjoy this luxury, among them Man Ray's very liberated lover, Kiki, who boldly posed for Foujita in the nude in the outdoor courtyard. Another portrait of Kiki titled "Reclining Nude with Toile de Jouy," shows her lying naked against an ivory-white background. It was the sensation of Paris at the Salon d'Automne in 1922, selling for more than 8,000 francs.
His life in Montparnasse is documented in several of his works, including the etching A la Rotonde or Café de la Rotonde of 1925/7, part of the Tableaux de Paris series published in 1929. La vie et l'oeuvre de Leonard Tusguharu Foujita; Sylvie Buisson, Dominique Buisson, Tsugouharu Foujita; pg. 500, 545, 555, 597 – Published by ACR Edition, 1987 ISBN 2-86770-145-7, ISBN 978-2-86770-145-0 
Marriage
Foujita's first marriage was in Japan whilst still a student. After travelling to Paris to pursue his art, a quiet divorce was arranged. In March 1917 in the Café de la Rotonde, Foujita met a young lady by the name of Fernande Barrey. At first, she totally ignored Foujita's efforts to engage her in conversation. However, early the next morning, Foujita showed up at Fernande's place with a blue corsage he had made overnight. Intrigued, she offered him a pot of tea and they were married 13 days later.Within a few years, particularly after his 1918 exposition, he achieved great fame as a painter of beautiful women and cats in a very original technique. He is one of the few Montparnasse artists who made a great deal of money in his early years. By 1925, Tsuguharu Foujita had received the Belgian Order of Leopold and the French government awarded him the Legion of Honor. In 1918, a trip to the south of France was organized by the Polish poet Léopold Zborowski, who had the idea that his artist-friends could sell pictures there to rich tourists. Foujita and his wife went along as did Soutine, Modigliani with his lover, Jeanne Hébuterne. The trip was not, however, a success and the group had to survive on the advances that Foujita had obtained from his Paris dealer. By the time the final reckoning arrived even those funds had run out, and their landlord, ignoring the offers of pieces of art, confiscated all their baggage in lieu of payment. In 1921, he became involved with Lucie Badoul, whom he called Youki, or "Rose Snow". She would become his third wife. The relationship ended when she became the lover, then the wife of the surrealist poet Robert Desnos.
Latin America and Japan
After the breakup of his third marriage, and his flight to Brazil in 1931 (with his new love, Mady), Foujita traveled and painted all over Latin America, giving hugely successful exhibitions along the way. In Buenos Aires, Argentina, 60,000 people attended his exhibition, and more than 10,000 queued up for his autograph. In 1932 he contributed a work to the Pax Mundi, a large folio book produced by the League of Nations calling for a prolonged world peace.  However, by 1933 he was welcomed back as a minor celebrity to Japan where he stayed and became a noted producer of militaristic propaganda during the war. For example, in 1938 the Imperial Navy Information Office supported his visit to China as an official war artist. Fujita left Japan after the war. Today, his works can be found in the Bridgestone Museum of Art and in the Museum of Contemporary Art in Tokyo, and more than 100 in the Hirano Masakichi Art Museum in Akita. 
Last work

On his return to France, Foujita converted to Catholicism. He was baptised in Reims cathedral on 14 October 1959, with René Lalou (the head of the Mumm champagne house) as his godfather and Françoise Taittinger as his godmother. This is reflected in his last major work,at the age of 80, the design, building and decoration of the Foujita chapel in the gardens of the Mumm champagne house in Reims, France, which he completed in 1966, not long before his death.Tsuguharu Foujita died of cancer on January 29, 1968 in Zürich, Switzerland and was interred in the Cimetière de Villiers-le-Bâcle, Essonne département, France. In 2003, his coffin was reinterred at the Foujita chapel under the flagstones in the position he originally intended when constructing the chapel. 
See also

Kenzo Okada
Alice Prin
Montparnasse
War artists


Notes 
References

McCloskey, Barbara. (2005).  Artists of World War II. Westport: Greenwood Press. 10-ISBN	0313321531/13-ISBN 9780313321535; OCLC 475496457
Nussbaum, Louis Frédéric and Käthe Roth. (2005). Japan Encyclopedia. Cambridge: Harvard University Press. 10-ISBN 0-674-01753-6; 13-ISBN 978-0-674-01753-5; OCLC 48943301


External links

www.artexpertswebsite.com/pages/artists/foujita.php

 
 
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Henry Miller
 
 
Henry Valentine Miller (December 26, 1891 – June 7, 1980) was an American writer and painter. He was known for breaking with existing literary forms and developing a new sort of "novel" that is a mixture of novel, autobiography, social criticism, philosophical reflection, surrealist free association, and mysticism, one that is distinctly always about and expressive of the real-life Henry Miller and yet is also fictional.  His most characteristic works of this kind are Tropic of Cancer (1934), Black Spring (1936), and Tropic of Capricorn (1939). He also wrote travel memoirs and essays of literary criticism and analysis.
BiographyMiller was born to German parents, tailor Heinrich Miller and Louise Marie Neiting, in the Yorkville section of Manhattan, New York City.  As a child, he lived for nine years at 662 Driggs Avenue in Williamsburg, Brooklyn,  known in that time (and referred to frequently in his works) as the Fourteenth Ward. As a young man, he was active with the Socialist Party (his "quondam idol" was the Black Socialist Hubert Harrison).  He briefly—for only one semester—attended the City College of New York. Although he was an exceptional student,  he was willing neither to be anchored nor to submit to the traditional college system of education.His first wife was Beatrice Sylvas Wickens, whom he married in 1917. During 1928/29, Miller spent several months in Paris with his second wife, June Edith Smith (June Miller). In 1930 he moved to Paris unaccompanied, and he continued to live there until the outbreak of World War II.  Although Miller had little or no money the first year in Paris, things began to change with the meeting of Anaïs Nin who, with Hugh Guiler, would go on to pay his entire way through the 1930s including the rent for the beautiful and modern apartment at 18, villa Seurat. Anaïs Nin became his lover and financed the first printing of Tropic of Cancer in 1934 with money from Otto Rank. In late 1931, Miller was employed by the Chicago Tribune (Paris edition) as a proofreader, thanks to his friend Alfred Perlès who worked there. Miller took this opportunity to submit some of his own articles under Perlès name, since only the editorial staff were permitted to publish in the paper in 1934. This period in Paris was highly creative for Miller, and during this time he also established a significant and influential network of authors circulating around the Villa Seurat.  One author who became a lifelong friend was the young British author Lawrence Durrell. Miller's correspondence with Durrell was later published in two books.   During the Paris period he was also influenced by the French Surrealists.His works contain detailed accounts of sexual experiences. His first published book, Tropic of Cancer (1934), was banned in the United States on the grounds of obscenity.    He continued to write novels that were banned; along with Tropic of Cancer, his Black Spring (1936) and Tropic of Capricorn (1939) were smuggled into his native country, building Miller an underground reputation.In 1939 Durrell, who lived in Corfu, invited Miller out to Greece. Miller described the visit in The Colossus of Maroussi (1941), which he considered his best book.  One of the first acknowledgments of Henry Miller as a major modern writer was by George Orwell in his 1940 essay "Inside the Whale", where he wrote:
 In 1940, Miller returned to the United States, settling at Anderson Canyon in Big Sur, California.   He continued to produce vividly written works that challenged contemporary American cultural values and moral attitudes. He was widely critical of consumerism in America, as reflected in Sunday After The War (1944) and The Air-Conditioned Nightmare (1945). He spent the last years of his life at his home at 444 Ocampo Drive, Pacific Palisades, Los Angeles, California.While Miller was establishing his base in Big Sur, the Tropics books, still banned in the USA, were being published in France by the Obelisk Press and later the Olympia Press. There they were acquiring a slow and steady notoriety among both Europeans and the various enclaves of American cultural exiles. As a result, the books were frequently smuggled into the States, where they would prove to be a major influence on the new Beat generation of American writers (most notably Jack Kerouac) some of whom would adopt stylistic and thematic principles found in Miller's oeuvre.The publication of Miller's Tropic of Cancer in the United States in 1961 by Grove Press led to a series of obscenity trials that tested American laws on pornography. The U.S. Supreme Court, in Grove Press, Inc., v. Gerstein, citing Jacobellis v. Ohio (which was decided the same day in 1964), overruled the state court findings of obscenity and declared the book a work of literature; it was one of the notable events in what has come to be known as the sexual revolution. Elmer Gertz, the lawyer who successfully argued the initial case for the novel's publication in Illinois, became a lifelong friend of Miller's; a volume of their correspondence has been published. In 1968, Miller signed the “Writers and Editors War Tax Protest” pledge, vowing to refuse tax payments in protest against the Vietnam War. In addition to his literary abilities, Miller produced numerous watercolor paintings and wrote books on this field. He was a close friend of the French painter Grégoire Michonze. He was also an amateur pianist.After his move to  444 Ocampo Drive, Pacific Palisades, he held innumerable dinner parties for the artistic and literary figures of the time. His cook and caretaker was a young artist's model named Twinka Thiebaud who later wrote a 1981 book of his evening chats.  Thiebaud's memories of Miller's table talk were published in a rewritten and retitled book in 2011. During the last four years of his life, Miller held an ongoing correspondence of over 1500 letters with Brenda Venus, a young and vivacious Playboy playmate, actress and dancer. A book about their correspondence was published in 1986.  An article detailing their affair ran in a special edition of Playboy in 1996.  The article called her Miller's "twilight muse" during the bedridden final years of his life.Before his death, Miller filmed with Warren Beatty for his film Reds. He spoke of his remembrances of John Reed and Louise Bryant as part of a series of "witnesses." The film was released eighteen months after Miller's death.Miller died of circulatory complications in Pacific Palisades in 1980 at the age of 88. After his death, he was cremated and his ashes scattered off Big Sur.
Legacy
Miller is considered a "literary innovator" in whose works "actual and imagined experiences became indistinguishable from each other."  His books did much to free the discussion of sexual subjects in American writing from both legal and social restrictions.Miller's papers can be found in the following library special collections:

Southern Illinois University Carbondale, which has correspondence and other archival collections. 
Syracuse University, which holds a portion of the correspondence between the Grove Press and Henry Miller. 
Charles E. Young Research Library of the University of California, Los Angeles Library. 
Harry Ransom Center at the University of Texas at Austin, which has materials about Miller from his first wife and their daughter. 
University of Victoria, which holds a significant collection of Miller's manuscripts and correspondence, including the corrected typescripts for Max and Quiet Days in Clichy, as well as Miller's lengthy correspondence with Alfred Perlès. 
University of Virginia. 
Beinecke Rare Book and Manuscript Library, Yale University Library. 

It is estimated that Miller painted 2000 watercolors during his life, and that 50 or more major collections of Miller’s paintings exist.  The Harry Ransom Center at the University of Texas at Austin holds a selection of Miller's watercolors,  as did the Henry Miller Museum of Art in Ōmachi City in Nagano, Japan, before closing in 2001.  Miller's daughter Valentine placed some of her father's art for sale in 2005. Miller's friend Emil White founded the nonprofit Henry Miller Memorial Library in Big Sur in 1981.    This houses a collection of his works and celebrates his literary, artistic and cultural legacy by providing a public gallery as well as performance and workshop spaces for artists, musicians, students, and writers. 
Selected works

Moloch: or, This Gentile World, written in 1927, published posthumously by the Estate of Henry Miller. New York: Grove Press, 1992. ISBN 0-8021-3372-X
Crazy Cock, written 1928–1930, published posthumously by the Estate of Henry Miller. New York: Grove Weidenfeld, 1991. ISBN 0-8021-1412-1
Tropic of Cancer, Paris: Obelisk Press, 1934.
New York: Grove Press, 1961. ISBN 0-8021-3178-6
What Are You Going to Do about Alf? An Open Letter to All and Sundry, Paris: Printed at author's expense, 1935.
London: Turret, 1971. ISBN 0-85469-022-0
Aller Retour New York, Paris: Obelisk Press, 1935.
New York: New Directions, 1991. ISBN 0-8112-1193-2
Black Spring, Paris: Obelisk Press, 1936.
New York: Grove Press, 1963. ISBN 0-8021-3182-4
Max and the White Phagocytes, Paris: Obelisk Press, 1938.
Tropic of Capricorn, Paris: Obelisk Press, 1939.
New York: Grove Press, 1961. ISBN 0-8021-5182-5
Hamlet Volume I with Michael Fraenkel, New York: Carrefour, 1939.
Hamlet Volume II with Michael Fraenkel, New York: Carrefour, 1941.
Above two volumes republished, minus two letters, as Henry Miller's Hamlet Letters, Santa Barbara, CA: Capra Press, 1988. ISBN 0-88496-269-5
The Cosmological Eye, Norfolk, CT: New Directions, 1939. ISBN 0-8112-0110-4
The World of Sex, Chicago: Ben Abramson, Argus Book Shop, 1940.
Richmond, England: Oneworld Classics, 2007. ISBN 978-1-84749-035-3
Under the Roofs of Paris, written as Opus Pistorum in 1941, published posthumously by the Estate of Henry Miller. New York: Grove Press, 1983. ISBN 0-8021-3183-2
The Colossus of Maroussi, San Francisco: Colt Press, 1941.
New York: New Directions, 1958. ISBN 0-8112-0109-0
The Wisdom of the Heart, Norfolk, CT: New Directions, 1941.
New York: New Directions, 1960. ISBN 0-8112-0116-3
Sunday after the War, Norfolk, CT: New Directions, 1944.
Semblance of a Devoted Past, Berkeley, CA: Bern Porter, 1944.
The Plight of the Creative Artist in the United States of America, Houlton, ME: Bern Porter, 1944.
Echolalia, Berkeley, CA: Bern Porter, 1945.
Henry Miller Miscellanea, San Mateo, CA: Bern Porter, 1945.
Why Abstract?, with Hilaire Hiler and William Saroyan, New York: New Directions, 1945.
New York: Haskell House, 1974. ISBN 0-8383-1837-1
The Air-Conditioned Nightmare, New York: New Directions, 1945.
New York: New Directions, 1970. ISBN 0-8112-0106-6
Maurizius Forever, San Francisco: Colt Press, 1946.
Remember to Remember, New York: New Directions, 1947. (Volume 2 of The Air-Conditioned Nightmare.)
London: Grey Walls Press, 1952.
Into the Night Life, privately published 1947 with Bezalel Schatz
The Smile at the Foot of the Ladder, New York: Duell, Sloan and Pearce, 1948.
Kansas City, MO: Hallmark Editions, 1971. ISBN 0-87529-173-2
Sexus (Book One of The Rosy Crucifixion), Paris: Obelisk Press, 1949.
New York: Grove Press, 1987. ISBN 0-394-62371-1
The Waters Reglitterized: The Subject of Water Color in Some of Its More Liquid Phases, San Jose, CA: John Kidis, 1950.
Santa Barbara, CA: Capra Press, 1973. ISBN 0-912264-71-3
The Books in My Life, Norfolk, CT: New Directions, 1952.
New York: New Directions, 1969. ISBN 0-8112-0108-2
Plexus (Book Two of The Rosy Crucifixion), Paris: Olympia Press, 1953.
New York: Grove Press, 1963. ISBN 0-8021-5179-5
Quiet Days in Clichy With Photographs by Brassaï, Paris: Olympia Press, 1956.
New York: Grove Press, 1987. ISBN 0-8021-3016-X
Richmond, England: Oneworld Classics, 2007. ISBN 978-1-84749-036-0
Henry Miller Recalls and Reflects: An Extraordinary American Writer Speaks Out (2 LP records, RLP 7002/3), New York: Riverside Records, 1956.
The Time of the Assassins: A Study of Rimbaud, New York: New Directions, 1956.
New York: New Directions, 1962. ISBN 0-8112-0115-5
A Devil in Paradise, New York: New American Library, 1956.
New York: New Directions, 1993. ISBN 0-8112-1244-0
Big Sur and the Oranges of Hieronymus Bosch, New York: New Directions, 1957. ISBN 0-8112-0107-4
The Red Notebook, Highlands, NC: Jonathan Williams, 1958.
Reunion in Barcelona: a Letter to Alfred Perlès, from Aller Retour New York, Northwood, England: Scorpion Press, 1959.
Nexus (Book Three of The Rosy Crucifixion), Paris: Obelisk Press, 1960.
New York: Grove Press, 1965. ISBN 0-8021-5178-7
To Paint Is to Love Again, Alhambra, CA: Cambria Books, 1960.
New York: Grossman Publishers, 1968.
Watercolors, Drawings, and His Essay "The Angel Is My Watermark," New York: Abrams, 1962.
Stand Still Like the Hummingbird, New York: New Directions, 1962. ISBN 0-8112-0322-0
Just Wild about Harry, New York: New Directions, 1963.
New York: New Directions, 1979. ISBN 0-8112-0724-2
Greece (with drawings by Anne Poor), New York: Viking Press, 1964.
Henry Miller on Writing, New York: New Directions, 1964. ISBN 0-8112-0112-0
Insomnia or the Devil at Large, Albuquerque: Loujon Press, 1970.
Garden City, NY: Doubleday, 1974.
First Impressions of Greece, Santa Barbara, CA: Capra Press, 1973. ISBN 0-912264-59-4
Reflections on The Maurizius Case: A Humble Appraisal of a Great Book, Santa Barbara, CA: Capra Press, 1974. ISBN 0-912264-73-X
Henry Miller's Book of Friends: A Tribute to Friends of Long Ago, Santa Barbara, CA: Capra Press, 1976. ISBN 0-88496-050-1
Sextet, Santa Barbara, CA: Capra Press, 1977. ISBN 0-88496-119-2
New York: New Directions, 2010. ISBN 978-0-8112-1800-9
My Bike and Other Friends, Santa Barbara, CA: Capra Press, 1978. ISBN 0-88496-075-7
Joey: a Loving Portrait of Alfred Perlès Together With Some Bizarre Episodes Relating to the Opposite Sex, Santa Barbara, CA: Capra Press, 1979. ISBN 0-88496-136-2


Films

Miller as himselfMiller appeared as himself in several films,  including:

He was the subject of four documentary films by Robert Snyder; The Henry Miller Odyssey (90 minutes), Henry Miller: Reflections On Writing (47 minutes), and Henry Miller Reads and Muses (60 minutes). In addition, there is a film by Snyder that was completed after Snyder's death in 2004 about Miller's watercolor paintings, Henry Miller: To Paint Is To Love Again (60 mimutes). All four films are in Miller's own words.
He was a "witness" (interviewee) in Warren Beatty's 1981 film Reds. 
He was featured in the 1996 documentary Henry Miller Is Not Dead that featured music by Laurie Anderson. 


Actors portraying MillerSeveral actors played Miller on film, such as:

Rip Torn played Miller in the 1970 film adaptation of Tropic of Cancer.
In the 1970 Jens Jørgen Thorsen adaptation of Quiet Days in Clichy, the Miller-based character of 'Joey' was played by Paul Valjean.
Fred Ward played Miller in the 1990 movie Henry & June.
Claude Chabrol's 1990 adaptation of Quiet Days in Clichy saw Andrew McCarthy play the Miller role.


References 
Further reading

Durrell, Lawrence, editor. The Henry Miller Reader, New York: New Directions Publishing, 1959. ISBN 0-8112-0111-2
Widmer, Kingsley. Henry Miller, New York: Twayne, 1963.
Revised edition, Boston: Twayne, 1990. ISBN 0-8057-7607-9
Wickes, George, and Harry Thornton Moore. Henry Miller and the Critics, Carbondale: Southern Illinois University Press, 1963.
Wickes, George. Henry Miller, Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1966.
Gordon, William A. The Mind and Art of Henry Miller, Baton Rouge: Louisiana State University Press, 1967.
Mailer, Norman. Genius and Lust: a Journey Through the Major Writings of Henry Miller, New York: Grove Press, 1976. ISBN 0-8021-0127-5
Martin, Jay. Always Merry and Bright: the Life of Henry Miller: an Unauthorized Biography, Santa Barbara, CA: Capra Press, 1978. ISBN 0-88496-082-X
Young, Noel, editor. The Paintings of Henry Miller: Paint as You Like and Die Happy, Santa Barbara, CA: Capra Press, 1982. ISBN 0-87701-280-6
Winslow, Kathryn. Henry Miller: Full of Life, Los Angeles: J. P. Tarcher, 1986. ISBN 0-87477-404-7
Brown, J. D. Henry Miller, New York: Ungar, 1986. ISBN 0-8044-2077-7
Stuhlmann, Gunther, editor. A Literate Passion: Letters of Anaïs Nin and Henry Miller, 1932–1953. San Diego: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1987. ISBN 0-15-152729-6
Dearborn, Mary V. The Happiest Man Alive: A Biography of Henry Miller, New York: Simon & Schuster, 1991. ISBN 0-671-67704-7
Jong, Erica. The Devil at Large: Erica Jong on Henry Miller, New York: Turtle Bay Books, 1993. ISBN 0-394-58498-8
Fitzpatrick, Elayne Wareing. Doing It With the Cosmos: Henry Miller's Big Sur Struggle for Love Beyond Sex, Philadelphia: Xlibris, 2001. ISBN 1-4010-1048-2
Brassaï. Henry Miller, Happy Rock, Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 2002. ISBN 0-226-07139-1
Masuga, Katy. Henry Miller and How He Got That Way, Edinburgh: Edinburgh University Press, 2011. ISBN 978-0-7486-4118-5
Masuga, Katy. The Secret Violence of Henry Miller, Rochester, NY: Camden House Publishing, 2011. ISBN 978-1-57113-484-4


External links 

Henry Miller Online by Dr. Hugo Heyrman, a tribute
Ibarguen, Raoul R. Narrative Detours: Henry Miller and the Rise of New Critical Modernism, excerpts from a 1989 Ph.D. thesis
Nexus: The International Henry Miller Journal
Rexroth, Kenneth. "The Reality of Henry Miller" and "Henry Miller: The Iconoclast as Everyman’s Friend" (1955–1962 essays)
Schiller, Tom, director. Henry Miller Asleep & Awake (1975), a 34-minute video
Smithsonian Folkways. An Interview with Henry Miller (1964), with link to transcript (in "liner notes")
Miller documentaries by Robert Snyder at Masters & Masterworks
UbuWeb Sound: Henry Miller (1891–1980), with links to MP3 files of "An Interview with Henry Miller" (1964), "Life As I See It" (1956/1961), and "Henry Miller Recalls and Reflects" (1957)
 
Young, Richard, director. Dinner with Henry Miller (1979), a 30-minute video

 
DEFAULTSORT













 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Piet Hein (scientist)
 Piet Hein (16 December 1905 – 17 April 1996) was a Danish scientist, mathematician, inventor, designer, author, and poet, often writing under the Old Norse pseudonym "Kumbel" meaning "tombstone". His short poems, known as gruks or grooks (Danish: gruk), first started to appear in the daily newspaper "Politiken" shortly after the Nazi occupation in April 1940 under the pseudonym "Kumbel Kumbell". 
Biography
He was born in Copenhagen, Denmark. He studied at the Institute for Theoretical Physics of the University of Copenhagen (later to become the Niels Bohr Institute), and Technical University of Denmark. Yale awarded him an honorary doctorate in 1972. He died in his home on Funen, Denmark in 1996.He was a direct descendant of Piet Pieterszoon Hein, the Dutch naval hero of the 17th century.
WorkPiet Hein, who, in his own words, "played mental ping-pong" with Niels Bohr   in the inter-War period, found himself confronted with a dilemma when the Germans occupied Denmark.  He felt that he had three choices:  Do nothing, flee to "neutral" Sweden or join the Danish resistance movement.  As he explained in 1968, "Sweden was out because I am not Swedish, but Danish.  I could not remain at home because, if I had, every knock at the door would have sent shivers up my spine.  So, I joined the Resistance." Taking as his first weapon the instrument with which he was most familiar, the pen, he wrote and had published his first "grook" (gruk in Danish).  It passed the censors who did not grasp its real meaning. The Danes, however, understood its importance and soon it was found as graffiti all around the country. The deeper meaning of the grook was that even if you lose your freedom ("losing one glove"), do not lose your patriotism and self-respect by collaborating with the Nazis ("throwing away the other"), because that sense of having betrayed your country will be more painful when freedom has been found again someday.
After Liberation, Scandinavian architects, tired of square buildings but cognizant that circular buildings were impractical, asked Piet Hein for a solution.  Applying his mathematical prowess to the problem, Piet Hein proposed to use the superellipse which became the hallmark of modern Scandinavian architecture.   In addition to the thousands of grooks he wrote, Piet Hein devised the games of Hex, Tangloids, Morra, Tower, Polytaire, TacTix, Nimbi, Qrazy Qube, Pyramystery, and the Soma cube. He advocated the use of the superellipse curve in city planning, furniture making and other realms.  He also invented a perpetual calendar called the Astro Calendar and marketed housewares based on the superellipse and Superegg.
PersonalPiet Hein was married four times and had five sons from his last three marriages. 1937: married Gunver Holck, divorced.1942: married: Gerda Ruth (Nena) Conheim, divorced. 
Sons: Juan Alvaro Hein, born 9 January 1943; Andrés Humberto Hein, born 30 December 1943.1947: married Anne Cathrina (Trine) Krøyer Pedersen, divorced. 
Son: Lars Hein, born 20 May 1950.1955: married Gerd Ericsson, who died 3 November 1968. 
Son: Jotun Hein, born 19 July 1956; Hugo Piet Hein, born 16 November 1963.Jotun Hein proved the Soma cube's "Basalt Rock" construction impossible at age 12.  This was published in the puzzle's instruction manual as "Jotun's Proof".  He was a Professor of Bioinformatics in the Department of Statistics of the University of Oxford and a professorial fellow of University College, Oxford. He was previously the director of the Bioinformatics Research Centre at Aarhus University, Denmark.
Bibliography

Grooks – 20 volumes, originally published between 1940 and 1963, all currently out-of-print


See also 

Flipism


Notes 
References

Gardner, Martin: Piet Hein's Superellipse. – in Gardner, Martin: Mathematical Carnival. A New Round-Up of Tantalizers and Puzzles from Scientific American. New York: Vintage, 1977, pp. 240–254.
Johan Gielis: Inventing the circle. The geometry of nature. – Antwerpen : Geniaal Press, 2003. – ISBN 90-807756-1-4
"A Poet with a Slide Rule: Piet Hein Bestrides Art and Science," by Jim Hicks, Life Magazine, Vol. 61 No. 16, 10/14/66, pp. 55–66


External links 

Piet Hein Homepage
Notes on Piet Hein, including several sample grooks.
Superellipse (MathWorld)
Grooks by Piet Hein

 
 
DEFAULTSORT











 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Joseph Stiglitz
 Joseph Eugene Stiglitz, ForMemRS, FBA (born February 9, 1943) is an American economist and a professor at Columbia University. He is a recipient of the Nobel Memorial Prize in Economic Sciences (2001) and the John Bates Clark Medal (1979). He is also the former senior vice president and chief economist of the World Bank. He is known for his critical view of the management of globalization, free-market economists (whom he calls "free market fundamentalists"), and some international institutions like the International Monetary Fund and the World Bank.In 2000, Stiglitz founded the Initiative for Policy Dialogue (IPD), a think tank on international development based at Columbia University. Since 2001, he has been a member of the Columbia faculty, and has been a University Professor since 2003. He also chairs the University of Manchester's Brooks World Poverty Institute as well as the Socialist International Commission on Global Financial Issues and is a member of the Pontifical Academy of Social Sciences. Stiglitz has over 40 honorary doctorates and at least eight honorary professorships, as well as an honorary deanship. CURRICULUM VITAE, JOSEPH E. STIGLITZ    Stiglitz is one of the most frequently cited economists in the world  and the author of ten books, with his latest, The Price of Inequality (2012), hitting The New York Times best seller list. 
Life and careerStiglitz was born in Gary, Indiana, to Jewish parents, Charlotte (née Fishman) and Nathaniel D. Stiglitz.  From 1960 to 1963, he studied at Amherst College, where he was a highly active member of the debate team and president of the student government. He went to the Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT) for his fourth year as an undergraduate, where he later pursued graduate work. His undergraduate degree was awarded from Amherst College. From 1965 to 1966, he moved to the University of Chicago to do research under Hirofumi Uzawa who had received an NSF grant. He studied for his PhD from MIT from 1966 to 1967, during which time he also held an MIT assistant professorship. Stiglitz stated that the particular style of MIT economics suited him well - simple and concrete models, directed at answering important and relevant questions. Joseph E. Stiglitz: The Sveriges Riksbank Prize in Economic Sciences in Memory of Alfred Nobel 2001  From 1966 to 1970 he was a research fellow at the University of Cambridge: he arrived at Fitzwilliam House as a Fulbright Scholar in 1965 and then won a Tapp Junior Research Fellowship at Gonville and Caius College.     In subsequent years, he held academic positions at Yale, Stanford, Duke, Oxford, and Princeton.  Stiglitz is now a professor at Columbia University, with appointments at the Business School, the Department of Economics and the School of International and Public Affairs (SIPA), and is editor of The Economists' Voice journal with J. Bradford DeLong and Aaron Edlin. He also gives classes for a double-degree program between Sciences Po Paris and École Polytechnique in 'Economics and Public Policy'. As of 2005 he chairs The Brooks World Poverty Institute at the University of Manchester.   Stiglitz is a New-Keynesian economist.  In addition to making numerous influential contributions to microeconomics, Stiglitz has played a number of policy roles. He served in the Clinton administration as the chair of the President's Council of Economic Advisors (1995 – 1997). At the World Bank, he served as senior vice-president and chief economist (1997 – 2000), in the time when unprecedented protest against international economic organizations started, most prominently with the Seattle WTO meeting of 1999. He was fired by the World Bank for expressing dissent with its policies.  He was a lead author for the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, which received the Nobel Peace Prize in 2007.He is a member of Collegium International, an organization of leaders with political, scientific, and ethical expertise whose goal is to provide new approaches in overcoming the obstacles in the way of a peaceful, socially just and an economically sustainable world. He is also a member of the scientific committee of the Fundacion IDEAS, a Spanish think tank. Stiglitz has advised American president Barack Obama, but has also been sharply critical of the Obama Administration's financial-industry rescue plan.  Stiglitz said that whoever designed the Obama administration's bank rescue plan is "either in the pocket of the banks or they’re incompetent." In October 2008 he was asked by the President of the United Nations General Assembly to chair a commission drafting a report on the reasons for and solutions to the financial crisis.  In response, the commission produced the Stiglitz Report.On July 25, 2011, Stiglitz participated to the "I Foro Social del 15M" organized in Madrid (Spain) expressing his support to the 2011 Spanish protests. In 2011, he was named by Foreign Policy magazine on its list of top global thinkers. 
Contributions to economics
Information asymmetry 
Stiglitz's most famous research was on screening, a technique used by one economic agent to extract otherwise private information from another.  It was for this contribution to the theory of information asymmetry that he shared the Nobel Memorial Prize in Economics Joseph E. Stiglitz: The Sveriges Riksbank Prize in Economic Sciences in Memory of Alfred Nobel 2001  in 2001 "for laying the foundations for the theory of markets with asymmetric information" with George A. Akerlof and A. Michael Spence.Before the advent of models of imperfect and asymmetric information, the traditional neoclassical economics literature had assumed that markets are efficient except for some limited and well defined market failures. More recent work by Stiglitz and others reversed that presumption, to assert that it is only under exceptional circumstances that markets are efficient. Stiglitz has shown (together with Bruce Greenwald) that "whenever markets are incomplete and/or information is imperfect (which are true in virtually all economies), even competitive market allocation is not constrained Pareto efficient". In other words, they addressed "the problem of determining when tax interventions are Pareto-improving.  The approach indicates that such tax interventions almost always exist and that equilibria in situations of imperfect information are rarely constrained Pareto optima."   Although these conclusions and the pervasiveness of market failures do not necessarily warrant the state intervening broadly in the economy, it makes clear that the "optimal" range of government recommendable interventions is definitely much larger than the traditional "market failure" school recognizes. WANG, Shaoguang. The State, Market Economy, and Transition. Department of Political Science, Yale University.  For Stiglitz, there is no such thing as an invisible hand. STIGLITZ, Joseph E. There is no invisible hand. London: The Guardian Comment, December 20, 2002.  According to Stiglitz: ALTMAN, Daniel. Managing Globalization. In: Q & Answers with Joseph E. Stiglitz, Columbia University and The International Herald Tribune, Oct 11, 2006 05:03AM.  In the opening remarks for his prize acceptance "Aula Magna", STIGLITZ, Joseph E. Prize Lecture: Information and the Change in the Paradigm in Economics. Joseph E. Stiglitz held his Prize Lecture December 8, 2001, at Aula Magna, Stockholm University. He was presented by Lars E.O. Svensson, Chairman of the Prize Committee.  Stiglitz said: 
 In an interview in 2007, Stiglitz explained further: STIGLITZ, Joseph E. The pact with the devil. Beppe Grillo's Friends interview 
 
Efficiency wages: the Shapiro-Stiglitz model 

Stiglitz also did research on efficiency wages, and helped create what became known as the "Shapiro-Stiglitz model" to explain why there is unemployment even in equilibrium, why wages are not bid down sufficiently by job seekers (in the absence of minimum wages) so that everyone who wants a job finds one, and to question whether the neoclassical paradigm could explain involuntary unemployment.   The answer to these puzzles was proposed by Shapiro and Stiglitz in 1984: "Unemployment is driven by the information structure of employment". SHAPIRO, Carl and STIGLITZ, Joseph E. Equilibrium Unemployment as a Worker Discipline Device. The American Economic Review, Vol. 74, No. 3 (Jun., 1984), pp. 433-444.   Two basic observations undergird their analysis:

Unlike other forms of capital, humans can choose their level of effort.
It is costly for firms to determine how much effort workers are exerting.

A full description of this model can be found at the links provided. Efficiency wages, the Shapiro-Stiglitz Model   Some key implications of this model are:

Wages do not fall enough during recessions to prevent unemployment from rising. If the demand for labour falls, this lowers wages. But because wages have fallen, the probability of 'shirking' (workers not exerting effort) has risen. If employment levels are to be maintained, through a sufficient lowering of wages, workers will be less productive than before through the shirking effect. As a consequence, in the model wages do not fall enough to maintain employment levels at the previous state, because firms want to avoid excessive shirking by their workers. So, unemployment  must rise during recessions, because wages are kept 'too high'.
Possible corollary: Wage sluggishness. Moving from one private cost of hiring   to another private cost of hiring   will require each firm to repeatedly re-optimize wages in response to shifting unemployment rate. Firms cannot cut wages until unemployment rises sufficiently (a coordination problem).

The outcome is never Pareto efficient.

Each firm employs too few workers because it faces private cost of hiring rather than the social cost — which is equal to and in all cases.  This means that firms do not "internalize" the "external" cost of unemployment - they do not factor how large-scale unemployment harms society when assessing their own costs.  This leads to a negative externality as marginal social cost exceeds the firm's marginal cost (MSC = Firm's Private Marginal Cost + Marginal External Cost of increased social unemployment) 
There are also negative externalities. Each firm increases the asset value of unemployment   for all other firms by hiring.  But the first problem clearly dominates since the 'natural rate of unemployment' is always too high.


Some possible practical implications of Stiglitz theoremsWhile the mathematical validity of Stiglitz et al. theorems are not in question, their practical implications in political economy and their application in real life economic policies have been subject to considerable disagreement and debate. SANAHUJA, José Antonio. Consensus, dissensus, confusion: the "Stiglitz Debate" in perspective. Development in Practice, Vol 14, 2004   Stiglitz himself seems to be continuously adapting his own political-economic discourse, FRIEDMAN, Benjamin M. Globalization: Stiglitz's Case. The New York Review of Books, Volume 49, Number 13 · August 15, 2002  as we can see from the evolution in his positions as initially stated in Whither Socialism? (1994) to his own new positions held on his most recent publications.


Once incomplete and imperfect information are introduced, Chicago-school defenders of the market system cannot sustain descriptive claims of the Pareto efficiency of the real world. Thus, Stiglitz's use of rational-expectations equilibrium assumptions to achieve a more realistic understanding of capitalism than is usual among rational-expectations theorists leads, paradoxically, to the conclusion that capitalism deviates from the model in a way that justifies state action—socialism—as a remedy. 




The effect of Stiglitz's influence is to make economics even more presumptively interventionist than Samuelson preferred. Samuelson treated market failure as the exception to the general rule of efficient markets. But the Greenwald-Stiglitz theorem posits market failure as the norm, establishing "that government could potentially almost always improve upon the market's resource allocation." And the Sappington-Stiglitz theorem "establishes that an ideal government could do better running an enterprise itself than it could through privatization" SAPPINGTON, David E. M. e STIGLITZ, Joseph E. Privatization, Information and Incentives. Columbia University; National Bureau of Economic Research (NBER) June 1988; NBER Working Paper No. W2196  (Stiglitz 1994, 179). BOETTKE, Peter J. What Went Wrong with Economics?, Critical Review Vol. 11, No. 1, P. 35. p. 58 

The objections to the wide adoption of these positions suggested by Stiglitz's discoveries do not come from economics itself but mostly from political scientists and are in the fields of sociology.  As David L. Prychitko discusses in his "critique" to Whither Socialism? (see below), although Stiglitz's main economic insight seems generally correct, it still leaves open great constitutional questions such as how the coercive institutions of the government should be constrained and what the relation is between the government and civil society. PRYCHITKO, David L. Book Reviews, Whither Socialism?,  The Cato Journal, Cato Institute, vol. 16, no. 2.   David L. Prychitko is the Head of the Department of Economics (Northern Michigan University), a Faculty Affiliate in the Program on Markets and Institutions at the James M. Buchanan Center for Political Economy (George Mason University) and the author of over a dozen socio-economic books mainly on Marxism and socialism  
Government
Clinton administration, 1993–1997Stiglitz joined the Clinton Administration in 1993,  serving first as a member during 1993-1995, and then appointed Chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers on June 28, 1995, in which capacity he also served as a member of the cabinet. He became deeply involved in environmental issues, which included serving on the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, and helping draft a new law for toxic wastes (which was never passed).Stiglitz's most important contribution in this period was helping define a new economic philosophy, a "third way", which postulated the important, but limited, role of government, that unfettered markets often did not work well, but that government was not always able to correct the limitations of markets. The academic research that he had been conducting over the preceding 25 years provided the intellectual foundations for this "third way".When President Bill Clinton was re-elected, he asked Stiglitz to continue to serve as Chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers for another term. But he had already been approached by the World Bank to be its senior vice president for development policy and its chief economist, and he assumed that position after his CEA successor was confirmed on February 13, 1997.As the World Bank began its ten-year review of the transition of the former Communist countries to the market economy it unveiled failures of the countries that had followed the International Monetary Fund (IMF) shock therapy policies - both in terms of the declines in GDP and increases in poverty - that were even worse than the worst that most of its critics had envisioned at the onset of the transition. Clear links existed between the dismal performances and the policies that the IMF had advocated, such as the voucher privatization schemes and excessive monetary stringency.  Meanwhile, the success of a few countries that had followed quite different strategies suggested that there were alternatives that could have been followed. The U.S. Treasury had put enormous pressure on the World Bank to silence his criticisms of the policies which they and the IMF had pursued. Wade, Robert. Showdown at the World Bank,  New Left Review 7, January-February 2001  Hage, Dave.. Joseph Stiglitz : A Dangerous Man, A World Bank Insider Who Defected, Published on Wednesday, October 11, 2000 in the Minneapolis Star-Tribune Stiglitz always had a poor relationship with Treasury Secretary Lawrence Summers.  In 2000, Summers successfully petitioned for Stiglitz's removal, supposedly in exchange for World Bank President James Wolfensohn's re-appointment – an exchange that Wolfensohn denies took place. Whether Summers ever made such a blunt demand is questionable – Wolfensohn claims he would "have told him to fuck himself". Stiglitz resigned from the World Bank in January 2000, a month before his term expired. HAGE, Dave. Joseph Stiglitz– A Dangerous Man, A World Bank Insider Who Defected. Published on Wednesday, October 11, 2000 in the Minneapolis Star-Tribune   The Bank's president, James Wolfensohn, announced Stiglitz's resignation in November 1999 and also announced that Stiglitz would stay on as "special advisor to the president", and would chair the search committee for a successor.

"Joseph E. Stiglitz said today [Nov. 24, 1999] that he would resign as the World Bank's chief economist after using the position for nearly three years to raise pointed questions about the effectiveness of conventional approaches to helping poor countries." Richard W. Stevenson, Outspoken chief economist leaving World Bank, New York Times (November 25, 1999). 

In this role, he continued criticism of the IMF, and, by implication, the US Treasury Department. In April 2000, in an article for The New Republic, he wrote:

"They’ll say the IMF is arrogant. They’ll say the IMF doesn’t really listen to the developing countries it is supposed to help. They’ll say the IMF is secretive and insulated from democratic accountability. They’ll say the IMF's economic ‘remedies’ often make things worse – turning slowdowns into recessions and recessions into depressions. And they’ll have a point. I was chief economist at the World Bank from 1996 until last November, during the gravest global economic crisis in a half-century. I saw how the IMF, in tandem with the U.S. Treasury Department, responded. And I was appalled."

The article was published a week before the annual meetings of the World Bank and IMF and provoked a strong response. It proved too strong for Summers and, yet more lethally, Stiglitz's protector-of-sorts at the World Bank, Wolfensohn. Wolfensohn had privately empathised with Stiglitz's views, but this time was worried for his second term, which Summers had threatened to veto.   Stanley Fisher, deputy managing director of the IMF, called a special staff meeting and informed at that gathering that Wolfensohn had agreed to fire Stiglitz.  Meanwhile, the Bank's External Affairs department told the press that Stiglitz had not been fired, his post had merely been abolished. WADE, Robert. U.S. Hegemony and the World Bank: Stiglitz's Firing And Kanbur's Resignation., New Left Review, Oct 9, 2000, pp 9-10. In a September 19, 2008 radio interview with Aimee Allison and Philip Maldari on Pacifica Radio's KPFA 94.1 FM in Berkeley, California, Stiglitz implied that President Clinton and his economic advisors would not have backed the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA) had they been aware of stealth provisions, inserted by lobbyists, that they overlooked.
Initiative for Policy DialogueIn July 2000 Stiglitz founded the Initiative for Policy Dialogue (IPD), with support of the Ford, Rockefeller, McArthur, and Mott Foundations and the Canadian and Swedish governments, to enhance democratic processes for decision-making in developing countries and to ensure that a broader range of alternatives are on the table and more stakeholders are at the table.
 
Commission on the Measurement of Economic Performance and Social ProgressAt the beginning of 2008, Stiglitz chaired the Commission on the Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress, also known as the Stiglitz-Sen-Fitoussi Commission, initiated by President Sarkozy of France. The Commission held its first plenary meeting on 22–23 April 2008 in Paris. Its final report was made public on September 14, 2009. 
Commission of Experts on Reforms of the International Monetary and Financial SystemIn 2009, Stiglitz chaired the Commission of Experts on Reforms of the International Monetary and Financial System which was convened by the President of the United Nations General Assembly "to review the workings of the global financial system, including major bodies such as the World Bank and the IMF, and to suggest steps to be taken by Member States to secure a more sustainable and just global economic order".  Its final report was released on September 21, 2009.  
Eurozone crisisDuring a 2010 BBC interview, Stiglitz argued that Europe should make a clear statement of belief in social solidarity and that they should 'stand behind Greece'. In 2012, Stiglitz described the European austerity plans as a "suicide-pact."   
Support to the 2011 Spanish ProtestsOn July 25, 2011, Stiglitz participated to the "I Foro Social del 15M" organized in Madrid (Spain) expressing his support to the 2011 Spanish protests.    During an informal speech, he made a brief review of some of the problems in Europe and in the United States, the serious unemployment rate and the situation in Greece. "This is an opportunity for economic contribution social measures", argued Stiglitz, who made a critical speech about the way authorities are handling the political exit to the crisis. He encouraged those present to respond to the "bad ideas", not with indifference, but with "good ideas". "This does not work, you have to change it", he said.
Criticism of rating agenciesStiglitz has been critical of rating agencies describing them as the "key culprit" in the financial crisis noting "they were the party that performed the alchemy that converted the securities from F-rated to A-rated. The banks could not have done what they did without the complicity of the rating agencies."   Stiglitz co-authored a paper with Peter Orszag in 2002 titled "Implications of the New Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac Risk-Based Capital Standard" where they stated "on the basis of historical experience, the risk to the government from a potential default on GSE debt is effectively zero." However, "the risk-based capital standard ... may fail to reflect the probability of another Great Depression-like scenario."   
BooksAlong with his technical economic publications (he has published over 300 technical articles), Stiglitz is the author of books on issues from patent law to abuses in international trade.
The Price of Inequality: How Today's Divided Society Endangers Our Future (2012)From the jacket: As those at the top continue to enjoy the best health care, education, and benefits of wealth, they often fail to realize that, as Joseph E. Stiglitz highlights, "their fate is bound up with how the other 99 percent live ... It does not have to be this way.  In The Price of Inequality Stiglitz lays out a comprehensive agenda to create a more dynamic economy and fairer and more equal society"
Freefall: America, Free Markets, and the Sinking of the World Economy (2010)In Freefall: America, Free Markets, and the Sinking of the World Economy, Stiglitz discusses the causes of the 2008 recession/depression and goes on to propose reforms needed to avoid a repetition of a similar crisis, advocating government intervention and regulation in a number of areas. Among the policy-makers he criticises are George W. Bush, Larry Summers, and Barack Obama. This book does not require an economics background in order to be of value to the reader.  Rather it explains Stiglitz's views on the recent economic crisis in terms which make it relevant to the average homeowner, retirement investor, and voter in the United States. He explains how without fundamental changes in economic policy and regulation, the position of the US in the world political and economic arena may deteriorate significantly.
The Three Trillion Dollar War: The True Cost of the Iraq Conflict (2008)The Three Trillion Dollar War (co-authored with Linda Bilmes) examines the full cost of the Iraq War, including many hidden costs. The book also discusses the extent to which these costs will be imposed for many years to come, paying special attention to the enormous expenditures that will be required to care for very large numbers of wounded veterans. Stiglitz was openly critical of George W. Bush at the time the book was released. 
Stability with Growth: Macroeconomics, Liberalization and Development (2006)In Stability with Growth: Macroeconomics, Liberalization and Development, Stiglitz, José Antonio Ocampo (United Nations Under-Secretary-General for Economic and Social Affairs, until 2007), Shari Spiegel (Managing Director, Initiative for Policy Dialogue - IPD), Ricardo Ffrench-Davis (Main Adviser, Economic Commission for Latin America and the Caribbean - ECLAC) and Deepak Nayyar (Vice Chancellor, University of Delhi) discuss the current debates on macroeconomics, capital market liberalization and development, and develop a new framework within which one can assess alternative policies. They explain their belief that the Washington Consensus has advocated narrow goals for development (with a focus on price stability) and prescribed too few policy instruments (emphasizing monetary and fiscal policies), and places unwarranted faith in the role of markets. The new framework focuses on real stability and long-term sustainable and equitable growth, offers a variety of non-standard ways to stabilize the economy and promote growth, and accepts that market imperfections necessitate government interventions. Policy-makers have pursued stabilization goals with little concern for growth consequences, while trying to increase growth through structural reforms focused on improving economic efficiency. Moreover, structural policies, such as capital market liberalization, have had major consequences for economic stability. This book challenges these policies by arguing that stabilization policy has important consequences for long-term growth and has often been implemented with adverse consequences. The first part of the book introduces the key questions and looks at the objectives of economic policy from different perspectives. The third part presents a similar analysis for capital market liberalization.
Making Globalization Work (2006)Making Globalization Work surveys the inequities of the global economy, and the mechanisms by which developed countries exert an excessive influence over developing nations. Dr. Stiglitz argues that through tariffs, subsidies, an over-complex patent system and pollution, the world is being both economically and politically destabilised. Stiglitz argues that strong, transparent institutions are needed to address these problems. He shows how an examination of incomplete markets can make corrective government policies desirable.Stiglitz is an exception to the general pro-globalization view of professional economists, according to economist Martin Wolf. "Why Globalization Works" (Yale University Press 2004) ISBN 978-0-300-10252-9, page 8. Also Wolf criticizes World Bank heavily (pages xiii - xv).  Stiglitz argues that economic opportunities are not widely enough available, that financial crises are too costly and too frequent, and that the rich countries have done too little to address these problems. Making Globalization Work  has sold more than two million copies.
Fair Trade for All (2005)In Fair Trade for All, authors Stiglitz and Andrew Charlton argue that it is important to make the trading world more development friendly.   The idea is put forth that the present regime of tariffs and agricultural subsidies is dominated by the interests of former colonial powers and needs to change.  The removal of the bias toward the developed world will be beneficial to both developing and developed nations.  The developing world is in needs of assistance, and this can only be achieved when developed nations abandon mercantilist based priorities and work towards a more liberal world trade regime. 
New Paradigm for Monetary Economics (2004)
The Roaring Nineties: A New History of the World's Most Prosperous Decade (2003)The Roaring Nineties" is Stiglitz' analysis of the boom and bust of the 1990s. Presented from an insider's point of view, firstly as chair of President Clinton's Council of Economic Advisors, and later as chief economist of the World Bank, it continues his argument on how misplaced faith in free-market ideology led to the global economic issues of today, with a perceptive focus on US policies.
Globalization and Its Discontents (2002)In Globalization and Its Discontents, Stiglitz argues that what are often called "developing economies" are, in fact, not developing at all, and puts much of the blame on the IMF.Stiglitz bases his argument on the themes that his decades of theoretical work have emphasized: namely, what happens when people lack the key information that bears on the decisions they have to make, or when markets for important kinds of transactions are inadequate or don't exist, or when other institutions that standard economic thinking takes for granted are absent or flawed. Stiglitz stresses the point: "Recent advances in economic theory" (in part referring to his own work) "have shown that whenever information is imperfect and markets incomplete, which is to say always, and especially in developing countries, then the invisible hand works most imperfectly." As a result, Stiglitz continues, governments can improve the outcome by well-chosen interventions. Stiglitz argues that when families and firms seek to buy too little compared to what the economy can produce, governments can fight recessions and depressions by using expansionary monetary and fiscal policies to spur the demand for goods and services. At the microeconomic level, governments can regulate banks and other financial institutions to keep them sound. They can also use tax policy to steer investment into more productive industries and trade policies to allow new industries to mature to the point at which they can survive foreign competition. And governments can use a variety of devices, ranging from job creation to manpower training to welfare assistance, to put unemployed labor back to work and cushion human hardship.Stiglitz complains bitterly that the IMF has done great damage through the economic policies it has prescribed that countries must follow in order to qualify for IMF loans, or for loans from banks and other private-sector lenders that look to the IMF to indicate whether a borrower is creditworthy. The organization and its officials, he argues, have ignored the implications of incomplete information, inadequate markets, and unworkable institutions—all of which are especially characteristic of newly developing countries. As a result, Stiglitz argues, the IMF has often called for policies that conform to textbook economics but do not make sense for the countries to which the IMF is recommending them. Stiglitz seeks to show that these policies have been disastrous for the countries that have followed them.
Whither Socialism?Whither Socialism? is based on Stiglitz's Wicksell Lectures, presented at the Stockholm School of Economics in 1990 and presents a summary of information economics and the theory of markets with imperfect information and imperfect competition, as well as being a critique of both free market and market socialist approaches (see Roemer critique, op. cit.).  Stiglitz explains how the neoclassical, or Walrasian model ("Walrasian economics" refers to the result of the process which has given birth to a formal representation of Adam Smith's notion of the "invisible hand", along the lines put forward by Léon Walras and encapsulated in the general equilibrium model of Arrow–Debreu), may have wrongly encouraged the belief that market socialism could work. Stiglitz proposes an alternative model, based on the information economics established by the Greenwald–Stiglitz theorems.One of the reasons Stiglitz sees for the critical failing in the standard neoclassical model, on which market socialism was built, is its failure to consider the problems that arise from lack of perfect information and from the costs of acquiring information. He also identifies problems arising from its assumptions concerning completeness. ZAPIA, Carlo. The economics of information, market socialism and Hayek's legacy., Dipartimento di Economia Politica, Università di Siena 
Papers and conferencesStiglitz wrote a series of papers and held a series of conferences explaining how such information uncertainties may have influence on everything from unemployment to lending shortages. As the chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers during the first term of the Clinton Administration and former chief economist at the World Bank, Stiglitz was able to put some of his views into action. For example, he was an outspoken critic of quickly opening up financial markets in developing countries. These markets rely on access to good financial data and sound bankruptcy laws, but he argued that many of these countries didn't have the regulatory institutions needed to ensure that the markets would operate soundly.
Private lifeStiglitz married for the third time on October 28, 2004, to Anya Schiffrin, who works at the School of International and Public Affairs at Columbia University. 
Publications

Books

:

2012, The Price of Inequality: How Today's Divided Society Endangers Our Future, Stiglitz, J.E., W.W. Norton & Company, ISBN 978-0393088694
2010, Freefall: America, Free Markets, and the Sinking of the World Economy, Stiglitz, J.E., W.W. Norton & Company, ISBN 0393075966
2010, Mismeasuring Our Lives: Why GDP Doesn't Add Up, Fitoussi, J-P., Sen, A. & Stiglitz, J.E., The New Press.
2010, The Stiglitz Report: Reforming the International Monetary and Financial Systems in the Wake of the Global Crisis, Stiglitz, J.E., The New Press, ISBN 1595585206
2010, Time for a Visible Hand: Lessons from the 2008 World Financial Crisis, Jones, S.G., Ocampo, J.A. & Stiglitz, J.E. (Ed.), Oxford University Press.
2008, The Three Trillion Dollar War, Bilmes, L. Stiglitz, J.E., W.W. Norton & Company, ISBN 978-0393067019
2006, Making Globalization Work, Stiglitz, J.E., W.W. Norton & Company, ISBN 978-0393061222
2006, Stability with Growth: Macroeconomics, Liberalization, and Development, Ffrench-Davis, R., Nayyar, D., Ocampo, J.A., Spiegel, S. & Stiglitz, J.E., Oxford University Press.
2005, Fair Trade for All: How Trade Can Promote Development, Charlton, A.H.G. & Stiglitz, J.E., Oxford University Press, ISBN 0199290903
2004, The Development Round of Trade Negotiations in the Aftermath of Cancún, Charlton, A.H.G. & Stiglitz, J.E., Commonwealth Secretariat, ISBN 978-0850928013
2003, The Roaring Nineties, Stiglitz, J.E, W.W. Norton & Company, ISBN 978-0393058529
2003, Towards a New Paradigm in Monetary Economics, Greenwald, B. & Stiglitz, J.E., Cambridge University Press, ISBN 978-0521810340
2002, Economics, Stiglitz, J.E. & Walsh, C.E., W.W. Norton & Company.
2002, Globalization and Its Discontents, Stiglitz, J.E., W.W. Norton & Company, ISBN 978-0393051247
2002, Peasants Versus City-Dwellers: Taxation and the Burden of Economic Development, Sah, R.K. & Stiglitz, J.E., Oxford University Press.
2002, Principles of Macroeconomics, Stiglitz, J.E. & Walsh, C.E., W.W. Norton & Company.
2002, The Rebel Within: Joseph Stiglitz and the World Bank, The Rebel Within: Joseph Stiglitz and the World Bank, Stiglitz, J.E., Anthem Press.
2001, Rethinking the East Asian Miracle, Stiglitz, J.E. & Yusuf, S. (Ed.), Oxford University Press.
2000, Frontiers of Development Economics: The Future in Perspective, Meier, G.M. & Stiglitz, J.E. (Ed.), World Bank.
1996, Whither Socialism?, Stiglitz, J.E., MIT Press, ISBN 978-0262691826
1994' Economics and the Canadian Economy,  Stiglitz, J.E. & Boadway, Robin W., W W Norton & Co Inc, ISBN 978-0393965117
1989, The Economic Role of the State, Stiglitz, J.E., Wiley-Blackwell, ISBN 978-0631171355
1986, Economics of the Public Sector, Stiglitz, J.E., W.W. Norton & Company, ISBN 978-0393966510
1981, Theory of Commodity Price Stabalization, Newberry, D.M.G. & Stiglitz, J.E., Oxford University Press.
1980, Lectures on Public Economics, Anthony Barnes Atkinson & Joseph E. Stiglitz, Mcgraw-Hill College, ISBN 978-0070841055
1969, Readings in the Modern Theory of Economic Growth, Stiglitz, J.E. & Uzawa, H., MIT Press, ISBN 978-0262190558



Book chapters

:


2009. "Regulation and Failure", in David Moss and John Cisternino (eds.), New Perspectives on Regulation, ch. 1, pp. 11-23. Cambridge: The Tobin Project.
2001, New Ideas About Old Age Security: Toward Sustainable Pension Systems in the 21st Century, edited with Robert Holzmann, World Bank, January 2001.



Selected scholarly articles



2007, "Prizes, Not Patents" post-autistic economics review, issue no. 42
1998, Distinguished lecture on economics in government: The private uses of public interests: Incentives and institutions. Journal of Economic Perspectives, 12, 3–22.
1998, Redefining the Role of the State - What should it do?  How should it do it? And how should these decisions be made? Paper presented at the Tenth Anniversary of MITI Research Institute, Tokyo, March 1998.
1996, The World Bank Research Observer: No 2: August 1996 by Joseph Stiglitz
1993, "Post Walrasian and post Marxian economics," Journal of Economic Perspectives, vol. 7, pp. 109–14
1993, "Market socialism and neoclassical economics," in Bardhan, P. K. and Roemer, J. E. (eds.), Market Socialism. The Current Debate, New York: Oxford University Press
1989, "Principal and agent," in J. Eatwell, M. Milgate and P. Newman (eds.), The New Palgrave. Allocation, Information and Markets. New York: W. W. Norton
1987, "The causes and consequences of the dependence of quality on prices", Journal of Economic Literature, vol. 25, pp. 1–48
1981 (with A. Weiss), "Credit Rationing in Markets with Imperfect Information", American Economic Review, vol. 71, pp. 393–410
1977 (with A.K. Dixit), "Monopolistic Competition and Optimum Product Diversity", American Economic Review, vol. 67, pp. 297–308
1976 (with M. Rothschild), "Equilibrium in Competitive Insurance Markets: An Essay on the Economics of Imperfect Information", Quarterly Journal of Economics,  vol. 90, pp.  629–650.
1974, "Incentives and Risk Sharing in Sharecropping", Review of Economic Studies, Vol. 41, No. 2, 219-255.
1974, "Alternative Theories of Wage Determination and Unemployment in LDCs: The Labour Turnover Model", Quarterly Journal of Economics, vol. 81, pp. 194–227
1971 (with M. Rothschild), "Increasing Risk: II. Its Economic Consequences", Journal of Economic Theory, Vol. 3, pp. 66–84
1970 (with M. Rothschild), "Increasing Risk: I. A Definition", Journal of Economic Theory, Vol. 2, pp. 225–243



Articles in popular press

:

2011, "Of the 1%, by the 1%, for the 1%", Vanity Fair, May 2011
2010,   Review of  
2009, "Wall Street’s Toxic Message", Vanity Fair, July 2009
2009, "America's socialism for the rich", The Guardian, June 2009
2009, "Capitalist Fools", Vanity Fair, January 2009
2009, "Report: The $10 Trillion Hangover: Paying the Price for Eight Years of Bush", with Linda Bilmes, Harper's Magazine, 318/1904, January 2009
2007, "The Economic Consequences of Mr. Bush", Vanity Fair, December 2007 Issue
2007, Where is the World Going To, Mr. Stiglitz? directed by Jacques Sarasin, First Run Features.
2002, "Implications of the New Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac Risk-based Capital Standard", for FannieMae Volume I, Issue March 2, 2002
2001, began writing for Project Syndicate, continues to present 



Video and online sources

:

2010, What should Europe do about Greece?, BBC Newsnight February 10, 2010.
2010, Freefall: Joseph Stiglitz at the Commonwealth Club
2008, The Three Trillion Dollar War a panel discussion with Joseph Stiglitz and Linda Bilmes regarding their new book, `The Three Trillion Dollar War: The True Cost of the Iraq Conflict.` Feb 28, 2008 at Columbia University.
2007, Where is the World Going To, Mr. Stiglitz? directed by Jacques Sarasin, First Run Features.
World Bank Video presentation
Online access to Stiglitz published papers, at his own website

 
See also

List of economists
List of Jewish Nobel laureates


References 
External links 

josephstiglitz.com
Joseph E. Stiglitz at Columbia University
Joseph Stiglitz committee chair profile at Committee on Global Thought at Columbia University
Information and the Change in the Paradigm in Economics 2001 lecture at NobelPrize.org
Profile and Papers at Research Papers in Economics/RePEc
Publications at the National Bureau of Economic Research
 
Column archives at Project Syndicate
 
 
 
 
 
Joseph Stiglitz with Matthew Bishop at the 92nd Street Y, January 2010
Interview at The Commonwealth Club, February 2010
Free Markets and the World Economy with the Australian Broadcasting Corporation, July 2010
Of the 1%, by the 1%, for the 1%, Joseph E. Stiglitz, Vanity Fair, May 2011

  
 
 
 
 
   
DEFAULTSORT







































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Deborah Kerr
 Deborah Jane Kerr CBE (born Deborah Jane Trimmer 30 September 1921 – 16 October 2007) was a Scottish film and television actress. She won the Sarah Siddons Award for her Chicago performance as Laura Reynolds in Tea and Sympathy, a role which she originated on Broadway, a Golden Globe Award for the motion picture The King and I, and was a three-time winner of the New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress. She was also the recipient of honorary Academy, BAFTA and Cannes Film Festival awards.She was nominated six times for Academy Award for Best Actress but never won. In 1994, however, she was awarded the Academy Honorary Award, cited by the Academy as "an artist of impeccable grace and beauty, a dedicated actress whose motion picture career has always stood for perfection, discipline and elegance".  Her films include The King and I, An Affair to Remember, From Here to Eternity, Quo Vadis, The Innocents, Black Narcissus, Heaven Knows, Mr. Allison, The Life and Death of Colonel Blimp and Separate Tables.
Early lifeKerr was born Deborah Jane Trimmer in a private nursing home (hospital) in Glasgow,       the only daughter of Kathleen Rose (née Smale) and Capt. Arthur Charles Trimmer, a World War I veteran who lost a leg at the Somme, and later became a naval architect and civil engineer.  Directly after her birth she spent the first three years of her life in the nearby town of Helensburgh, where her parents lived with Deborah's grandparents in a house on West King Street. Kerr had a younger brother, Edmund (a.k.a. Teddy), who became a journalist and died in a "road-rage" incident in 2004.  Kerr was educated at the independent Northumberland House School in the Henleaze area of Bristol in England (the school was demolished in 1937, when Kerr was only 16 years old), and at Rossholme School in Weston-super-Mare.Kerr originally trained as a ballet dancer, first appearing on stage at Sadler's Wells in 1938. After changing careers, she soon found success as an actress. Her first acting teacher was her aunt, Phyllis Smale, who ran the Hicks-Smale Drama School in Bristol.  
CareerShe adopted the name Deborah Kerr on becoming a film actress - "Kerr" was a family name, supposedly that of the maternal grandmother of her grandfather Arthur Kerr Trimmer. Braun, Eric. Deborah Kerr. St. Martin's Press, 1978. ISBN 0-312-18895-1. 
Films

Kerr's first film role was in the British film Contraband in 1940 but her scenes were left on the cutting room floor. She followed that with a series of films, including Hatter's Castle (1942), in which she starred opposite Robert Newton and James Mason. She was an immediate hit with the public: British exhibitors voted her the most popular local female star at the box office. In 1943 she played three women in Michael Powell and Emeric Pressburger's The Life and Death of Colonel Blimp. During the filming, according to Powell's autobiography, she and Powell became lovers:     "I realised that Deborah was both the ideal and the flesh-and-blood woman whom I had been searching for".   Kerr made clear that her surname should be pronounced the same as "car".  To avoid confusion over pronunciation, Louis B. Mayer of MGM billed her as "Kerr rhymes with Star!"   Although Winston Churchill thought it would ruin wartime morale, and the British Army refused to extend co-operation with the producers, the film confounded critics by proving to be an artistic and commercial success.  Powell had hoped to reunite Kerr and Roger Livesey, who had played the title character, in his next film, A Canterbury Tale (1944), but her agent had sold her contract to MGM. According to Powell, his affair with Kerr ended when she made it clear to him that she would accept an offer to go to Hollywood if one were made. Her role as a troubled nun in Black Narcissus in 1947 brought her to the attention of Hollywood producers. The film was a hit in the US as well as the UK, and Kerr won the New York Film Critics' Award as Actress of the Year as well as saw British exhibitors vote her the 8th most popular local star at the box office.  In Hollywood, her British accent and manners led to a succession of roles portraying a refined, reserved and proper English lady. Nevertheless, Kerr frequently used any opportunity to discard her cool exterior. She starred in the 1950 adventure film, King Solomon's Mines, shot on location in Africa with Stewart Granger and Richard Carlson. This was immediately followed by her appearance in the religious epic Quo Vadis? (1951), shot at Cinecittà in Rome, in which she played the indomitable Lygia, a first-century Christian.Kerr also departed from typecasting with a performance that brought out her sensuality, as Karen Holmes, the embittered military wife in From Here to Eternity (1953), for which she received an Oscar nomination for Best Actress. The American Film Institute acknowledged the iconic status of the scene from that film in which she and Burt Lancaster have a cuddle on a Hawaii beach amidst the crashing waves. The organisation ranked it twentieth in its list of the 100 most romantic films of all time.From then on, Kerr's career choices would make her known in Hollywood for her versatility as an actress,   She portrayed a nun (Heaven Knows, Mr. Allison), a mama's girl (Separate Tables), and a governess (The Chalk Garden and The Innocents), but she also portrayed an earthy Australian sheep-herder's wife (The Sundowners) and lustful and beautiful screen enchantresses (Beloved Infidel, Bonjour Tristesse). She also starred in comedies (The Grass is Greener and Marriage on the Rocks).Among her most famous roles were Anna Leonowens in the film version of the Rodgers and Hammerstein musical The King and I (1956), and opposite Cary Grant in An Affair to Remember (1958). In 1966, the producers of Carry On Screaming! offered her a fee comparable to that paid to the rest of the cast combined, but she turned it down in favour of appearing in an aborted stage version of Flowers for Algernon. In 1967, at the age of 46, she starred in Casino Royale, achieving the distinction of being the oldest 'Bond Girl' in any James Bond film.In 1969, pressure of competition from younger, upcoming actresses made her agree to appear nude in John Frankenheimer's The Gypsy Moths,  the only nude scene in Kerr's career. Concern about the parts being offered to her, as well as the increasing amount of nudity in films in general, led her to abandon film work at the end of the 1960s in favour of television and theatre work. 
TheatreAs a stage actress, Deborah Kerr made her Broadway debut in 1953 in Robert Anderson's Tea and Sympathy, for which she received a Tony Award nomination. Kerr repeated her role along with her stage partner John Kerr (no relation) in Vincente Minnelli's film adaptation of the drama. In 1955, Kerr won the Sarah Siddons Award for her performance in Chicago during a national tour of the play. In 1975, she returned to Broadway, creating the role of Nancy in Edward Albee's Pulitzer-winning play Seascape.The theatre, despite her success in films, was always to remain Kerr's first love, even though going on stage filled her with trepidation: 
TelevisionDeborah Kerr experienced a career resurgence in the early 1980s on television, when she played the role of the nurse (played by Elsa Lanchester in the 1957 film version) in Witness for the Prosecution. Later, Kerr re-teamed with screen partner Robert Mitchum in Reunion at Fairborough. This period also saw Kerr take on the role as the older version of the female tycoon, Emma Harte, in the adaptation of Barbara Taylor Bradford's A Woman of Substance. For this performance, Kerr was nominated for an Emmy Award.
Personal lifeKerr's first marriage was to Royal Air Force Squadron Leader Anthony Bartley on 29 November 1945. They had two daughters, Melanie Jane (born 27 December 1947) and Francesca Ann (born 20 December 1951), who married the actor John Shrapnel. The Kerr-Bartley marriage was troubled, owing to Bartley's jealousy of his wife's fame and financial success,  and because her career often took her away from home. Kerr and Bartley divorced in 1959.  Her second marriage was to author Peter Viertel on 23 July 1960. In marrying Viertel, she acquired a stepdaughter, Christine Viertel. Although she long resided in Klosters, Switzerland and Marbella, Spain,    she moved back to Britain to be closer to her own children as her health began to deteriorate.  Her husband, however, continued to live in Marbella.Some of Kerr's leading men have stated in their autobiographies that they had an affair or romantic fling with her. The actor Stewart Granger claimed that Kerr seduced him in the back of his chauffeur-driven car at the time he was making Caesar and Cleopatra (1945).  Likewise Burt Lancaster claimed that he was romantically involved with her during the filming of From Here to Eternity (1953).  There is no independent corroboration of either actor's claims.Deborah Kerr died from the effects of Parkinson's disease on 16 October 2007 at the age of 86 in the English village of Botesdale, Suffolk. Clark, Mike. "Actress Deborah Kerr dies at age 86". USA Today. 18 October 2007.  "From Here to Eternity actress Kerr dies." CNN. 18 October 2007   Peter Viertel died of cancer on 4 November 2007, less than three weeks later.  At the time of Viertel's death, director Michael Scheingraber was filming the documentary Peter Viertel: Between the Lines, which Scheingraber says will include reminiscences about events concerning Kerr and the American Academy Awards. The film is as yet (2010) unreleased. 
Honours
Deborah Kerr was made a Commander of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) in 1998, but was unable to accept the honour in person because of ill health.  She was also honoured in Hollywood where, for her contributions to the motion picture industry, she received a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame, at 1709 Vine Street.Deborah Kerr won a Golden Globe Award for "Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy" for The King and I in 1957, and a Henrietta Award for "World Film Favorite – Female". She was the first performer to win the New York Film Critics Circle Award for "Best Actress" three times (1947, 1957 and 1960).Although she never won a BAFTA, Oscar or Cannes Film Festival award in a competitive category, all three academies gave her honorary awards. In 1984, she was awarded a Cannes Film Festival Tribute.  In 1991, she received a BAFTA Special Award  and in 1994, she received the Academy Honorary Award in recognition of "an artist of impeccable grace and beauty, a dedicated actress whose motion picture career has always stood for perfection, discipline and elegance". Kerr has also never been honored with an in-depth biography or filmography that critically examines her unique artistry or her quiet, but fascinating life.  Besides the biography by Eric Braun, there is only one other by entertainment journalist Michelangelo Capua, published in 2010, entitled simply: Deborah Kerr: A Biography.  However, the British Film Institute's Josephine Botting curated a "Deborah Kerr Season," which included almost 20 of her feature films as well as an exhibition of posters, other cinemabilia, and personal items on loan from Deborah Kerr's family, which took place in September and October 2010.
Award nominationsDeborah Kerr was nominated six times for the Academy Award for Best Actress: Edward, My Son (1949), From Here to Eternity (1953), The King and I (1956), Heaven Knows, Mr. Allison (1957), Separate Tables (1958) and The Sundowners (1960).She was also nominated four times for the BAFTA Award for Best British Actress: The End of the Affair (1955), Tea and Sympathy (1956), The Sundowners (1961) and The Chalk Garden (1964).She received one Emmy Award nomination in 1985 for Outstanding Supporting Actress in a Limited Series or a Special for A Woman of Substance. She was also nominated for the Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama for Edward, My Son (1949), Heaven Knows, Mr. Allison (1957) and Separate Tables (1958).
Filmography


Year Film Role Notes 
1940 Contraband Bit (scenes deleted) UK release 
1941 Major Barbara Jenny Hill UK release 
Love on the Dole Sally UK release 
1942 Penn of Pennsylvania Gulielma Maria Springett U.S. title: Courageous Mr. Penn 
Hatter's Castle Mary Brodie  
The Day Will Dawn Kari Alstad U.S. title: The Avengers 
A Battle for a Bottle Linda Voice–animated short 
1943 The Life and Death of Colonel Blimp Edith Hunter/Barbara Wynne/Johnny Cannon UK release 
1945 Perfect Strangers Catherine Wilson U.S. title: Vacation From Marriage 
1946 I See a Dark Stranger Bridie Quilty U.S. Title: The Adventuress  New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress (and Black Narcissus) 
1947 Black Narcissus Sister Clodagh UK release  New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress (and I See a Dark Stranger) 
The Hucksters Kay Dorrance  
If Winter Comes Nona Tybar  
1949 Edward, My Son Evelyn Boult Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated—Golden Globe Award – Best Actress Drama 
1950 Please Believe Me Alison Kirbe  
King Solomon's Mines Elizabeth Curtis  
1951 Quo Vadis Lygia  
1952 The Prisoner of Zenda Princess Flavia  
Thunder in the East Joan Willoughby  
1953 Young Bess Catherine Parr  
Julius Caesar Portia  
Dream Wife Effie  
From Here to Eternity Karen Holmes Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress 
1955 The End of the Affair Sarah Miles Nominated—BAFTA Award – Best British Actress 
1956 The Proud and Profane Lee Ashley  
The King and I Anna Leonowens singing voice dubbed by Marni Nixon Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress 
Tea and Sympathy Laura Reynolds Nominated—BAFTA Award – Best British Actress 
1957 Heaven Knows, Mr. Allison Sister Angela Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated—Golden Globe Award – Best Actress Drama New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress 
An Affair to Remember Terry McKay  
Kiss Them for Me Gwinneth Livingston Unbilled, dubbed voice of Suzy Parker in a few scenes 
1958 Bonjour Tristesse Anne Larsen  
Separate Tables Sibyl Railton-Bell Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated—Golden Globe Award – Best Actress Drama 
1959 The Journey Diana Ashmore  
Count Your Blessings Grace Allingham  
Beloved Infidel Sheilah Graham  
1960 The Sundowners Ida Carmody Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated—BAFTA Award – Best British Actress New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress 
The Grass Is Greener Lady Hilary Rhyall  
1961 The Naked Edge Martha Radcliffe UK release 
The Innocents Miss Giddens UK release 
1964 On the Trail of the Iguana Herself UK promotional short subject 
The Chalk Garden Miss Madrigal Nominated—BAFTA Award – Best British Actress 
The Night of the Iguana Hannah Jelkes  
1965 Marriage on the Rocks Valerie Edwards UK release 
1967 Casino Royale Agent Mimi / Lady Fiona McTarry  
Eye of the Devil Catherine de Montfaucon UK release 
1968 Prudence and the Pill Prudence Hardcastle UK release 
1969 The Gypsy Moths Elizabeth Brandon US release 
The Arrangement Florence Anderson US release 
1982 BBC2 Playhouse Carlotta Gray TV episode: "A Song at Twilight" 
Witness for the Prosecution Nurse Plimsoll  
1984 A Woman of Substance Emma Harte UK TV mini-series 
1985 The Assam Garden Helen UK release 
Reunion at Farnborough Sally Wells Grant UK television film 
1986 Hold the Dream Emma Harte UK TV mini-series 

References
 
Works cited


Braun, Eric. Deborah Kerr. St. Martin's Press, 1978. ISBN 0-312-18895-1.
Powell, Michael. A Life In Movies. Heinemann, 1986. ISBN 0-434-59945-X.
Andrew, Penelope. "Deborah Kerr: An Actress in Search of an Author." Bright Lights Film Journal, May 2011, Issue #72.   (c) Penelope Andrew, 2011.


External links 
 
 

 
 
 
 
Deborah Kerr at Helensburgh Heroes
essay The Enigma of Deborah Kerr — Ephemera, media files and an essay about Ms. Kerr
55th Sydney Film Festival Deborah Kerr Retrospective ("From Kerr To Eternity" 2008)
Deborah Kerr Rhymes With Star, and What a Star She Was: She Deserves to be Remembered, Too (Huffington Post, 7 April 2008)
Deborah Kerr Tribute by Spanish director Pedro Almodóvar, whose Broken Embraces script was influenced by his reflections of the great international star at the time of her death (blogpedroalmodóvar, 25 March 2008)
Extensive collection of press articles from 1940s to 2000s, photo galleries and information on Deborah Kerr (April 2009)
Photographs and literature

   
DEFAULTSORT












  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Paul Fort
 
Paul Fort (1 February 1872 20 April 1960) was a French poet associated with the Symbolist movement. At the age of 18, reacting against the Naturalistic theatre, Fort founded the Théâtre d’Art (1890–93). He also founded and edited the literary reviews Livre d'Art with Alfred Jarry and Vers et Prose (1905–14) with poet Guillaume Apollinaire, which published the work of Paul Valéry and other important Symbolist writers. Fort is notable for his enormous volume of poetry, having published more than thirty volumes of ballads and, according to Amy Lowell for creating the polyphonic prose form in his 'Ballades francaises' .  
Life and careerBorn in Reims, Marne département, France, he became an important part of the artistic community of Montparnasse. While a student at the Lycée Louis-le-Grand in Paris, he founded the Théâtre d' Art in 1890. Many new artists were promoted there, including Paul Verlaine, Paul Gauguin, and Maurice Maeterlinck.  By 1912 his accomplishments and influence were such that Verlaine gave him the title "Prince of the Poets."One of his famous works was "La Ronde". This poem is famous world wide because it is a plea for world friendship.He died on 20 April 1960 in France and is buried in the Cimetière de Montlhéry, in Montlhéry, Essonne département, in the Île-de-France, Region of France.
 
TriviaFort is mentioned by Hemingway as a customer of Closerie des Lilas, in A Moveable Feast. 
References 
External links

Poems by Paul Fort
 


 
DEFAULTSORT





 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Jon Bon Jovi
 
 
John Francis Bongiovi, Jr. (born March 2, 1962), known as Jon Bon Jovi, is an American musician, singer, songwriter, record producer and  actor, best known as the founder and the lead singer of rock band Bon Jovi, which was formed in 1983. During his career, he has released two solo albums and eleven studio albums with his band, which to date have sold over 130 million albums worldwide making them one of the world's best-selling music artists. Besides his music career, Jon Bon Jovi started an acting career in the 90s, starring roles in several movies include Moonlight and Valentino and U-571 and also made appearances on TV Series include Sex and the City and Ally McBeal As a songwriter, Jon Bon Jovi inducted into Songwriters Hall of Fame in 2009. Jon Bon Jovi inducted into Songwriters Hall of Fame  Richie Sambora inducted into Songwriters Hall of Fame  In 2012, Jon Bon Jovi ranked number fifty on the list of Billboard magazine's "Power 100", a ranking of "The Most Powerful and Influential People In The Music Business".    In 1996, People magazine named him as one of the "50 Most Beautiful People In The World". In 2000, the same magazine named him as the "Sexiest Rock Star" and he was also placed at number thirteen on VH1's "100 Sexiest Artists ".In addition, Jon Bon Jovi is the one of the majority owners of the AFL team Philadelphia Soul. He is the founder of The Jon Bon Jovi Soul Foundation which was founded in 2006 and exists to combat issues that force families and individuals into economic despair. He also campaigned for Al Gore in the 2000 Presidential election, John Kerry in the 2004 Presidential election, and Barack Obama in the 2008 Presidential election. In 2010, President Barack Obama named Jon Bon Jovi to the White House Council for Community Solutions. He was also awarded an honorary Doctorate of Humanities from Monmouth University in 2001.
Early lifeJon Bon Jovi was born John Francis Bongiovi, Jr. in Perth Amboy, New Jersey, the son of two former Marines, barber John Francis Bongiovi, Sr. and Playboy Bunny turned florist Carol Sharkey.  He has two brothers, Anthony and Matthew.  His father was of Italian (from Sciacca, Sicily) and Slovak ancestry and his mother was of German and Russian descent.   He has stated that he is a blood relative of singer Frank Sinatra.  Bon Jovi was raised Catholic.    He spent summers in Erie, Pennsylvania, with his grandparents, and sold newspapers.  As a child, John attended St. Joseph High School, in Metuchen, New Jersey, during his freshman and sophomore years.  He later transferred to Sayreville War Memorial High School in Parlin, New Jersey. John spent most of his adolescence skipping school to opt for music activities instead, and ended up playing in local bands with friends and his cousin Tony Bongiovi, who owned the then famous New York recording studio, The Power Station. As a result, his academic records displayed poor grades. By the time he was 16, John Bongiovi was playing clubs. It was not long before he joined up with keyboardist David Bryan (real name: David Bryan Rashbaum), who played with him in a ten-piece rhythm and blues band called Atlantic City Expressway. John also performed with bands called The Rest, The Lechers and John Bongiovi and the Wild Ones.When he was seventeen, Jon Bon Jovi was working sweeping floors at his cousin Tony Bongiovi's recording studio. In 1980, when Meco was there recording Christmas in the Stars: The Star Wars Christmas Album, Tony Bongiovi recommended him for the song "R2-D2 We Wish You A Merry Christmas." This became his first professional recording (credited as John Bongiovi). 
Music career 
In June 1982, Jon Bon Jovi recorded a song called Runaway.  The studio musicians who helped record "Runaway" – known as The All Star Review – were guitarist Tim Pierce, keyboardist Roy Bittan, drummer Frankie LaRocka, and bassist Hugh McDonald. He went to several record companies, including Atlantic Records and Mercury (PolyGram), but they all turned him down. Jon Bon Jovi visited major rock station WAPP 103.5FM "The Apple" in New York City. He spoke directly to the promotion director John Lassman, who accepted the song "Runaway" for inclusion on the station's compilation album of local homegrown talent. Runaway became a local hit. Along the way, Mercury Records gave Jon Bon Jovi a recording contract in 1983, and to promote Runaway, Jon Bon Jovi called up  David Bryan who in turn called bassist Alec John Such, drummer Tico Torres. Tapped to play lead guitar was Jon Bon Jovi's neighbor, Dave Sabo who later formed the group Skid Row. Sabo was eventually replaced by Richie Sambora.  After Jon Bon Jovi claimed he wanted a group name, a friend of Richard Fischer and an employee of Doc McGhee, suggested they call themselves Bon Jovi, following the example of the other famous last name bands such as Van Halen and Dokken. This name was chosen instead of the original idea of Johnny Electric. The band released their eponymous first album on January 21, 1984. The band became an international act in the late 1980s, when they released their breakthrough album Slippery When Wet. Their fourth album New Jersey, which was released in 1988, became just as successful as its predecessor. Following the group’s success, Jon Bon Jovi and Richie Sambora were asked to assist in producing Cher’s self-titled album in 1987. Jon Bon Jovi and Richie Sambora co-wrote and sang backing vocals on Cher’s single "We All Sleep Alone" and also produced several other tracks on the album, later going on to co-produce Cher’s multi-platinum album Heart of Stone in 1989 and co-wrote the song Does Anybody Really Fall In Love Anymore?. Jon Bon Jovi and Richie Sambora also produced and co-wrote the song called Hell Is Living Without You on Alice Cooper's album Trash in 1989. During the Slippery When Wet Tour in 1987, Jon Bon Jovi's attempt to give it his all during live shows and the tour's exhausting schedule greatly strained his vocal cords, and he began receiving steroid shots to help him sing.  With the help of a vocal coach, he was able to continue doing the tour. Despite the band achieving massive success with Slippery When Wet and New Jersey, living on the road almost destroyed the strong bond between the band members. The band members were exhausted physically, mentally and emotionally. Jon Bon Jovi note that, each band member went their separate way, even departing in separate jets after the New Jersey Tour ended in early 1990 which exceeded 232 shows on 5 continents.In 1990, Jon Bon Jovi recorded a soundtrack to the movie Young Guns II more commonly known as Blaze of Glory. Having been originally approached by his friend Emilio Estevez to lend "Wanted Dead Or Alive" as the theme song for his upcoming Billy The Kid sequel, Jon Bon Jovi ended up composing an all new theme song for the film's soundtrack and delivering his first solo album. The album featured high profile guests such as Elton John, Little Richard and Jeff Beck. The title track, "Blaze of Glory" peaked at number one the Billboard Hot 100. In 1991 "Blaze of Glory" won an award for Favorite Pop/Rock Single at the American Music Awards    and awarded a Golden Globe, as well. The song also earned Jon Bon Jovi an Academy Award nomination and a Grammy nomination.
In 1991 Jon Bon Jovi started his own label, Jambco Records, and produced  Aldo Nova's album Blood on the Bricks and Billy Falcon's album Pretty Blue World. Disillusioned with the music business, despite all his success, and unhappy with the status quo, in summer of 1991 he set off on a two-week cross-country motorcycle trip that would significantly affect his creative juices. In September 1991, he fired the band's long time manager Doc McGhee, business advisers, agents and created Bon Jovi Management. After that he put the band together. Upon resolving their issues, they returned with the album Keep The Faith, released in late 1992.  Jon Bon Jovi cut his trademark hair and the band turned away from the 80's hair metal to simply rock n roll and introduce a more mature sound. The media focused considerable attention on Jon Bon Jovi's hair. When Jon Bon Jovi cut his hair he made headlines on CNN. Despite the rise of the grunge and alternative rock, adult contemporary-styled ballad hits include "Bed of Roses" and "Always" helped sustain the band’s popularity in the 90's.Jon Bon Jovi, wrote what would become his second solo album, 1997's Destination Anywhere. A short movie of the same name was recorded right around the record's release, based entirely on the songs from the record and starring Jon Bon Jovi, Demi Moore, Kevin Bacon and Whoopi Goldberg. The film debuted on both MTV and VH1 in 1997.  
After five years since their last studio album, the band returned in 2000 and released their seventh studio album, Crush. The lead single, "It's My Life" helped introduce the band to a new, younger fan base.
Other ventures
Acting careerJon Bon Jovi is a credited actor in the movies Moonlight and Valentino, The Leading Man, Destination Anywhere, Homegrown, Little City, No Looking Back, Row Your Boat, Vampires Los Muertos, U-571, Cry Wolf, National Lampoon's Pucked, and New Year's Eve.  He also had a supporting role in the movie Pay It Forward, where he played Helen Hunt's abusive ex-husband. His TV series appearances include Sex and the City, 30 Rock, Las Vegas, The West Wing, and an extended stint on Ally McBeal as a plumber who was Ally's boyfriend for a short period of time. He also had a brief, uncredited role in the 1990 film Young Guns II.  On January 24, 2011, it was confirmed that Jon would be cast in the film New Year's Eve, released later that year, as a successful rock star who is connected with Katherine Heigl's character.
Charitable work
Jon Bon Jovi has worked on behalf of the Special Olympics, the American Red Cross, the Elizabeth Glaser Pediatric AIDS Foundation, Habitat for Humanity, Covenant House, Project H.O.M.E., The Jon Bon Jovi Soul Foundation (formerly the Philadelphia Soul Charitable Foundation), and other groups.He has been named the first Founding Ambassador of the Habitat for Humanity Ambassador program as part of the international-nonprofit organization’s new advocacy outreach initiative. Jon Bon Jovi has been raising awareness with Habitat for Humanity since 2005 when he provided the funds to build six homes in Philadelphia and built the homes alongside the homeowner families, as well as with members of his Philadelphia Soul Arena Football Team (now non existent).  The construction site also served as the video shoot location for his band’s single, "Who Says You Can’t Go Home".  In 2006, Bon Jovi made a $1 million donation to build 28 Habitat homes in Louisiana in partnership with low-income families on the hurricane-stricken coast.  In July, 2007, Bon Jovi announced a project that will rehabilitate a block of 15 homes in north Philadelphia.   During an appearance on The Oprah Winfrey Show in 2005, the band donated $1 million to the Angel Network foundation.  The Jon Bon Jovi Soul Foundation  (formerly the Philadelphia Soul Charitable Foundation) was founded in 2006 and exists to combat issues that force families and individuals into economic despair. Through the funding and creation of programs and partnerships, they support innovative community efforts to break the cycle of poverty and homelessness.  On October 19, 2011, they opened the JBJ Soul Kitchen, a community restaurant where patrons pay what they can afford for their meal, either with money or by volunteering work.He is one of 21 artists singing on "Everybody Hurts", a charity single organized by Simon Cowell in aid of the 2010 Haiti earthquake. 
Political activismAs a Democrat, Bon Jovi toured extensively on behalf of Presidential candidate John Kerry in 2004, appearing at and playing acoustic sets (with Richie Sambora) at rallies for the Kerry-Edwards ticket throughout the United States.   Bon Jovi also played as a part of the Live Earth concert at the Meadowlands in 2007, and was introduced by former Vice President Al Gore. In 2008, Jon Bon Jovi supported Barack Obama for President, even holding an exclusive fundraiser at his home for him; he also played a 2009 Manhattan fundraiser for now Secretary of State Clinton to lessen some of her $6.3 million dollar campaign debt. On Sunday, January 18, 2009 Bon Jovi performed a duet at the Obama Inauguration Concert of the Sam Cooke classic "A Change is Gonna Come" with Bettye LaVette.   On June 4, 2009 Bon Jovi performed an acoustic benefit show for democratic Gov. Jon Corzine at the NJPAC in Newark, New Jersey. On June 24, 2009, Jon Bon Jovi, Richie Sambora and Andy Madadian recorded a musical message of worldwide solidarity with the people of Iran. The handwritten Persian sign in the video translates to "we are one". On 15 December 2010, Bon Jovi was appointed by Barack Obama to the new White House Council for Community Solutions. Bon Jovi's efforts with his own The Jon Bon Jovi Soul Foundation in recent years have resulted in creative public/private partnerships as well as more than 260 units of affordable housing for low income individuals and families.  In addition to providing advice to the President on solving specific community needs, the White House Council for Community Solutions has been tasked with three key functions: enlisting leaders in the non-profit, private, and philanthropic sectors to make progress on key policy goals; providing strategic input and recommendations to help the federal government promote greater innovation and cross-sector collaboration; and honoring and highlighting those making a significant impact in their own communities. Although he is generally associated with the Democratic Party, Bon Jovi's voter registration indicates that he is unaffiliated. 
Personal lifeDuring a stop in Los Angeles on the New Jersey tour in 1989, Bon Jovi secretly took a trip to Las Vegas, where he married his high school sweetheart, Dorothea Hurley (born September 29, 1962) on April 29, 1989, at the Graceland Wedding Chapel.  Together they have four children: Stephanie Rose (born 31 May 1993), Jesse James Louis (born 19 February 1995), Jacob Hurley (born 7 May 2002) and Romeo Jon (29 March 2004). Bon Jovi maintains a strong family foundation to this day.  In 2004, he became founder and primary owner of the Philadelphia Soul of the Arena Football League. He appeared in several television commercials for the league, typically with John Elway, Hall of Fame quarterback for the Denver Broncos. The AFL will be returning in 2011, but Jon will no longer be part owner of the Soul. Bon Jovi described himself as a recovering Catholic.  In 2011, Bon Jovi expressed interest in purchasing 15% of the Atlanta Falcons for 150 million dollars.  He is also a supporter of Australian soccer team, Melbourne Heart FC.

Filmography

Year Film Role 
1990 Young Guns II Long haired corpse in coffin 
1995 Moonlight and Valentino The Painter 
1996 The Leading Man Robin Grange 
1997 Destination Anywhere Jon 
Little City Kevin 
1998 Homegrown Danny 
No Looking Back Michael 
Row Your Boat Jamey Meadows 
1999  Sex and the city  Seth 
2000 U-571 Lieutenant Pete Emmett 
Pay It Forward Ricky McKinney 
2001–2002 Ally McBeal Victor Morrison (10 Episodes) 
2002 Vampires: Los Muertos Derek Bliss 
2005 Cry Wolf Rich Walker 
2006 National Lampoon's Pucked Frank Hopper 
The West Wing Himself 
2010 30 Rock Himself 
2011 New Year's Eve  Jensen 

Awards and Nominations
Grammy Awards

Year Nominated work Award Result 
1991 "Blaze of Glory" Best Rock Vocal Performance – Male   
1991 "Blaze of Glory" Best Song Written for a Motion Picture, Television, or Other Visual Media   

MTV Video Music Awards

Year Nominated work Award Result 
1991 "Blaze of Glory" Best Male Video   
1991 "Blaze of Glory" Best Video from a Film   

American Music Awards

Year Nominated work Award Result 
1991 "Blaze of Glory" Favorite Pop/Rock Single   

Academy Awards

Year Nominated work Award Result 
1991 "Blaze of Glory" Best Original Song   

Golden Globe Awards

Year Nominated work Award Result 
1991 "Blaze of Glory" Best Original Song   

MTV Europe Music Awards

Year Nominated work Award Result 
1997 "Himself" Best Male   

Brit Awards

Year Nominated work Award Result 
1998 "Himself" Best International Artist (Male)   

Discography
Studio albums

Year Album details Peak chart positions Certifications  (sales threshold)  
US CAN UK AUS NZ JAP SPA GER AUT SWI SWE 
1990 Blaze of Glory – Young Guns II
 

Released: July 26, 1990
Label: Mercury Records 
 3 — 2 2 3 4 — 4 1 4 1  

US: 2× Multi-Platinum
CAN: 2× Platinum 
 
1997 Destination Anywhere
 

Released: June 17, 1997
Label: Mercury Records 
 31 6 2 4 34 2 1 1 1 1 7  

CAN: Platinum
ITA: Platinum 
 
"—" denotes releases that did not chart 

Compilation albums

Year Album 
2001 The Power Station Years: The Unreleased Recordings  

Released: September 18, 2001
Label: Mercury Records 
 

Solo singles

Year Single Peak chart positions Album 
US US Rock CAN AUS NZ UK IRE GER SWI AUT NL SWE 
1990 "Blaze of Glory" 1 1 1 1 1 13 3 16 5 2 16 3 Blaze of Glory 
"Miracle" 12 20 6 8 6 29 20 47 20 — 65 15 
1991 "Never Say Die" — — 86 60 — — — — — — — — 
"Dyin' Ain't Much of a Livin'" — — — — — — — — — — — — 
1992 "Levon" 37* 27 — ?— — — — — — — — — Two Rooms 
1994 "Please Come Home for Christmas" — — — — — 7  +  6  +  — — — — — A Very Special Christmas 2 
1997 "Midnight in Chelsea" 27* — 3 17 — 4 13 9 5 8 16 49 Destination Anywhere 
"Queen of New Orleans" — — 40 40 — 10 27 66 50 — 40 41 
"Janie, Don't Take Your Love to Town" 48* — 18 — — 13 — 38 — 40 61 — 
"Ugly" — — — — — — — 75 41 39 — — 
2010 "Everybody Hurts"  (as part of "Helping Haiti")  121 — 69 28 17 1 1 16 16 — — 25 Charity single 
  * Airplay/Radio & Records Chart, "—" denotes the single failed to chart or not released  


 +  "Please Come Home for Christmas" was originally credited as a solo recording by Jon Bon Jovi when included on the Christmas compilation A Very Special Christmas 2 in 1992, but when released as a single in UK, Ireland and Europe in 1994 it was released as a Bon Jovi single under the band name. The cover artwork of the single was a still from the musicvideo of Jon Bon Jovi and Cindy Crawford and the same Bon Jovi logo as was used on the albums Keep the Faith and Cross Road and the singles taken from them.


Guest singles

Year Single Artist  US Country  Album 
1998 "Bang a Drum" Chris LeDoux 68 One Road Man 

With Bon Jovi 
 
 

Studio albums
Bon Jovi (1984)
7800° Fahrenheit (1985)
Slippery When Wet (1986)
New Jersey (1988)
Keep the Faith (1992)
These Days (1995)
Crush (2000)
Bounce (2002)
Have a Nice Day (2005)
Lost Highway (2007)
The Circle (2009)
 

Compilation albums
Cross Road (1994)
Tokyo Road: Best of Bon Jovi (2001)
This Left Feels Right (2003)
Greatest Hits (2010)



Live albums
One Wild Night Live 1985-2001 (2001)



Box sets
100,000,000 Bon Jovi Fans Can't Be Wrong (2004)
 
References 
External links 

 
Interview on CNN's Larry King Live, Aug 16, 2006
 
 
Jon Bon Jovi at Facebook

 
 
 
  
 
 DEFAULTSORT

























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Edgar Degas
 
 
 
Edgar Degas (  or  ;  ; born Hilaire-Germain-Edgar De Gas, 19 July 1834 – 27 September 1917), was a French artist famous for his work in painting, sculpture, printmaking and drawing. He is regarded as one of the founders of Impressionism although he rejected the term, and preferred to be called a realist. Gordon and Forge 1988, p. 31  A superb draftsman, he is especially identified with the subject of dance, and over half of his works depict dancers. These display his mastery in the depiction of movement, as do his racecourse subjects and female nudes. His portraits are notable for their psychological complexity and depiction of human isolation. Early in his career, he wanted to be a history painter, a calling for which he was well prepared by his rigorous academic training and close study of classic art. In his early thirties, he changed course, and by bringing the traditional methods of a history painter to bear on contemporary subject matter, he became a classical painter of modern life. 
Early life
Degas was born in Paris, France, the oldest of five children of Célestine Musson De Gas, a Creole from New Orleans, and Augustin De Gas, a banker. The family was moderately wealthy. Degas' mother died when he was thirteen, after which his father and grandfather were the main influences on his early life. At age eleven, Degas (in adulthood he abandoned the more pretentious spelling of the family name)  began his schooling with enrollment in the Lycée Louis-le-Grand, graduating in 1853 with a baccalauréat in literature.Degas began to paint early in life. By the age of eighteen, he had turned a room in his home into an artist's studio, and in 1853 he registered as a copyist in the Louvre. His father, however, expected him to go to law school. Degas duly enrolled at the Faculty of Law of the University of Paris in November 1853, but made little effort at his studies. In 1855, Degas met Jean Auguste Dominique Ingres, whom he revered, and whose advice he never forgot: "Draw lines, young man, and still more lines, both from life and from memory, and you will become a good artist."  In April of that same year, Degas received admission to the École des Beaux-Arts, where he studied drawing with Louis Lamothe, under whose guidance he flourished, following the style of Ingres.  In July 1856, Degas traveled to Italy, where he would remain for the next three years. In 1858, while staying with his aunt's family in Naples, he made the first studies for his early masterpiece, The Bellelli Family. He also drew and painted numerous copies after Michelangelo, Raphael, Titian, and other artists of the Renaissance but, contrary to conventional practice, he usually selected from an altarpiece a detail that had caught his attention—a secondary figure, or a head which he treated as a portrait. 
Artistic careerUpon his return to France in 1859, Degas moved into a Paris studio large enough to permit him to begin painting The Bellelli Family—an imposing canvas he intended for exhibition in the Salon, although it remained unfinished until 1867. He also began work on several history paintings: Alexander and Bucephalus and The Daughter of Jephthah in 1859–60; Sémiramis Building Babylon in 1860; and Young Spartans around 1860.  In 1861, Degas visited his childhood friend Paul Valpinçon in Normandy, and made the earliest of his many studies of horses. He exhibited at the Salon for the first time in 1865, when the jury accepted his painting Scene of War in the Middle Ages, which attracted little attention.  Although he exhibited annually in the Salon during the next five years, he submitted no more history paintings, and his Steeplechase—The Fallen Jockey (Salon of 1866) signaled his growing commitment to contemporary subject matter. The change in his art was influenced primarily by the example of Édouard Manet, whom Degas had met in 1864 (while both were copying the same Velázquez portrait in the Louvre, according to a story that may be apocryphal). At the outbreak of the Franco-Prussian War in 1870, Degas enlisted in the National Guard, where his defense of Paris left him little time for painting. During rifle training his eyesight was found to be defective, and for the rest of his life his eye problems were a constant worry to him. 

After the war, in 1872, Degas began an extended stay in New Orleans, Louisiana, where his brother René and a number of other relatives lived. Staying at the home of his Creole uncle, Michel Musson, on Esplanade Avenue,  Degas produced a number of works, many depicting family members. One of Degas's New Orleans works, A Cotton Office in New Orleans, garnered favorable attention back in France, and was his only work purchased by a museum (that of Pau) during his lifetime. Degas returned to Paris in 1873. The following year his father died, and in the subsequent settling of the estate it was discovered that Degas's brother René had amassed enormous business debts. To preserve the family name, Degas was forced to sell his house and a collection of art he had inherited. Dependent for the first time in his life on sales of his artwork for income, he produced much of his greatest work during the decade beginning in 1874.  By now thoroughly disenchanted with the Salon, Degas joined forces with a group of young artists who were intent upon organizing an independent exhibiting society. The first of their exhibitions, which were quickly dubbed Impressionist Exhibitions, was in 1874. The Impressionists subsequently held seven additional shows, the last in 1886. Degas took a leading role in organizing the exhibitions, and showed his work in all but one of them, despite his persistent conflicts with others in the group. He had little in common with Monet and the other landscape painters, whom he mocked for painting outdoors. Conservative in his social attitudes, he abhorred the scandal created by the exhibitions, as well as the publicity and advertising that his colleagues sought.  He bitterly rejected the label Impressionist that the press had created and popularized, and his insistence on including non-Impressionist artists such as Jean-Louis Forain and Jean-François Raffaëlli in their exhibitions created rancor within the group, contributing to their eventual disbanding in 1886. As his financial situation improved through sales of his own work, he was able to indulge his passion for collecting works by artists he admired: old masters such as El Greco and such contemporaries as Manet, Pissarro, Cézanne, Gauguin, and Van Gogh. Three artists he idolized, Ingres, Delacroix, and Daumier, were especially well represented in his collection. In the late 1880s, Degas also developed a passion for photography.  He photographed many of his friends, often by lamplight, as in his double portrait of Renoir and Mallarmê. Other photographs, depicting dancers and nudes, were used for reference in some of Degas's drawings and paintings. As the years passed, Degas became isolated, due in part to his belief that a painter could have no personal life.  The Dreyfus Affair controversy brought his anti-Semitic leanings to the fore and he broke with all his Jewish friends. Guillaud and Guillaud 1985, p. 56  His argumentative nature was deplored by Renoir, who said of him: "What a creature he was, that Degas! All his friends had to leave him; I was one of the last to go, but even I couldn't stay till the end." Bade and Degas 1992, p. 6 Although he is known to have been working in pastel as late as the end of 1907, and is believed to have continued making sculpture as late as 1910, he apparently ceased working in 1912, when the impending demolition of his longtime residence on the rue Victor Massé forced him to move to quarters on the boulevard de Clichy.  He never married and spent the last years of his life, nearly blind, restlessly wandering the streets of Paris before dying in September 1917. 
Artistic style
Degas is often identified as an Impressionist, an understandable but insufficient description. Impressionism originated in the 1860s and 1870s and grew, in part, from the realism of such painters as Courbet and Corot. The Impressionists painted the realities of the world around them using bright, "dazzling" colors, concentrating primarily on the effects of light, and hoping to infuse their scenes with immediacy.Technically, Degas differs from the Impressionists in that he "never adopted the Impressionist color fleck",  and he continually belittled their practice of painting en plein air.  "He was often as anti-impressionist as the critics who reviewed the shows", according to art historian Carol Armstrong; as Degas himself explained, "no art was ever less spontaneous than mine. What I do is the result of reflection and of the study of the great masters; of inspiration, spontaneity, temperament, I know nothing."  Nonetheless, he is described more accurately as an Impressionist than as a member of any other movement. His scenes of Parisian life, his off-center compositions, his experiments with color and form, and his friendship with several key Impressionist artists—most notably Mary Cassatt and Édouard Manet—all relate him intimately to the Impressionist movement. Roskill 1983, p.33 Degas's style reflects his deep respect for the old masters (he was an enthusiastic copyist well into middle age)  and his great admiration for Jean Auguste Dominique Ingres and Eugène Delacroix. He was also a collector of Japanese prints, whose compositional principles influenced his work, as did the vigorous realism of popular illustrators such as Daumier and Gavarni. Although famous for horses and dancers, Degas began with conventional historical paintings such as The Young Spartans, in which his gradual progress toward a less idealized treatment of the figure is already apparent. During his early career, Degas also painted portraits of individuals and groups; an example of the latter is The Bellelli Family (c.1858–67), a brilliantly composed and psychologically poignant portrayal of his aunt, her husband, and their children. In this painting, as in The Young Spartans and many later works, Degas was drawn to the tensions present between men and women. In his early paintings, Degas already evidenced the mature style that he would later develop more fully by cropping subjects awkwardly and by choosing unusual viewpoints.
By the late 1860s, Degas had shifted from his initial forays into history painting to an original observation of contemporary life. Racecourse scenes provided an opportunity to depict horses and their riders in a modern context. He began to paint women at work, milliners and laundresses. Mlle. Fiocre in the Ballet La Source, exhibited in the Salon of 1868, was his first major work to introduce a subject with which he would become especially identified, dancers. In many subsequent paintings dancers were shown backstage or in rehearsal, emphasizing their status as professionals doing a job. From 1870 Degas increasingly painted ballet subjects, partly because they sold well and provided him with needed income after his brother's debts had left the family bankrupt. Growe 1992 
Degas began to paint café life as well, in works such as L’Absinthe and Singer with a Glove. His paintings often hinted at narrative content in a way that was highly ambiguous; for example, Interior (which has also been called The Rape) has presented a conundrum to art historians in search of a literary source—Thérèse Raquin has been suggested —but it may be a depiction of prostitution. As his subject matter changed, so, too, did Degas's technique. The dark palette that bore the influence of Dutch painting gave way to the use of vivid colors and bold brushstrokes. Paintings such as Place de la Concorde read as "snapshots," freezing moments of time to portray them accurately, imparting a sense of movement. The lack of color in the 1874 Ballet Rehearsal on Stage and the 1876 The Ballet Instructor can be said to link with his interest in the new technique of photography. The changes to his palette, brushwork, and sense of composition all evidence the influence that both the Impressionist movement and modern photography, with its spontaneous images and off-kilter angles, had on his work. Blurring the distinction between portraiture and genre pieces, he painted his bassoonist friend, Désiré Dihau, in The Orchestra of the Opera (1868–69) as one of fourteen musicians in an orchestra pit, viewed as though by a member of the audience. Above the musicians can be seen only the legs and tutus of the dancers onstage, their figures cropped by the edge of the painting. Art historian Charles Stuckey has compared the viewpoint to that of a distracted spectator at a ballet, and says that "it is Degas' fascination with the depiction of movement, including the movement of a spectator's eyes as during a random glance, that is properly speaking 'Impressionist'." 
Degas's mature style is distinguished by conspicuously unfinished passages, even in otherwise tightly rendered paintings. He frequently blamed his eye troubles for his inability to finish, an explanation that met with some skepticism from colleagues and collectors who reasoned, as Stuckey explains, that "his pictures could hardly have been executed by anyone with inadequate vision".  The artist provided another clue when he described his predilection "to begin a hundred things and not finish one of them",  and was in any case notoriously reluctant to consider a painting complete.His interest in portraiture led Degas to study carefully the ways in which a person's social stature or form of employment may be revealed by their physiognomy, posture, dress, and other attributes. In his 1879 Portraits, At the Stock Exchange, he portrayed a group of Jewish businessmen with a hint of anti-Semitism. In 1881 he exhibited two pastels, Criminal Physiognomies, that depicted juvenile gang members recently convicted of murder in the "Abadie Affair". Degas had attended their trial with sketchbook in hand, and his numerous drawings of the defendants reveal his interest in the atavistic features thought by some 19th-century scientists to be evidence of innate criminality.  In his paintings of dancers and laundresses, he reveals their occupations not only by their dress and activities but also by their body type: his ballerinas exhibit an athletic physicality, while his laundresses are heavy and solid. 
By the later 1870s Degas had mastered not only the traditional medium of oil on canvas, but pastel as well. The dry medium, which he applied in complex layers and textures, enabled him more easily to reconcile his facility for line with a growing interest in expressive color.In the mid-1870s he also returned to the medium of etching, which he had neglected for ten years. At first he was guided in this by his old friend Ludovic-Napoléon Lepic, himself an innovator in its use, and began experimenting with lithography and monotype. Thomson 1988, p. 75  He was especially fascinated by the effects produced by monotype and frequently reworked the printed images with pastel.  By 1880, sculpture had become one more strand to Degas's continuing endeavour to explore different media, although the artist displayed only one sculpture publicly during his lifetime.
These changes in media engendered the paintings that Degas would produce in later life. Degas began to draw and paint women drying themselves with towels, combing their hair, and bathing (see: After the Bath). The strokes that model the form are scribbled more freely than before; backgrounds are simplified.The meticulous naturalism of his youth gave way to an increasing abstraction of form. Except for his characteristically brilliant draftsmanship and obsession with the figure, the pictures created in this late period of his life bear little superficial resemblance to his early paintings. Ironically, it is these paintings, created late in his life, and after the heyday of the Impressionist movement, that most obviously use the coloristic techniques of Impressionism. For all the stylistic evolution, certain features of Degas's work remained the same throughout his life. He always painted indoors, preferring to work in his studio, either from memory, photographs, or live models.  The figure remained his primary subject; his few landscapes were produced from memory or imagination. It was not unusual for him to repeat a subject many times, varying the composition or treatment. He was a deliberative artist whose works, as Andrew Forge has written, "were prepared, calculated, practiced, developed in stages. They were made up of parts. The adjustment of each part to the whole, their linear arrangement, was the occasion for infinite reflection and experiment."  Degas himself explained, "In art, nothing should look like chance, not even movement". 
SculptureDegas's only showing of sculpture during his life took place in 1881 when he exhibited The Little Fourteen Year Old Dancer, only shown again in 1920; the rest of the sculptural works remained private until a posthumous exhibition in 1918. Degas scholars have agreed that the sculptures were not created as aids to painting, although the artist habitually explored ways of linking graphic art and oil painting, drawing and pastel, sculpture and photography. Degas assigned the same significance to sculpture as to drawing: "Drawing is a way of thinking, modelling another". After Degas's death, his heirs found in his studio 150 wax sculptures, many in disrepair. They consulted foundry owner Adrien Hébrard, who concluded that 74 of the waxes could be cast in bronze. It is assumed that, except for the Little Dancer Aged Fourteen, all Degas bronzes worldwide are cast from surmoulages (i.e., cast from bronze masters). A surmoulage bronze is a bit smaller, and shows less surface detail, than its original bronze mold. The Hébrard Foundry cast the bronzes from 1919–1936, and closed down in 1937, shortly before Hébrard's death.In 2004, a previously unknown cache of 73 plaster casts created from wax originals sculpted by Degas was discovered. Although not previously catalogued, the casts were consistent with the 73 originals that Degas’s heirs gave to Hébrard Foundry in 1918. Art scholars are not in agreement as to what these casts actually are.  It appears, from their condition and provenance, that no bronzes were ever cast from these 73 plasters.
Personality and politics
Degas, who believed that "the artist must live alone, and his private life must remain unknown", Werner 1969, p. 11  lived an outwardly uneventful life. In company he was known for his wit, which could often be cruel. He was characterized as an "old curmudgeon" by the novelist George Moore,  and he deliberately cultivated his reputation as a misanthropic bachelor.  Profoundly conservative in his political opinions, he opposed all social reforms and found little to admire in such technological advances as the telephone.  He fired a model upon learning she was Protestant.  Although Degas painted a number of Jewish subjects from 1865 to 1870, his anti-Semitism became apparent by the mid-1870s. His 1879 painting At The Bourse is widely regarded as strongly anti-Semitic, with the facial features of the banker taken directly from the anti-Semitic cartoons rampant in Paris at the time. The Dreyfus Affair, which divided Paris from the 1890s to the early 1900s, further intensified his anti-Semitism. By the mid-1890s, he had broken off relations with all of his Jewish friends,  publicly disavowed his previous friendships with Jewish artists, and refused to use models who he believed might be Jewish. He remained an outspoken anti-Semite and member of the anti-Semitic "Anti-Dreyfusards" until his death. 
ReputationDuring his life, public reception of Degas's work ranged from admiration to contempt. As a promising artist in the conventional mode, Degas had a number of paintings accepted in the Salon between 1865 and 1870. These works received praise from Pierre Puvis de Chavannes and the critic, Jules-Antoine Castagnary.  He soon joined forces with the Impressionists, however, and rejected the rigid rules, judgements, and elitism of the Salon—just as the Salon and general public initially rejected the experimentalism of the Impressionists.Degas's work was controversial, but was generally admired for its draftsmanship. His La Petite Danseuse de Quatorze Ans, or Little Dancer of Fourteen Years, which he displayed at the sixth Impressionist exhibition in 1881, was probably his most controversial piece; some critics decried what they thought its "appalling ugliness" while others saw in it a "blossoming".   In part Degas' originality consisted in disregarding the smooth, full surfaces and contours of classical sculpture ... [and] in garnishing his little statue with real hair and clothing made to scale like the accoutrements for a doll. These relatively "real" additions heightened the illusion, but they also posed searching questions, such as what can be referred to as "real" when art is concerned.   The suite of pastels depicting nudes that Degas exhibited in the eighth Impressionist Exhibition in 1886 produced "the most concentrated body of critical writing on the artist during his lifetime ... The overall reaction was positive and laudatory". Recognized as an important artist in his lifetime, Degas is now considered "one of the founders of Impressionism".  Though his work crossed many stylistic boundaries, his involvement with the other major figures of Impressionism and their exhibitions, his dynamic paintings and sketches of everyday life and activities, and his bold color experiments, served to finally tie him to the Impressionist movement as one of its greatest artists.His paintings, pastels, drawings, and sculptures are on prominent display in many museums.Although Degas had no formal pupils, he greatly influenced several important painters, most notably Jean-Louis Forain, Mary Cassatt, and Walter Sickert;  his greatest admirer may have been Henri de Toulouse-Lautrec. 
Gallery 
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 049.jpg|Portrait of the Bellelli Family, 1858–1867, Musée d'Orsay, Paris
File:Young Spartans National Gallery NG3860.jpg|Young Spartans Exercising, c. 1860, National Gallery, London
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 013.jpg|The Amateur, 1866, The Metropolitan Museum of Art, New York City
File:Degas - Das Ehepaar Manet.jpg|Édouard Manet and Mme. Manet, 1868–1869, Kitakyushu Municipal Museum of Art, Japan
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 051.jpg|Portrait of Miss Cassatt, Seated, Holding Cards, 1876–1878
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 037.jpg|At the Café-Concert: The Song of the Dog, 1875–1877
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 025.jpg|Fin d'Arabesque, with ballerina Rosita Mauri, 1877, Musée d’Orsay.
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 019.jpg|The Singer with the Glove, 1878, The Fogg Art Museum, Cambridge, Massachusetts
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 044.jpg|Miss La La at the Cirque Fernando, 1879, The National Gallery, London
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 011.jpg|The Millinery Shop, 1885, The Art Institute of Chicago
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 004.jpg|Ballet Rehearsal, 1873, The Fogg Art Museum, Cambridge, Massachusetts
File:Edgar Degas Waiting.jpg|Waiting, 1880-82.
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 069.jpg|Dancer with a Bouquet of Flowers (Star of the Ballet), 1878
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 009.jpg|Stage Rehearsal, 1878–1879, The Metropolitan Museum of Art, New York City
File:Degas - Frau mit Stadtkostüm.jpg|Woman in Street Clothes, Portrait of Ellen Andrée, 1879, pastel on paper
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 072.jpg|Dancers at The Bar, 1888, The Phillips Collection, Washington, DC
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 032.jpg|Woman in the Bath, 1886, Hill-Stead Museum, Farmington, Connecticut
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 031.jpg|The Tub, 1886, Musée d'Orsay, Paris, France
File:Edgar Degas (1834-1917) - 'The Bath- Woman Supporting her Back', pastel on paper, c. 1887.jpg|The Bath: Woman Supporting her Back, c. 1887, pastel on paper, Honolulu Museum of Art
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 042.jpg|Kneeling Woman, 1884, Pushkin Museum, Moscow
File:Three Dancers in Yellow Skirts Edgar Degas.JPG|Three Dancers in Yellow Skirts, circa 1891, oil on canvas, The Detroit Institute of Arts
File:Edgar Germain Hilaire Degas 045.jpg|After the Bath, Woman Drying her Nape 1898, Musée d'Orsay, Paris
File:SpanishDance c1884-DegasPC20080120-8849A.jpg|The Spanish Dance, c. 1885 (bronze cast 1921), bronze, 46.3 x 14.3 cm, Ackland Art Museum, Chapel Hill, North Carolina
File:Edgar Degas - Dance Class.jpg|Edgar Degas - Dance Class, 1871  - The Metropolitan Museum of Art, New York City
File:Edgar Degas - Rehearsal of the Scene.jpg|Edgar Degas - Rehearsal of the Scene - Musée d'Orsay, Paris
File:Edgar Degas - Rehearsal on Stage.jpg|Edgar Degas - Rehearsal on Stage - The Metropolitan Museum of Art, New York City
File:Degas-dancer.jpg|Little Dancer of Fourteen Years, cast in 1922 from a mixed-media sculpture modeled ca. 1879–80, Bronze, partly tinted, with cotton skirt and satin hair ribbon, on a wooden base, Metropolitan Museum of Art, New York City
File:Edgar Degas - Before the Race - Walters 37850.jpg|Before the Race - The Walters Art Museum, Baltimore
 
References

Notes 
Sources 

Armstrong, Carol (1991). Odd Man Out: Readings of the Work and Reputation of Edgar Degas. Chicago and London: University of Chicago Press. ISBN 0-226-02695-7
Bade, Patrick; Degas, Edgar (1992). Degas. London: Studio Editions. ISBN 1-85170-845-6
Baumann, Felix; Karabelnik, Marianne, et al. (1994). Degas Portraits. London: Merrell Holberton. ISBN 1-85894-014-1
Benedek, Nelly S. "Chronology of the Artist's Life." Degas. 2004. 21 May 2004.
Benedek, Nelly S. "Degas's Artistic Style." Degas. 2004. 21 March 2004.
Bowness, Alan. ed. (1965) "Edgar Degas." The Book of Art Volume 7. New York: Grolier Incorporated :41.
Brettell, Richard R.; McCullagh, Suzanne Folds (1984). Degas in The Art Institute of Chicago. New York: The Art Institute of Chicago and Harry N. Abrams, Inc. ISBN 0-86559-058-3
Brown, Marilyn (1994). Degas and the Business of Art: a Cotton Office in New Orleans. Pennsylvania State University Press. ISBN 0-271-00944-6
Canaday, John (1969). The Lives of the Painters Volume 3. New York: W.W. Norton and Company Inc.
Dorra, Henri. Art in Perspective New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, Inc.:208
Dumas, Ann (1988). Degas's Mlle. Fiocre in Context. Brooklyn: The Brooklyn Museum. ISBN 0-87273-116-2
Dunlop, Ian (1979). Degas. New York, N.Y: Harper & Row.  
"Edgar Degas, 1834–1917." The Book of Art Volume III (1976). New York: Grolier Incorporated:4.
Gordon, Robert; Forge, Andrew (1988). Degas. New York: Harry N. Abrams. ISBN 0-8109-1142-6
Growe, Bernd; Edgar Degas (1992). Edgar Degas, 1834–1917. Cologne: Benedikt Taschen. ISBN 3-8228-0560-2
Guillaud, Jaqueline; Guillaud, Maurice (editors) (1985). Degas: Form and Space. New York: Rizzoli. ISBN 0-8478-5407-8
Hartt, Frederick (1976). "Degas" Art Volume 2. Englewood Cliffs, NJ: Prentice-Hall Inc.: 365.
"Impressionism." Praeger Encyclopedia of Art Volume 3 (1967). New York: Praeger Publishers: 952.
J. Paul Getty Trust "Walter Richard Sickert." 2003. 11 May 2004.
Kendall, Richard; Degas, Edgar; Druick, Douglas W.; Beale, Arthur (1998). Degas and The Little Dancer. New Haven: Yale University Press. ISBN 0-300-07497-2
Krämer, Felix (May 2007). "'Mon tableau de genre': Degas's 'Le Viol' and Gavarni's 'Lorette'". The Burlington Magazine 149 (1250).
Mannering, Douglas (1994). The Life and Works of Degas. Great Britain: Parragon Book Service Limited.
Muehlig, Linda D. (1979). Degas and the Dance, 5–27 April May 1979. Northampton, Mass.: Smith College Museum of Art.
Peugeot, Catherine, Sellier, Marie (2001). A Trip to the Orsay Museum. Paris: ADAGP: 39.
Reff, Theodore (1976). Degas the artist's mind. [New York]: Metropolitan Museum of Art. ISBN 0-87099-146-9
Roskill, Mark W. (1983). "Edgar Degas." Collier's Encyclopedia.
Thomson, Richard (1988). Degas: The Nudes. London: Thames and Hudson Ltd. ISBN 0-500-23509-0
Tinterow, Gary (1988). Degas. New York: The Metropolitan Museum of Art and National Gallery of Canada.
Turner, J. (2000). From Monet to Cézanne: late 19th-century French artists. Grove Art. New York: St Martin's Press. ISBN 0-312-22971-2
Werner, Alfred (1969) Degas Pastels. New York: Watson-Guptill. ISBN 0-8230-1276-X
 
Further reading

Capriati, Elio; I Segreti di Degas (2009). Milano: Mjm Editore. ISBN 978-88-95682-68-6
Valery, Paul; "Degas, Manet, Morisot" Princeton University Press, 1989.


External links 
 

Edgar Degas at Hill-Stead Museum, Farmington, Connecticut
Edgar Degas at Norton Simon Museum, Pasadena, California
Degas, Sickert & Toulouse Lautrec at Tate
Edgar Degas Gallery at MuseumSyndicate
Edgar Degas paintings & interactive timeline
Union List of Artist Names, Getty Vocabularies. ULAN Full Record Display for Edgar Degas. Getty Vocabulary Program, Getty Research Institute. Los Angeles, California.
Works and literature on Edgar Degas
The Complete Set of Edgar Degas Bronzes at the M.T. Abraham Foundation
Edgar Degas exhibition catalogs and letter from The Metropolitan Museum of Art Libraries

 
  
DEFAULTSORT











  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Vaslav Nijinsky
 
 
 
 Vaslav (or Vatslav) Nijinsky ( ;  ;  ;  ; March 12, 1889  /1890  April 8, 1950) was a Russian danseur and choreographer of Polish descent, cited as the greatest male dancer of the early 20th century.     He grew to be celebrated for his virtuosity and for the depth and intensity of his characterizations. He could perform en pointe, a rare skill among male dancers at the time  and his ability to perform seemingly gravity-defying leaps was also legendary. The choreographer Bronislava Nijinska was his sister. He also had a brother, Stassik Nijinsky.   
Biography
Vaslav Nijinsky was born in 1889     or 1890  in Kiev, Ukraine, a part of Russian Empire as Wacław Niżyński, to ethnic Polish parents, dancers Tomasz Lavrentievitch Niżyński (b. 7 March 1862) and Eleonora Bereda (b. 28 December 1856). Nijinsky was christened in Warsaw, and considered himself to be a Pole despite difficulties in properly speaking the language as a result of his childhood in Russia's interior where his parents worked.   Eleanora, with two brothers and two sisters, was orphaned while still a child and  started to earn some money as an extra in the Wielki Theatre Ballet, becoming a full member of the company aged thirteen. In 1868 she was talent spotted and  moved to Kiev as a solo dancer. Thomas also attended the Wielki Theatre school, becoming a soloist there, before at age 18 accepting a soloist contract with the Odessa Theatre. The two met, married in May 1884 and settled to a career with the travelling Setov opera company. Thomas was premier danseur, and Eleanora a soloist. Eleanora continued to tour and dance while having three children, Stanislav Fomitch (b. 29 December 1886 in Tiflis), Vaslav, and Bronislava Fominitchna (b. 8 January 1891 in Minsky). Both boys recieved training from their father and appeared in an amateur production of Hopak in Odessa 1894.  Josef Setov died about 1894 and the company disbanded. Thomas attempted to run his own company but this was not a success so he and his family became itinerant dancers, his children appearing in the Christmas show at Nijini Novgorod. In 1897 Thomas and Eleanora separated after Thomas had fallen in love with a dancer, Rumiantseva, while touring in Finland. Eleanora moved to 20 Mokhovaya Street in St Petersburg with her children. She persuaded a friend from the Wielki Theatre, Victor Stanislas Gillert, who was now teaching at the  Imperial Ballet School, to help get Vaslav into the school and he arranged for Enrico Cecchetti to sponsor the application. In 1900 Nijinsky joined the Imperial Ballet School, where he initially studied dance under Sergei Legat and his brother Nicholas, and studied mime under Pavel Gerdt, all principal dancers at the Imperial Russian Ballet. At the end of the one year probationary period his teachers agreed upon his exceptional dancing ability  and he was confirmed as a boarder at the school. He appeared in supporting parts  in Faust, as a mouse in The Nutcracker, a page in Sleeping Beauty and Swan lake and won the Didelot scholarship. During his first year his academic studies had covered work he had already done before, so his relatively poor performance had not been so much noted. He did well in subjects which interested him, but not otherwise. This was compounded through his school years by his frequent choice as an extra in various productions, taking him away from classrooms for rehearsals and spending  nights at performances. He was teased for being Polish, and with the nickname 'Japonczek' for his faintly Japanese looks at a time Russia was at war with Japan. Even his dancing ability raised the resentment of some of his classmates. An incident in 1901 when one of the class deliberately caused him to fall led to his being in a coma for four days. Mikhail Oboukhov became his teacher in 1902, and awarded him the highest grade he ever gave to a student. In 1904 at the age of just fourteen Nijinsky was selected by the great choreographer Marius Petipa to dance a principal role in what proved to be the choreographer's last ballet, La Romance d'un Bouton de rose et d'un Papillon. But the work was never performed due to the out-break of the Russo-Japanese War. In subsequent years Nijinsky was given several soloist roles. In 1910, the company's Prima ballerina Mathilde Kschessinska selected Nijinsky to dance in a revival of Petipa's Le Talisman, during which Nijinsky created a sensation in the role of the Wind God Vayou.
Ballets Russes
A turning point for Nijinsky was his meeting Sergei Diaghilev, a celebrated and highly innovative producer of ballet and opera as well as art exhibitions, who concentrated on promoting Russian visual and musical art abroad,  particularly in Paris. Nijinsky and Diaghilev became lovers for a time,   and Diaghilev was heavily involved in directing and managing Nijinsky's career. In 1909 Diaghilev took a company of Russian opera and ballet stars to Paris featuring Nijinsky and Anna Pavlova. The season of colorful Russian ballets and operas, works mostly new to the West, was a great success. It led Diaghilev to create his famous company the Ballets Russes with choreographer Michel Fokine and designer Léon Bakst. The Paris seasons of the Ballets Russes were an artistic and social sensation; setting trends in art, dance, music and fashion for the next decade.Nijinsky's unique talent showed in Fokine's pieces such as Le Pavillon d'Armide (music by Nikolai Tcherepnin), Cleopatra (music by Anton Arensky and other Russian composers) and a divertissement La Fête. His expressive execution of a pas de deux from The Sleeping Beauty (Tchaikovsky) was a tremendous success; in 1910 he performed in Giselle, and Fokine's ballets Carnaval and Scheherazade (based on the orchestral suite by Rimsky-Korsakov).  His portrayal of "Petrushka" the puppet with a soul, was a remarkable showmanship of his ability to transform into this characters.  His partnership with Tamara Karsavina, also of the Mariinsky Theatre, was legendary, and they have been called the "most exemplary artists of the time". 

Nijinsky took the creative reins and choreographed ballets, which pushed boundaries and stirred controversy. His ballets were L'après-midi d'un faune (The Afternoon of a Faun, based on Claude Debussy's Prélude à l'après-midi d'un faune) (1912), Jeux (1913), Till Eulenspiegel (1916). In The Rite of Spring (Le Sacre du Printemps), with music by Igor Stravinsky) (1913), Nijinsky created choreography that exceeded the limits of traditional ballet and propriety. For the first time, his audiences were experiencing the futuristic, new direction of modern dance. The radically angular movements expressed the heart of Stravinsky's radically modern score. Unfortunately, Nijinsky's new trends in dance caused a riotous reaction at the Théâtre de Champs-Élysées when they premiered in Paris. As the title character in L'après-midi d'un faune the final tableau (or scene), during which he mimed masturbation with the scarf of a nymph, caused a scandal; he was defended by such artists as Auguste Rodin, Odilon Redon and Marcel Proust.  Violence broke out in the audience as The Rite of Spring premiered.  The theme of the ballet centered around a young maiden who was sacrificing herself by dancing until she died.  The theme, the difficult music of Stravinsky combined with the heavy, pedestrian movement of Nijinsky's choreography led to a violent uproar.  This uproar didn't seem displeasing to Diaghilev. 
Marriage and diagnosis
In 1913 the Ballets Russes toured South America. Diaghilev did not make this journey, because of a superstitious fear that he would die on the ocean if he ever sailed. Free from supervision, Nijinsky became acquainted with Romola de Pulszky, a Hungarian countess. An ardent fan of Nijinsky, she took up ballet and used her family connections to get close to him . Despite her efforts to attract him, Nijinsky initially appeared unaware of her interest. They married while overseas which infuriated Diaghilev.  When the company returned to Europe Diaghilev is reported to have flown into a rage, culminating in Nijinsky's dismissal .During World War I, Nijinsky was interned in Hungary. Diaghilev with the help of King Alfonso XIII of Spain succeeded in getting him out for a North American tour in 1916. However, it was around this time in his life that signs of his schizophrenia were becoming apparent to members of the company. He was diagnosed with schizophrenia and taken to Switzerland by his wife, where he was treated unsuccessfully by psychiatrist Eugen Bleuler.He spent the rest of his life in and out of psychiatric hospitals and asylums. During the last days of World War II, Nijinsky danced in public for the last time. He encountered a group of Russian soldiers decamped outside of Vienna, playing traditional folk tunes. Inspired by the music and his reunion with his countrymen, he leapt into an exquisite dance, astounding the men with the complexity and grace of his figures. The experience restored some of Nijinsky's capacity for communication, after having maintained long periods of almost absolute silence.   Nijinsky died in a clinic in London on April 8, 1950 and was buried in London until 1953 when his body was moved to Montmartre Cemetery, Paris, France beside the graves of Gaétan Vestris, Théophile Gautier, and Emma Livry. 
LegacyNijinsky's daughter Kyra married the Ukrainian conductor Igor Markevitch, and they had a son named Vaslav. The marriage ended in divorce.Nijinsky's Diary was written during the six weeks he spent in Switzerland before being committed to the asylum, combining elements of autobiography with appeals for compassion toward the less fortunate, and for vegetarianism and animal rights. Nijinsky writes of the importance of feeling as opposed to reliance on reason and logic alone, and he denounces the practice of art criticism as being nothing more than a way for those who practice it to indulge their own egos rather than focusing on what the artist was trying to say. The diary also contains bitter and conflicted thoughts regarding his relationship with Diaghilev.As a dancer, Nijinsky was extraordinary for his time. Nijinsky is responsible for changing audiences' perspective of the male dancer. He was a sensual performer and wore revealing costumes. He looked androgynous.Nijinsky is immortalized in numerous still photographs, many of which were made by E.O. Hoppé, who extensively photographed the Ballets Russes London seasons between 1909 and 1921. However, no film exists of Nijinsky dancing; Diaghilev never allowed the Ballets Russes to be filmed, because he felt that the quality of film at the time could never capture the artistry of his dancers, and that the reputation of the company would suffer if people saw it only in short jerky films. 
Cultural depictions
In plays

Clownmaker (1975) Richard Crane/Faynia Williams Edinburgh Festival Fringe First Award, transfer to London and New York
In 1974-75, Terence Rattigan was commissioned to write a play about Nijinsky and Diaghilev, as the BBC's Play of the Month.  He completed the script and was very happy with it, but Romola Nijinsky objected to her late husband's being depicted as a homosexual.  Rattigan, himself a homosexual, was sympathetic to her view and decided he did not want the work produced in his lifetime, so he withdrew it.  He died in 1977; the play has never been staged.  
A Cavalier for Milady: A Play in Two Scenes [c. 1976] is a one act play by Tennessee Williams that includes a fantastical, non-literal appearance by Nijinsky.  In the play, an adult woman named Nance (who is dressed a Victorian era child) has been left by her mother with a hostile "babysitter," who is distressed by the attention that Nance is paying to a Greek statue of a "naked man" (while keeping her fingers running on her lap).  Eventually the babysitter leaves and an apparition of Nijinsky appears and comforts Nance about her mental state in a strange, touching interaction.
Chinchilla (1977) by Robert David MacDonald.
Nijinsky: God's Mad Clown (1986) by Glenn J. Blumstein. 
Niżyński (2005) by Waldemar Zawodzinski. 
ICONS: The Lesbian and Gay History of the World, Vol. 5 (2011), actor/playwright Jade Esteban Estrada portrayed Nijinsky in this solo musical
Nijinsky - The Miraculous God of Dance (2011), Sagiri Seina performed the title role in the Takarazuka Revue production in Japan


In film

Nijinsky (uncompleted film, 1970)
The screenplay was written by Edward Albee. The film was to be directed by Tony Richardson and star Rudolf Nureyev as Nijinsky, Claude Jade as Romola and Paul Scofield as Diaghilev, but producer Harry Saltzman canceled the project.

Nijinsky (1980)
Directed by Herbert Ross, starring George de la Peña as Nijinsky, Leslie Browne as Romola, Alan Bates as Diaghilev and Jeremy Irons as Fokine. Romola Nijinsky had a writing credit for the film.

The Diaries of Vaslav Nijinsky (2001)
Directed and written by Paul Cox. The screenplay was based directly on Nijinsky's diaries and read over related imagery. The subject matter included his work, his sickness, and his relationships with Diaghilev as well as his wife.

Riot at the Rite (2005)
A TV drama, directed by Andy Wilson. Centers around the first performance of The Rite of Spring. Nijinsky is portrayed by Adam Garcia.

Nijinsky & Neumeier Soulmates in Dance (2009)
Documentary on influence of Nijinsky's work on the contemporary American choreographer John Neumeier. Produced by Lothar Mattner for WDR/ARTE. 
By Jan Kounen

Coco Chanel & Igor Stravinsky (2009)
A French film directed by Jan Kounen about an affair between Coco Chanel and Igor Stravinsky. Nijinsky is portrayed in scenes depicting the creation of The Rite of Spring. Nijinsky is played by Polish actor Marek Kossakowski.
In poetry

The War of Vaslav Nijinsky (1981) by poet Frank Bidart
"September 1, 1939" (1939) by poet W. H. Auden
Mention in Soumitra Mohan's long Hindi poem, Luqman Ali (1968)


In novels

Vaslav (2010) by Dutch novelist Arthur Japin 
He's a regularly occurring background gag character in Aoike Yasuko's "Sons of Eve" or "Ibu no Musukotachi" manga as Heath Ethan's stalker. He is always depicted in women's ballet uniforms & frequently turns into a swan.


In music

In 2011, composer Jade Esteban Estrada wrote the song "Beautiful" for the musical, ICONS: The Lesbian and Gay History of the World, Vol. 5.
A verse of the song "Dancing" from the album Mask (1981) by the Bauhaus refers to Nijinsky "...Dancing on hallowed ground/Dancing Nijinsky style/Dancing with the lost and found..."
A verse of the song "Prospettiva Nevskj" from the album Patriots (1980) by Franco Battiato quotes Nijinsky, his peculiar dancing style, and hints to his relation with Diaghilev "poi guardavamo con le facce assenti la grazia innaturale di Nijinsky. E poi di lui si innamorò perdutamente il suo impresario e dei balletti russi "


In competitive skating

Since 2003 Evgeni Plushenko has performed Tribute to Vaslav Nijinsky in figure skating competitions all over the world. He earned across the board perfect 6.0s for artistic impression in 2003/2004, on Rus Nat Champ, St. Petersburg. 


See also

List of Russian ballet dancers


References 
Sources

Albright, Daniel (2004). Modernism and Music: An Anthology of Sources, p. 19. University of Chicago Press. ISBN 0-226-01267-0.
Bergamini, John (1969) The Tragic Dynasty: A History of the Romanovs, pg. 430. Konecky and Konecky. ISBN 1-56852-160-X
Buckle, Richard (1971) Nijinsky
Buckle, Richard (1979) Diaghilev
Kolb, Alexandra (2009) Nijinsky's Images of Homosexuality: Three Case Studies. Journal of European Studies 39/2, pp. 147-171
Kopelson, Kevin (1997) The Queer Afterlife of Vaslav Nijinsky. Stanford University Press. ISBN 0-8047-2950-6
 
 


External links 
 

Vaslav Nijinsky: Creating A New Artistic Era Vaslav, New York Public Library.
 
 
Newyorker.com

 
DEFAULTSORT
























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	W. T. Cosgrave
 
William Thomas "W. T." Cosgrave ( ; 6 June 1880 – 16 November 1965), was an Irish politician who succeeded Michael Collins as Chairman of the Irish Provisional Government from August to December 1922. He served as the first President of the Executive Council (prime minister) of the Irish Free State from 1922 to 1932.   
Early and private lifeWilliam Thomas Cosgrave, W. T., or Liam as he was generally known, was born at 174 James's Street, Dublin in 1880. He was educated at the Christian Brothers School at Malahide Road, Marino, before entering his father's publican business. Cosgrave first became politically active when he attended the first Sinn Féin convention in 1905.He was a Sinn Féin councillor on Dublin Corporation from 1909 until 1922 and joined the Irish Volunteers in 1913. Cosgrave played an active role in the Easter Rising of 1916 serving under Eamonn Ceannt at the South Dublin Union. Following the rebellion Cosgrave was sentenced to death, however this was later commuted to penal servitude for life and he was interned in Frongoch, Wales. While in prison Cosgrave won a seat for Sinn Féin in the 1917 Kilkenny by-election.He again won an Irish seat in the 1918 general election, serving as MP for Carlow–Kilkenny.    He was released from prison in 1918 under a general amnesty and took part in the soon to be established Dáil Éireann. On 24 June 1919 Cosgrave married Louisa Flanagan in Dublin.
Political careerSinn Féin proved to be the big winner of the election in Ireland, capturing 73 Irish seats, 25 uncontested. Its manifesto promised abstentionism from the House of Commons in Westminster. On 21 January 1919, Sinn Féin's MPs who were not imprisoned assembled in the Round Room of the Mansion House in Dublin and formed themselves into an Assembly of Ireland, known in the Irish language as Dáil Éireann. Cathal Brugha became Príomh Aire (First or Prime Minister), also called President of Dáil Éireann.In April 1919 Brugha resigned and Éamon de Valera, the Sinn Féin leader, who had just escaped from prison with the help of Michael Collins using a key made from a candle, assumed the premiership instead. The new government and state, known as the Irish Republic, claimed a right to govern the island of Ireland. It also declared UDI, that is, a declaration of independence which remained until the end of the Republic unrecognised by any other world state except the Russian Republic under Lenin. 
Minister for local governmentThough one of the most politically experienced of Sinn Féin's TDs, Cosgrave was not among the major leadership of the party. Nevertheless he was appointed to de Valera's cabinet as Minister for Local Government, his close friendship with de Valera being one of the reasons he was chosen. Another reason was his long-time experience gained on Dublin Corporation, most recently as Chairman of its Finance Committee.  His chief task as minister was the job of organising the non-cooperation of the people with the British authorities and establishing an alternative system of government. Cosgrave was very successful in his role at the Department of Local Government.In 1920 he oversaw elections to local councils in which the new system of proportional representation was used. Sinn Féin gained control of 28 of the 33 local councils. These councils then cut their links to the British, and pledged loyalty to the Sinn Féin Department of Local Government, under Cosgrave.
Anglo-Irish TreatyCosgrave broke with Éamon de Valera over the issue of the Anglo-Irish Treaty of 1921. To de Valera and almost half of the Sinn Féin TDs, the treaty betrayed "the republic" by proposing to replace it with dominion status akin to the position of Canada or Australia within the British Empire.To a majority, however, republican status remained for the moment an unattainable goal, with the republic unrecognised internationally. Dominion status offered, in the words of Michael Collins, "the freedom to achieve freedom". At the cabinet meeting in Dublin held to consider the Treaty immediately after it had been signed, Cosgrave surprised de Valera by agreeing with Collins and with Arthur Griffith, de Valera's predecessor as leader of Sinn Féin and the chairman of the delegation which included Collins that had negotiated the Treaty.  After the Dáil voted by 64 to 57 to approve the Treaty in January, 1922, De Valera resigned the presidency (which in August 1921 had been upgraded from a prime ministerial President of Dáil Éireann to a full head of state, called President of the Irish Republic). De Valera was replaced as president by Griffith. Collins, in accordance with the Treaty, formed a Provisional Government; this included Cosgrave amongst its membership.
Chairman of the Provisional GovernmentThe months following the acceptance of the Treaty saw a gradual progression to civil war. The split in Sinn Féin gradually deepened and the majority of the IRA hardened against accepting anything less than a full republic. Collins and de Valera tried desperately to find a middle course and formed a pact whereby Sinn Féin fought a General Election in June with a common slate of candidates. Despite this pact, the electorate voted heavily in favour of pro-Treaty parties. On the day of the election, the draft Free State Constitution was published and rejected by the Anti-Treatyites as it was clearly not a republican document. Collins, forced to a decision, opted to maintain the Treaty position and the support of the British Government, and moved to suppress the Republican opposition that had seized the Four Courts in Dublin. The Civil War started on 28 June 1922, and the IRA was decisively defeated in the field over the following two months, being largely pinned back to Munster. In August 1922, both Griffith and Collins died in quick succession; the former of natural causes, the latter a few days later when ambushed by Republicans at Béal na Bláth. With de Valera now on the fringes as the nominal leader of the Anti-Treaty forces in the Civil War, the new dominion (which was in the process of being created but which would not legally come into being until December 1922) had lost all its most senior figures.Though it had the option of going for General Richard Mulcahy, Collins' successor as Commander-in-Chief of the National Army, the pro-Treaty leadership opted for Cosgrave, in part due to his democratic credentials as a long-time politician. Having previously held the Local Government and Finance portfolios, he now became simultaneously President of Dáil Éireann (Griffith had returned his office to its pre-August 1921 name) and Chairman of the Provisional Government. When, on 6 December 1922, the Irish Free State came into being, Cosgrave became its first prime minister, called President of the Executive Council.
President of the Executive Council 1922–1932W. T. Cosgrave was a small, quiet man, and at 42 was the oldest member of the Cabinet. He had not sought the leadership of the new country but once it was his he made good use of it. One of his chief priorities was to hold the new country together and to prove that the Irish could govern themselves. Some historians have noted that he lacked vision as a leader and was surrounded by men who were more capable than himself. However, over his ten years as President he provided the emerging Irish state with an able leader who had a sound judgement on the matters of state that the new country was facing.
Domestic policy
As head of the Free State government during the Civil War, he was ruthless in what he saw as defence of the state against his former republican comrades. Although he actually disagreed with the use of the death penalty in principle, in October 1922 he enacted a Public Safety Bill, which allowed for the execution of anyone who was captured bearing arms against the state or aiding armed attacks on state forces. He told the Dáil on 27 September 1922, "although I have always objected to the death penalty, there is no other way that I know of in which ordered conditions can be restored in this country, or any security obtained for our troops, or to give our troops any confidence in us as a government". Cosgrave's position was that a guerrilla war could drag on indefinitely, making the achievement of law and order and establishing the Free State impossible, if harsh action was not taken.
His reputation suffered after he ordered the execution without trial of republican prisoners during the civil war. In all 77 republicans were executed by the Free State between November 1922 and the end of the war in May 1923, including Robert Erskine Childers, Liam Mellowes and Rory O'Connor, far more than the 14 IRA Volunteers the British executed in the War of Independence. The Republican side, for their part, attacked pro-Treaty politicians and their homes and families. Cosgrave's family home was burned down by Anti-Treaty fighters and an uncle of his was shot dead.  (See also Executions during the Irish Civil War)
Cosgrave said " I am not going to hesitate if the country is to live, and if we have to exterminate ten thousand Republicans, the three million of our people is greater than this ten thousand" [WT Cosgrave 1880-1965 Founder of Modern Irelans by Anthony Jordan  Westport books 2006 p. 89]
In April 1923 the Pro-Treaty Sinn Féin members organised a new political  party called Cumann na nGaedheal with Cosgrave as leader. The following month the civil war was brought to an end, when the remaining Anti-Treaty IRA guerrillas announced a ceasefire and dumped their arms.In the first few years in power Cosgrave's new government faced a number of problems. Firstly, the government attempted to reduce the size of the Irish Army. During the civil war it had grown to over 55,000 men which, now that the civil war was over, was far too large and costly to maintain. However, some army officers challenged the authority of the government to cut the size of the Army. The officers, mostly Pro-Treaty IRA men, were angry that the government was not doing enough to help to create a republic and also there would be massive unemployment.When he and his position were challenged by the disgruntled Army officers of the Irish Republican Army Organisation (IRAO), other politicians and soldiers took the important decisions.  In March 1924 more layoffs were expected and the army officers, Major-General Liam Tobin and Colonel Charles Dalton  sent an ultimatum to the government demanding an end to the demobilisation. Kevin O'Higgins, the Minister for Justice, who was also acting President for Cosgrave while the latter was in hospital, moved to resolve the so-called "Army Mutiny". Richard Mulcahy, the Minister for Defence, resigned and O'Higgins was victorious in a very public power struggle within Cumann na nGaedheal. The crisis within the army was solved but the government was divided.In 1924 the British and Irish governments agreed to attend the "Boundary Commission" to redraw the border which partitioned Ireland between the Irish Free State and Northern Ireland. The Free State's representative was Eoin MacNeill, a respected scholar and Minister for Education. The Free State expected to gain much territory in heavily Catholic and republican parts of counties Londonderry, Fermanagh, Tyrone, and Armagh, as the British government had indicated during the treaty negotiations that the wishes of the nationalist inhabitants along the border would be taken into account. However, after months of secret negotiations a newspaper reported that there would be little change to the border and the Free State would actually lose territory in Donegal. MacNeill resigned from the commission and the government for not reporting to Cosgrave on the details of the commission. Cosgrave immediately went to London for a meeting with the British Prime Minister and the Prime Minister of Northern Ireland, where they agreed to let the border remain as it was, and in return the Free State did not have to pay its pro-rata share of the Imperial debt. In the Dáil debate on 7 December Cosgrave stated: "I had only one figure in my mind and that was a huge nought. That was the figure I strove to get, and I got it." 
Cosgrave notably turned down a plea for asylum in Ireland for Leon Trotsky while in exile. The request was made by the trade union leader William X. O'Brien in 1930. Cosgrave told O'Brien  
Told him [O'Brien] "I could see no reason why Trotsky should be considered by us. Russian bonds had been practically confiscated. He said there was to be consideration of them. I said it was not by Trotsky, whose policy was the reverse. I asked his nationality. Reply Jew. They were against religion (he said that was modified). I said not by Trotsky. He said he had hoped there would be an asylum here as in England for all. I agreed that under normal conditions, which we had not here, that would be alright. But we had no touch with this man or his Government, nor did they interest themselves in us in his 'day'.
  In June, 1927, a general election was held in which de Valera's new party, Fianna Fáil, won many seats on an abstentionist platform. In July, the Minister for Justice, Kevin O'Higgins, was assassinated on his way home from Sunday Mass by the IRA. Cosgrave had legislation passed to force Fianna Fáil to take their seats in the Dáil and this proved successful with de Valera and his party entering the Dáil.  Previously, without de Valera, Cosgrave faced very little opposition, giving him considerable freedom of action.  However, de Valera's arrival significantly altered the situation.
Foreign policyAlthough Cosgrave and his government accepted dominion status for the Irish Free State, they did not trust the British to respect this new independence. The government embarked on fairly radical foreign initiatives. In 1923 the Irish Free State became a member of the League of Nations. The Free State became the first British Commonwealth country to have a separate or non-British representative in Washington, D.C.. The new state also exchanged diplomats with many other European nations.The Anglo-Irish Treaty itself also gave the Irish much more freedom than many other dominions. The Oath of Allegiance in Ireland was much less royalist than in Canada or Australia. The king's representative in Ireland was Irish, unlike the other dominions, and although the head of state was the king, power was derived from the Irish people and not him.  There were also questions raised about the word "treaty". The British claimed it was an internal affair while the Irish saw it as an international agreement between two independent states, a point which was accepted  by the League of Nations, when that body registered the Treaty in 1924. 
Economic policyDuring the ten years that Cosgrave and Cumann na nGaedheal were in power they adopted a conservative economic policy. Taxation was kept as low as possible and the budget was balanced to avoid borrowing. The Irish currency remained linked to the British currency, resulting in the overvaluation of the Irish pound.  Free trade was advocated as opposed to protection, but moderate tariffs were introduced on some items.The new government decided to concentrate on developing agriculture, while doing little to help the industrial sector. Agriculture responded well with stricter quality control being introduced and the passing of a Land Act to help farmers buy their farms. Also, the Irish Sugar Company and the Agricultural Credit Corporation were established to encourage growth. However, the economic depression that hit in the 1930s soon undid the good work of Cosgrave and his ministers. Industry was seen as secondary to agriculture and little was done to improve it. The loss of the industrialised north-east of Ireland had a bad effect on the country as a whole. However, the Electricity Supply Board, with the first national grid in Europe, was established to provide employment and electricity to the new state.
General election 1932 A general election was not required by law until the end of 1932, however, Cosgrave called one for February of that year. There was growing unrest in the country and a fresh mandate was needed for an important Commonwealth meeting in the summer. Another reason for calling the election early was the pending Eucharistic Congress to be held in June. This was a major national and international event. Cosgrave, as a devout Catholic like most of his cabinet, had invested much time in the build-up to it and wished it to proceed without any tension from a pending General election. In the event Éamon de Valera and Fianna Fáil were the ones to derive all the kudos from that event.  Cumann na nGaedheal fought the election on its record of providing ten years of honest government and political and economic stability. Instead of developing new policies the party played the "red card" by portraying the new party, Fianna Fáil, as communists.  Fianna Fáil offered the electorate a fresh and popular manifesto of social reform.  Unable to compete with this Cosgrave and his party lost the election, and a minority Fianna Fáil government came to power.
Cosgrave in oppositionFollowing the general election Cosgrave assumed the nominal role of Leader of the Opposition. Fianna Fáil were expected to have a short tenure in government, however, this turned out to be a sixteen year period of rule by the new party. In 1933 three groups, Cumann na nGaedheal, the National Centre Party and the National Guard came together to form a new political force, Fine Gael - the United Ireland Party. Cosgrave became the first parliamentary leader of the new party, serving until his retirement in 1944. During that period the new party failed to win a general election. Cosgrave retired as leader of the party and from politics in 1944.
LegacyAn effective and good chairman rather than a colourful or charismatic leader, he led the new state during the more turbulent period of its history, when the legislation necessary for the foundation of a stable independent Irish polity needed to be pushed through. Cosgrave's governments in particular played a crucial role in the evolution of the British Empire into the British Commonwealth, with fundamental changes to the concept of the role of the Crown, the governor-generalship and the British Government within the Commonwealth.In overseeing the establishment of the formal institutions of the state his performance as its first political leader may have been undervalued. In an era when democratic governments formed in the aftermath of the First World War were moving away from democracy and towards dictatorships, the Free State under Cosgrave remained unambiguously democratic, a fact shown by his handing over of power to his one-time friend, then rival, Éamon de Valera, when de Valera's Fianna Fáil won the 1932 general election, in the process killing off talk within the Irish Army of staging a coup to keep Cosgrave in power and de Valera out of it.Perhaps the best endorsement made of Cosgrave came from his old rival, with whom he was reconciled before his death, Éamon de Valera. De Valera once in 1932 and later close to his own death, made two major comments. To an interviewer, when asked what was his biggest mistake, he said without a pause, "not accepting the Treaty". To his own son, Vivion, weeks after taking power in 1932 and reading the files on the actions of Cosgrave's governments in relation to its work in the Commonwealth, he said of Cosgrave and Cosgrave's ministers ". . . when we got in and saw the files. . . they did a magnificent job, Viv. They did a magnificent job." 
DeathWilliam T. Cosgrave died on 16 November 1965, aged 85. The Fianna Fáil government under Seán Lemass awarded him the honour of a state funeral, which was attended by the cabinet, the leaders of all the main Irish political parties, and Éamon de Valera, then President of Ireland. He is buried in Goldenbridge Cemetery in Inchicore.
Richard Mulcahy said, "It is in terms of the Nation and its needs and its potential  that I praise God who gave us in our dangerous days the gentle but steel-like spirit of rectitude, courage and humble  self-sacrifice, that was Liam T. Cosgrave". 
Cosgrave's son, Liam, succeeded his father as a TD in 1944 and went on to become leader of Fine Gael from 1965 to 1977 and Taoiseach from 1973 to 1977. W.T.'s grandson, also called Liam also served as a TD and as Senator and his grand daughter Louise Cosgrave served as a Dún Laoghaire-Rathdown County Councillor from 1999 to 2009.
GovernmentsThe following governments were led by Cosgrave:

Provisional Government (August 1922–December 1922)
1st Executive Council of the Irish Free State (December 1922–September 1923)
2nd Executive Council of the Irish Free State (September 1923–June 1927)
3rd Executive Council of the Irish Free State (June 1927–October 1927)
4th Executive Council of the Irish Free State (October 1927–April 1930)
5th Executive Council of the Irish Free State (April 1930–March 1932)


See also

Families in the Oireachtas
List of people on stamps of Ireland


References 
External links  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 -
 
 
 
 
 
 -
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   
 
DEFAULTSORT




























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	C-3PO
 
 
 C-3PO ( , phonetically spelled See-Threepio; 3PO or Threepio for short) is a robot character from the Star Wars universe who appears in both the original Star Wars films and the prequel trilogy. He is also a major character in the television show Droids, and appears frequently in the series' "Expanded Universe" of novels, comic books, and video games. Along with Anakin Skywalker (Darth Vader), Obi-Wan Kenobi and R2-D2, he is one of only four characters to appear in all six Star Wars films. C-3PO (played by Anthony Daniels) and R2-D2 (played by Kenny Baker) are the only characters portrayed by the same actor in all six films.C-3PO is a protocol droid designed to serve humans, and boasts that he is fluent in "over six million forms of communication". He is generally seen with his long-time counterpart, R2-D2. Threepio's main function is to assist etiquette, customs, and translation, so that meetings of different cultures run smoothly. Threepio and R2-D2 played a vital and pivotal role in the Galaxy's history . While many protocol/interpretor droids range in color, C-3PO's own identifying colors are primarily gold with silver from the right knee down.
Film appearances
Original trilogy
In Star Wars Episode IV: A New Hope C-3PO is introduced to the audience when C-3PO and R2-D2 are aboard the consular ship  Tantive IV when it is attacked by Darth Vader’s Star Destroyer Devastator. When R2-D2 leaves the ship to deliver a secret message to Obi-Wan Kenobi, C-3PO follows R2-D2, eventually to the planet Tatooine. There, C-3PO and R2-D2 are captured by Jawas and taken to be sold. In the process of being sold to Owen Lars, C-3PO convinces Owen to buy R2-D2 as well. Star Wars Episode IV: A New Hope Throughout the film C-3PO is a foil to R2-D2's jokes,    even when C-3PO translates R2-D2's machine speech for the audience. C-3PO was the property of the captain on the Tantive IV, but seems to follow R2-D2 in a relationship akin to those between human children;  Herzheld p.62 "R2-D2 and C-3PO act more like children..."  C-3PO often following R2-D2 around, and R2-D2 needing C-3PO to translate for him. Herzfeld pp 62-64 "One quickly senses the dependence R2-D2 has on C-3PO as a translator, a dependence that is returned by C-3PO's emotional need for R2-D2, as well as for the human characters"   When R2 is damaged in the Battle of Yavin, C-3PO offers to donate any mechanical parts helpful in his repair; but this transference is never confirmed. Herzfeld p.62 "The closeness of the two robots is exemplified by C-3PO, who both urges R2-D2 to take care of himself and offers his own circuits to repair R2-D2 after a mishap." C-3PO also displays the ability to lie (essentially favouring one human group over another), giving him a more autonomous capability of thought than characters subject to Isaac Asimov's Three Laws of Robotics. In The Empire Strikes Back, C-3PO is responsible for identifying the Empire's probe droid, alerting the Rebels to the Empire's awareness of their location on the 6th planet of the Hoth System . C-3PO escapes with Han Solo, Chewbacca, and Princess Leia in the Millennium Falcon, while R2-D2 joins Luke in his search for Yoda. Star Wars Episode V: The Empire Strikes Back  During this time C-3PO and Solo are often shown as foils; C-3PO quoting odds and Han defying them. After a chase through the Hoth asteroid field, the Falcon escapes to Cloud City on Bespin. While exploring a room in Cloud City, C-3PO is blasted by a stormtrooper. In search of Threepio, Chewbacca heads to the Ugnaught recycling facility where he finds the dismembered droid. When Darth Vader reveals his presence to the group, Chewbacca is sent into a holding cell, but is permitted to rebuild the droid, which he does poorly. Thereafter Chewbacca carries the partially rebuilt C-3PO on his back during Han Solo's encasement in carbonite. With the help of the city's administrator, Lando Calrissian, Princess Leia, Chewbacca, and C-3PO escape the city. Having C-3PO on Chewbacca's back is beneficial, in that when Boba Fett escapes the city with Han Solo, C-3PO notifies them of pursuing stormtroopers. After successfully escaping Vader's flagship Executor, C-3PO is fully repaired by R2-D2. In Star Wars Episode VI: Return of the Jedi, Luke commands C-3PO and R2-D2 to deliver a message to Jabba the Hutt, whereby C-3PO is used as Jabba's translator while R2-D2 serves on his flying 'sail barge'. C-3PO's first translation for the crime lord is of the bounty hunter Boushh — Leia in disguise — claiming the bounty for Chewbacca. Star Wars Episode VI: Return of the Jedi 
Later, Luke Skywalker infiltrates the palace and kills Jabba's rancor in a duel; whereupon Jabba transfers his court to the sail barge with Luke Skywalker, Han Solo, and Chewbacca as food for the Sarlacc, while Leia serves as Jabba's slave. When Luke Skywalker attempts escape, R2-D2 tosses him his lightsaber, with which he attacks Jabba's guards. In the midst of the battle, C-3PO is attacked by Salacious Crumb, who pulls out his right photoreceptor before being driven off by R2-D2. Thereafter the two escape the sail barge and are retrieved by the protagonists. 
C-3PO accompanies the strike force to the Forest Moon of Endor to disable the shield generator protecting the second Death Star. When he, Han Solo, Luke Skywalker, Chewbacca, and R2-D2 are captured by the Ewoks, C-3PO is perceived to be a god by the latter. When the human prisoners are threatened by the Ewoks, Luke levitates the droid above the crowd as demonstration of the supposed god's ability, so as to prompt release  . Later that night, C-3PO narrates the history and intentions of the Rebels to the tribe, convincing them to help the Rebels at the Battle of Endor. When the Rebels are captured, C-3PO begins the Ewoks' assault on the Empire by luring stormtroopers to a false surrender. Chaos ensues as Ewoks attack the Imperial Stormtroopers, allowing Han Solo and Leia Organa to reach the controls. When R2-D2 is needed in infiltration, C-3PO follows, evading enemy fire. The battle ends with the Death Star's destruction and the death of the Emperor. C-3PO is present at the celebration afterward. 
Prequel trilogyIn the Star Wars series' narrative chronology, C-3PO first appears in Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace as the creation of Anakin Skywalker, who builds him out of spare parts. (The non-canon story "Thank the Maker!" in Star Wars Tales explains that Anakin found the parts in a junk heap, and guessed they were very old).In The Phantom Menace, C-3PO meets his future partner, R2-D2, Jedi Master Qui-Gon Jinn, Queen Padmé Amidala of Naboo, and Jar Jar Binks; C-3PO and R2-D2 co-operate to perfect Anakin's podracer for the race "Boonta Eve Classic". Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace (Novelization) Shortly afterwards, C-3PO becomes part of Anakin's pit crew during the race, where he sees Anakin defeat Sebulba. C-3PO and Anakin part ways when Qui-Gon frees the boy after winning a bet with Anakin's master, Watto. Before parting from C-3PO, Anakin assures the droid that (Anakin's mother) Shmi does not sell him. In Star Wars Episode II: Attack of the Clones, set 10 years later, Shmi is kidnapped by a group of Tusken Raiders. Sensing that his mother is in danger, Anakin travels with Padmé to Tatooine, where they reunite with Threepio. C-3PO recognizes Anakin and Padmé instantly and presents them to Beru Whitesun, Owen, and Cliegg Lars. When Anakin returns with his mother's lifeless body, C-3PO attends her funeral. Star Wars Episode II: Attack of the Clones After Anakin and Padmé's visit to Tatooine, C-3PO accompanies them to the planet Geonosis to rescue Obi-Wan Kenobi. Shortly afterward, he follows R2-D2 into a droid-construction site, where his head is temporarily attached to the torso of a battle droid, while the head of the droid is placed onto Threepio's torso. Influenced by the battle droid's programming, Threepio reluctantly participates in the film's climactic battle scene, where he is stopped by Kit Fisto. Having been restored by R2-D2, he leaves Geonosis with the other protagonists. At the end of the film, he is a witness to Padmé and Anakin's marriage on Naboo. In Star Wars Episode III: Revenge of the Sith, C-3PO is aware of Padmé's pregnancy and the meetings held with Bail Organa and Mon Mothma. After Anakin and R2-D2 return from Anakin's massacre of the Jedi, C-3PO and R2-D2 conclude that the latter was the result of emotional pressure on Anakin.  Star Wars Episode III: Revenge of the Sith  C-3PO becomes a witness to his maker's turn to the dark side of the Force when he accompanies Padmé to Mustafar, and Anakin, now the Sith Lord Darth Vader, uses the Force to render her unconscious; whereupon C-3PO and R2-D2 take her to safety. When Obi-Wan returns to their spaceship, C-3PO pilots it to Polis Massa and witnesses Padmé give birth to the Skywalker twins, Luke and Leia, and dies shortly afterward. C-3PO and R2-D2 fall into the custody of Bail Organa, who orders that C-3PO's memories be erased to protect the twins from Palpatine and Vader. 
Expanded UniverseIt has been said  that older accounts of Threepio's creation on the planet Affa in 112 BBY have been changed by his portrayal in The Phantom Menace. The older version of Threepio's origins originated with George Lucas, and both versions were harmonized from the outset: in 1977, Lucas provided a guide for early Expanded Universe creators, in which Threepio's origin on Affa was established, and also the statement that he was "totally reassembled by a young boy working for a junk dealer" before joining the Alderaanian diplomatic corps "several years" later. Some of the early material in this guide has since been superseded.In all Star Wars media involving the Clone Wars, C-3PO serves as Padmé Amidala's personal protocol droid. In "The New Face of War", a story in Star Wars: Republic, Queen Jamillia appoints the droid to serve as liaison to the Jedi during that campaign following the defense of Naboo and the bio-plague of Ohma-D'un by the Separatists. Star Wars Republic: The New Face of War  He is a reluctant participant in many of Padmé's adventures, including a rather hazardous mission during the Battle of Ilum, Star Wars: Clone Wars Chapter 15  in which his loyalty is essential in helping Jedi Master Yoda rescue fellow Jedi Luminara Unduli and Barriss Offee. Star Wars: Clone Wars Chapter 16 In Clone Wars, C-3PO's outer plating are upgraded to a shiny bronzium coating due to his tenure as Padmé's servant. Star Wars: Clone Wars Chapter 1  He also severely disapproves of combat droids, once demanding to "have a serious talk with their programmer". Star Wars: Clone Wars Chapter 23 During the Droids series, set between Revenge of the Sith and A New Hope, C-3PO and R2-D2 are traded to various masters. Highlights include an early encounter with bounty hunter Boba Fett, Star Wars: Droids: The White Witch  and a change in personality brought by remodeling. Star Wars Droids: The Kalarba Adventures In the Expanded Universe material set after Return of the Jedi, C-3PO assists Leia Organa, Luke Skywalker, and their allies in the Alliance (and later, the New Republic) on many missions. Due to his function as a protocol droid, he most often stays with Leia Organa-Solo on Coruscant, assisting her political duties, while R2-D2 often stays with Luke Skywalker at the Jedi Academy.In The Truce at Bakura, he translates Ssi-ruuvi, the language of the Ssi-ruuk, to aid the Alliance. The Truce at Bakura  In The Glove of Darth Vader, C-3PO and R2-D2 are members of the Senate Planetary Intelligence Network (SPIN), and undergo transformation by the Droid Modification Team to be disguised as Kessel droids so that they could infiltrate a gathering of Imperials to find out who is planning to take control of the Empire. The Glove of Darth Vader In The Courtship of Princess Leia, C-3PO is led to believe that Han Solo is ancestrally the King of Corellia during Solo's competition with Prince Isolder for Leia's hand in marriage. Threepio agrees to assist Solo as a counselor droid; but is shocked when Solo kidnaps the princess and takes her to Dathomir. Despite this, Threepio continues to present Han in the best possible light and writes a song for him entitled "The Virtues of King Han Solo", which he backs with the sound of a full symphony orchestra. He later discoveres that Solo's ancestor was merely "a pretender to the throne", but is present at Han and Leia's wedding. The Courtship of Princess Leia In Tatooine Ghost, C-3PO returns to Tatooine, where he helps Han and Leia in their search for an Alderaanian moss painting storing a valuable code. Here, Threepio reunites with Kitster Banai and Wald, childhood friends of Anakin Skywalker. With their help C-3PO and the others discover Shmi's diary, whereof Leia remarks that the droid described reminds her of Threepio. The code is eventually found and destroyed. Tatooine Ghost In Dark Force Rising, Threepio goes to Honoghr with Leia during the Thrawn Crisis during her quest with Khabarakh to discover what had caused the plight of the Noghri. Threepio is forced to hide with Leia and Chewbacca when Imperial forces arrive overhead, Dark Force Rising  but later return with Leia to Coruscant, where she gives birth to Jaina and Jacen Solo. Threepio serves as caretaker to the twins, and later Anakin Solo as well. In Heir to the Empire, Lando reprograms Threepio to sound like Leia in order to hide from Imperials on Nkllon; but the Empire, led by Grand Admiral Thrawn, sees through the deception. Threepio also accompanies Han, Lando, Artoo, Luke, Chewbacca, and Mara Jade to Wayland on a mission to destroy the Mount Tantiss storehouse. Thanks to Threepio and some Noghri, the party recruits aid from the local population and destroys the storehouse. The Last Command In Dark Apprentice, the Solo twins escape from Chewbacca's and Threepio's watch during a trip to a zoo on Coruscant and arrive in the planet's sub-levels. Threepio frantically searches for them, but they had been found by King Onibald Daykim and are reunited with their parents. Dark Apprentice In Empire's End, Threepio and Artoo are nearly destroyed after they spot an Imperial installing a homing beacon on the Millennium Falcon; but are saved by Han Solo and Chewbacca. The resurrected Palpatine and his fleet discover the Alliance's existence, leading C-3PO and the others to flee to Iziz, a city on the planet of Onderon. Palpatine eventually finds them, but is wounded by Solo and destroyed when Empatojayos Brand sacrifices himself to save the latter's son Anakin. Empire's End In Planet of Twilight, Threepio and Artoo accompany Leia on a diplomatic mission to Nam Chorios but are unable to prevent her kidnapping and fail to stop the Death Seed plague unleashed on the crew by Seti Ashgad and Dzym. Eventually rescued by Han and Lando, the two droids convey their message for help. Planet of Twilight In The Crystal Star, C-3PO accompanies Luke Skywalker and Han Solo to Crseih Station to investigate the possible existence of Jedi trainees; but instead find Waru, a creature from another dimension, from whom they learn of Waru's alliance with Lord Hethrir and of the kidnapping of the Solo children. Hethrir is destroyed following a confrontation with Leia, Han, and Luke while Waru returns to his dimension. The Crystal Star In The Black Fleet Crisis, Threepio accompanies Lando Calrissian, R2-D2, and Lando's associate Lobot to investigate the runaway alien ship Teljkon Vagabond; eventually to discover that the ship contains the last vestiges of the Quella civilization. The Black Fleet Crisis In The New Rebellion, Threepio, along with Artoo and a young mechanic named Cole Fardreamer, is instrumental in stopping Kueller from regaining power by disabling the explosive devices he had placed in a large number of droids. The New Rebellion In Ambush at Corellia, during the outbreak of the First Corellian Insurrection, Threepio and Chewbacca retrieve Jaina, Jacen, and Anakin from the burning Corona House. Ambush at Corellia  In Showdown at Centerpoint, Threepio accompanies Luke, Gaeriel Captison, Belindi Kalenda, and Lando Calrissian to Centerpoint Station, and alerts them to the fact that the temperature inside Hollowtown is increasing to dangerously high levels. Showdown at Centerpoint  In Vision of the Future, C-3PO participates in Talon Karrde's expedition to the Kathol Sector to find Jorj Car'das, serving as a translator. Vision of the Future In the comic book Storyteller, C-3PO is found partially destroyed and abandoned on a planet enslaved by the Vindar by Otalp and Remoh, two boys indigenous to the planet, whom he tells stories of Luke Skywalker's adventures. As he is finishing his tale, a Vindar slavedriver appears, blasts Threepio's head off, and kills Otalp. After the Vindar leave the cave, Remoh finds a lightsaber in the remains of C-3PO's body and plots to use it against the Vindar. C-3PO is later rediscovered by Luke Skywalker and R2-D2.
Behind the scenesC-3PO was played by Anthony Daniels in all six Star Wars films. In Episode I, a skeletal C-3PO model was puppeteered, with Anthony Daniels providing the voice, and the puppeteer was removed in post-production. For Episode II, Daniels requested to take over the puppeteering duties; but the scenes thereof were later deleted. In Episodes III to VI, Daniels both wore the costume and provided the voice in most scenes.Daniels also played C-3PO in the live-action segments of The Star Wars Holiday Special, while only voicing the character in the animated portion. He also vocally played 3PO in the three Star Wars animated series Star Wars: Clone Wars, Star Wars: Droids, and Star Wars: The Clone Wars as well as in the radio drama adaptations of the original trilogy.Daniels reprised his role of C-3PO for the Disneyland ride Star Tours, co-created by George Lucas in 1987. He was videotaped while recording the dialogue, with the tape serving as a reference for the Imagineers to program an audio-animatronic C-3PO in the queue area. Both it and the audio-animatronic R2-D2 are the original props used in filming. Daniels also donned the costume for certain video segments played before and after the simulator ride itself, also portraying an electronically disguised Ewok announcer. Daniels also appeared in the C-3PO costume for various promotional materials for Star Tours, including the electronic press kit, a Disney special on Star Tours hosted by Gil Gerard, and various opening day skits. When Star Tours opened a bilingual version at Disneyland Paris, Daniels re-recorded C-3PO's dialogue in French. C-3PO appears as the pilot for the Starspeeder 1000, in the attraction's successor, Star Tours: The Adventures Continue and a central character in the animated special Star Wars: The Padawan Menace. In these appearances, he is also played by Anthony Daniels.Daniels made several appearances as C-3PO on numerous TV shows and commercials, notably on a Star Wars-themed episode of The Donny and Marie Show in 1977, Disneyland's 35th Anniversary and a Star Wars-themed episode of The Muppet Show in 1980.
He also has a role as the character on Sesame Street episodes 1364 and 1396 (along with R2-D2).Daniels initially did not agree to be cast as C-3PO; but changed his mind after reading C-3PO's part in the script and seeing a concept painting by Ralph McQuarrie. , who based his early design largely on the Maschinenmensch.
References

Notes
 

Citations
 
 

Bibliography
 


External links 

 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 DEFAULTSORT






 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Yoda
 
 
 
 
Yoda is a character in the Star Wars universe, appearing in the second and third original films, as well as all three prequel trilogy films. A renowned Jedi master, Yoda made his first on-screen appearance in Star Wars Episode V: The Empire Strikes Back where he is responsible for training Luke Skywalker in the ways of the Jedi. His final chronological appearance is Star Wars Episode VI: Return of the Jedi, when he dies peacefully at the age of 900. He also appears extensively in the two animated Clone Wars series, as well as the Star Wars Expanded Universe of novels and comic books.In the original films, he trains Luke Skywalker to fight against the evil Galactic Empire. In the prequel films, he serves as Grand Master of the Jedi Council and as a general in the Clone Wars. In 2008, Yoda was selected by Empire magazine as the 25th greatest movie character of all time.  On their list of the 100 Greatest Fictional Characters, Fandomania.com ranked Yoda at number 60. A lifesize statue of Yoda greets visitors to Lucasfilm's Letterman Digital Arts Center in San Francisco's Presidio, the headquarters of Industrial Light and Magic.
Voice and animationFrank Oz provided Yoda's voice in each film and spent his skills as a puppeteer in the original trilogy and Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace. For the latter, in some walking scenes, Warwick Davis incarnated Yoda as well. For the radio dramatizations of The Empire Strikes Back and Return of the Jedi, Yoda was voiced by John Lithgow, while Tom Kane voiced him in the Clone Wars animated series, several video games, and the new series Star Wars: The Clone Wars. In The Phantom Menace, he was redesigned to look younger. He was computer-generated for two distant shots, but remained mostly a puppet.    The puppet was re-designed by Nick Dudman from Stuart Freeborn's original design.Rendered with computer animation in Star Wars Episode II: Attack of the Clones and Star Wars Episode III: Revenge of the Sith, Yoda appeared in ways not previously possible, including his participation in elaborate fight scenes. In Revenge of the Sith, his face appears in several big close-ups, demanding highly-detailed CGI work. His performance was deliberately designed to be consistent with the limitations of the puppet version, with some "mistakes" made such as the occasional ear-jiggling.  Rob Coleman was responsible for the character's new incarnation to the series.Yoda was recreated in CGI for the 2011 Blu-ray release of The Phantom Menace.  A clip of the new CG Yoda from The Phantom Menace was first seen in the featurette The Chosen One, included in the 2005 DVD release of Revenge of the Sith.  The 2012 theatrical 3D release of The Phantom Menace also features the CG version of Yoda.
Depiction

Character overviewYoda is portrayed as a powerful Jedi Master in the Star Wars universe. Series creator George Lucas originally wished Yoda to follow his other characters in having a full name—Minch Yoda—but instead opted to have many details of the character's life history remain unknown. Yoda's race and home world have not been named in any media, canonical or otherwise, and he is merely said to be of a "species unknown" by the Star Wars Databank. Yoda's speech syntax has been analyzed and discussed by academic syntacticians, who found it somewhat inconsistent, but could extrapolate that "Yodic" has object–subject–verb word order. The films and Expanded Universe reveal that he had trained several Jedi, including Count Dooku, who is identified in Attack of the Clones as Yoda's old Padawan Learner; Mace Windu; Obi-Wan Kenobi (partially, before Qui-Gon Jinn takes over as Obi-Wan's master); Ki-Adi-Mundi, Kit Fisto and eventually Luke Skywalker. During the animated series Star Wars: Clone Wars, set between Attack of the Clones and Revenge of the Sith, he mentions that he trained another one of the leaders on the Jedi Council, Master Oppo Rancisis. In the Star Wars prequels, it is shown that he instructs several younglings in the Jedi Temple before they are assigned to a master. This was displayed in a scene in Attack of the Clones.
The Empire Strikes BackYoda makes his first film appearance in The Empire Strikes Back (1980). Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) arrives on Dagobah to seek his guidance, having been instructed to do so by the Force ghost of Obi-Wan Kenobi (Alec Guinness).Yoda doesn't initially identify himself to Luke and instead tests his patience by presenting himself as a comical and senile backwater individual, deliberately provoking both Luke and R2-D2 (portrayed by Kenny Baker). Luke is shocked when he finally realizes that this small, elderly creature is the powerful Jedi Master he was seeking. Finding that Luke has the same anger and recklessness which caused his father's downfall, Yoda is reluctant to teach him in the ways of the Force, and only agrees at Obi-Wan's behest. Before finishing his training, however, Luke chooses to leave Dagobah in order to confront Darth Vader and save his friends from the Empire's grasp at Bespin. Ignoring Yoda and Obi-Wan's warnings that he is not ready to face Vader and is being lured into a trap, Luke leaves but promises to return. Thinking his fears about Luke have been confirmed, Yoda chides Kenobi: 'told you I did, reckless is he. Now, matters are worse.' Obi-Wan laments that Luke is their "last hope," but Yoda reminds him that "there is another." 
Return of the Jedi 
Yoda's final chronological appearance is in Star Wars Episode VI: Return of the Jedi, set a year after The Empire Strikes Back. Yoda, now sick and frail, informs Luke that he has completed his training but will not be a Jedi until he confronts Darth Vader; he also confirms that Vader is Luke's father, which the Sith Lord had told a shocked Luke in the previous film. Yoda then peacefully dies at the age of 900, his body disappearing as he becomes "one with the Force". He leaves Luke with the knowledge that "there is another Sky...walk.......". Moments later, Obi-Wan's  ghost helps Luke come to the realization that the "other" whom Yoda spoke of is Princess Leia (Carrie Fisher), who is his twin sister.In the film's final scene, after the Empire has been defeated, Luke sees Yoda's spirit looking upon him with pride, alongside Obi-Wan and the redeemed Anakin Skywalker (Vader's former Jedi self). 
The Phantom MenaceIn the films' timeline, Yoda first appears in Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace, which is set 35 years before Empire Strikes Back. Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) brings the young Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) to the Jedi Council. Qui-Gon is convinced that the boy is the fabled "Chosen One" who will bring balance to the Force, and requests the boy be trained as a Jedi Knight. Yoda senses great fear in the boy, especially his attachment to the memory of his mother, and foresees 'grave danger' in Anakin's training. The council, led by Yoda, initially rejects the request.Qui-Gon was soon mortally wounded in a duel with Sith Lord Darth Maul  (played by Ray Park and voiced by Peter Serafinowicz), and his dying request to Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) is that Anakin be trained as a Jedi. Obi-Wan, determined to fulfill his promise to his master, tells Yoda that he will train the boy, even without the council's permission. After failing in one last attempt to dissuade Obi-Wan, Yoda reluctantly gives his blessing to Skywalker's training and informs Obi-Wan that the Jedi Council also agrees with him. 
Attack of the Clones 
In Star Wars Episode II: Attack of the Clones, set 10 years after The Phantom Menace, Yoda is one of the many Jedi who are concerned about the emergence of the Separatists, a group of systems rebelling against the Galactic Republic. After the second attempted assassination of Senator Padmé Amidala (Natalie Portman), Chancellor Palpatine (Ian McDiarmid) "suggests" that she be put under the protection of Obi-Wan, who is training Anakin Skywalker (now played by Hayden Christensen).Yoda later leads an army of Jedi and clone troopers in the film's climactic battle scene. He helps rescue Obi-Wan, Anakin and Padmé from execution at the hands of the Separatists. At the climax of the battle, Yoda duels with Separatist leader and Sith Lord Count Dooku (Christopher Lee), his former Jedi apprentice. Although seemingly frail, the ancient Yoda demonstrates agility and mastery of lightsaber combat and acrobatics through the Force. This confrontation ends with Dooku making his escape by threatening Yoda's comrades, Anakin and Obi-Wan. 
Revenge of the SithIn Star Wars Episode III: Revenge of the Sith, set three years after Attack of the Clones, Yoda leads the Jedi Council in pursuing the mysterious Sith Lord Darth Sidious. Palpatine has by now amassed near-dictatorial emergency powers, and begins interfering in Jedi affairs by appointing Anakin as his personal representative on the Council. The Council grants Anakin a Council seat, but denies him the rank of Master, feeling that doing so would amount to giving Palpatine a vote in the Council. Embittered by the perceived snub, Anakin begins to lose faith in the Jedi.Anakin seeks Yoda's counsel about his prophetic visions that someone close to him will die. Yoda, unaware of the intensity of Anakin's love for Padmé, his pregnant wife, tells him to "Train yourself to let go of everything you fear to lose." Unsatisfied, Anakin turns to Palpatine, who reveals himself as Darth Sidious, and manipulates the young Jedi into becoming his Sith apprentice—Darth Vader—with the promise that the dark side holds the power to save Padmé from dying in childbirth.Palpatine later transforms the Republic into the tyrannical Galactic Empire, proclaiming himself Emperor for life, and orders the clone troopers to kill their Jedi generals. At this time, Yoda is on Kashyyyk, overseeing the battle between the Separatist forces and a combined command of clone troopers and Wookiees. Through the Force, he feels the deaths of each of the Jedi as they are assassinated by their own troops. After swiftly killing the clone troopers instructed to kill him, he escapes with the help of Wookiee leaders Tarfful and Chewbacca (Peter Mayhew), and returns to Coruscant, where he and Obi-Wan fight their way into the Jedi Temple to stop a trap for any surviving Jedi. Inside, they discover that all the Jedi inside, younglings included, have been slaughtered. They then discover a holographic recording revealing Anakin as the assassin. Yoda decides to face Palpatine, sending Obi-Wan to kill his former Padawan. Obi-Wan tells Yoda he cannot kill Anakin, asking instead to go after Palpatine. However, Yoda insists, saying, "To fight this Lord Sidious, strong enough you are not." He also tells Obi-Wan that the Anakin he knew no longer exists, having been "consumed by Darth Vader".Subsequently, Yoda battles Palpatine in a lightsaber duel that wrecks the Senate Rotunda. At the climax of the duel, Yoda holds back the Sith Lord's Force lightning, creating a blast of energy that knocks him to the Senate floor. Yoda is forced to retreat and go into exile on Dagobah so that he may hide from the Empire and wait for another opportunity to destroy the Sith. At the end, it is revealed that Yoda has been in contact with Qui-Gon's spirit, learning the secret of immortality from him and passing it on to Obi-Wan.Yoda is also instrumental in deciding the fate of the Skywalker children after Padmé dies in childbirth, recommending that Luke and Leia be hidden from Vader and Palpatine in remote locations. Other than the ancient Jedi Master, only the Organas, the Lars family, R2-D2 and Obi-Wan know of their true identities. 
Clone Wars (animated)During the opening of the animated series Star Wars: Clone Wars, Yoda is made a General, like many of the Jedi Knights and Masters. Yoda escorts Padmé on their journey to an unspecified planet, but Yoda senses several Jedi in distress on Ilum. Using the Jedi mind trick to convince Captain Typho to take them to Ilum, Yoda saves two Jedi Knights and finds a message from Count Dooku giving orders to destroy the Jedi Temple on Ilum.
In the animated series' final episode, Yoda fights side by side with Mace Windu to defend Coruscant, which is under attack from the Separatists. The two Jedi Masters realize too late that the battle is a distraction; Separatist leader General Grievous truly intends to kidnap Palpatine. The Jedi Master's effort to stop Grievous fails, and Palpatine is taken hostage, thus setting the stage for Revenge of the Sith.
Expanded UniverseYoda acts as a supporting character in Dark Horse Comics' Clone Wars tie-in comic books. He is also an important character in several novels set in the Star Wars universe, particularly Yoda: Dark Rendezvous. Yoda also appears in Disney's Star Tours: The Adventures Continue attraction, where he is voiced by his original voice actor, Frank Oz. 
Merchandising Lego's Yoda minifigure was the first of their figures to have a shorter height, created by giving the toy shorter legs. TomTom has included a "Yoda" voice as one of the Celebrity GPS voicings in their "Star Wars" voice series.  A comical clip of the "behind the scenes" recording of this is available on YouTube.
Notes 
References

The Jedi Apprentice series by Dave Wolverton and Jude Watson
Episode I: The Phantom Menace, 1st edition paperback, 1999. Terry Brooks, George Lucas, ISBN 0-345-43411-0
Episode III: Revenge of the Sith - Novelization, 1st edition hardcover, 2005. Matthew Woodring Stover, George Lucas, ISBN 0-7126-8427-1
The Annotated Screenplays, softcover, 1997. George Lucas, Leigh Brackett, Lawrence Kasdan, Laurent Bouzereau, ISBN 0-345-40981-7
The Courtship of Princess Leia, 1995. Dave Wolverton, ISBN 0-553-56937-6
Mission from Mount Yoda, 1993. Paul Davids, Hollace Davids, ISBN 0-553-15890-2
A Guide to the Star Wars Universe, 2nd edition, 1994. Bill Slavicsek, ISBN 0-345-38625-6
The Essential guide to Characters (Star Wars), 1st edition, 1995. Andy Mangels, ISBN 0-345-39535-2
The New Essential Guide to Characters, 1st edition, 2002. Daniel Wallace, Michael Sutfin, ISBN 0-345-44900-2
Star Wars: The Visual Dictionary, hardcover, 1998. David West Reynolds, ISBN 0-7894-3481-4
Star Wars: Revenge of the Sith: The Visual Dictionary, hardcover, 2005. James Luceno, ISBN 0-7566-1128-8
Star Wars Roleplaying Game: Revised Core Rulebook, hardcover, 2002. Bill Slavicsek, Andy Collins, J.D. Wiker, ISBN 0-7869-2876-X
Star Wars Roleplaying Game: Power of the Jedi Sourcebook, hardcover, 2002. Michael Mikaelian, Jeff Grubb, Owen K.C. Stephens, James Maliszewski, ISBN 0-7869-2781-X


External links 

 
 
 
Yoda on Soulcalibur Wiki
by Benjamin Urrutia: "Interview with Master Yoda."
 
 
 
 
 
 
 









 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Joyce Kilmer
 
 Joyce Kilmer (born as Alfred Joyce Kilmer; 6 December 1886 – 30 July 1918) was an American writer and poet mainly remembered for a short poem titled "Trees" (1913), which was published in the collection Trees and Other Poems in 1914. Though a prolific poet whose works celebrated the common beauty of the natural world as well as his Roman Catholic religious faith, Kilmer was also a journalist, literary critic, lecturer, and editor.  While most of his works are largely unknown, a select few of his poems remain popular and are published frequently in anthologies.  Several critics—including both Kilmer's contemporaries and modern scholars—have disparaged Kilmer's work as being too simple, overly sentimental, and suggested that his style was far too traditional, even archaic. Hart, James A.Joyce Kilmer 1886–1918 (Biography) at Poetry Magazine. (Retrieved 15 August 2012).   Many writers, including notably Ogden Nash, have parodied Kilmer's work and style—as attested by the many parodies of "Trees".At the time of his deployment to Europe during World War I (1914–1918), Kilmer was considered the leading American Roman Catholic poet and lecturer of his generation, whom critics often compared to British contemporaries G. K. Chesterton (1874–1936) and Hilaire Belloc (1870–1953). Hillis, John. Joyce Kilmer: A Bio-Bibliography.  Master of Science (Library Science) Thesis.  Catholic University of America.  (Washington, DC: 1962)     He enlisted in the New York National Guard and was deployed to France with the 69th Infantry Regiment (the famous "Fighting 69th") in 1917.  He was killed by a sniper's bullet at the Second Battle of the Marne in 1918 at the age of 31. He was married to Aline Murray, who later became a poet and author in her own right, with whom he had five children.
Biography
Early years and education: 1886–1908Kilmer was born 6 December 1886 in New Brunswick, New Jersey,  the fourth and youngest child, Per Miriam A. Kilmer's website (located here. Retrieved 14 August 2012), Joyce was the fourth and youngest, however two of his siblings, sister Ellen Annie Kilmer (1875–1876) and brother Charles Willoughby Kilmer (1880–1880), died before his birth.  Kilmer's older, surviving brother, Anda Frederick Kilmer (1873–1899), died when Joyce was thirteen years old, most likely a suicide in a Philadelphia hotel.  of Annie Ellen Kilburn (1849–1932), a minor writer and composer,   and Dr. Frederick Barnett Kilmer (1851–1934), a physician and analytical chemist employed by the Johnson and Johnson Company and inventor of the company's baby powder. Joyce Kilmer: FAQ and Fancies, website published by Miriam A. Kilmer, with Kilmer genealogical information. Retrieved 26 December 2006.    He was named Alfred Joyce Kilmer after two priests at Christ Church in New Brunswick: Alfred R. Taylor, the curate; and the Rev. Dr. Elisha Brooks Joyce (1857–1926), the rector. Christ Church is the oldest Episcopal parish in New Brunswick and the Kilmer family were parishioners.  Rector Joyce, who served the parish from 1883 to 1916, baptised the young Kilmer.  Kilmer's birthplace in New Brunswick, where the Kilmer family lived from 1886 to 1892, is still standing, and houses a small museum to Kilmer, as well as a few Middlesex County government offices. Kilmer entered Rutgers College Grammar School (now Rutgers Preparatory School) in 1895 at the age of 8. During his years at the Grammar School, Kilmer was editor-in-chief of the school's paper, the Argo and loved the classics but had difficulty with Greek.  He won the first Lane Classical Prize, for oratory, and obtained a scholarship to Rutgers College which he would attend the following year. Despite his difficulties with Greek and mathematics, he stood at the head of his class in preparatory school.  After graduating from Rutgers College Grammar School in 1904, he continued his education at Rutgers College (now Rutgers University) from 1904 to 1906. At Rutgers, Kilmer was associate editor of the Targum, the campus newspaper, and a member of the Delta Upsilon fraternity. However, he was unable to complete the curriculum's rigorous mathematics requirement and was asked to repeat his sophomore year.  Under pressure from his mother, Kilmer transferred to Columbia University in New York City.  At Columbia, Kilmer was vice-president of the Philolexian Society (a literary society), associate editor of Columbia Spectator (the campus newspaper), and member of the Debating Union. He completed his Bachelor of Arts (A.B.) degree and was graduated from Columbia on 23 May 1908.   Shortly after graduation, on 9 June  1908, he married Aline Murray (1888–1941), a fellow poet to whom he had been engaged since his sophomore year at Rutgers.    The Kilmers had five children: Kenton Sinclair Kilmer (1909–1995), Michael Barry Kilmer (1916–1927), Deborah ("Sister Michael") Clanton Kilmer (1914–1999) who was a Catholic nun at the Saint Benedict’s Monastery, Rose Kilburn Kilmer (1912–1917), and Christopher Kilmer (1917–1984). 
Years of writing and faith: 1909–1917In the autumn of 1908, Kilmer was employed teaching Latin at Morristown High School  in Morristown, New Jersey.  At this time, he began to submit essays to Red Cross Notes (including his first published piece—an essay on the "Psychology of Advertising") and his early poems to literary periodicals. Kilmer also wrote book reviews for The Literary Digest, Town & Country, The Nation, and The New York Times. By June 1909, Kilmer had abandoned any aspirations to continue teaching and relocated to New York City where he focused solely on developing a career as a writer.  From 1909–1912, Kilmer was employed by Funk and Wagnalls, which was preparing an edition of The Standard Dictionary that would be published in 1912.  According to Hillis, Kilmer's job "was to define ordinary words assigned to him at five cents for each word defined. This was a job at which one would ordinarily earn ten to twelve dollars a week, but Kilmer attacked the task with such vigor and speed that it was soon thought wisest to put him on a regular salary."  In 1911, Kilmer's first book of verse, entitled Summer of Love was published. Kilmer would later write that "...some of the poems in it, those inspired by genuine love, are not things of which to be ashamed, and you, understanding, would not be offended by the others."  In 1912, Kilmer became a special writer for the New York Times Review of Books and the New York Times Sunday Magazine and was often engaged in lecturing.  He moved to Mahwah, New Jersey, where he resided until his service and death in World War I. By this time, he had become established as a published poet, and as a popular lecturer. According to Robert Holliday, Kilmer "frequently neglected to make any preparation for his speeches, not even choosing a subject until the beginning of the dinner which was to culminate in a specimen of his oratory. His constant research for the dictionary, and, later on, for his New York Times articles, must have given him a store of knowledge at his fingertips to be produced at a moment's notice for these emergencies." Holliday, Robert Cortes (ed.). "Memoir" in Joyce Kilmer: Poems, Essays and Letters. 2 volumes. (New York: George H. Doran Company, 1918), 1:24.   When the Kilmers' daughter Rose (1912–1917) was stricken with poliomyelitis (also known as infantile paralysis) shortly after birth,  they turned to their religious faith for comfort. A series of correspondence between Kilmer and Father James J. Daly led the Kilmers to convert to Roman Catholicism and they were received in the church in 1913. In one of these letters, Kilmer writes that he "believed in the Catholic position, the Catholic view of ethics and aesthetics, for a long time" and he "wanted something not intellectual, some conviction not mental – in fact I wanted Faith." Kilmer would stop "every morning for months" on his way "to the office and prayed for faith" claiming that when "faith did come, it came, I think, by way of my little paralyzed daughter. Her lifeless hands led me; I think her tiny feet know beautiful paths. You understand this and it gives me a selfish pleasure to write it down."  With the publication of "Trees" in the magazine Poetry in August 1913, Kilmer gained immense popularity as a poet across the United States.  He had established himself as a successful lecturer—particularly one seeking to reach a Catholic audience.  His close friend and editor, Robert Holliday, wrote that it "is not an unsupported assertion to say that he was in his time and place the laureate of the Catholic Church."  Trees and Other Poems (1914) was published the following year. Over the next few years, Kilmer was prolific in his output—managing an intense schedule of lectures, publishing a large number of essays and literary criticism, and writing poetry.  In 1915, he became poetry editor of Current Literature and contributing editor of Warner's Library of the World's Best Literature. In 1916 and 1917, before the American entry into World War I, Kilmer would publish four books: The Circus and Other Essays (1916), a series of interviews with literary personages entitled Literature in the Making (1917), Main Street and Other Poems (1917), and Dreams and Images: An Anthology of Catholic Poets (1917). 
War years: 1917–1918In April 1917, a few days after the United States entered World War I, Kilmer enlisted in the Seventh Regiment of the New York National Guard. In August, Kilmer was assigned as a statistician with the U.S. 69th Infantry Regiment (better known as the "Fighting 69th" and later re-designated the 165th Infantry Regiment), of the 42nd "Rainbow" Division, and quickly rose to the rank of sergeant. Though he was eligible for commission as an officer and often recommended for such posts during the course of the war, Kilmer refused stating that he would rather be a sergeant in the Fighting 69th than an officer in any other regiment.  Shortly before his deployment to Europe, the Kilmer's daughter Rose had died, and twelve days later, their son Christopher was born.    Before his departure, Kilmer had contracted with publishers to write a book about the war, deciding upon the title Here and There with the Fighting Sixty-Ninth. The regiment arrived in France in November 1917, and Kilmer wrote to his wife that he had not written "anything in prose or verse since I got here—except statistics—but I've stored up a lot of memories to turn into copy when I get a chance."  Kilmer did not write such a book; however, toward the end of the year, he did find time to write prose sketches and poetry.  The most notable of his poems during this period was "Rouge Bouquet" (1918) which commemorated the deaths of two dozen members of his regiment on patrol in the Rouge Bouquet forest north-east of the French village of Baccarat.  At the time, this was a relatively quiet sector of the front, but the first battalion was struck by a German heavy artillery bombardment on the afternoon of 12 March 1918 that buried 21 men of the unit—of which 14 remained entombed.   Duffy, Francis Patrick. Father Duffy’s Story. (New York: George H. Doran Company, 1919)  Kilmer sought more hazardous duty and was transferred to the military intelligence section of his regiment, in April 1918. In a letter to his wife, Aline, he remarked: "Now I'm doing work I love – and work you may be proud of. None of the drudgery of soldiering, but a double share of glory and thrills."   According to Hillis, Kilmer's fellow soldiers had accorded him much respect for his battlefield demeanour—"He was worshipped by the men about him. I have heard them speak with awe of his coolness and his nerve in scouting patrols in no man's land. This coolness and his habit of choosing, with typical enthusiasm, the most dangerous and difficult missions, led to his death."  
Death and burialDuring the Second Battle of Marne, there was heavy fighting throughout the last days of July 1918.  On 30 July 1918, Kilmer volunteered to accompany Major William "Wild Bill" Donovan (later, in World War II, the founder of the Office of Strategic Services—forerunner to the Central Intelligence Agency) when Donovan's Battalion (1–165th Infantry) was sent to lead the day's attack.During the course of the day, Kilmer led a scouting party to find the position of a German machine gun. When his comrades found him, some time later, they thought at first that he was peering over the edge of a little hill, where he had crawled for a better view. When he did not answer their call, they ran to him and found him dead. According to Father Duffy: “A bullet had pierced his brain. His body was carried in and buried by the side of Ames. God rest his dear and gallant soul.”   A sniper's bullet likely killed him immediately.  According to military records, Kilmer died on the battlefield near Muercy Farm, beside the Ourcq River near the village of Seringes-et-Nesles, in France, on 30 July 1918 at the age of 31.  For his valor, Kilmer was posthumously awarded the Croix de Guerre (War Cross) by the French Republic. Kilmer was buried in the Oise-Aisne American Cemetery and Memorial, near Fere-en-Tardenois, Aisne, Picardy, France.  A cenotaph erected to his memory is located on the Kilmer family plot in Elmwood Cemetery, in New Brunswick, New Jersey.  A memorial mass was held at St. Patrick's Cathedral in Manhattan on 14 October 1918. 
Criticism and influence

Trees 
Joyce Kilmer's reputation as a poet is staked largely on the widespread popularity of one poem—"Trees" (1913).  It was first published in the August 1913 issue of Poetry: A Magazine of Verse which had begun publishing the year before in Chicago, Illinois  and was included as the title poem in a collection of poems Trees and Other Poems (1914).   According to Kilmer's oldest son, Kenton, the poem was written on 2 February 1913 when the family resided in Mahwah, New Jersey. Many locations including Rutgers University (where Kilmer attended for two years),   University of Notre Dame,]  as well as historians in Mahwah, New Jersey and in other places,  have boasted that a specific tree was the inspiration for Kilmer's poem.  However, Kenton Kilmer refutes these claims, remarking that, "Mother and I agreed, when we talked about it, that Dad never meant his poem to apply to one particular tree, or to the trees of any special region. Just any trees or all trees that might be rained on or snowed on, and that would be suitable nesting places for robins. I guess they'd have to have upward-reaching branches, too, for the line about 'lifting leafy arms to pray.' Rule out weeping willows." The popular appeal of this simple poem is likely the source of its endurance despite the continuing negative opinion of the poem's merits from scholars and critics.  According to Robert Holliday, Kilmer's friend and editor, "Trees" speaks "with authentic song to the simplest of hearts" and that "(t)he exquisite title poem now so universally known, made his reputation more than all the rest he had written put together. That impeccable lyric which made for immediate widespread popularity."   Its popularity has also led to parodies of the poem—some by noted poets and writers.  The pattern of its first its first lines (I think that I shall never see / A poem lovely as a tree.) is of seemingly simple rhyme and meter and easy to mimic along with the poem's choice of metaphors.  One of the best known parodies is "Song of the Open Road" by American humorist and poet Ogden Nash (1902–1971):

I think that I shall never see 
A billboard lovely as a tree.
Indeed, unless the billboards fall, 
I'll never see a tree at all. 


Influences upon Kilmer's verseKilmer's early works were inspired by, and were imitative of, the poetry of Algernon Charles Swinburne, Gerard Manley Hopkins, Ernest Dowson, Aubrey Beardsley, and William Butler Yeats (and the Celtic Revival). It was later through the influence of works by Coventry Patmore, Francis Thompson, and those of Alice Meynell and her children Viola Meynell and Francis Meynell, that Kilmer seems to have become interested in Catholicism.   Kilmer wrote of his influences: Because he was initially raised Episcopalian (or Anglican), Kilmer became literary editor of the Anglican weekly, The Churchman, before his conversion to Catholicism. During this time he did considerable research into 16th and 17th century Anglican poets as well as metaphysical, or mystic poets of that time, including George Herbert, Thomas Traherne, Robert Herrick, Bishop Coxe, and Robert Stephen Hawker (the eccentric vicar of the Church of Saint Morwenna and Saint John the Baptist at Morwenstow in Cornwall)—the latter whom he referred to as "a coast life-guard in a cassock." These poets also had an influence on Kilmer's writings.  Critics compared Kilmer to British Catholic writers Hilaire Belloc and G. K. Chesterton—suggesting that his reputation might have risen to the level where he would have been considered their American counterpart if not for his untimely death.  
Criticism of Kilmer's workIndeed, Kilmer's death at age 31 removed from him the opportunity to develop into a more mature poet. Because "Trees" is often dismissed by modern critics and scholars as simple verse, much of Kilmer's work (especially his literary criticism) has slipped into obscurity. Only a very few of his poems have appeared in anthologies, and with the exception of "Trees"—and to a much lesser extent "Rouge Bouquet" (1917–1918)—almost none have obtained lasting widespread popularity.    The entire corpus of Kilmer's work was produced between 1909 and 1918 when Romanticism and sentimental lyric poetry fell out of favor and Modernism took root—especially with the influence of the Lost Generation. In the years after Kilmer's death, poetry went in drastically different directions, as is seen especially in the work of T. S. Eliot and Ezra Pound. Kilmer's verse is conservative and traditional in style and does not break any of the formal rules of poetics—he can be considered as one the last poets of the Romantic era.  This style is often criticized because it fails to break free of traditional modes, rhyme and meter, or themes, and for being too sentimental to be taken seriously. 
Works

1911: Summer of Love (poetry)
1914: Trees and Other Poems (poetry)
1916: The Circus and Other Essays (essays)
1917: Main Street and Other Poems. (poetry)
1917: The Courage of Enlightenment: An address delivered in Campion College, Prairie du Chien, Wisconsin, to the members of the graduating class, 15 June 1917.
1917: Dreams and Images: An Anthology of Catholic Poets. (poetry anthology, edited by Kilmer)
1917: Literature in the Making by some of its Makers (criticism)
1918: Poems, Essays and Letters in Two Volumes Volume One: Memoir and Poems, Volume Two: prose works (collected works) (published posthumously, edited by Robert Cortes Holliday).
1919: Kilmer's unfinished history of the Fighting 69th (165th Infantry) is posthumously printed in Father Duffy's Story by Francis P. Duffy (New York: Doran, 1919). 
1921: The Circus and Other Essays and Fugitive Pieces (published posthumously)


See also

List of places named after Joyce Kilmer


References

Notes
 

References
 
Further reading

Cargas, Harry J. I lay down my life: A Biography of Joyce Kilmer (Boston, Massachusetts: Daughters of Saint Paul Editions, 1964). NO ISBN (pre-1964)
Covell, John E. Joyce Kilmer: A Literary Biography. (Brunswick, Georgia: Write-Fit Communications, 2000). ISBN 978-0-615-11175-9
Kilmer, Annie Kilburn. Whimsies, More Whimsies. (New York: Frye Publishing Co., 1929). NO ISBN (Pre-1964).
Kilmer, Annie Kilburn. Memories of My Son, Sergeant Joyce Kilmer. (New York: Brentano's, 1920). NO ISBN (Pre-1964).
Kilmer, Annie Kilburn. Leaves of My Life. (New York: Frye Publishing Co., 1925). NO ISBN (Pre-1964).
Kilmer, Kenton. Memories of my Father, Joyce Kilmer (Joyce Kilmer Centennial, 1993). ISBN 978-0-9637524-0-6
Roberto, Brother C.S.C. Death Beneath the Trees: A Story of Joyce Kilmer (South Bend, Indiana: Dujarie Press-University of Notre Dame, 1967). NO ISBN (Privately published).
Smaridge, Norah. Pen and Bayonet: The Story of Joyce Kilmer. (Stroud, Gloucestershire, England: Hawthorn Books, 1962). NO ISBN (Pre-1964).


External links 
 
 

 
Kilmer archive, Georgetown University Library 
Joyce Kilmer/Campion College Collection  Raynor Memorial Libraries / Marquette University 

  DEFAULTSORT


















 
 
 
 
	Jan Peter Balkenende
 
Jan Pieter "Jan Peter" Balkenende ( ) (born May 7, 1956) is a Dutch politician of the Christian Democratic Appeal (CDA). He served as Prime Minister of the Netherlands from July 22, 2002 until October 14, 2010.He previously served as a Member of the House of Representatives from May 19, 1998 until July 22, 2002. After then CDA Party leader and Parliamentary leader in the House of Representatives Jaap de Hoop Scheffer stepped down after an internal power struggle, between him and then CDA Party Chair Marnix van Rij. Balkenende succeed him in both positions, and became the CDA Lijsttrekker for the Dutch general election of 2002. The CDA became the surprising winner of the election, gaining 14 seats (from 29 to 43) and becoming the largest party in the House of Representatives. This success was in part owed to Balkenende and to his neutral attitude in the debate with LPF leader Pim Fortuyn, for not having participated in the supposed ‘demonization’ by the political Left. Fortuyn was assassinated during the national election campaign on May 6, 2002. Balkenende became Prime Minister of the Netherlands, leading the Cabinet Balkenende I but it collapsed after just 86 days in office because of internal conflicts within the LPF that destabilised the government. After the Dutch general election of 2003, Balkenende who again as CDA Lijsttrekker gained 1 seat and formed the new Cabinet Balkenende II. The cabinet fell on June 30, 2006 after the D66, the smallest coalition party withdrew its support of the cabinet over the way Minister for Integration and Immigration Rita Verdonk had handled the crisis around the naturalization of Member of the House of Representatives Ayaan Hirsi Ali. A rump cabinet Balkenende III was formed and stayed in office until the Dutch general election of 2006. Balkenende again as Lijsttrekker lost three seats but the CDA remained the largest party with 41 seats. After the cabinet formation, the new Cabinet Balkenende IV took office on February 22, 2007. The cabinet fell on February 20, 2010 as the result of disagreement between CDA and Labour Party over the extension of ISAF mission in Afghanistan. For the Dutch general election of 2010, Balkenende for a fourth time as Lijsttrekker resigned his position as Party leader taking political responsibility after the CDA's disappointing results in the election. He remaind as Prime Minister of the Netherlands until the new Cabinet Rutte was installed on October 14, 2010.  After his premiership, Balkenende retired from active politics and became a partner at the professional services firm Ernst & Young and returned as a professor of political science at the Erasmus University Rotterdam.      
Biography

Early lifeJan Pieter Balkenende was born on May 7, 1956 in Biezelinge in the Netherlands Province of Zeeland. His father, Jan Pieter Balkenende, was a cereal grains merchant and his mother, Thona Johanna Sandee, was a teacher. Balkenende went to a Protestant primary school in Kapelle. He attended secondary school at the "Christian Lyceum for Zeeland" in Goes, graduating in 1974.       He studied at the Vrije Universiteit in Amsterdam, where he received an M.A. degree in history in 1980, an LL.M. degree in Dutch Law in 1982, and finally a PhD degree in Law in 1992. 
Balkenende resides with his wife, Bianca Hoogendijk, and his daughter, Amelie, in Capelle aan den IJssel, a suburb of Rotterdam.  During his tenure as Prime Minister, he rented an apartment in The Hague, rather than live in the Catshuis, the formal residency of the Prime Minister. 







Early political careerHe began his career on the staff of the research institute of the CDA and as a city councilman in Amstelveen. In that period he received his PhD with a thesis on "Administrative regulation and social organisations" (Overheidsregelgeving en maatschappelijke organisaties), a work strongly inspired by the Communitarian ideas of Amitai Etzioni.  He later became an extraordinary professor of Christian-Social Thought at the Free University of Amsterdam.Balkenende first entered the House of Representatives on 19 May 1998 while the CDA was in opposition. He became the CDA's financial spokesman and was also involved with social affairs, justice, and domestic affairs. In this role he advocated a substantial reduction of the national debt and sound public finances.He was elected Chairman of the CDA parliamentary fraction on 1 October 2001, succeeding Jaap de Hoop Scheffer. On 3 November 2001, he was appointed lijsttrekker for the CDA in the tumultuous May 2002 parliamentary elections. These elections restored the CDA's former position as the largest political party in the Dutch parliament.
Prime MinisterBalkenende has been prime minister of four successive cabinets.
Balkenende I 
On 4 July 2002 Queen Beatrix asked Balkenende to form a new government after the general elections following the resignation of Prime Minister Wim Kok. This cabinet is known as Balkenende I. The coalition cabinet included the Pim Fortuyn List (LPF) party, whose leader (Pim Fortuyn) was assassinated just days before the election. It collapsed after just 86 days in office because of internal conflicts within the LPF that destabilised the government.
Balkenende II After early elections in 2003 Balkenende formed his second government  with: Christian Democratic Appeal (CDA), the liberal People's Party for Freedom and Democracy (VVD) and the progressive liberal D66. Once again leader of a centre-right coalition, Balkenende's policies centred around reform of the Dutch public services, reducing crime, a tough immigration policy and historically large cuts in public spending. The measures gave rise to large public anger and bad results in opinion polls for his CDA party. While his party remained the largest Dutch delegation in the European Parliament after the European Elections, beating the general expectation of a huge loss in parliamentary seats, the party suffered strong losses during Dutch municipal elections of 2006, losing their position as the largest party in many municipalities. Despite his unpopularity among Dutch voters (polls in 2006 showed that only 26–33% of the voters had confidence in him as prime minister), his position as leader of the CDA remained stable. In the beginning of 2006, some CDA members tried to replace Balkenende as leader with minister Cees Veerman. Veerman did not accept this and offered his support to Balkenende. Balkenende's popularity recovered since then, surpassing that of his main competitor Wouter Bos in the autumn of 2006. By then, 53% preferred Balkenende as Prime Minister while 40% preferred Bos.  This switch in public opinion is sometimes explained by the steady recovery of the Dutch economy during the last year of his administration, combined with declining confidence in Bos as a good alternative for the position of prime-minister.On 1 July 2004 Balkenende took up the rotating presidency of the European Union.
Balkenende III 
On 30 June 2006 D66, the smallest coalition party, withdrew its support of the government over the way immigration minister Rita Verdonk had handled the crisis around the naturalization of Dutch MP Ayaan Hirsi Ali. Balkenende resigned for the second time as Prime Minister, announced early elections and presented his third government a week later. This rump cabinet, formed of a minority coalition of CDA and VVD, stayed in office until the elections of 22 November 2006.
Balkenende IV 
Though his old coalition partners VVD and D66 fared badly in the parliamentary elections of 2006, Balkenende managed to defend the dominant position of his CDA. Needing alternative coalition partners to form a new majority government, he formed a social-Christian coalition with the Dutch Labour Party (PVDA) and the orthodox-Protestant ChristianUnion. This Fourth Balkenende cabinet is the current coalition cabinet of the Netherlands, formed by Balkenende, who was appointed formateur by Queen Beatrix on 9 February 2007.   His cabinet was announced on 13 February and was scheduled to be in office until 2011, but it fell in the early morning of 20 February 2010 as the result of disagreement between the majority of the parliament and the coalition partners CDA and PvdA over the extension of the Dutch ISAF-mission in Afghanistan.  In contrast to the formation of a new caretaker cabinet with full responsibility (Balkenende III after the fall of Balkenende II), Balkenende IV continued as a demissionary cabinet, a caretaker cabinet with limited responsibility.
2010 Election and resignationDespite serious criticism by former prime ministers from the CDA, Balkenende was the Christian Democratic Appeal Lijsttrekker for the Dutch general election of 2010. 
Balkenende raised mild controversy during his campaign for the 2010 Dutch elections. While appearing in a television show, Balkenende was asked by a female presenter what parties he would most likely form a coalition with. Balkenende first gave evasive answers, then when asked again by the presenter, responded saying "U kijkt zo lief" (English: "You look so cute"). The comment was regarded as sexist and criticized by several people, including Opzij chief-editor Margriet van der Linden and GroenLinks leader Femke Halsema (who stated that "[the prime minister] deserves a knee to the groin" (in Dutch: "een knietje verdient")).  Balkenende apologized for the comment later. On 9 June 2010, Balkenende resigned his position as leader of the CDA as well as his seat in the newly-elected parliament, taking political responsibility for the CDA's disappointing election results in the 2010 general election. 
Other issuesIn 2004, during his second cabinet, Balkenende was diagnosed with necrotizing fasciitis. He was treated through surgical debridement and made a full recovery after several weeks in hospital.On 4 June 2005, the Belgian Minister of Foreign Affairs Karel De Gucht said in the Flemish newspaper Het Laatste Nieuws (The Latest News) that "Balkenende is a mix of Harry Potter and a petty rigid bourgeois mentality". This comparison caused a small diplomatic controversy, and the Belgian ambassador had to apologise to Ben Bot, the Dutch Minister of Foreign Affairs.  Retired Deputy Prime Minister Hans Wiegel commented he preferred Harry Potter to the Manneken Pis.Balkenende has a close relationship with the Dutch people from Suriname and the Netherlands Antilles. He has visited several Keti Koti celebrations in recent years.He is a member of the Calvinist Protestant Church in the Netherlands.
Awards

Golden Honorary Medal, of the municipality Amstelveen (Netherlands, 30 May 1998)


Honorary degrees

Honorary doctorate, Hofstra University (New York, USA, 22 May 2011)
Honorary doctorate in Social Sciences, Yonsei University (Seoul, South Korea, 27 April 2010)
Honorary doctorate, Keio University (Tokyo, Japan, 27 oktober 2009)
Honorary doctorate, Károli Gáspár University of the Hungarian Reformed Church (Budapest, Hungary, 10 October 2005)


Decorations

Balkenende was appointed a Member of the Order of Orange-Nassau on 30 March 1998, and elevated to Knight Grand Cross of the same Order on 23 November 2010.


References 
External links

Mr. Dr. J.P. Balkenende  (Ministry of General Affairs) 
  Prof.Mr.dr. J.P. (Jan Peter) Balkenende  (Parlement & Politiek) 

  
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
|-
 
 
|-
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
|-
 
  
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT




















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Norbert Wiener
 Norbert Wiener (November 26, 1894 – March 18, 1964) was an American mathematician. He was Professor of Mathematics at MIT.A famous child prodigy, Wiener later became an early researcher in stochastic and noise processes, contributing work relevant to electronic engineering, electronic communication, and control systems.Wiener is regarded as the originator of cybernetics, a formalization of the notion of feedback, with many implications for engineering, systems control, computer science, biology, philosophy, and the organization of society.
Biography
YouthWiener was born in Columbia, Missouri, the first child of Leo Wiener and Bertha Kahn, Jews of Polish and German descent, respectively. Norbert Wiener became a famous child prodigy. Leo had educated Norbert at home until 1903, employing teaching methods of his own invention,  except for a brief interlude when Norbert was 7 years of age.  Earning his living teaching German and Slavic languages, Leo read widely and accumulated a personal library from which the young Norbert benefited greatly. Leo also had ample ability in mathematics, and tutored his son in the subject until he left home.  In his autobiography, Norbert described his father as calm and patient, unless he (Norbert) failed to give a correct answer, at which his father would lose his temper.Despite being raised in a Jewish family, he later became an agnostic. After graduating from Ayer High School in 1906 at 11 years of age, Wiener entered Tufts College. He was awarded a BA in mathematics in 1909 at the age of 14, whereupon he began graduate studies of zoology at Harvard.  In 1910 he transferred to Cornell to study philosophy.
Harvard and World War IThe next year he returned to Harvard, while still continuing his philosophical studies. Back at Harvard, Wiener became influenced by Edward Vermilye Huntington, whose mathematical interests ranged from axiomatic foundations to engineering problems. Harvard awarded Wiener a Ph.D. in 1912, when he was merely 17 years old, for a dissertation on mathematical logic, supervised by Karl Schmidt, the essential results of which were published as Wiener (1914). In that dissertation, he was the first to state publicly that ordered pairs can be defined in terms of elementary set theory. Hence relations can be defined by set theory, thus the theory of relations does not require any axioms or primitive notions distinct from those of set theory. In 1921, Kazimierz Kuratowski proposed a simplification of Wiener's definition of ordered pairs, and that simplification has been in common use ever since.In 1914, Wiener traveled to Europe, to be taught by Bertrand Russell and G. H. Hardy at Cambridge University, and by David Hilbert and Edmund Landau at the University of Göttingen. During 1915–16, he taught philosophy at Harvard, then worked as an engineer for General Electric and wrote for the Encyclopedia Americana. Wiener worked briefly as a journalist for the Boston Herald, where he wrote a feature story on the poor labor conditions for mill workers in Lawrence, Massachusetts, but he was fired soon afterwards for his reluctance to write favorable articles about a politician the newspaper's owners sought to promote. Although Wiener eventually became a staunch pacifist, he eagerly contributed to the war effort in World War I. In 1916, with America's entry into the war drawing closer, Wiener attended a training camp for potential military officers, but failed to earn a commission. One year later Wiener again tried to join the military, but the government again rejected him due to his poor eyesight. In the summer of 1918, Oswald Veblen invited Wiener to work on ballistics at the Aberdeen Proving Ground in Maryland.  Living and working with other mathematicians strengthened his interest in mathematics. However, Wiener was still eager to serve in uniform, and decided to make one more attempt to enlist, this time as a common soldier. Wiener wrote in a letter to his parents, "I should consider myself a pretty cheap kind of a swine if I were willing to be an officer but unwilling to be a soldier".  This time the army accepted Wiener into its ranks and assigned him, by coincidence, to a unit stationed at Aberdeen, Maryland. World War I ended just days after Wiener's return to Aberdeen and Wiener was discharged from the military in February 1919. 
After the war
Wiener was unable to secure a permanent position at Harvard, a situation he blamed largely on anti-semitism at the university and in particular on the antipathy of Harvard mathematician G. D. Birkhoff.  He was also rejected for a position at the University of Melbourne. At W. F. Osgood's suggestion, Wiener became an instructor of mathematics at MIT, where he spent the remainder of his career, becoming promoted eventually to Professor.  In 1926, Wiener returned to Europe as a Guggenheim scholar. He spent most of his time at Göttingen and with Hardy at Cambridge, working on Brownian motion, the Fourier integral, Dirichlet's problem, harmonic analysis, and the Tauberian theorems.In 1926, Wiener's parents arranged his marriage to a German immigrant, Margaret Engemann; they had two daughters.Many tales, perhaps apocryphal, were told of him at MIT, especially concerning his absent-mindedness.  It was said that he returned home once to find his house empty.  He inquired of a neighborhood girl the reason, and she said that the family had moved elsewhere that day.  He thanked her for the information and she replied, "That's why I stayed behind, Daddy!"
During and after World War IIDuring World War II, his work on the automatic aiming and firing of anti-aircraft guns caused Wiener to investigate information theory independently of Claude Shannon and to invent the Wiener filter. (To him is due the now standard practice of modeling an information source as a random process.) His anti-aircraft work eventually led him to formulate cybernetics. Unlike many of his contemporaries, Wiener was not invited to participate in the Manhattan Project.  After the war, his fame helped MIT to recruit a research team in cognitive science, composed of researchers in neuropsychology and the mathematics and biophysics of the nervous system, including Warren Sturgis McCulloch and Walter Pitts. These men later made pioneering contributions to computer science and artificial intelligence. Soon after the group was formed, Wiener suddenly ended all contact with its members, mystifying his colleagues. In their biography of Wiener, Conway and Siegelman suggest that Wiener's wife Margaret, who detested McCulloch's bohemian lifestyle, engineered the breach. Wiener later helped develop the theories of cybernetics, robotics, computer control, and automation. He shared his theories and findings with other researchers, and credited the contributions of others. These included Soviet researchers and their findings. Wiener's acquaintance with them caused him to be regarded with suspicion during the Cold War. He was a strong advocate of automation to improve the standard of living, and to end economic underdevelopment. His ideas became influential in India, whose government he advised during the 1950s.After the war, Wiener became increasingly concerned with what he believed was political interference with scientific research, and the militarization of science. His article "A Scientist Rebels" for the January 1947 issue of The Atlantic Monthly  urged scientists to consider the ethical implications of their work. After the war, he refused to accept any government funding or to work on military projects. The way Wiener's beliefs concerning nuclear weapons and the Cold War contrasted with that of John von Neumann is the major theme of the book John Von Neumann and Norbert Wiener Heims (1980).  Wiener was a core participant of the Macy conferences.  He died, aged 69, in Stockholm, Sweden.
Awards and honors

Wiener won the Bôcher Memorial Prize in 1933 and the National Medal of Science in 1963, presented by President Johnson at a White House Ceremony in January, 1964, shortly before his death.
Wiener won the 1965 U.S. National Book Award in Science, Philosophy and Religion for God & Golem, Inc.: A Comment on Certain Points where Cybernetics Impinges on Religion. 
"National Book Awards – 1965". National Book Foundation. Retrieved 2012-03-05. 

The Norbert Wiener Prize in Applied Mathematics was endowed in 1967 in honor of Norbert Wiener by MIT's mathematics department and is provided jointly by the American Mathematical Society and Society for Industrial and Applied Mathematics.
The Norbert Wiener Award for Social and Professional Responsibility awarded annually by CPSR, was established in 1987 in honor of Wiener to recognize contributions by computer professionals to socially responsible use of computers.
The crater Wiener on the far side of the Moon is named after him.
The Norbert Wiener Center for Harmonic Analysis and Applications, at the University of Maryland, College Park, is named in his honor. 
Robert A. Heinlein named a spaceship after him in his 1957 novel Citizen of the Galaxy, a "Free Trader" ship called the Norbert Wiener mentioned in Chapter 14.


Work Wiener was an early studier of stochastic and noise processes, contributing work relevant to electronic engineering, electronic communication, and control systems.Wiener is regarded as the originator of cybernetics, a formalization of the notion of feedback, with many implications for engineering, systems control, computer science, biology, philosophy, and the organization of society.Wiener's work with cybernetics influenced  Gregory Bateson and Margaret Mead, and through them, anthropology, sociology, and education. 
Wiener equationA simple mathematical representation of Brownian motion, the Wiener equation, named after Wiener, assumes the current velocity of a fluid particle fluctuates.
Wiener filterFor signal processing, the Wiener filter is a filter proposed by Wiener during the 1940s and published in 1949. Its purpose is to reduce the amount of noise present in a signal by comparison with an estimation of the desired noiseless signal.
In mathematicsWiener took a great interest in the mathematical theory of Brownian motion (named after Robert Brown) proving many results now widely known such as the non-differentiability of the paths. As a result the one-dimensional version of Brownian motion became known as the Wiener process. It is the best known of the Lévy processes, càdlàg stochastic processes with stationary statistically independent increments, and occurs frequently in pure and applied mathematics, physics and economics (e.g. on the stock-market).Wiener's Tauberian theorem, a 1932 result of Wiener, developed Tauberian theorems in summability theory, on the face of it a chapter of real analysis, by showing that most of the known results could be encapsulated in a principle taken from harmonic analysis. As now formulated, the theorem of Wiener does not have any obvious association with Tauberian theorems, which deal with infinite series; the translation from results formulated for integrals, or using the language of functional analysis and Banach algebras, is however a relatively routine process.The Paley–Wiener theorem relates growth properties of entire functions on C n  and Fourier transformation of Schwartz distributions of compact support.The Wiener–Khinchin theorem, (or Wiener – Khintchine theorem or Khinchin – Kolmogorov theorem), states that the power spectral density of a wide-sense-stationary random process is the Fourier transform of the corresponding autocorrelation function.An abstract Wiener space is a mathematical object in measure theory, used to construct a "decent", strictly positive and locally finite measure on an infinite-dimensional vector space. Wiener's original construction only applied to the space of real-valued continuous paths on the unit interval, known as classical Wiener space. Leonard Gross provided the generalization to the case of a general separable Banach space.The notion of a Banach space itself was discovered independently by both Wiener and Stefan Banach at around the same time. 
PublicationsWiener wrote many books and hundreds of articles: 

1914,   Reprinted in  
1930,  
1933, The Fourier Integral and Certain of its Applications Cambridge Univ. Press; reprint by Dover, CUP Archive 1988 ISBN 0-521-35884-1
1942, Extrapolation, Interpolation and Smoothing of Stationary Time Series. A war-time classified report nicknamed "the yellow peril" because of the color of the cover and the difficulty of the subject. Published postwar 1949 MIT Press.   Cybernetics: Or Control and Communication in the Animal and the Machine. Paris, (Hermann & Cie) & Camb. Mass. (MIT Press) ISBN 978-0-262-73009-9; 2nd revised ed. 1961.
1950, The Human Use of Human Beings. The Riverside Press (Houghton Mifflin Co.).
1958, Nonlinear Problems in Random Theory. MIT Press & Wiley.
1964, Selected Papers of Norbert Wiener. Cambridge Mass. 1964 (MIT Press & SIAM)
1964, God & Golem, Inc.: A Comment on Certain Points Where Cybernetics Impinges on Religion. MIT Press.
1966,   Published in book form.
1966, Generalized Harmonic Analysis and Tauberian Theorems. MIT Press.
1994,  
1976–84, The Mathematical Work of Norbert Wiener. Masani P (ed) 4 vols, Camb. Mass. (MIT Press). This contains a complete collection of Wiener's mathematical papers with commentaries.

Fiction:

1959,The Tempter. Random House.

Autobiography:

1953. Ex-Prodigy: My Childhood and Youth. MIT Press.
1956. I am a Mathematician. London (Gollancz).

Under the name "W. Norbert"

1952 The Brain and other short science fiction in Tech Engineering News


ReferencesNotes
 Further reading
 

 
 
 
  *  
 
 
 
 
 
 .
 
Montagnini, Leone, 2005.   Le Armonie del disordine]. Norbert Wiener Matematico-Filosofo del Novecento. Istituto Veneto di Scienze Lettere ed Arti, Venezia, 2005. XVI, 314 pp. ISBN 88-88143-41-6

A brief profile of Dr. Wiener is given in The Observer newspaper, Sunday, 28 January 1951.
External links 
 

Norbert Wiener and Cybernetics – Living Internet
 
 

  
 
  
DEFAULTSORT


























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Linda Hamilton
 
 
Linda Carroll Hamilton (born September 26, 1956) is an American actress best known for her portrayal of Sarah Connor in The Terminator and its sequel Terminator 2: Judgment Day and Catherine Chandler in the 1987 - 1990 television series Beauty and the Beast, for which she was nominated for two Golden Globes and an Emmy.  Hamilton had a recurring role as Mary Elizabeth Bartowski on NBC's Chuck.
Early lifeHamilton was born in Salisbury, Maryland. Her mother was a Mayflower descendant and her father, Carroll Stanford Hamilton, was a physician. Hamilton's father died when she was five, and her mother remarried to a police chief.         Hamilton has an identical twin sister (Leslie Hamilton), one older sister and one younger brother. She has said that she was raised in a "very boring, white Anglo-Saxon" family, and "voraciously read books" during her spare time.  Hamilton went to Wicomico Junior High (now Wicomico Middle School) and Wicomico High School in Salisbury, with her twin sister, Leslie. She studied for two years at Washington College in Chestertown, Maryland, before moving on to acting studies in New York City. While attending Washington College, her acting professor told her she had no hope of earning a living as an actress. In New York, she attended acting workshops given by Lee Strasberg.
CareerHamilton's acting debut came first on television, followed by a major role as Lisa Rogers in the prime-time soap opera Secrets of Midland Heights (1980). Her theatrical debut was in the thriller TAG: The Assassination Game (1982) and as a result, she was listed as one of twelve "Promising New Actors of 1982" in John Willis' Screen World, Vol 34. She also shared a starring role in the CBS made for TV movie Country Gold, with Loni Anderson and Earl Holliman.Hamilton played the lead in Children of the Corn, based on the horror short story by Stephen King. The movie, which made $14 million at the box office,  was panned by critics,   Hamilton's next role was in The Terminator, co-starring Arnold Schwarzenegger and Michael Biehn, in 1984. The movie was an unexpectedly huge commercial and critical success.        Following The Terminator, Hamilton starred in Black Moon Rising, an action thriller with Tommy Lee Jones. She then returned to television as a guest-star in the mystery series Murder, She Wrote, scoring favorable reviews. Hamilton next starred opposite Ron Perlman in the TV series Beauty and the Beast. The series was critically acclaimed, and she received Emmy and Golden Globe nominations. Hamilton left the series in 1989 and it ended in 1990.Hamilton returned to the big screen in 1990 with Michael Caine in Mr. Destiny and in 1991 with Terminator 2: Judgment Day, the sequel to The Terminator. The latter was a smash at the box office, grossing over $500 million, more than any other film of that year. Hamilton underwent intense physical training to emphasize the character's transformation from the first film. Her identical twin sister Leslie Hamilton Gearren was Linda's double in Terminator 2. Hamilton received two MTV Movie Awards for her role in the film, one for Best Female Performance and the other for Most Desirable Female. She reprised the character, Sarah Connor, for the theme park attraction T2 3-D.In 1990, Hamilton was chosen by People magazine as one of the 50 Most Beautiful People in the world. Following the success of the Terminator series, she hosted Saturday Night Live.She returned to television in A Mother's Prayer (1995) playing a mother who lost her husband and is diagnosed with AIDS. For her performance in the film, which co-starred Kate Nelligan and Bruce Dern, Hamilton was awarded a CableACE Award for best dramatic performance and nominated for another Golden Globe in 1996.That same year, Hamilton filmed two motion pictures that were released one week apart in 1997: Shadow Conspiracy with Charlie Sheen and Dante's Peak with Pierce Brosnan. Shadow Conspiracy flopped at the box office, but Dante's Peak grossed $180 million and was one of the biggest commercial hits of the year. She received a Blockbuster Entertainment Award for female performance in Dante's Peak.Hamilton has since appeared on the television shows Frasier (season 4 episode "Odd Man Out" as Laura) and According to Jim and has done more TV movies, including On the Line, Robots Rising, Rescuers: Stories of Courage: Two Couples, Point Last Seen, and The Color of Courage.Hamilton and her Beauty and the Beast costar Ron Perlman reunited in the 2005 post-Vietnam war drama Missing in America.In 2009, she returned as Sarah Connor in Terminator Salvation, in voice-overs only.In 2010, she joined the cast of Chuck in the recurring guest role of Mary Elizabeth Bartowski, a CIA agent and long-missing mother of Chuck and Ellie.   She also appears as a guest star in the Showtime cable television show Weeds as the marijuana supplier for the show's main character (Mary-Louise Parker).In November 2011, she narrated the Chiller The Future of Fear horror documentary.  
Personal lifeHamilton has been married twice.   She married her first husband, actor Bruce Abbott, on December 18, 1982. In 1989, Abbott and Hamilton separated while she was pregnant with their first child    While filming Terminator 2 in 1991, Hamilton began a relationship with director James Cameron, whom she had met seven years earlier when he directed her in the first Terminator film. They had a daughter, Josephine, born in 1993. She and Cameron eventually married in 1997, but the marriage was short-lived, ending in a $50 million divorce settlement in 1999.   Hamilton has described herself politically as a Democrat, but she voted for Republican candidate Arnold Schwarzenegger, her Terminator co-star, in the 2003 California gubernatorial election after his campaign convinced her he was suitable for the job.   In an October 2005 appearance on Larry King Live, Hamilton revealed she has bipolar disorder, which she said destroyed her marriage to first husband Bruce Abbott, whom she admitted having abused verbally and physically, and eventually sought treatment. She also has stated that despite internet rumors to the contrary, she was never married to Peter Horton. 
Awards

Academy of Science Fiction, Fantasy & Horror Films, USA
1992 – Won Saturn Award Best Actress for Terminator 2: Judgment Day (1991)
Blockbuster Entertainment Awards
1998 – Won Blockbuster Entertainment Award Favorite Actress—Action/Adventure for Dante's Peak (1997)
CableACE Awards
1995 – Won CableACE Actress in a Movie or Miniseries for A Mother's Prayer (1995) (TV)
DVD Exclusive Awards
2001 – Won Video Premiere Award Best Supporting Actress for: Skeletons in the Closet (2001)
Golden Globe Awards
1988 – Nominated  Best Performance by an Actress in a TV-Series — Drama for Beauty and the Beast
1989 – Nominated Best Performance by an Actress in a TV-Series — Drama for Beauty and the Beast
1996 – Nominated Best Performance by an Actress in a Mini-Series or Motion Picture Made for TV for A Mother's Prayer (1995)
MTV Movie Awards
1992 – Won MTV Movie Award Best Female Performance for Terminator 2: Judgment Day (1991)
1992 – Won MTV Movie Award Most Desirable Female
Satellite Awards
2000 – Won Golden Satellite Award Best Performance by an Actress in a Miniseries or a Motion Picture Made for Television for The Color of Courage (1999) (TV)


Filmography

Year Film Role Notes 
1980 Rape and Marriage: The Rideout Case Greta Rideout  
1982 Tag: The Assassination Game Susan Swayze  
1984 Children of the Corn Vicky  
The Terminator Sarah Connor Nominated - Saturn Award for Best Actress 
Hill Street Blues Sandy Valpariso TV series (guest-star in four episodes) 
The Stone Boy Eva Crescent Moon (lady on bus)  
1985 Secret Weapons   
1986 King Kong Lives Dr. Amy Franklin  
Black Moon Rising Nina  
Murder, She Wrote Carol McDermott TV Series 
1987 Beauty and the Beast Catherine Chandler TV Series (1987–89) 
1988 Go Toward The Light Claire Madison  
1990 Mr. Destiny Ellen Jane  
1991 Terminator 2: Judgment Day Sarah Connor Saturn Award for Best Actress   MTV Movie Award for Best Female Performance   MTV Movie Award for Most Desirable Female 
1994 Silent Fall Karen Rainer  
1995 Separate Lives Lauren Porter/Lena  
1996 T2 3-D: Battle Across Time Sarah Connor At Universal Studios, Orlando. Narrator 
1997 Dante's Peak Mayor Rachel Wando Blockbuster Entertainment Award for Favorite Actress - Action/Adventure 
Shadow Conspiracy Amanda Givens  
Frasier Laura TV series (guest star season 4 Ep 24) 
1998 On the Line Det. Jean Martin TV Movie 
Rescuers: Stories of Courage: Two Couples  TV Movie 
Point Last Seen Rachel Harrison TV Movie 
1999 The Secret Life of Girls Ruby Sanford  
2000 Skeletons in the Closet Tina Conway DVD Exclusive Awards for Best Supporting Actress 
Sex & Mrs. X Joanna Scott TV Movie 
2001 Bailey's Mistake Liz Donovan TV Movie 
A Girl Thing Rachel TV Movie 
2002 Silent Night Elisabeth Vincken TV Movie 
2003 Wholey Moses Valerie Short 
2004 Jonah June Short 
2005 Smile Bridget  
Missing in America Kate  
The Kid & I Susan Mandeville  
2006 Thief Roselyn Moore TV series (guest-star in two episodes) 
Home by Christmas Julie Bedford TV movie 
2007 Broken Karen  
2009 Holy Water Cory  
The Line Carol TV series (guest-star in two episodes) 
Terminator Salvation Sarah Connor Voice role 
2010 Weeds Linda  
DC Showcase: Jonah Hex Madame Lorraine Voice role  
2010-2012 Chuck Mary Elizabeth Bartowski TV series (starred in 12 episodes) 

References 
External links 

 
2006 Linda Hamilton Interview on Sidewalks Entertainment
Linda Hamilton interview with Larry King

 
  
DEFAULTSORT













 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Erich Maria Remarque
 Erich Maria Remarque  (22 June 1898 – 25 September 1970), born Erich Paul Remark, was a German author, best known for his novel All Quiet on the Western Front.
Life and workErich Paul Remarque was born on 22 June 1898 into a working class family in the German city of Osnabrück to Peter Franz Remark (b. 14 June 1867, Kaiserswerth) and Anna Maria (née Stallknecht; born 21 November 1871, Katernberg).
First World WarDuring World War I, Remarque was conscripted into the army at the age of 18. On 12 June 1917, he was transferred to the Western Front, 2nd Company, Reserves, Field Depot of the 2nd Guards Reserve Division at Hem-Lenglet. On 26 June, he was posted to the 15th Reserve Infantry Regiment, 2nd Company, Engineer Platoon Bethe, and was stationed between Torhout and Houthulst. On 31 July, he was wounded by shrapnel in the left leg, right arm and neck, and was repatriated to an army hospital in Germany where he spent the rest of the war. 
TeacherAfter the war he continued his teacher training and worked from 1 August 1919 as a primary school teacher in Lohne, at that time in the county of Lingen, now in the county of Bentheim. From May 1920 he worked in Klein Berßen in the former County of Hümmling, now Emsland, and from August 1920 in Nahne, which has been part Osnabruck since 1972. With his application for leave of absence from teaching this period ended on 20 November 1920.
Other jobsErich worked at a number of different jobs, including librarian, businessman, teacher, journalist and editor. His first paid writing job was as a technical writer for the Continental Rubber Company, a German tyre manufacturer.   
NovelistAt the age of 16, Remarque had made his first attempts at writing; this included essays, poems, and the beginnings of a novel that was finished later and published in 1920 as The Dream Room (Die Traumbude).When he published All Quiet on the Western Front, Remarque changed his middle name in memory of his mother and reverted to the earlier spelling of the family name to dissociate himself from his novel Die Traumbude.   The original family name, Remarque, had been changed to Remark by his grandfather in the 19th century. In 1927, Remarque made a second literary start with the novel Station at the Horizon (Station am Horizont), which was serialized in the sports journal "Sport im Bild" for which Remarque was working. It was published in book form only in 1998. His best known work, All Quiet on the Western Front (Im Westen nichts Neues), was written in a few months in 1927, but Remarque was not immediately able to find a publisher.  The novel, published in 1929, described the experiences of German soldiers during World War I. A number of similar works followed; in simple, emotive language they described wartime and the postwar years.In 1931, after finishing The Road Back (Der Weg zurück), Remarque bought a villa in Porto Ronco, Switzerland, planning to live both there and in France.   On 10 May 1933, the German government, under the initiative of the Nazi propaganda minister, Joseph Goebbels, banned and publicly burned Remarque's works. Remarque finally left Germany to live at his villa in Switzerland. The Germans continued to decry his writings and produced propaganda claiming that he was a descendant of French Jews and that his real last name was Kramer, a Jewish-sounding name, and his original name spelled backwards. This is still cited in some biographies despite the complete lack of evidence. The Nazis also claimed, falsely, that Remarque had not done active service during World War I. In 1938, Remarque's German citizenship was revoked and then in 1939 after he and his ex-wife were remarried to prevent her repatriation to Germany, they left Porto Ronco, Switzerland for the United States of America.  They became naturalized citizens of the United States in 1947.In 1943, the government arrested his sister, Elfriede Scholz, who had stayed behind in Germany with her husband and two children. After a short trial in the "Volksgerichtshof" (Hitler's extra-constitutional "People's Court"), she was found guilty of "undermining morale" for stating that she considered the war lost. Court President Roland Freisler declared, "Ihr Bruder ist uns leider entwischt—Sie aber werden uns nicht entwischen" ("Your brother has unfortunately escaped us—you, however, will not escape us"). Scholz was guillotined on 16 December 1943. His next novel, Three Comrades (Drei Kameraden), spans the years of the Weimar Republic, from the hyperinflation of 1923 to the end of the decade. Remarque's fourth novel, Flotsam (in German titled Liebe deinen Nächsten, or Love Thy Neighbour), first appeared in a serial version in English translation in Collier's magazine in 1939, and Remarque spent another year revising the text for its book publication in 1941, both in English and German. His next novel, Arch of Triumph, first published in 1945 in English, and the next year in German as Arc de Triomphe, was another instant best-seller and reached worldwide sales of nearly five million.
SwitzerlandIn 1948, Remarque returned to Switzerland, where he spent the rest of his life. There was a gap of seven years — a long silence for Remarque — between Arch of Triumph and his next work, Spark of Life (Der Funke Leben), which appeared both in German and in English in 1952. While he was writing The Spark of Life Remarque was also working on a novel, Zeit zu leben und Zeit zu sterben (Time to Live and Time to Die). It was published first in English translation in 1954 with the not-quite-literal title A Time to Love and a Time to Die. In 1958, Douglas Sirk directed the film A Time to Love and a Time to Die in Germany, based on Remarque's novel. Remarque made a cameo appearance in the film in the role of the professor.In 1955, Remarque wrote the screenplay for an Austrian film, The Last Act (Der letzte Akt), about Hitler's final days in the bunker of the Reich Chancellery in Berlin, which was based on the book Ten Days to Die (1950) by Michael Musmanno. In 1956, Remarque wrote a drama for the stage, Full Circle (Die letzte Station), which played successfully in both Germany and on Broadway. An English translation was published in 1974. Heaven Has No Favorites was serialized (as Borrowed Life) in 1959 before appearing as a book in 1961 and was made into the 1977 movie Bobby Deerfield. The Night in Lisbon (Die Nacht von Lissabon), published in 1962, is the last work Remarque finished. The novel sold some 900,000 copies in Germany and was a modest best-seller abroad as well.  
MarriagesHis first marriage was to the actress Ilse Jutta Zambona in 1925.  Their marriage was stormy and unfaithful on both sides. Remarque and Zambone divorced in 1930, but fled together to his home in Porto Ronco, Switzerland in 1933 when the Nazis took over Germany; in May 1933, his novel All Quiet on the Western Front was burned in one of the first of the Nazi book burnings and it became clear that neither Remarque nor Zambona could return to Germany. Taylor, Marvin J. The life and writings of Erich Maria Remarque. New York: Fales Library, New York University, 2011. Accessed 29 July 2012.
  During the 1930s, Remarque had relationships with Austrian actress Hedy Lamarr and then with Marlene Dietrich.  The love affair with Dietrich began in September 1937 when they met on the Lido while in Venice for the Film Festival and continued through at least 1940, maintained mostly by way of letters, cables, and telephone calls. A selection of their letters were published in 2003 in the book "Sag Mir, Dass Du Mich Liebst"("Tell Me That You Love Me")   
and then in the 2011 play Puma. In 1938, Remarque and his ex-wife Zambone remarried each other in Switzerland as a protection to prevent her being forced to return to Germany and then they immigrated to the United States in 1939 where they both became naturalized citizens in 1947.  They divorced again on May 20, 1957, this time for good. Ilse Remarque died on June 25, 1975.  Remarque married actress Paulette Goddard in 1958 and they remained married until his death in Locarno on 25 September 1970, aged 72.  Remarque was interred in the Ronco cemetery in Ronco, Ticino, Switzerland. Goddard died in 1990 and was interred next to her husband. She left a bequest of $20 million to New York University to fund an institute for European studies, which is named in honor of Remarque. Lorch, Donatella. "Paulette Goddard Left N.Y.U. $20 Million." New York Times. 18 May 1990. Accessed 29 July 2012.    The first Director of The Remarque Institute was Professor Tony Judt.  Remarque's papers are housed at NYU's Fales Library.  
NYU also named an undergraduate dormitory building after her: Paulette Goddard Hall.
Casa Monte TaborEfforts to raise CHF 6.2M ($7M), to buy and save the villa of Erich Maria Remarque and Paulette Goddard from most certain demolition are underway. The intent is to transform the Casa Monte Tabor into a museum and home to an artist-in-residence program, focused on creativity, freedom and peace. 
List of worksNote: the dates of English publications are those of the first publications in a book form.
Novels

(1920) Die Traumbude. Ein Künstlerroman; English translation: The Dream Room
(written 1924, published 1998) Gam
(1928) Station am Horizont; English translation: Station at the Horizon
(1929) Im Westen nichts Neues; English translation: All Quiet on the Western Front (1929)
(1931) Der Weg zurück; English translation: The Road Back (1931)
(1936) Drei Kameraden; English translation: Three Comrades (1937)
(1939) Liebe deinen Nächsten; English translation: Flotsam (1941)
(1945) Arc de Triomphe; English translation: Arch of Triumph (1945)
(1952) Der Funke Leben; English translation: Spark of Life (1952)
(1954) Zeit zu leben und Zeit zu sterben; English translation: A Time to Love and a Time to Die (1954)
(1956) Der schwarze Obelisk; English translation: The Black Obelisk (1957)
(1961) Der Himmel kennt keine Günstlinge (serialized as Geborgtes Leben); English translation: Heaven Has No Favorites (1961)
(1962) Die Nacht von Lissabon; English translation: The Night in Lisbon (1964)
(1970) Das gelobte Land; English translation: The Promised Land
(1971) Schatten im Paradies; English translation: Shadows in Paradise (1972)


Other works

(1931) Der Feind; English translation: The Enemy (1930–1931); short stories
(1955) Der letzte Akt; English translation: The Last Act; screenplay
(1956) Die letzte Station; English translation: Full Circle (1974); play
(1988) Die Heimkehr des Enoch J. Jones; English translation: The Return of Enoch J. Jones; play
(1994) Ein militanter Pazifist; English translation: A Militant Pacifist; interviews and essays


See also 

Exilliteratur


References 
Further reading

Mariana Parvanová: „... das Symbol der Ewigkeit ist der Kreis“. Eine Untersuchung der Motive in den Romanen von Erich Maria Remarque. GRIN-Verlag, München 2010, ISBN 978-3-640-64739-2 (in German)
Mariana Parvanová: E.M.Remarque in der kommunistischen Literaturkritik in der Sowjetunion und in Bulgarien. ReDiRoma Verlag, Remscheid 2009, ISBN 978-3-86870-056-5 (in German)


External links

multilingual pages about Erich Maria Remarque
 
German Language Guide to the Remarque papers at NYU's Fales Library

  
DEFAULTSORT


















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Horatio Alger, Jr.
 
 Horatio Alger, Jr. (January 13, 1832 – July 18, 1899) was a prolific 19th-century American author, best known for his many formulaic juvenile novels about impoverished boys and their rise from humble backgrounds to lives of middle-class security and comfort through hard work, determination, courage, and honesty. His writings were characterized by the "rags-to-riches" narrative, which had a formative effect on America during the Gilded Age. Alger's name is often invoked incorrectly as though he himself rose from rags to riches, but that arc applied to his characters, not to the author. Essentially, all of Alger's novels are the same: a young boy struggles through hard work to escape poverty. Critics, however, are quick to point out that it is not the hard work itself that rescues the boy from his fate, but rather some extraordinary act of bravery or honesty, which brings him into contact with a wealthy elder gentleman, who takes the boy in as a ward. The boy might return a large sum of money that was lost or rescue someone from an overturned carriage, bringing the boy--and his plight--to the attention of some wealthy individual. It has been suggested that this reflects Alger's own patronizing attitude to the boys he tried to help.Alger secured his literary niche in 1868 with the publication of his fourth book Ragged Dick, the story of a poor bootblack's rise to middle-class respectability, which was a huge success. His many books that followed were essentially variations on Ragged Dick and featured a cast of stock characters:  the valiant hard-working, honest youth (who knew more Latin than the villain), the noble, mysterious stranger (whom the poor boy rescued and by whom he got rewarded), the snobbish youth (cousin), and the evil squire (uncle).In the 1870s, Alger took a trip to California to gather material for future books, but the trip had little influence on his writing. In the last decades of the 19th century, boys' tastes  changed, and Alger's moral tone coarsened accordingly. The Puritan ethic had loosened its grip on America, and violence, murder, and other sensational themes entered Alger's works. Public librarians questioned whether his books should be made available to the young. By the time he died in 1899, he had published around a hundred volumes.
Biography
Childhood: 1832–1847Horatio Alger, Jr. was born in the New England coastal town of Chelsea, Massachusetts, on January 13, 1832, to Horatio Alger, a Unitarian minister, and his wife Olive Augusta Fenno.   He was the descendant of Plymouth Pilgrims Robert Cushman, Thomas Cushman, William Bassett, and the descendant of Sylvanus Lazell, a Minuteman and brigadier general in the War of 1812; and Edmund Lazell, a member of the Constitutional Convention in 1788.  Horatio's siblings Olive Augusta and James were born in 1833 and 1836, and an invalid sister Annie and a brother Francis in 1840 and 1842. Alger 2008, p. 277  Alger was a precocious boy afflicted with nearsightedness and bronchial asthma,   but Alger, Sr. decided early that his eldest son would one day enter the ministry, and, to that end, he tutored the boy in classical studies and allowed him to observe the responsibilities of ministering to parishioners.  Alger began attending the Chelsea Grammar School in 1842, Hoyt 1974, p. 14  but by December 1844 his father's financial troubles had increased considerably and, in search of a better salary, he moved his family to Marlborough, Massachusetts, an agricultural town 25 miles west of Boston. He was installed as pastor of the Second Congregational Society in January 1845 with a salary sufficient to meet his needs.  Horatio attended Gates Academy, a local preparatory school,  and completed his studies at age fifteen.  He published his earliest literary work in local newspapers. Scharnhorst 1985, p. 14 
Harvard and early works: 1848–1864In July 1848 Alger passed the Harvard entrance examinations,  and was admitted to the class of 1852.  The fourteen member full-time Harvard faculty included Louis Agassiz and Asa Gray (sciences), Cornelius Conway Felton (classics), James Walker (religion and philosophy), and Henry Wadsworth Longfellow (belles lettres). Edward Everett served as president.  Alger's classmate Joseph Choate described Harvard at this time as "provincial and local because its scope and outlook hardly extended beyond the boundaries of New England; besides which it was very denominational, being held exclusively in the hands of Unitarians". Scharnhorst 1985, p. 15 Alger flowered in the highly disciplined and regimented Harvard environment, winning scholastic prizes and prestigious awards.  His genteel poverty and less than aristocratic heritage however barred him from membership in the Hasty Pudding and Porcellian clubs.  In 1849 he became a professional writer when he sold two essays and a poem to the Pictorial National Library, a Boston magazine.  He began reading Sir Walter Scott, James Fenimore Cooper, Herman Melville, and other modern writers of fiction and cultivated a lifelong love for Longfellow, whose verse he sometimes employed as a model for his own. He was chosen Class Odist, and graduated with Phi Beta Kappa honors in 1852, eighth in a class of 88. Alger had no job prospects following graduation and returned home. He continued to write, submitting his work to religious and literary magazines with varying success.  He briefly attended Harvard Divinity School in 1853, possibly to be reunited with a romantic interest,  but left in November 1853 to take a job as an assistant editor with the Boston Daily Advertiser.  He loathed editing and quit in 1854 to teach at The Grange, a boys' boarding school in Rhode Island. When The Grange suspended operations in 1856, Alger found employment managing the 1856 summer session at Deerfield Academy.   His poems at this time expressed a sexual ambivalence, and were sometimes written in a woman's voice.His first book, a collection of short pieces called Bertha's Christmas Vision: An Autumn Sheaf, was published in 1856, and his second, a lengthy satirical poem called Nothing to Do: A Tilt at our Best Society, was published in 1857.  He attended the Harvard Divinity School from 1857 to 1860, and upon graduation, he did a tour of Europe.  In the spring of 1861, he returned to a nation in the throes of the Civil War.  Drafted but exempted from military service in July 1863, he wrote in support of the Union cause and hobnobbed with New England intellectuals. He was elected an officer in the New England Genealogical Society in 1863. His first novel Marie Bertrand: The Felon's Daughter was serialized in the New York Weekly in 1864, and his first boys' book Frank's Campaign was published by A. K. Loring in Boston the same year.   Alger initially wrote for adult magazines, including Harper's Monthly and Frank Leslie's Illustrated Newspaper; a friendship with William Taylor Adams, a boys' author, led him to write for the young. Hoyt 1974, pp. 49–50 
Ministry: 1864–1866On December 8, 1864 Alger was installed as pastor with the First Unitarian Church and Society of Brewster, Massachusetts.  Between ministerial duties, he organized games and amusements for the boys in the parish, railed against smoking and drinking, and organized and served as president of the local chapter of the Cadets for Temperance. Scharnhorst 1980, p. 33   He submitted stories to Student and Schoolmate, a boys' monthly magazine of moral writings edited by William Taylor Adams (Oliver Optic) and published in Boston by Joseph H. Allen.  Scharnhorst 1985, p. 65  In September 1865 his second boys' book Paul Prescott's Charge was published to favorable reviews.  Alger 2008, p. 278  Early in 1866, a church committee was formed to investigate sexual misconduct reports about Alger. He denied nothing, admitted he had been imprudent, considered his association with the church dissolved, and left town. Church officials reported to the hierarchy in Boston that Alger had been charged with "the crime of...unnatural familiarity with boys".   Alger sent Unitarian officials in Boston a letter of remorse, and his father assured them his son would never seek another post in the church. Officials were satisfied and decided no further action would be taken. 
New York City: 1866–1896Alger relocated to New York City, abandoned forever any thought of a career in the church, and focused instead on his writing. He wrote "Friar Anselmo" at this time, a poem that tells of a sinning cleric's atonement through good deeds. He became interested in the welfare of the thousands of vagrant children who flooded New York City following the Civil War. He attended a children's church service at Five Points which led to "John Maynard", a ballad about an actual shipwreck on Lake Erie that brought Alger not only the respect of the literati but a letter from Longfellow. He published two poorly received adult novels, Helen Ford and Timothy Crump's Ward. He fared better with stories for boys published in Student and Schoolmate and a third boys' book Charlie Codman's Cruise. In January 1867 the first of twelve installments of Ragged Dick appeared in Student and Schoolmate. The story about a poor bootblack's rise to middle class respectability was a huge success. It was expanded, and published as a novel in 1868.  It proved to be his bestseller. After Ragged Dick he wrote almost entirely for boys,  and signed a contract with publisher Loring for a Ragged Dick Series. In spite of the series' success, Alger was on financially uncertain ground and tutored the five sons of international banker Joseph Seligman. He wrote serials for Young Israel,  and lived in the Seligman home until 1876. Alger 2008, p. 279  In 1875 Alger produced the serial Shifting for Himself and Sam's Chance, a sequel to The Young Outlaw.  It was evident in these that Alger had grown stale. Profits suffered, and he headed West for new material at Loring's behest, arriving in California in February 1877.   He enjoyed a reunion with his brother James in San Francisco and returned to New York late in 1877 via a schooner around Cape Horn.    He wrote a few lackluster books in the following years that rehashed the formulaic Alger of old but this time the tales were played before a Western backcloth rather than an urban one. In New York, Alger continued to tutor the town's aristocratic youth and to rehabilitate its street boys.  He was writing both urban and Western-themed tales. In 1879, for example, he published The District Messenger Boy and The Young Miner. Hoyt 1974, p. 201  In 1877, Alger's fiction became a target of librarians concerned about sensational juvenile fiction.  An effort was made to remove Alger's works from public collections, but the debate was only partially successful, defeated by the renewed interest in Alger's work after his death. In 1881, Alger informally adopted Charlie Davis, a street boy, and another, John Downie, in 1883; they lived in Alger's apartment.  In 1881, he wrote President James A. Garfield's biography,  but filled the work with contrived conversations and boyish excitements rather than facts. The book sold well. Alger was commissioned to give Abraham Lincoln a biographical treatment but again it was Alger the boys' novelist opting for thrills rather than facts. In 1882, Alger's father died. Alger continued to produce stories of honest boys outwitting evil, greedy squires, and malicious youths. His work appeared in hardcover and paperback, and decades-old poems were published in anthologies. He led a busy life with the street boys, his Harvard classmates, and the social elite. In Massachusetts, he was regarded with the same reverence as Harriet Beecher Stowe. He tutored with never a whisper of scandal.
Last years: 1896–1899In the last two decades of the 19th century, the quality of Alger's books deteriorated and his boys' works became nothing more than reruns of the plots and themes of his past.  The times had changed, boys expected more, and a streak of violence entered Alger's work. In The Young Bank Messenger, for example, a woman is throttled and threatened with death – an episode that would never have occurred in his earlier work. He attended the theater and Harvard reunions, read the literary magazines, and wrote a poem at Longfellow's death in 1892.  His last novel for adults, The Disagreeable Woman, was published under the pseudonym Julian Starr. Scharnhorst 1980, p. 45  He took pleasure in the successes of the boys he had informally adopted over the years, retained his interest in reform, accepted speaking engagements, and read portions of Ragged Dick to boys' assemblies. His popularity—and income—dwindled in the 1890s. In 1896, he had (what he called) a "nervous breakdown"; he relocated permanently to his sister's home in South Natick, Massachusetts. Scharnhorst 1980, p. 46  After suffering from bronchitis and asthma for two years, he died on July 18, 1899. Hoyt 1974, p. 232  His death was barely noticed.  Before his death, Alger asked Edward Stratemeyer to complete his unfinished works. Alger 2008, p. 280  In 1901, Young Captain Jack was completed by Stratemeyer and promoted as Alger's last work.  Alger once estimated that he earned only $100,000 between 1866 and 1896; Scharnhorst 1980, p. 47  at his death he had little money, leaving only small sums to family and friends. His literary work was bequeathed to his niece, to two boys he had casually adopted, and to his sister Olive Augusta, who destroyed his manuscripts and his letters at his wish.  Alger's works received favorable comments and experienced a resurgence following his death; up until the advent of the Jazz Age in the 1920s, he sold about seventeen to twenty million volumes. In 1926, however, reader interest plummeted and his major publisher ceased printing the books altogether. Surveys in 1932 and 1947 revealed very few children had read or even heard of Alger. The first Alger biography was a heavily fictionalized account published in 1928 by Herbert R. Mayes, who later admitted the work was a fraud. Scharnhorst 1980, p. 141  
LegacySince 1947, the Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans has bestowed an annual award on "outstanding individuals in our society who have succeeded in the face of adversity" and scholarships "to encourage young people to pursue their dreams with determination and perseverance".   A 1982 musical, Shine!, was based on Alger's work, particularly Ragged Dick and Silas Snobden's Office Boy.    
Style and themes
Alger scholar Gary Scharnhorst describes Alger's style as "anachronistic", "often laughable", "distinctive", and "distinguished by the quality of its literary allusions". Ranging from the Bible and Shakespeare (half of Alger's books contain Shakespearean references) to John Milton and Cicero, the allusions he employed were a testament to his erudition. Scharnhorst credits these allusions for distinguishing Alger's novels from pulp fiction. Scharnhorst describes six major themes in Alger's boys' books. The first, the Rise to Respectability, he observes, is evident in both his early and late books, notably in Ragged Dick, whose young impoverished hero declares: "I mean to turn over a new leaf, and try to grow up 'spectable." His virtuous life wins him–not riches–but, more realistically, a comfortable clerical position and salary.  The second major theme explores Character Strengthened Through Adversity. In Strong and Steady and Shifting for Himself, for example, the affluent heroes are reduced to poverty and forced to meet the demands of their new circumstances. Alger occasionally cited the young Abe Lincoln as a representative of this theme for his readers. The third theme is Beauty versus Money, which became central to Alger's adult fiction. Characters fall in love and marry based on the their character, talents, or intellect rather than the size of their bank accounts. In The Train Boy, for example, a wealthy heiress chooses to marry a talented but struggling artist and in The Erie Train Boy a poor woman wins her true love despite the machinations of a rich, depraved suitor. All of Alger's novels rework the same plot: a young boy struggles to escape poverty through hard work and clean living. However, it is not always the hard work and clean living that rescue the boy from his situation, but rather a wealthy older gentleman, who admires the boy as a result of some extraordinary act of bravery or honesty that the boy has performed. For example, the boy might rescue a child from an overturned carriage or find and return the man's stolen watch. Often the older man takes the boy into his home as a ward or companion and helps him find a better job (sometimes replacing a less honest or industrious boy).According to Scharnhorst, Alger's father was "an impoverished man" who defaulted on his debts in 1844. His properties around Chelsea were seized and assigned to a local squire who held the mortgages. Scharnhorst speculates this episode in Alger's childhood accounts for the recurrent theme in his boys' books of heroes being threatened with eviction or foreclosure, and may account for Alger's "consistent espousal of environmental reform proposals". Scharnhorst  writes "Financially insecure throughout his life, the younger Alger may have been active in reform organizations such as those for temperance and children's aid as a means of resolving his status-anxiety and establish his genteel credentials for leadership." Alger scholar Hoyt notes that Alger's morality "coarsened" around 1880, possibly influenced by the Western tales he was writing, because "the most dreadful things were now almost casually proposed and explored".  Although he continued to write for boys, Alger explored subjects like violence and "openness in the relations between the sexes and generations"; Hoyt attributes this shift to the decline of Puritan ethics in America. Scholar John Geck notes that Alger relied on "formulas for experience rather than shrewd analysis of human behavior", and that these formulas were "culturally centered" and "strongly didactic". Although the frontier society was a thing of the past during Alger's career, Geck contends that "the idea of the frontier, even in urban slums, provides a kind of fairy tale orientation in which a Jack mentality can be both celebrated and critiqued". He claims that Alger's intended audience were youths whose "motivations for action are effectively shaped by the lessons they learn".Geck notes that perception of the "pluck" characteristic of an Alger hero has changed over the decades. During the Jazz Age and the Great Depression, "the Horatio Alger plot was viewed from the perspective of the Progressive movement as a staunch defense of laissez-faire capitalism, yet at the same time criticizing the cutthroat business techniques and offering hope to a suffering young generation during the Great Depression". By the Atomic Age, however "Alger's hero was no longer a poor boy who, through determination and providence rose to middle-class respectability. He was instead the crafty street urchin who through quick wits and luck rose from impoverishment to riches".Geck observes that Alger's themes have been transformed in modern America from their original meanings into a Male Cinderella myth, and are an Americanization of the traditional Jack tales. Each story has its clever hero, its "fairy godmother", and obstacles and hindrances to the hero's rise. "However", he writes, "[T]he true Americanization of this fairy tale occurs in its subversion of this claiming of nobility; rather, the Alger hero achieves the American Dream in its nascent form, he gains a position of middle-class respectability that promises to lead wherever his motivation may take him". The reader may speculate what Cinderella achieved as Queen and what an Alger hero attained once his middle class status was stabilized and "[i]t is this commonality that fixes Horatio Alger firmly in the ranks of modern adaptors of the Cinderella myth".
SexualityScharnhorst writes that Alger "exercised a certain discretion in discussing his probable homosexuality" and was known to have mentioned his sexuality only once after the Brewster incident. In 1870 the elder Henry James wrote that Alger "talks freely about his own late insanity—which he in fact appears to enjoy as a subject of conversation". Although Alger was willing to speak to James, his sexuality was a closely guarded secret. According to Scharnhorst, Alger made veiled references to homosexuality in his boys' books and these references, Scharnhorst speculates, indicate Alger was "insecure with his sexual orientation". Alger wrote, for example, that it was difficult to distinguish whether Tattered Tom was a boy or a girl and in other instances he introduces foppish, effeminate, lisping "stereotypical homosexuals" who are treated with scorn and pity by others. In Silas Snobden's Office Boy, a kidnapped boy disguised as a girl is threatened with the "insane asylum" if he should reveal his actual sex. Scharnhorst believes Alger's desire to atone for his "secret sin" may have "spurred him to identify his own charitable acts of writing didactic books for boys with the acts of the charitable patrons in his books who wish to atone for a secret sin in their past by aiding the hero". Scharnhorst points out that the patron in Try and Trust, for example, conceals a "sad secret" from which he is redeemed only after saving the hero's life. Alan Trachtenberg of Yale University points out in his introduction to the Signet Classic edition of Ragged Dick (1990) that Alger had tremendous sympathy for boys and discovered a calling for himself in the composition of boys' books. "He learned to consult the boy in himself", Trachtenberg writes, "[T]o transmute and recast himself—his genteel culture, his liberal patrician sympathy for underdogs, his shaky economic status as an author, and not least, his dangerous erotic attraction to boys—into his juvenile fiction".  He observes that it is impossible to know whether Alger lived the life of a secret homosexual, "[b]ut there are hints that the male companionship he describes as a refuge from the streets—the cozy domestic arrangements between Dick and Fosdick, for example—may also be an erotic relationship". Trachtenberg observes that nothing prurient occurs in Ragged Dick but believes the few instances in Alger's work of two boys touching or a man and a boy touching "might arouse erotic wishes in readers prepared to entertain such fantasies". Such images, Trachtenberg believes, may imply "a positive view of homoeroticism as an alternative way of life, of living by sympathy rather than aggression". Trachtenberg concludes "[I]n Ragged Dick we see Alger plotting domestic romance, complete with a surrogate marriage of two homeless boys, as the setting for his formulaic metamorphosis of an outcast street boy into a self-respecting citizen". 
WorksAlger published about 100 poems and odes, most written by 1875. In 1853–54 he published short stories with Gleason's Pictorial Drawing-Room Companion and The Flag of Our Nation. Other Gleason publications printed about 100 stories before he began writing for Student and Schoolmate. Alger had many publishers over the decades. His first was A. K. Loring of Boston, and when Loring declared bankruptcy in 1881, Porter & Coates became his second and Henry T. Coates and Company his third. Other publishers include G. W. Carleton, J. S. Oglivie, John Anderson who published the biographies, A. L. Burt, Frank Munsey, Penn Publishing, and Street & Smith. M. A. Donahue and the New York Book Company published inexpensive paperback reprints by the thousands. It is believed there were at least 60 publishers releasing Alger. 

Title Date Genre Publication Synopsis/Notes 
"Voices of the Past" June 1849 Poem. Published in the Boston monthly magazine Pictorial National Library.  
Fair Harvard 1852    
"A Welcome to May" 1853 Poem.   
Bertha's Christmas Vision: An Autumn Sheaf 1856 Poems and Short Stories. Published by Brown, Bazin and Company of Boston. Alger's first book. 
Nothing to Do: A Tilt at Our Best Society 1857 Poem. Published anonymously by James French & Company. Satire about the idle upper classes. 
Nothing To Eat 1857    
He Has Gone, and I Have Sent Him! 1862 Poem. Published in Harper's Weekly Nov. 1862 Civil War poem. 
Marie Bertrand 1864 Adult Novel. Serialized by Street & Smith in the New York Weekly. A kidnapped young woman is reunited with her mother, a French countess. 
Frank's Campaign; or, What Boys Can Do on the Farm for the Camp 1864 Juvenile Novel. Published by A. K. Loring. First volume of the Campaign Series. Frank Frost manages the family farm when his father goes to war. Alger's first boys' book. Online at Gutenberg 
Paul Prescott's Charge: A Story for Boys 1865 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Second volume of the Campaign Series. A youth pays off his deceased father's debts. Online at Gutenberg 
Charlie Codman's Cruise: A Story for Boys 1866 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Third and final volume of the Campaign Series. A youth is shanghaied but restored to his home after adventures at sea. 
Helen Ford 1866 Adult Novel. Published by Loring. The tribulations of a young woman in NYC before she falls in love with a promising artist. 
Timothy Crump's Ward; or, The New Years Loan, And What Became of It 1866 Adult Novel. Published anonymously by Loring. Later reworked as Sam's Ward for the juvenile market. 
John Maynard: A Ballad of Lake Erie 1868 Poem. Published in Student and Schoolmate in January 1868 and then in various publications. A helmsman perishes at the wheel while the ship burns. Based on an actual incident. 
Ragged Dick; or, Street Life in New York with the Bootblacks 1868 Juvenile Novel. First serialized in twelve installments in Student and Schoolmate in 1867. Published by Loring in book format in 1868. First volume of the Ragged Dick Series. A New York City bootblack rises to middle class respectability through hard work, honesty, and determination. Alger's all-time bestseller. Online at Gutenberg 
Fame and Fortune; or, The Progress of Richard Hunter 1868 Juvenile Novel. First serialized in twelve installments in Student and Schoolmate.  Novelization published by Loring. Second volume of the Ragged Dick Series. Continues the story of Ragged Dick and his experiences after leaving bootblacking for an office job. Online at Gutenberg. 
Struggling Upward; or, Luke Larkin's Luck 1868 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Small town boy helps solve bank robbery. Online at Gutenberg 
Luck and Pluck; or, John Oakley's Inheritance 1869 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. First volume in the Luck and Pluck Series. 
Mark the Match Boy; or, Richard Hunter's Ward 1869 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Third volume in the Ragged Dick Series. 
Rough and Ready; or, Life Among the New York Newsboys 1869 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Fourth volume in the Ragged Dick Series. 
Ralph Raymond's Heir; or, The Merchant's Crime 1869 Short Story. Published under the pseudonym "Arthur Hamilton" for Gleason's Literary Companion.  
Ben The Luggage Boy; or, Among the Wharves 1870 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Fifth volume in the Ragged Dick Series. Boy runs away from home and struggles as a luggage carrier in New York. Online at Gutenberg. 
Rufus and Rose; or, The Fortunes of Rough and Ready 1870 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Sixth and final volume in the Ragged Dick Series. Sequel to Rough and Ready. Rufus and Rose try to avoid their evil stepfather. Online at Gutenberg 
Sink or Swim; or, Harry Raymond's Resolve 1870 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Second volume in the Luck and Pluck Series. 
Paul the Peddler; or the Fortunes of a Young Street Merchant 1871 Juvenile Novel. Serialized in Student and Schoolmate. Novelization published by Loring. Second volume in the Tattered Tom Series. Young entrepreneur goes from selling candy to owning a necktie stand. Online at Gutenberg 
Strong and Steady; or, Paddle Your Own Canoe 1871 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Third volume in the Luck and Pluck Series. 
Tattered Tom; or, The Story of a Street Arab 1871 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. First volume in the Tattered Tom Series. Jane Lindsay is a child streetsweeper. 
"Friar Anselmo" 1872 Poem.  A sinning cleric finds redemption in ministering to the sick. 
Phil the Fiddler; or, The Story of a Young Street Musician 1872 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Third volume in the Tattered Tom Series. Phil is an Italian boy enslaved by a padrone. 
Slow and Sure; The Story of Paul Hoffman the Young Street-Merchant 1872 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Fourth volume in the Tattered Tom Series. Sequel to Paul the Peddler. Paul moves from his street stall to a retail store. Online at Gutenberg 
Strive and Succeed; or, The Progress of Walter Conrad 1872 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Fourth volume in the Luck and Pluck Series. Online at University of Florida 
Bound to Rise; or, Up the Ladder 1873 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Seventh volume in the Luck and Pluck Series. 
Try and Trust; or, The Story of a Bound Boy 1873 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Fifth volume in the Luck and Pluck Series. 
Brave and Bold; or, The Fortunes of Robert Rushton 1874 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. First in the Brave and Bold Series. A youth searches for his sea captain father. 
Julius; or, The Street Boy Out West 1874 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Fifth volume in the Tattered Tom Series. A boy is resettled in the west through the agency of the Children's Aid Society. 
Risen from the Ranks; or, Harry Walton's Success 1874 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Sixth volume in the Luck and Pluck Series. 
Grand'ther Baldwin's Thanksgiving 1875 Poems.   
Herbert Carter's Legacy; or, The Inventor's Son 1875 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Eighth and last volume in the Luck and Pluck Series. A boy and his mother thwart a Squire foreclosing on their cottage. 
Jack's Ward; or, The Boy Guardian 1875 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Second volume in the Brave and Bold Series. Reworking of Timothy Crump's Ward. 
Seeking His Fortune, And Other Dialogues 1875    
St. Nicholas 1875    
The Young Outlaw; or, Adrift In The Streets 1875 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Sixth volume in the Tattered Tom Series. Sam Barlow resists reform. 
Sam's Chance; and How He Improved It 1876 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Seventh volume in the Tattered Tom Series. Sequel to The Young Outlaw. Sam improves and finds an office job. 
Shifting for Himself; or, Gilbert Greyson's Fortunes 1876 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Third volume in the Brave and Bold Series. A rich youth loses his fortune. 
Life of Edwin Forrest 1877 Biography   
The New Schoolma'am; or, A Summer in North Sparta 1877 Adult Novella. Published anonymously. A privileged young woman changes her name to teach school in New Hampshire. 
Wait and Hope; or, Ben Bradford's Motto 1877 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Fourth and last volume in the Brave and Bold Series. A mill boy is laid off but remains optimistic about his future. 
The Western Boy; or, The Road to Success 1878    
The Young Adventurer; or, Tom's Trip Across the Plains 1878 Juvenile novel. Published by Loring. First volume of the Pacific series. Western setting. A boy head west to find gold and help pay the mortgage. 
The Telegraph Boy 1879 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Eighth and last volume in the Tattered Tom Series. A penniless boy finds a job as a telegram messenger boy.  Last of the fourteen social reform novels begun with Ragged Dick. Online at University of Florida 
The Young Miner; or, Tom Nelson in California 1879 Juvenile Novel. Published by Loring. Western theme. Second volume of the Pacific series. 
Tony the Hero 1880    
The Young Explorer; or, Among the Sierras 1880 Juvenile novel. Published by Loring. Western theme. Third volume in the Pacific series 
From Canal Boy to President; or, The Boyhood and Manhood of James A. Garfield 1881 Biography Published by John R. Anderson  
Ben's Nugget; or, A Boy's Search for Fortune 1882 Juvenile novel. Published by Porter & Coates after Loring declares bankruptcy. Western theme. Fourth and final volume in the Pacific series. 
From Farm Boy to Senator: Being the History of the Boyhood and Manhood of Daniel Webster 1882 Biography Published by J. S. Ogilvie and Company. Originally published in serialization by Street & Smith, 1860s. 
Abraham Lincoln: the Backwoods Boy; or, How A Young Rail-Splitter Became President 1883 Biography Published by John R. Anderson.  
The Train Boy 1883    
The Young Circus Rider; or, The Mystery of Robert Rudd 1883    
Dan, the Detective 1884    
Do and Dare; or A Brave Boy's Fight for Fortune 1884    
Hector's Inheritance; or, The Boys of Smith Institute 1885    
Helping Himself; or, Grant Thornton's Ambition 1886   Online at UFL 
Frank Fowler, the Cash Boy 1887    
Number 91; or, The Adventures of a New York Telegraph Boy 1887    
The Store Boy; or, The Fortunes of Ben Barclay 1887    
Bob Burton; or, The Young Ranchman of the Missouri 1888  Published by The World Syndicate Publishing Co., Cleveland, O./NY, NY  
The Errand Boy; or, How Phil Brent Won Success 1888    
Tom Temple's Career 1888    
Tom Thatcher's Fortune 1888    
Tom Tracy 1888    
The Young Acrobat of the Great North American Circus 1888 Juvenile novel.  Circus theme suggested by P. T. Barnum. First serialized in The Golden Argosy. 
Luke Walton; or, The Chicago Newsboy 1889    
The Erie Train Boy 1890    
Five Hundred Dollars; or, Jacob Marlowe's Secret 1890    
Mark Stanton 1890    
Ned Newton; or, The Fortunes of a New York Bootblack 1890 Juvenile novel.  First serialized in The Golden Argosy. 
A New York Boy 1890    
The Odds Against Him; or, Carl Crawford's Experience 1890    
Dean Dunham; or, The Waterford Mystery 1891    
Digging for Gold. A Story of California 1892    
The Young Boatman of Pine Point 1892    
Cast Upon the Breakers 1893    
Facing the World; or, The Haps and Mishaps of Harry Vane 1893    
In a New World; or, Among the Gold-Fields of Australia 1893    
Only an Irish Boy; Or, Andy Burke's Fortunes and Misfortunes 1894    
Victor Vane, The Young Secretary 1894    
The Disagreeable Woman; A Social Mystery 1895 Adult Novel G. W. Carleton Alger's last adult novel. Only one copy is known and held in the Library of Congress. 
Frank Hunter's Peril 1896    
The Young Salesman 1896    
Frank and Fearless; or, The Fortunes of Jasper Kent 1897    
Walter Sherwood's Probation 1897    
A Boy's Fortune; or, The Strange Adventures of Ben Baker 1898    
The Young Bank Messenger 1898   Online at Gutenberg. 
Jed the Poorhouse Boy 1899 Juvenile novel.  A poorhouse boy is discovered to be an English baronet. 
Mark Mason's Victory; or, The Trials and Triumphs of a Telegraph Boy 1899    
Rupert's Ambition 1899    
Silas Snobden's Office Boy 1899  Doubleday Originally serialized by Argosy under the pseudonym Arthur Lee Putnam. 
A Debt of Honor. The Story of Gerald Lane's Success in the Far West 1900    
Falling in With Fortune; or, The Experiences of a Young Secretary 1900    
Out for Business; or, Robert Frost's Strange Career 1900    
Ben Bruce. Scenes in the Life of a Bowery Newsboy 1901    
Lester's Luck 1901    
Nelson the Newsboy; or, Afloat in New York 1901    
Tom Brace: Who He Was and How He Fared 1901    
Young Captain Jack; or, The Son of a Soldier 1901 Juvenile Novel  Originally serialized in Golden Hours. Promoted as Alger's last work. Completed by Edward Stratemeyer as Arthur M. Winfield. 
Adrift in the City; or, Oliver Conrad's Plucky Fight 1902    
Andy Grant's Pluck 1902    
A Rolling Stone; or, The Adventures of a Wanderer 1902    
Striving for Fortune; or, Walter Griffith's Trials and Successes 1902    
Tom Turner's Legacy 1902    
The World Before Him 1902    
Bernard Brooks' Adventures. The Story of a Brave Boy's Trials 1903    
Chester Rand; or, A New Path to Fortune 1903    
Forging Ahead 1903    
Adrift in New York; or, Tom and Florence Braving the World 1904    
Finding a Fortune 1904    
Jerry the Backwoods Boy; or, The Parkhurst Treasure 1904    
Lost at Sea; or, Robert Roscoe's Strange Cruise 1904    
From Farm to Fortune; or Nat Nason's Strange Experience 1905    
Making His Mark 1905    
Mark Manning's Mission. The Story of a Shoe Factory Boy 1905    
The Young Book Agent; or, Frank Hardy's Road to Success 1905    
Joe the Hotel Boy, or Winning Out by Pluck 1906    
Randy of the River; or, The Adventures of a Young Deckhand 1906    
The Young Musician; or, Fighting His Way 1906    
Ben Logan's Triumph; or, The Boys of Boxwood Academy 1908    
Wait and Win. The Story of Jack Drummond's Pluck 1908    
Robert Coverdale's Struggle; or, On the Wave of Success 1910    
Joe's Luck; or Always Wide Awake 1913    
The Cousin's Conspiracy     
In Search of Treasure. The Story of Guy's Eventful Voyage     

Notes 
References

 
 
 
 
 
 


Research resources

The Papers of Horatio Alger, 1880–1953 (990 pieces) are housed at the Huntington Library.
H. Jack Barker Papers, undated (3 liner feet) are housed at Emory University's Manuscripts, Archives, & Rare Book Library.
Seligman Family papers, 1877–1934 (0.8 linear feet) are housed at American Jewish Archives (Cincinnati, Ohio).


Further reading

Nackenoff, Carol. "The Horatio Alger Myth". In Myth America: A Historical Anthology, Volume II. 1997. Gerster, Patrick, and Cords, Nicholas. (editors.) Brandywine Press, St. James, NY. ISBN 1-881089-97-5
 


External links 
 

Works by or about Horatio Alger at Internet Archive (scanned books original editions color illustrated)
  (plain text and HTML)
The Complete "Ragged Dick" Series on kindle.
Horatio Alger Books On-Line 2 18 of Alger's works (with A Fancy of Hers, unique to this collection)
Horatio Alger Books On-Line 3 3 of Alger's works (with The Maniac's Secret, unique to this collection)
Horatio Alger research page at the University of Rochester
Horatio Alger Society Home Page
The Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans
The Horatio Alger Collection at Northern Illinois University
The Horatio Alger Fellowship for the Study of American Popular Culture at Northern Illinois University

  
DEFAULTSORT








 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Arthur Schnitzler
 
 Arthur Schnitzler (15 May 1862 – 21 October 1931) was an Austrian author and dramatist.
Private lifeArthur Schnitzler, son of a prominent Hungarian laryngologist Johann Schnitzler (1835-1893) and Luise Markbreiter (1838-1911) a daughter of the Viennese doctor Philipp Markbreiter, was born in Praterstraße 16, Leopoldstadt, Vienna, in the Austro-Hungarian Empire. His parents were both from Jewish families.  He began studying medicine at the University of Vienna in 1879 and received his doctorate of medicine in 1885 and worked at Vienna's General Hospital ( ), but ultimately abandoned medicine in favour of writing.On 26 August 1903, Schnitzler married 21-year old aspiring actress and singer Olga Gussmann (1882-1970) who came from a Jewish middle class family. They had a son together, Heinrich (1902-1982), who was born on 9 August 1902. In 1909 they had a daughter, Lili (1909-1928), who committed suicide. The Schnitzlers separated in 1921. Schnitzler died on 21 October 1931, in Vienna, of a brain hemorrhage. Heinrich went to the United States in 1938, following the Anschluss, and did not return to Austria until 1959. Heinrich is the father of the Austrian musician and ecologist Michael Schnitzler, born in 1944 in Berkeley, California. He moved to Vienna with his parents in 1959. 
Literary worksHis works were often controversial, both for their frank description of sexuality (Sigmund Freud, in a letter to Schnitzler, confessed "I have gained the impression that you have learned through intuition — though actually as a result of sensitive introspection — everything that I have had to unearth by laborious work on other persons")  and for their strong stand against anti-Semitism, represented by works such as his play Professor Bernhardi and the novel Der Weg ins Freie. However, though Schnitzler was himself Jewish, Professor Bernhardi and Fräulein Else are among the few clearly identified Jewish protagonists in his work. Schnitzler was branded as a pornographer after the release of his play Reigen, in which ten pairs of characters are shown before and after the sexual act, leading and ending with a prostitute. The furore after this play was couched in the strongest anti-semitic terms.  Reigen was made into a French language film in 1950 by the German-born director Max Ophüls as La Ronde. The film achieved considerable success in the English-speaking world, with the result that Schnitzler's play is better known there under Ophüls' French title. 
More recently, in the film 360, the Schnitlzler play had a new version.In the novella Fräulein Else (1924), Schnitzler may be rebutting a contentious critique of the Jewish character by Otto Weininger (1903) by positioning the sexuality of the young female Jewish protagonist. Race, Andrew Barker, Sex and Character in Schnitzler's Fräulein Else, 
German Life and Letters. v. 54(1):1–9  The story, a first-person stream of consciousness narrative by a young aristocratic woman, reveals a moral dilemma that ends in tragedy. In response to an interviewer who asked Schnitzler what he thought about the critical view that his works all seemed to treat the same subjects, he replied, "I write of love and death. What other subjects are there?"[source?]  Despite his seriousness of purpose, Schnitzler frequently approaches the bedroom farce in his plays (and had an affair with one of his actresses, Adele Sandrock). Professor Bernhardi, a play about a Jewish doctor who turns away a Catholic priest in order to spare a patient the realization that she is on the point of death, is his only major dramatic work without a sexual theme.A member of the avant-garde group Young Vienna (Jung Wien), Schnitzler toyed with formal as well as social conventions. With his 1900 short story Lieutenant Gustl, he was the first to write German fiction in stream-of-consciousness narration. The story is an unflattering portrait of its protagonist and of the army's obsessive code of formal honour. It caused Schnitzler to be stripped of his commission as a reserve officer in the medical corps — something that should be seen against the rising tide of anti-semitism of the time. He specialized in shorter works like novellas and one-act plays. And in his short stories like "The Green Tie" ("Die grüne Krawatte") he showed himself to be one of the early masters of microfiction. However he also wrote two full-length novels: Der Weg ins Freie about a talented but not very motivated young composer, a brilliant description of a segment of pre-World War I Viennese society; and the artistically less satisfactory Therese. In addition to his plays and fiction, Schnitzler meticulously kept a diary from the age of 17 until two days before his death. The manuscript, which runs to almost 8,000 pages, is most notable for Schnitzler's casual descriptions of sexual conquests — he was often in relationships with several women at once, and for a period of some years he kept a record of every orgasm. Collections of Schnitzler's letters have also been published.Schnitzler's works were called "Jewish filth" by Adolf Hitler and were banned by the Nazis in Austria and Germany. In 1933, when Joseph Goebbels organized book burnings in Berlin and other cities, Schnitzler's works were thrown into flames along with those of other Jews, including Einstein, Marx, Kafka, Freud and Stefan Zweig. 
Selected works
Plays

Anatol (1893), a series of seven acts revolving around a bourgeois playboy and his immature relationships.
Flirtation (Liebelei – 1895), also known as The Reckoning, which was made into a film by Max Ophüls and adapted as Dalliance by Tom Stoppard (1986)  and Sweet Nothings by David Harrower for the Young Vic in 2010. 
Fair Game (Freiwild – 1896)
"Light-'O-Love" (1896)

Reigen (1897), more usually called La Ronde is still frequently presented. Max Ophüls directed the first movie adaptation of the play in 1950; Roger Vadim directed a second version in 1964, and Otto Schenk a third version in 1973. In 1998, it was reworked by British playwright David Hare as The Blue Room.  It was also adapted by theatrical songwriter Michael John LaChiusa into an Off-Broadway musical called Hello Again in 1994.
Paracelsus (1899)
The Green Cockatoo (Der grüne Kakadu – 1899)
The Lonely Way (Der einsame Weg – 1903)
Intermezzo (Zwischenspiel – 1904)
Der Ruf des Lebens (1906)
Countess Mizzi or the Family Reunion (Komtesse Mizzi oder Der Familientag – 1907)
Living Hours (1911)
Young Medardus (Der junge Medardus – 1910)
The Vast Domain (Das weite Land – 1911). The play was adapted as Undiscovered Country by Tom Stoppard (1979).  Three film versions of this play have been made, the first by Ernst Lothar in 1960 with Attila Hörbiger as Hofreiter, the second by Peter Beauvais in 1970 with O. W. Fischer, the third one in 1986 by Luc Bondy and starring Michel Piccoli.
Professor Bernhardi (1912)
The Comedy of Seduction (Komödie der Verführung – 1924)


Novels

Beatrice (1901)
The Road Into the Open (Der Weg ins Freie – 1908)
Therese. Chronik eines Frauenlebens (1928)


Short stories and novellas

Dying (Sterben – 1895)
None but the Brave (Leutnant Gustl – 1900)
Berta Garlan (1900)
Blind Geronimo and his Brother (Der blinde Geronimo und sein Bruder – 1902)
The Prophecy (Die Weissagung – 1905)
Casanova's Homecoming (Casanovas Heimfahrt – 1918)
Fräulein Else (1924)
Rhapsody - also published as Dream Story (Traumnovelle – 1925/26), later adapted as the film Eyes Wide Shut by American director Stanley Kubrick)
Night Games (Spiel im Morgengrauen – 1926)
Flight into Darkness (Flucht in die Finsternis – 1931)
The Death of a Bachelor


Nonfiction

Youth in Vienna (Jugend in Wien), an autobiography published posthumously in 1968
Diary, 1879–1931
Comedies of Words and Other Plays (1917)


Publications

Theodor Reik Arthur Schnitzler als Psycholog (Minden, 1913)
H. B. Samuel Modernities (London, 1913)
J. G. Huneker Ivory, Apes, and Peacocks (New York, 1915)
Ludwig Lewisohn The Modern Drama (New York, 1915)


See also

Schnitzler (disambiguation)


References 
External links 
 

PushkinPress.com English editions of works by the author
 
 
 
Additional works by Arthur Schnitzler (eLibrary Projekt – eLib)
Schnitzler Archive, a research institution at the german Freiburg University which holds a copy of Schnitzler's literary estate such as drafts of his works and some unpublished works

 
 
DEFAULTSORT









 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Boris Spassky
 Boris Vasilievich Spassky (also Spasskij;  ; born January 30, 1937) is a Soviet-French chess grandmaster. He was the tenth World Chess Champion, holding the title from 1969 to 1972. He is known as one of the greatest living chess players, and is the oldest living world champion.Spassky won the Soviet Chess Championship twice outright (1961, 1973), and twice lost in playoffs (1956, 1963), after tying for first place during the event proper. He was a World Chess Championship candidate on seven occasions (1956, 1965, 1968, 1974, 1977, 1980, and 1985).Spassky defeated Tigran Petrosian in 1969 to become World Champion, then lost the title in the Fischer–Spassky match in 1972 – one of the most famous chess matches in history.
Early lifeHe was born in Leningrad (now Saint Petersburg) to a Russian mother and father, and learned to play chess at the age of five on a train evacuating from Leningrad during World War II. He first drew wide attention in 1947 at age ten, when he defeated Soviet champion Mikhail Botvinnik in a simultaneous exhibition in Leningrad.  His early coach was Vladimir Zak, a respected master and trainer. During his youth, from the age of ten, Spassky often worked on chess for several hours a day with master-level coaches. He set records as the youngest Soviet player to achieve first category rank (age ten), candidate master rank (age eleven), and Soviet Master rank (age fifteen). In 1952, at fifteen, Spassky scored 50 percent in the Soviet Championship semifinal at Riga, and placed second in the Leningrad Championship that same year, being highly praised by Botvinnik.
Career

Young grandmasterSpassky made his international debut in 1953, aged sixteen, in Bucharest, Romania, finishing equal fourth  with Laszlo Szabo on 12/19, an event won by his trainer, Alexander Tolush. At Bucharest he defeated Vasily Smyslov, who would challenge for the World Championship the following year. He was awarded the title of International Master by FIDE. In his first attempt at the Soviet Championship final, the 22nd in the series, held in Moscow 1955, Spassky tied for third place with 11½/19,  after Smyslov and Efim Geller, which was sufficient to qualify him for the Gothenburg Interzonal later that year.The same year, he won the World Junior Chess Championship held at Antwerp, Belgium, scoring 6/7 to qualify for the final,  then 8/9 in the final to win by a full point over Edmar Mednis.  Spassky competed for the Lokomotiv Voluntary Sports Society.By sharing seventh place with 11/20 at Gothenburg,  Spassky qualified for the 1956 Candidates' Tournament, held in Amsterdam, automatically gaining the grandmaster title, and was then the youngest to hold the title. At Amsterdam, he tied for third place with four others in the ten-player field, scoring 9½/18.  At the 23rd Soviet final, held in Leningrad in January–February 1956,  Spassky shared first place on 11½/19, with Mark Taimanov and Yuri Averbakh, but Taimanov won the subsequent playoff to become champion,  defeating Spassky in both their games. Spassky then tied for first in a semifinal for the 24th Soviet championship, thereby qualifying. 
Uneven resultsSpassky then went into a slump in world championship qualifying events, failing to advance to the next two Interzonals (1958 and 1962), a prerequisite to earn the right to play for the world championship. This crisis coincided with the hard three final years of his first marriage before his divorce in 1961,  the same year that he broke with his trainer Tolush.In the 24th Soviet final, played at Moscow in January–February 1957, Spassky shared fourth place with Tolush,  as both scored 13/21, while Mikhail Tal won the first of his six Soviet titles, which began his ascent to the world title in 1960.Spassky's failure to qualify for the Portoroz Interzonal came after a last-round defeat at the hands of Tal, in a nervy game in the 1958 Soviet championship,  held at Riga. Spassky had the advantage for much of the game, but missed a difficult win after adjournment, then declined a draw. A win would have qualified Spassky for the Interzonal, and a draw would have ensured a share of fourth place with Yuri Averbakh, with qualification possible via a playoff.Spassky tied for first place at Moscow 1959 on 7/11, with Smyslov and David Bronstein.  He shared second place in the 26th Soviet final with Tal, at Tbilisi 1959, finishing a point behind champion Tigran Petrosian, on 12½/19.  Soon after Spassky notched a victory at Riga 1959, with 11½/13, one-half point in front of Vladas Mikenas.  Spassky finished in a tie for ninth at the 27th Soviet final in Leningrad, with 10/19, as fellow Leningrader Viktor Korchnoi scored his first of four Soviet titles.  Spassky travelled to Argentina, where he shared first place with Bobby Fischer, two points ahead of Bronstein, at Mar del Plata 1960 on 13½/15,  defeating Fischer in their first career meeting.Another disappointment for Spassky came at the qualifier for the next Interzonal, the Soviet final, played in Moscow 1961,  where he again lost a crucial last-round game, this to Leonid Stein, who thus qualified, as Spassky finished equal fifth with 11/19, while Petrosian won.
Title contenderSpassky decided upon a switch in trainers, from the volatile attacker Alexander Tolush to the calmer strategist Igor Bondarevsky. This proved the key to his resurgence. He won his first of two USSR titles in the 29th Soviet championship at Baku 1961, with a score of 14½/20, one-half point ahead of Lev Polugaevsky.  Spassky shared second with Polugaevsky at Havana 1962 with 16/21, behind winner Miguel Najdorf.  He placed joint fifth, with Leonid Stein at the 30th Soviet championship held in Yerevan 1962, with 11½/19.  At Leningrad 1963, the site of the 31st Soviet final, Spassky tied for first with Stein and Ratmir Kholmov,  with Stein winning the playoff, which was held in 1964.  Spassky won at Belgrade 1964 with an undefeated 13/17, as Korchnoi and Borislav Ivkov shared second place with 11½.  He finished fourth at Sochi 1964 with 9½/15, as Nikolai Krogius won. In the 1964 Soviet Zonal at Moscow, a seven-player double round-robin event, Spassky won with 7/12, overcoming a start of one draw and two losses, to advance to the Amsterdam Interzonal the same year.  At Amsterdam, he tied for first place, along with Mikhail Tal, Vasily Smyslov and Bent Larsen on 17/23, with all four, along with Borislav Ivkov and Lajos Portisch  thus qualifying for the newly created Candidates' Matches the next year. With Bondarevsky, Spassky's style broadened and deepened, with poor results mostly banished, yet his fighting spirit was even enhanced. He added psychology and surprise to his quiver, and this proved enough to eventually propel him to the top.
ChallengerSpassky was considered an all-rounder on the chess board, and his adaptable "universal style" was a distinct advantage in beating many top grandmasters. In the 1965 cycle, he beat Paul Keres in the quarterfinal round at Riga 1965 with careful strategy, triumphing in the last game to win 6–4 (+4 −2 =4).  Also at Riga, he defeated Efim Geller with mating attacks, winning by 5½–2½ (+3 −0 =5).  Then, in his Candidates' Final match against Mikhail Tal at Tbilisi 1965, Spassky often managed to steer play into quieter positions, either avoiding former champion Tal's tactical strength, or extracting too high a price for complications. Though losing the first game, he won by 7–4 (+4 −1 =6). Spassky won two tournaments in the run-up to the final. He shared first at the third Chigorin Memorial in Sochi, in 1965 with Wolfgang Unzicker on 10½/15,  then tied for first at Hastings 1965–66 with Wolfgang Uhlmann on 7½/9. Spassky lost a keenly fought match to Petrosian in Moscow, with three wins against Petrosian's four, with seventeen draws,  though the last of his three victories came only in the twenty-third game, after Petrosian had ensured his retention of the title, the first outright match victory for a reigning champion since the latter of Alekhine's successful defences against Bogoljubov in 1934.  Spassky's first event after the title match was the fourth Chigorin Memorial, where he finished tied for fifth with Anatoly Lein as Korchnoi won.  Spassky then finished ahead of Petrosian and a super-class field at Santa Monica 1966 (the Piatigorsky Cup), with 11½/18, half a point ahead of Bobby Fischer, as he overcame the American grandmaster's challenge after Fischer had scored 3½/9 in the first cycle of the event.  Spassky also won at Beverwijk 1967 with 11/15,  one-half point ahead of Anatoly Lutikov, and shared first place at Sochi 1967 on 10/15 with Krogius, Alexander Zaitsev, Leonid Shamkovich, and Vladimir Simagin. As losing finalist in 1966, Spassky was automatically seeded into the next Candidates' cycle. In 1968, he faced Geller again, this time at Sukhumi, and won by the same margin as in 1965 (5½–2½, +3 −0 =5).  He next met Bent Larsen at Malmö, and again won by the score of 5½–2½ after winning the first three games.  The final was against his Leningrad rival Korchnoi at Kiev, and Spassky triumphed (+4 −1 =5),  which earned him another match with Petrosian. Spassky's final tournament appearance before the match came at Palma, where he shared second place (+10 −1 =6) with Larsen, a point behind Korchnoi.  Spassky's flexibility of style was the key to victory over Petrosian, by 12½–10½,  with the site again being Moscow.
World ChampionIn Spassky's first appearance after winning the crown, he placed first at San Juan in October 1969 with 11½/15, one and one-half points clear of second.  He then played the annual event at Palma, where he finished fifth with 10/17. While Spassky was undefeated and handed tournament victor Larsen one of his three losses, his fourteen draws kept him from seriously contending for first prize, as he came two points behind Larsen.  In March–April 1970, Spassky played first board for the Soviet side in the celebrated USSR vs. World event at Belgrade,  where he scored +1 −1 =1 in the first three rounds against Larsen before Stein replaced him for the final match, as the Soviets won by the odd point, 20½–19½. He won a quadrangular event at Leiden 1970 with 7/12, a point ahead of Jan Hein Donner, who was followed by Larsen and Botvinnik, the latter of whom was making what would be his final appearance in serious play.  Spassky shared first at the annual IBM event held in Amsterdam 1970 with Polugaevsky on 11½/15.  He was third at Gothenburg 1971 with 8/11,  behind winners Vlastimil Hort and Ulf Andersson. He shared first with Hans Ree at the 1971 Canadian Open in Vancouver. In November and December, Spassky finished the year by tying for sixth with Tal, scoring +4 −2 =11, at the Alekhine Memorial in Moscow, which was won by Stein and Anatoly Karpov,  the latter's first top-class success.
Championship match with Fischer
Spassky's reign as world champion lasted three years, as he lost to Fischer of the United States in 1972 in the "Match of the Century". The contest took place in Reykjavík, Iceland, at the height of the Cold War, and consequently was seen as symbolic of the political confrontation between the two superpowers. Spassky accommodated many demands by Fischer, including moving the third game into a side room. The Fischer vs Spassky World championship was the most widely covered chess match in history, as mainstream media throughout the world covered the match. Secretary of State Henry Kissinger spoke with Fischer urging him to play the match, and chess was at its apex. The match could not have occurred without Spassky's tremendous sportsmanship, accommodating many demands of Fischer, refusing to use these demands as an opportunity to win by forfeit.Going into the match, Fischer had never won a game from Spassky in five attempts, losing three. In addition, Spassky had secured Geller as his coach, who also had a plus score against Fischer. However, Fischer was in excellent form, and won the title match convincingly (+7 −3 =11), with one of the three losses by default.The match could be divided into halves, the first won convincingly by Fischer, and the second a close battle. Before Spassky, Mark Taimanov, Larsen, and Petrosian, had lost convincingly to Fischer, but Spassky maintained his composure and competitiveness.
Ex-champion (1973–85)In February–March 1973, Spassky finished equal third at Tallinn with 9/15, three points behind Tal;  he tied for first at Dortmund on 9½/15 (+5 −1 =9) with Hans-Joachim Hecht and Ulf Andersson.  Spassky finished in fourth place at the annual IBM tournament held in Amsterdam,  one point behind winners Petrosian and Albin Planinc. In September, Spassky went 10/15 to finish second to Tal in the Chigorin Memorial at Sochi by a point.  In the 41st Soviet Championship  at Moscow, Spassky scored 11½/17 to win by a full point in a field which included all the top Soviet grandmasters of the time.
In the 1974 Candidates' matches, Spassky first defeated American Robert Byrne in San Juan, Puerto Rico by 4½–1½ (+3 −0 =3);  he then lost the semifinal match to Anatoly Karpov in Leningrad, despite winning the first game, (+1 −4 =6).  In Spassky's only tournament action of 1974, he played at Solingen, finishing with 8½/14 (+4 −1 =9), thus sharing third with Bojan Kurajica, behind joint winners Lubomir Kavalek and Polugaevsky, who scored 10. During 1975, Spassky played two events, the first being the annual tournament at Tallinn, where he finished equal second with Fridrik Olafsson, scoring 9½/15 (+5 −1 =9), one point behind Keres,  the last international event won by the latter before his sudden death in June 1975. In October–November, Spassky finished second to Geller at the Alekhine Memorial in Moscow with a score of 10 points from fifteen games (+6 −1 =8). In 1976, Spassky was obliged to return to the Interzonal stage, and finished in a tie for tenth place in Manila,  well short of qualifying for the Candidates matches, but was nominated to play after Fischer declined his place. Spassky won an exhibition match with Dutch grandmaster Jan Timman at Amsterdam 1977 by 4–2.  He triumphed in extra games in his quarterfinal Candidates' match over Vlastimil Hort at Reykjavík 1977 by 8½–7½.  This match saw Spassky fall ill, exhaust all his available rest days while recovering ; then the healthy Hort used one of his own rest days, to allow Spassky more time to recover; Spassky eventually won the match.Spassky won an exhibition match over Robert Hübner at Solingen, 1977 by 3½–2½,  then defeated Lubomir Kavalek, also at Solingen, by 4–2 in another exhibition.  His next Candidates' match was against Portisch at Geneva 1977, and Spassky won by 8½–6½, to qualify for the final.  At Belgrade 1977–78, Spassky lost to Korchnoi, by (+4 −7 =7).  In this match, Spassky fell behind 2½–7½ after losing the tenth game; however, he then won four consecutive games. After draws in games fifteen and sixteen, Korchnoi won the next two games to clinch the match by the score of 10½–7½.Spassky, as losing finalist, was seeded into the 1980 Candidates' matches, and faced Portisch again, with this match held in Mexico. After fourteen games, the match was 7–7, but Portisch advanced since he had won more games with the black pieces.  Spassky missed qualification from the 1982 Toluca Interzonal with 8/13, finishing half a point short, in third place behind Portisch and Eugenio Torre,  both of whom thus qualified. The 1985 Candidates' event was held as a round-robin tournament at Montpellier, France, and Spassky was nominated as an organizer's choice. He scored 8/15 to tie for sixth place with Alexander Beliavsky, behind joint winners Andrei Sokolov, Rafael Vaganian, and Artur Yusupov, and one-half point short of potentially qualifying via a playoff.  This was Spassky's last appearance at the Candidates' level.
International team resultsSpassky played five times for the USSR in Student Olympiads, winning eight medals. He scored 38½/47 (+31 −1 =15), for 81.91 percent. His complete results are:

Lyon 1955, board 2, 7½/8 (+7 −0 =1), team gold, board gold;
Reykjavík 1957, board 2, 7/9 (+5 −0 =4), team gold, board gold;
Varna 1958, board 2, 6½/9 (+4 −0 =5), team gold;
Leningrad 1960, board 1, 10/12 (+9 −1 =2), team silver;
Marianske Lazne 1962, board 1, 7½/9 (+6 −0 =3), team gold, board gold.  

Spassky played twice for the USSR in the European Team Championships, winning four gold medals. He scored 8½/12 (+5 −0 =7), for 70.83 percent. His complete results are:

Vienna 1957, board 5, 3½/5 (+2 −0 =3), team gold, board gold;
Bath, Somerset 1973, board 1, 5/7 (+3 −0 =4), team gold, board gold.   

Spassky played seven times for the Soviet Olympiad team. He won thirteen medals, and scored 69/94 (+45 −1 =48), for 73.40 percent. His complete results are:

Varna 1962, board 3, 11/14 (+8 −0 =6), team gold, board gold medal;
Tel Aviv 1964, 2nd reserve, 10½/13 (+8 −0 =5), team gold, board bronze;
Havana 1966, board 2, 10/15, team gold.
Lugano 1968, board 2, 10/14, team gold, board bronze;
Siegen 1970, board 1, 9½/12, team gold, board gold;
Nice 1974, board 3, 11/15, board gold, team gold;
Buenos Aires 1978, board 1, 7/11 (+4 −1 =6), team silver. 

Spassky played board one in the USSR vs. Rest of the World match at Belgrade 1970, scoring (+1 −1 =1) against Larsen.Spassky then represented France in three Olympiads, on board one in each case. For Thessaloniki 1984, he scored 8/14 (+2 −0 =12). At Dubai 1986, he scored 9/14 (+4 −0 =10). Finally at Thessaloniki 1988, he scored 7½/13 (+3 −1 =9). He also played board one for France at the inaugural World Team Championships, Lucerne 1985, where he scored 5½/9 (+3 −1 =5).
Later tournament career (after 1976)
In his later years, Spassky showed a reluctance to totally devote himself to chess. Since 1976, Spassky has lived in France with his third wife; he became a French citizen in 1978, and has competed for France in the Chess Olympiads.Spassky did, however, score some notable triumphs in his later years. In his return to tournament play after the loss to Korchnoi, he tied for first at Bugojno 1978 on 10/15 with Karpov,  both players scoring +6 -1 =8 to finish a point ahead of Timman. He was clear first at Montilla–Moriles 1978 with 6½/9.  At Munich 1979, he tied for first place with 8½/13,  with Yuri Balashov, Andersson and Robert Hübner.  He shared first at Baden in 1980, on 10½/15 with Alexander Beliavsky.  He won his preliminary group at Hamburg 1982 with 5½/6, but lost the final playoff match to Anatoly Karpov in extra games.  His best result during this period was clear first at Linares 1983 with 6½/10, ahead of Karpov and Ulf Andersson, who shared second. At London Lloyds' Bank Open 1984, he tied for first with John Nunn and Murray Chandler, on 7/9. He won at Reykjavík 1985. At Brussels 1985, he placed second with 10½/13 behind Korchnoi. At Reggio Emilia 1986, he tied for 2nd–5th places with 6/11 behind Zoltán Ribli. He swept Fernand Gobet 4–0 in a match at Fribourg 1987. He finished equal first at Wellington 1988 with Chandler and Eduard Gufeld. Spassky maintained a top ten world ranking into the mid-1980s.However, Spassky's performances in the World Cup events of 1988 and 1989 showed that he could by this stage finish no higher than the middle of the pack against elite fields. At Belfort WC 1988, he scored 8/15 for a joint 4th–7th place, as Garry Kasparov won. At Reykjavík WC 1988, he scored 7/17 for a joint 15th–16th place, with Kasparov again winning. Finally, at Barcelona WC 1989, Spassky scored 7½/16 for a tied 8th–12th place, as Kasparov shared first with Ljubomir Ljubojević.Spassky played in the 1990 French Championship at Angers, placing fourth with 10½/15, as Marc Santo Roman won. At Salamanca 1991, he placed 2nd with 7½/11 behind winner Evgeny Vladimirov. Then in the 1991 French Championship, he scored 9½/15 for a tied 4th–5th place, as Santo Roman won again.In 1992, Bobby Fischer, after a twenty-year hiatus from chess, re-emerged to arrange a "Revenge Match of the 20th century" against Spassky in Montenegro and Belgrade; this was a rematch of the 1972 World Championship. At the time, Spassky was rated 106th in the FIDE rankings, and Fischer did not appear on the list at all, owing to his inactivity. This match was essentially Spassky's last major challenge. Spassky lost the match with a score of +5 −10 =15. Spassky then played young female prodigy Judit Polgár in a 1993 match at Budapest, losing narrowly by 4½–5½.Spassky continued to play occasional events through much of the 1990s, such as the Veterans versus Women series.On October 1, 2006, Spassky suffered a minor stroke during a chess lecture in San Francisco. In his first major post-stroke play, he drew a six-game rapid match with Hungarian Grandmaster Lajos Portisch in April 2007.On September 23, 2010, ChessBase reported that Spassky had suffered a more serious stroke that had left him paralyzed on his left side.  After that he returned to France for a long rehabilitation programme.   On August 16, 2012, Spassky left France to return to Russia under disputed circumstances.    Spassky is the oldest living former world champion.
Legacy
 
Spassky's best years were as a youthful prodigy in the mid 1950s, and then again as an adult in the mid to late 1960s. He seemed to lose ambition once he became World Champion. Some suggest the first match with Fischer took a severe nervous toll, but others would disagree as he was a sportsman who appreciated his opponent's skill. He applauded one well-played game of Fischer, and attempted to defend Fischer when he faced jailing.Some might suggest his preparation was largely bypassed by Fischer, but the match saw several important novelties by Spassky. Instead, Fischer was an incredible player in 1972, having won an unprecedented 20 games in a row, and Spassky probably showed he was number 2, and the match saw many enjoyable games. While one suggested he felt the disappointment of his nation for losing the title, others would say he conceived of himself as his own man and after the match took French citizenship. He had the equanimity to appreciate what was the chess event of the century, as chess occupied the spotlight for almost a year.Never a true openings maven, at least when compared to contemporaries such as Geller and Fischer, he excelled in the middlegame with highly imaginative yet usually sound and deeply planned play, which could erupt into tactical violence as needed.Spassky succeeded with a wide variety of openings, including the King's Gambit, 1.e4 e5 2.f4, an aggressive and risky line rarely seen at the top level. Indeed, his record of sixteen wins (including victories against Fischer, Bronstein, and Karpov), no losses, and a few draws with the King's Gambit is unmatched.  The chess game between "Kronsteen" and "McAdams" in the early part of the James Bond movie From Russia With Love is based on a game in that opening played between Spassky and David Bronstein in 1960 in which Spassky ("Kronsteen") was victorious. His contributions to opening theory extend to reviving the Marshall Attack for Black in the Ruy Lopez (1.e4 e5 2.Nf3 Nc6 3.Bb5 a6 4.Ba4 Nf6 5.0-0 Be7 6.Re1 b5 7.Bb3 0-0 8.c3 d5), developing the Leningrad Variation for White in the Nimzo-Indian Defence (1.d4 Nf6 2.c4 e6 3.Nc3 Bb4 4.Bg5), the Spassky Variation on the Black side of the Nimzo–Indian, and the Closed Variation of the Sicilian Defence for White (1.e4 c5 2.Nc3). Another rare line in the King's Indian Attack bears his name: 1.Nf3 Nf6 2.g3 b5!?Spassky is respected as a universal player, a great storyteller, a bon vivant on occasion, and someone who is rarely afraid to speak his mind on controversial chess issues, and who usually has something important to relate.
Notable chess games

Boris Spassky vs Robert Fischer, Santa Monica 1966, Grunfeld Defence, Exchange Variation (D87), 1–0 Fischer seems to equalize in a sharp game, but he makes a small mistake and Spassky finishes nicely.
Boris Spassky vs Efim Geller, Sukhumi Candidates' match 1968, game 6, Sicilian Defence, Closed Variation (B25), 1–0 One of three beautiful wins by Spassky over Geller in this match using the same variation, which is one of Spassky's favorites.
Boris Spassky vs Tigran Petrosian, World Championship match, Moscow 1969, game 19, Sicilian Defence, Najdorf Variation (B94), 1–0 Aggressive style of play and brilliant sparkles of combinations shows Spassky at his heights.
Bent Larsen vs Boris Spassky, Belgrade 1970 (match USSR vs. Rest of the World), Nimzo–Larsen Attack, Modern Variation (A01), 0–1 Another nice short win over a noted grandmaster.
Boris Spassky vs Robert Fischer, Siegen Olympiad 1970, Grunfeld Defence, Exchange Variation (D87), 1–0 Fischer tries the Grunfeld again against Spassky, and the game is remarkably similar to their 1966 encounter.
Boris Spassky vs Robert Fischer, World Championship match, Reykjavík 1972, game 11, Sicilian Defense, Najdorf, Poisoned Pawn Variation (B97), 1–0 Fischer's only loss in his favourite Poisoned Pawn variation.
Anatoly Karpov vs Boris Spassky, Candidates' match, Leningrad 1974, game 1, Sicilian Defence, Scheveningen Variation (B83), 0–1 Spassky lost the match, but he started strongly with this fine win.


Notes 
Further reading

Spassky's Best Games by Bernard Cafferty, Batsford, 1969.
World chess champions by Edward G. Winter, editor. 1981 ISBN 0-08-024117-4
 
 
No Regrets: Fischer–Spassky by Yasser Seirawan; International Chess Enterprises; March 1997. ISBN 1-879479-08-7
Bobby Fischer Goes to War: How the Soviets Lost the Most Extraordinary Chess Match of All Time by David Edmonds and John Eidinow; Ecco, 2004.
Garry Kasparov (2004). My Great Predecessors, part III. Everyman Chess. ISBN 1-85744-371-3
 


External links 
 

 
Chessbase report of stroke
OlimpBase
Interview with Boris Spassky

 
 
 
 
     
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Captain Beefheart
 Don Van Vliet ( , born Don Glen Vliet;   
January 15, 1941 – December 17, 2010) was an American musician, singer-songwriter, artist and poet widely known by the stage name Captain Beefheart. His musical work was conducted with a rotating ensemble of musicians called The Magic Band, active between 1965 and 1982, with whom he recorded 13 studio albums. Noted for his powerful singing voice with its wide range,  Van Vliet also played the harmonica, saxophone and numerous other wind instruments. His music blended rock, blues and psychedelia with  avant-garde and contemporary experimental composition.    Beefheart was also known for exercising an almost dictatorial control over his supporting musicians, and for often constructing myths about his life. 
  During his teen years in Lancaster, California, Van Vliet developed an eclectic musical taste and formed "a mutually useful but volatile" friendship with Frank Zappa, with whom he sporadically competed and collaborated. Loder, Kurt. June 24, 1999. Captain Beefheart: The Man Who Reconstructed Rock & Roll. www.mtv.com.  He began performing with his Captain Beefheart persona in 1964 and joined the original Magic Band line-up, initiated by Alexis Snouffer, in 1965. The group drew attention with their cover of Bo Diddley's "Diddy Wah Diddy", which became a regional hit. It was followed by their acclaimed debut album Safe as Milk, released in 1967 on Buddah Records. After being dropped by two consecutive record labels, they signed to Zappa's Straight Records. As producer, Zappa granted Beefheart unrestrained artistic freedom in making 1969's Trout Mask Replica, which ranked fifty-eighth in Rolling Stone magazine's 2003 list of the 500 greatest albums of all time.    In 1974, frustrated by lack of commercial success, he released two albums of more conventional rock music that were critically panned; this move, combined with not having been paid for a European tour, and years of enduring Beefheart's abusive behavior, led the entire band to quit. Beefheart eventually formed a new Magic Band with a group of younger musicians and regained contemporary approval through three final albums: Shiny Beast (Bat Chain Puller) (1978),  Doc at the Radar Station (1980)  and Ice Cream for Crow (1982).Van Vliet has been described as "one of modern music's true innovators" with "a singular body of work virtually unrivalled in its daring and fluid creativity".     Although he achieved little commercial or mainstream critical success,    he sustained a cult following as a "highly significant" and "incalculable" influence on an array of New Wave, punk, post-punk, experimental and alternative rock musicians.     Known for his enigmatic personality and relationship with the public, Van Vliet made few public appearances after his retirement from music (and from his Beefheart persona) in 1982. He pursued a career in art, an interest that originated in his childhood talent for sculpture, and a venture which proved to be his most financially secure. His expressionist paintings and drawings command high prices, and have been exhibited in art galleries and museums across the world.   McKenna, Kristina (July 29, 1990). "A Crossover of a Different Color". Los Angeles Times.  Van Vliet died in 2010, having suffered from multiple sclerosis for many years. 
Biography
Early life and musical influences, 1941–1962Van Vliet was born Don Glen Vliet in Glendale, California, on January 15, 1941, to Glen Alonzo Vliet, a service station owner of Dutch ancestry from Kansas, and Willie Sue Vliet (née Warfield), who was from Arkansas.   He claimed to have as an ancestor Peter Van Vliet, a Dutch painter who knew Rembrandt. Van Vliet also claimed that he was related to adventurer and author Richard Halliburton and the cowboy actor Slim Pickens, and said that he remembered being born.    Van Vliet began painting and sculpting at age three. Rogers, John (June 22, 1995). "Captain Beefheart Gaining International Acclaim—for Painting". AP.  His subjects reflected his "obsession" with animals, particularly dinosaurs, fish, African mammals and lemurs.    At the age of nine he won a children's sculpting competition organised for the Los Angeles Zoo in Griffith Park by a local tutor, Agostinho Rodrigues.    Local newspaper cuttings of his junior sculpting achievements can be found reproduced in the Splinters book, included in the Riding Some Kind Of Unusual Skull Sleigh boxed CD work, released in 2004. Riding Some Kind Of Unusual Skull Sleigh Ltd. Ed. boxed work. Artist Ink Editions (2003), ISBN 0-7379-0284-1  The sprawling park, with its zoo and observatory had a strong influence on young Vliet, as it was a short distance from his home on Waverly Drive. The track "Observatory Crest" on Bluejeans & Moonbeams reflects this continued interest. A portrait photo of the school-age Vliet can be seen on the front of the lyric sheet within the first issue of the US release of Trout Mask Replica.For some time during the 1950s Van Vliet worked as an apprentice with Rodrigues, who considered him a child prodigy. Vliet made claim to have been a lecturer at the Barnsdall Art Institute in Los Angeles at the age of eleven,  although it is likely he simply gave a form of artistic dissertation. Accounts of Van Vliet's precocious achievement in art often include his statement that he sculpted on a weekly television show. Winner, Langdon (May 14, 1970). "The Odyssey of Captain Beefheart". Rolling Stone.  He claimed that his parents discouraged his interest in sculpture, based upon their perception of artists as 'queer'. They declined several scholarship offers,  including one from the local Knudsen Creamery to travel to Europe with six years' paid tuition to study marble sculpture. Don Van Vliet , IMDB – David Letterman "Episode dated 11 November 1982 (1982) TV episode (as Captain Beefheart) .... Himself"  Van Vliet later admitted personal hesitation to take the scholarship based upon the bitterness of his parents' disencouragement. Van Vliet's artistic enthusiasm became so fervent, he claimed that his parents were forced to feed him through the door in the room where he sculpted. When he was thirteen the family moved from the Los Angeles area to the more remote farming town of Lancaster, near the Mojave Desert, where there was a growing aerospace industry and testing plant that would become Edwards Airforce Base. It was an environment that would greatly influence him creatively from then on.  Van Vliet remained interested in art; his paintings, often reminiscent of Franz Kline's, Ohrt, Roberto (1993). "The Painting of Don Van Vliet". In Stand Up to Be Discontinued, Cantz, ISBN 3-89322-595-1.  were later featured on several of his own albums. Meanwhile he developed his taste and interest in music, listening "intensively" to the Delta blues of Son House and Robert Johnson, jazz artists such as Ornette Coleman, John Coltrane, Thelonious Monk and Cecil Taylor, and the Chicago blues of Howlin' Wolf and Muddy Waters.      During his early teenage years Vliet would sometimes socialize with members of local bands such as The Omens and The Blackouts, although his interests were still focused upon an art career. The Omens' guitarists Alexis Snouffer and Jerry Handley would later become founders of "The Magic Band" and The Blackouts' drummer, Frank Zappa, would later capture Vliet's vocal capabilities on record for the first time.  Watson, 1996, Frank Zappa: The Negative Dialectics of Poodle Play, p. 13.  This first known recording, when he was simply 'Don Vliet', is "Lost In A Whirlpool" - one of Zappa's early 'field recordings' made in his college classroom with brother Bobby on guitar. It is featured on Zappa's posthumously released The Lost Episodes (1996). Van Vliet claimed that he never attended public school, alleging "half a day of kindergarten" to be the extent of his formal education and saying that "if you want to be a different fish, you've got to jump out of the school."  His associates said that he only dropped out during his senior year of high school to help support the family after his father's heart attack. His graduation picture appears in the school's yearbook.  While attending Antelope Valley High School in Lancaster, Van Vliet became close friends with fellow teenager Frank Zappa, the pair bonding through their interest in Chicago blues and R&B.   Van Vliet is portrayed in both The Real Frank Zappa Book and Barry Miles' biography Zappa as fairly spoiled at this stage of his life, the center of attention as an only child. He spent most of his time locked in his room listening to records, often with Zappa, into the early hours in the morning, eating leftover food from his father's Helms bread truck and demanding that his mother bring him a Pepsi.     His parents tolerated such behavior under the belief that their child was truly gifted. Vliet's 'Pepsi-moods' were ever a source of amusement to band members, leading Zappa to later write the wry tune "Why Doesn't Someone Give Him A Pepsi?" that featured on the Bongo Fury tour. After Zappa began regular occupation at Paul Buff's PAL Studio in Cucamonga he and Van Vliet began collaborating, tentatively as "The Soots". By the time Zappa had turned the venue into Studio Z the duo had completed some songs. These were "Cheryl's Canon", "Metal Man Has Won His Wings" and a Howlin' Wolf styled rendition of Little Richard's "Slippin' and Slidin'".  Further songs, on Zappa's Mystery Disc (1996), "I Was a Teen-Age Malt Shop" and "The Birth of Captain Beefheart" also provide an insight to Zappa's 'teenage movie' script titled Captain Beefheart vs. the Grunt People,    the first appearances of the Beefheart name. It has been suggested this name came from a term used by Vliet's Uncle Alan who had a habit of exposing himself to Don's girlfriend, Laurie Stone. He would urinate with the bathroom door open and, if she was walking by, would mumble about his penis, saying "Ahh, what a beauty! It looks just like a big, fine beef heart." Zappa, Frank & Occhiogrosso, Peter (1990). The Real Frank Zappa Book. Fireside. ISBN 0-671-70572-5.   In a 1970 interview with Rolling Stone, Van Vliet requests "don't ask me why or how" he and Zappa came up with the name.  He would later claim in an appearance on Late Night with David Letterman that the name referred to "a beef in my heart against this society."  In the "Grunt People" draft script Beefheart and his mother play themselves, with his father played by Howlin' Wolf. Grace Slick is penned in as a 'celestial seductress' and there are also roles for future Magic Band members Bill Harkleroad and Mark Boston. Van Vliet enrolled at Antelope Valley Junior College as an art major, but decided to leave the following year. He once worked as a door-to-door vacuum cleaner salesman, during which time he sold a vacuum cleaner to the writer Aldous Huxley at his home in Llano, pointing to it and declaring, "Well I assure you sir, this thing sucks."    After managing a Kinney's shoe store, Van Vliet relocated to Rancho Cucamonga, California, to reconnect with Zappa, who inspired his entry into musical performance. Van Vliet was quite shy but was eventually able to imitate the deep voice of Howlin' Wolf with his wide vocal range.  Zappa, Frank (March 1977). International Times.  He eventually grew comfortable with public performance and, after learning to play the harmonica, began playing at dances and small clubs in Southern California.
Initial recordings, 1962–1969In early 1965 Alex Snouffer, a Lancaster rhythm and blues guitarist, invited Vliet to sing with a group that he was assembling. Vliet joined the first Magic Band and changed his name to Don Van Vliet, while Snouffer became Alex St. Clair (sometimes spelled Claire). Captain Beefheart and his Magic Band signed to A&M and released two singles in 1966. The first was a version of Bo Diddley's "Diddy Wah Diddy" that became a regional hit in Los Angeles. The followup, "Moonchild" (written by David Gates) was less well received. The band played music venues that catered to underground artists, such as the Avalon Ballroom in San Francisco. 
Safe as MilkAfter fulfilling their deal for two singles the band presented demos to A&M during 1966 for what would become the Safe as Milk album. A&M's Jerry Moss reportedly described this new direction as "too negative"  and dropped the band from the label, although still under contract. Much of the demo recording was accomplished at Art Laboe's Original Sound Studio, then with Gary Marker on the controls at Sunset Sound on 8-track. By the end of 1966 they were signed to Buddah Records and much of the demo work was transferred to 4-track, at the behest of Krasnow and Perry, in the RCA Studio in Hollywood, where the recording was finalized. Tracks that were originally laid down in the demo by Doug Moon are therefore taken up by Cooder's work in the release, as Moon had departed over 'musical differences' at this juncture.Drummer John French had now joined the group and it would later (notably on Trout Mask Replica) be his patience that was required to transcribe Van Vliet's creative ideas (often expressed by whistling or banging on the piano) into musical form for the other group members. On French's departure this role was taken over by Bill Harkleroad for Lick My Decals Off, Baby. Many of the lyrics on the Safe as Milk album were written by Van Vliet in collaboration with the writer Herb Bermann, who befriended Van Vliet after seeing him perform at a bar-gig in Lancaster in 1966. The song "Electricity" was a poem written by Bermann, who gave Van Vliet permission to adapt it to music.    Much of the Safe as Milk material was honed and arranged by the arrival of 20-year–old guitar prodigy Ry Cooder, who had been brought into the group after much pressure from Vliet. The band began recording in spring 1967, with Richard Perry cutting his teeth in his first job as producer. The album was released in September 1967. Richie Unterberger of Allmusic called the album "blues–rock gone slightly askew, with jagged, fractured rhythms, soulful, twisting vocals from Van Vliet, and more doo wop, soul, straight blues, and folk–rock influences than he would employ on his more avant garde outings".
RecognitionAmong those who took notice were The Beatles. Both John Lennon and Paul McCartney were known as great admirers of Beefheart.    Lennon displayed two of the album's promotional 'baby bumper stickers' in the sunroom at his home.  Later, the Beatles planned to sign Beefheart to their experimental Zapple label (plans that were scrapped after Allen Klein took over the group's management). Van Vliet was often critical of the Beatles, however. He considered the lyric "I'd love to turn you on", from their song "A Day in the Life", to be ridiculous and conceited. Tiring of their "lullabies",    he lampooned them with the Strictly Personal song "Beatle Bones 'n' Smokin' Stones", that featured the sardonic refrain of "strawberry fields, strawberry fields forever". It should also be noted that 'strawberry fields' could also be an oblique reference to a form of LSD circulating at the time. The album's five 'acid stamps' and first track "Ah Feel like Ahcid" may underline this, while 'Smokin' Stones' is probably a 'pro comment' on the contrasting rhythm and blues style of the Rolling Stones. Vliet spoke badly of Lennon after getting no response when he sent a telegram of support to him and wife Yoko Ono during their 1969 "Bed–In for peace". Van Vliet did meet McCartney in Cannes during the Magic Band's 1968 tour of Europe, though McCartney later claimed to have no recollection of this meeting. 
The flipside of successDoug Moon left the band because of his dislike of the band's increasing experimentation outside his preferred blues genre. Ry Cooder told of Moon becoming so angered by Van Vliet's unrelenting criticism that he walked into the room pointing a loaded crossbow at him, only to be told "Get that fucking thing out of here, get out of here and get back in your room", which he obeyed.  (Other band members have disputed this account, although Moon is likely to have 'passed through' the studio with a weapon.)  Moon was present during the early demo sessions at Original Sound studio, above the Kama Sutra/Buddah offices. The works Moon laid down did not see the light of day, as he was replaced by Cooder when they continued on material at Sunset Sound with Marker.  Marker then fell by the wayside when recording was moved by Krasnow and Perry to RCA Studio. This would have a profound effect on the quality of the Safe as Milk work, as the former studio was 8-track and the subsequent studio a 4-track.To support the album's release the group had been scheduled to play at the 1967 Monterey Pop Festival. During this period Vliet suffered severe anxiety attacks that made him convinced that he was having a heart attack, probably exacerbated by his heavy LSD use and the fact that his father died of heart failure a few years earlier. At a vital 'warm-up' performance at the Mt. Tamalpais Festival (June 10/11) shortly before the scheduled Monterey Festival (June 16/18), the band began to play "Electricity" and Van Vliet froze, straightened his tie, then walked off the ten–foot stage and landed on manager Bob Krasnow. He later claimed he had seen a girl in the audience turn into a fish, with bubbles coming from her mouth.  This aborted any opportunity of breakthrough success at Monterey, as Cooder immediately decided he could no longer work with Van Vliet,  effectively quitting both the event and the band on the spot. With such complex guitar parts there was no means for the band to find a competent replacement in time for Monterey. Cooder's spot was eventually filled for a short spell by Gerry McGee, who had played with The Monkees. According to French the band did two gigs with McGee, one of which was at The Peppermint Twist near Long Beach. The other was at Santa Monica Civic Auditorium, 7 August 1967, as opening act to The Yardbirds. John French, Beefheart: Through The Eyes Of Magic p264. ISBN 978-0-9561212-1-9  McGee was in the group long enough to have an outfit made by a Santa Monica boutique  that also created the gear worn by the band on the Strictly Personal cover stamps. 
Strictly PersonalIn August, guitarist Jeff Cotton filled the guitar spot vacated, in turn, by Cooder and McGee. In October and November 1967 the Snouffer/Cotton/Handley/French line–up recorded material for what was planned to be the second album. Originally intended to be a double album called It Comes to You in a Plain Brown Wrapper for the   label, it was released later in pieces in 1971 and 1995. After rejection from Buddah, Bob Krasnow encouraged the band to re–record four of the shorter numbers, to add two more, and make shorter versions of "Mirror Man" and "Kandy Korn". The music was already weakly recorded with a trebly thin sound; Krasnow then implemented a strange mix full of "phasing" that by most accounts (including Beefheart's) diminished the music's strength; this was released in October 1968 as Strictly Personal on Krasnow's Blue Thumb label.  Stewart Mason in his Allmusic review of the album described it as a "terrific album" and a "fascinating, underrated release", "every bit the equal of Safe as Milk and Trout Mask Replica".  Langdon Winner of Rolling Stone called Strictly Personal "an excellent album. The guitars of the Magic Band mercilessly bend and stretch notes in a way that suggests that the world of music has wobbled clear off its axis," with the lyrics demonstrating "Beefheart's ability to juxtapose delightful humor with frightening insights". Winner, Langdon (May 14, 1970). "The Odyssey of Captain Beefheart" 
Mirror ManIn 1971 some of the recordings done for Buddah were released as Mirror Man, bearing a liner note claiming that the material had been recorded "one night in Los Angeles in 1965". This was a ruse to circumvent possible copyright issues; the material was actually recorded in November and December 1967. Essentially a "jam" album, described as pushing "the boundaries of conventional blues–rock, with a Beefheart vocal tossed in here and there. Some may miss Beefheart's surreal poetry, gruff vocals, and/or free jazz influence, while others may find it fascinating to hear the Magic Band simply letting go and cutting loose".  The album's 'miss-credit errors' also state band members as "Alex St. Clare Snouffer" (Alex St. Clare/Alexis Snouffer), "Antennae Jimmy Simmons" (Semens/Jeff Cotton) and "Jerry Handsley" (Handley). First vinyl was issued in both a die-cut gatefold (revealing a 'cracked' mirror) and a single sleeve with same image. The UK Buddah issue was part of the Polydor-manufactured 'Select' series.During his first trip to England in January 1968, Captain Beefheart was briefly represented in the UK by mod icon Peter Meaden, an early manager of The Who. The Captain and his band members were initially denied entry to the United Kingdom, because Meaden had illegally booked them for gigs without applying for appropriate work permits.  After returning to Germany for a few days, the group was permitted to re-enter the UK, when they recorded material for John Peel's radio show and appeared at the Middle Earth venue, introduced by Peel on Saturday 20 January. By this time, they had terminated their association with Meaden. On January 27, 1968, Beefheart achieved one of his most memorable live performances, when the band performed in the MIDEM Music Festival on the beach at Cannes, France.Alex St. Claire left the band in June 1968 after their return from a second European tour and was replaced by teenager Bill Harkleroad; bassist Jerry Handley left a few weeks later.
The Mirror Man Sessions and new BuddhaIn 1999 the defunct Buddah label emerged with a new look, a correct title spelling and relevant 'deity' image - replacing the silhouetted 'Shiva' image and Buddah name for Beefheart material. The Bertelsmann Music Group (BMG) now had the Buddah catalogue, producing both a remastered CD of Safe as Milk and a CD titled The Mirror Man Sessions, the latter providing an insight to the Mirror Man and Strictly Personal albums, and recordings relating to the 'Brown Wrapper' project. The tracks are presented as "Original Masters" and provides further insight to the interpolating material that also appears on It Comes To You In A Plain Brown Wrapper. The insert also shows the entire band in Quaker hats and outfits.
The 'Brown Wrapper' SessionsAfter their Euro tour and the Cannes beach performance the band returned to the USA. Moves were already in the air for them to leave Buddah and sign to MGM and, prior to their May tour - mainly in the UK - they re-recorded some Buddah material of the partial Mirror Man sessions at Sunset Sound with Bruce Botnick. Beefheart had also been conceptualizing new band names, including "25th Century Quaker" and "Blue Thumb",  while making suggestions to other musicians that they might get involved. The thought-process of "25th Century Quaker" was that it would be a 'blues band' alias for the more avant-garde work of the Magic Band. Photographer Guy Webster actually photographed the band in Quaker-style outfits, and the picture appears in The Mirror Man Sessions CD insert. It would later transpire that much of this situation was transient and that Buddah's Bob Krasnow was to set up his own label. The label that was unsurprisingly named Blue Thumb launched with its first release Strictly Personal, a truncated version of the original Beefheart vision of a double album. Thus "25th Century Quaker" became a track and a potential band-name became a label.In overview, the works for the double album in this period were intended to be packaged in a plain brown wrapper, with a 'strictly personal' over-stamp and addressed in a manner that could have connotations of drug content, pornographic or illicit material; As per the small ads of the time; "It comes to you in a plain brown wrapper". Given that Krasnow had effectively poached the band from Buddah there were limitations on what material could be released. Strictly Personal was the result, contained in its enigmatically-addressed parcel sleeve. The raft of material left behind eventually emerged, firstly on CD as I May Be Hungry, But I Sure Ain't Weird and later on vinyl, implemented by John French, as It Comes To You In A Plain Brown Wrapper (which has two tracks that are missing from the former release). Both Blue Thumb and the stamps on the cover of Strictly Personal have LSD connotations, as does the track "Ah Feel Like Ahcid".
Trout Mask Replica, 1969 
Critically acclaimed as Van Vliet's magnum opus,    Trout Mask Replica was released as a 28 track double album in June 1969 on Frank Zappa's newly formed Straight Records label. First issues, in the USA, were auto-coupled and housed in the black 'Straight' liners along with a 6-page lyric sheet illustrated by The Mascara Snake. A school-age portrait of Van Vliet appears on the front of this sheet, while the cover of the gatefold enigmatically shows Beefheart in a 'Quaker' hat, obscuring his face with the head of a fish. The fish is a carp - arguably a 'replica' for a trout, photographed by Cal Schenkel. The inner spread 'infra-red' photography is by Ed Caraeff, whose Beefheart vacuum cleaner images from this session also appear on Zappa's Hot Rats release (a month earlier) to accompany "Willie The Pimp" lyrics sung by Vliet. Alex St. Clair had now left the band and, after Junior Madeo from The Blackouts was considered,  the role was filled by Bill Harkleroad. Bassist Jerry Handley had also departed, with Gary Marker stepping in. Thus the long rehearsals for the album began in the house on Ensenada Drive in Woodland Hills, L.A., Grow Fins CD box set booklet, p107   that would become the infamous 'Magic Band House'.The Magic Band began recordings for Trout Mask Replica with bassist Gary 'Magic' Marker at T.T.G. (on "Moonlight On Vermont" and "Veteran's Day Poppy"),  but later enlisted bassist Mark Boston after his departure. The remainder of the album was recorded at Whitney Studios, with some field recordings made at the house.  Boston was acquainted with French and Harkleroad via past bands. Van Vliet had also begun assigning nicknames to his band members, so Harkleroad became "Zoot Horn Rollo", and Boston became "Rockette Morton", while John French assumed the name "Drumbo", and Jeff Cotton became "Antennae Jimmy Semens". Van Vliet's cousin Victor Hayden, "The Mascara Snake", performed as a bass clarinetist later in the proceedings.  Vliet's girlfriend Laurie Stone, who can be heard laughing at the beginning of "Fallin' Ditch", would also became an audio typist  at the Magic Band house.Van Vliet wanted the whole band to "live" the Trout Mask Replica album. The group rehearsed Van Vliet's difficult compositions for eight months, living communally in their small rented house in the Woodland Hills suburb of Los Angeles. With only two bedrooms the band members would find sleep in various corners of one, while Vliet occupied the other and rehearsals were accomplished in the main living area. Van Vliet implemented his vision by completely dominating his musicians, artistically and emotionally. At various times one or another of the group members was "put in the barrel," with Van Vliet berating him continually, sometimes for days, until the musician collapsed in tears or in total submission.  Drummer John French described the situation as "cultlike"    and a visiting friend said "the environment in that house was positively Mansonesque."  Their material circumstances were dire. With no income other than welfare and contributions from relatives, the group barely survived and were even arrested for shoplifting food (Zappa bailed them out). French has recalled living on no more than a small cup of beans a day for a month.  A visitor described their appearance as "cadaverous" and said that "they all looked in poor health." Band members were restricted from leaving the house and practiced for 14 or more hours a day.Physical assaults were encouraged at times, along with verbal degradation. Beefheart spoke of studying texts on brainwashing at a public library at about this time, and appeared to be applying brainwashing techniques to his bandmembers: sleep deprivation, food deprivation, constant negative reinforcement, and rewarding bandmembers when they attacked each other or competed with each other. At one point Cotton ran from the house and escaped for a few weeks, during which time Alex Snouffer filled in for him and helped to work up "Ant Man Bee". French, who had thrown a metal cymbal at Cotton, ran after him yelling that he too wanted to come. Cotton later returned to the house with French's mother, who took him away for a few weeks, but he later felt compelled to return, as did Cotton. Mark Boston at one point hid clothes in a field across the street, planning his own getaway. John French's 2010 book Through the Eyes of Magic describes some of the "talks" which were initiated by his actions such as being heard playing a Frank Zappa drum part ("The Blimp (mousetrapreplica)") in his drumming shed, and not having finished drum parts as quickly as Beefheart wanted. French writes of being punched by band members, thrown into walls, kicked, punched in the face by Beefheart hard enough to draw blood, being attacked with a sharp broomstick,  and eventually of Beefheart threatening to throw him out of an upper floor window. He admits complicity in similarly attacking his bandmates during "talks" aimed at them. In the end, after the album's recording, French was ejected from the band by Beefheart throwing him down a set of stairs with violence, telling him to "Take a walk, man" after not responding in a desired manner to a request to "play a strawberry" on the drums. Beefheart replaced French with drummer Jeff Bruschel, an acquaintance of Hayden. Referred to as 'Fake Drumbo' (playing on French's drumset) this final act resulted in French's name not appearing on the album credits, either as a player or arranger. Bruschel toured with the band to Europe but was replaced by the next recording.According to Van Vliet, the 28 songs on the album were written in a single 8½ hour session at the piano, an instrument which he had no skill in playing, an approach Mike Barnes compared to John Cage's "maverick irreverence toward classical tradition",    though band members have stated that the songs were written over the course of about a year, beginning around December 1967. (The band did watch Federico Fellini's 1963 film 8½ during the creation of the album). It took the band about eight months to mold the songs into shape, with French bearing primary responsibility for transposing and shaping Vliet's piano fragments into guitar and bass lines, which were mostly notated on paper. Miles, Barry (2005). Zappa: A Biography. pp. 182–183. Grove Press  Harkleroad in 1998 said in retrospect: "We're dealing with a strange person, coming from a place of being a sculptor/painter, using music as his idiom. He was getting more into that part of who he was instead of this blues singer."  The band had rehearsed the songs so thoroughly that the instrumental tracks for 21 of the songs were recorded in a single four and a half hour recording session.  Van Vliet spent the next few days overdubbing the vocals. The album's cover artwork was photographed and designed by Cal Schenkel and shows Van Vliet wearing the raw head of a carp, bought from a local fish market and fashioned into a mask by Schenkel.  Trout Mask Replica incorporated a wide variety of musical styles, including blues, avant garde/experimental, and rock. The relentless practice prior to recording blended the music into an iconoclastic whole of contrapuntal tempos, featuring slide guitar, polyrhythmic drumming (with French's drums and cymbals covered in cardboard), honking saxophone and bass clarinet. Van Vliet's vocals range from his signature Howlin' Wolf inspired growl to frenzied falsetto to laconic, casual ramblings.The instrumental backing was effectively recorded live in the studio, while Van Vliet overdubbed most of the vocals in only partial synch with the music by hearing the slight sound leakage through the studio window. Chusid, Irwin (2000). Songs in the Key of Z: The Curious Universe of Outsider Music, pp. 129–140. London: Cherry Red Books. ISBN 1 901447 11 1  Zappa said of Van Vliet's approach, "[it was] impossible to tell him why things should be such and such a way. It seemed to me that if he was going to create a unique object, that the best thing for me to do was to keep my mouth shut as much as possible and just let him do whatever he wanted to do whether I thought it was wrong or not." Van Vliet used the ensuing publicity, particularly with a 1970 Rolling Stone interview with Langdon Winner, to promulgate a number of myths which were subsequently quoted as fact. Winner's article stated, for instance, that neither Van Vliet nor the members of the Magic Band ever took drugs, but Harkleroad later contradicted this. Van Vliet claimed to have taught both Harkleroad and Boston to play their instruments from scratch; in fact the pair were already accomplished young musicians before joining the band.  Last, Van Vliet claimed to have gone a year and half without sleeping. When asked how this was possible, he claimed to have only eaten fruit. Critic Steve Huey of Allmusic writes that the album's influence "was felt more in spirit than in direct copycatting, as a catalyst rather than a literal musical starting point. However, its inspiring reimagining of what was possible in a rock context laid the groundwork for countless experiments in rock surrealism to follow, especially during the punk and New Wave era."    In 2003, the album was ranked fifty-eighth by Rolling Stone in their list of The 500 Greatest Albums of All Time: "On first listen, Trout Mask Replica sounds like raw Delta blues", with Beefheart "singing and ranting and reciting poetry over fractured guitar licks. But the seeming sonic chaos is an illusion—to construct the songs, the Magic Band rehearsed twelve hours a day for months on end in a house with the windows blacked out. (Producer Frank Zappa was then able to record most of the album in less than five hours.) Tracks such as "Ella Guru" and "My Human Gets Me Blues" are the direct predecessors of modern musical primitives such as Tom Waits and PJ Harvey".  Guitarist Fred Frith noted that during this process "forces that usually emerge in improvisation are harnessed and made constant, repeatable." Critic Robert Christgau gave the album a B+, saying that "I find it impossible to give this record an A because it is just too weird. But I'd like to. Very great played at high volume when you're feeling shitty, because you'll never feel as shitty as this record".    BBC disc jockey John Peel said of the album: "If there has been anything in the history of popular music which could be described as a work of art in a way that people who are involved in other areas of art would understand, then Trout Mask Replica is probably that work."  It was inducted into the United States National Recording Registry in 2011.

Later recordings, 1970–1982
Lick My Decals Off, BabyLick My Decals Off, Baby (1970) continued in a similarly experimental vein. An album with "a very coherent structure" in the Magic Band's "most experimental and visionary stage",  it was Van Vliet's most commercially successful in the United Kingdom, spending twenty weeks on the UK Albums Chart and peaking at number 20. An early promotional music video was made of its title song, and a bizarre television commercial was also filmed that included excerpts from "Woe-Is-uh-Me-Bop", silent footage of masked Magic Band members using kitchen utensils as musical instruments, and Beefheart kicking over a bowl of what appears to be porridge onto a dividing stripe in the middle of a road. The video was rarely played but was accepted into the Museum of Modern Art, where it has been used in several programs related to music. Music Video: The Industry and Its Fringes, Museum of Modern Art, September 6–30, 1985  Looking at Music,, Museum of Modern Art, August 13, 2008 – January 5, 2009 On this LP Art Tripp III, formerly of the Mothers of Invention, played drums and marimba. Lick My Decals Off, Baby was the first record on which the band was credited as "The Magic Band", rather than "His Magic Band"; journalist Irwin Chusid interprets this change as "a grudging concession of its members' at least semiautonomous humanity."  Robert Christgau gave the album an A-, commenting that "Beefheart's famous five-octave range and covert totalitarian structures have taken on a playful undertone, repulsive and engrossing and slapstick funny".  Due to licensing disputes, Lick My Decals Off, Baby was unavailable on CD for many years, though it remained in print on vinyl. It was ranked second in Uncut magazine's May 2010 list of "The 50 Greatest Lost Albums".  In 2011, the album became available for download on the iTunes Store. 
The Spotlight Kid and Clear Spot
The next two records, The Spotlight Kid (simply credited to "Captain Beefheart") and Clear Spot (credited to "Captain Beefheart and the Magic Band"), were both released in 1972. The atmosphere of The Spotlight Kid is "definitely relaxed and fun, maybe one step up from a jam." And though "things do sound maybe just a little too blasé," "Beefheart at his worst still has something more than most groups at their best."  The music is simpler and slower than on the group's two previous releases, the uncompromisingly original Trout Mask Replica and the frenetic Lick My Decals Off, Baby. This was in part an attempt by Van Vliet to become a more appealing commercial proposition as the band had made virtually no money during the previous two years—at the time of recording, the band members were subsisting on welfare food handouts and remittances from their parents.  Van Vliet offered that he "got tired of scaring people with what I was doing... I realized that I had to give them something to hang their hat on, so I started working more of a beat into the music."    Magic Band members have also said that the slower performances were due in part to Van Vliet's inability to fit his lyrics with the instrumental backing of the faster material on the earlier albums, a problem that was exacerbated in that he almost never rehearsed with the group.  In the period leading up to the recording the band lived communally, first at a compound near Ben Lomond, California and then in northern California near Trinidad.  The situation saw a return to the physical violence and psychological manipulation that had taken place during the band's previous communal residence while composing and rehearsing Trout Mask Replica. According to John French, the worst of this was directed toward Harkleroad.  In his autobiography Harkleroad recalls being thrown into a dumpster, an act he interpreted as having metaphorical intent. Clear Spots production credit of Ted Templeman made Allmusic consider "why in the world [it] wasn't more of a commercial success than it was," and that while fans "of the fully all-out side of Beefheart might find the end result not fully up to snuff as a result, but those less concerned with pushing back all borders all the time will enjoy his unexpected blend of everything tempered with a new accessibility." The song "Big Eyed Beans from Venus" is noted as "a fantastically strange piece of aggression."  A Clear Spot song, "Her Eyes Are A Blue Million Miles", appeared on the soundtrack of the Coen brothers' cult comedy film The Big Lebowski (1998).
Unconditionally Guaranteed and Bluejeans & MoonbeamsIn 1974, immediately after the recording of Unconditionally Guaranteed, which markedly continued the trend towards a more commercial sound heard on some of the Clear Spot tracks, the Magic Band's original members departed. Disgruntled and past members worked together for a period, gigging at Blue Lake and putting together their own ideas and demos, with John French earmarked as the vocalist. These concepts eventually coalesced around the core of Art Tripp III, Harkleroad and Boston, with the formation of Mallard, helped by finance and UK recording facilities from Jethro Tull's Ian Anderson. John French, Beefheart: Through The Eyes Of Magic, p608 - 609. ISBN 978-0-9561212-1-9
Bill Harkleroad, Lunar Notes p132-133. ISBN 0-946719-21-7  Some of French's compositions were used in the band's work, but the group's singer was Sam Galpin and the role of keyboardist was eventually taken by John Thomas, who had shared a house with French in Eureka at the time. At this time Vliet attempted to recruit both French and Harkleroad as producers for his next album, but his pleas fell on deaf ears. Andy Di Martino produced both of these Virgin label albums.Vliet was forced to quickly form a new Magic Band to complete support-tour dates, with musicians who had no experience with his music and in fact had never heard it. Having no knowledge of the previous Magic Band style, they simply improvised what they thought would go with each song, playing much slicker versions that have been described as "bar band" versions of Beefheart songs. A review described this incarnation of the Magic Band as the "Tragic Band", a term that has stuck over the years.  Mike Barnes said that the description of the new band "grooving along pleasantly", was "an appropriately banal description of the music of a man who only a few years ago composed with the expressed intent of shaking listeners out of their torpor".  The one album they recorded, Bluejeans & Moonbeams (1974) has, like its predecessor, a completely different, almost soft rock sound from any other Beefheart record. Neither was well received; drummer Art Tripp recalled that when he and the original Magic Band listened to Unconditionally Guaranteed, they "were horrified. As we listened, it was as though each song was worse than the one which preceded it."  Beefheart later disowned both albums, calling them "horrible and vulgar", asking that they not be considered part of his musical output and urging fans who bought them to "take copies back for a refund". 
Bongo Fury to Bat Chain PullerBy the fall of 1975 the band completed their European tour, with further U.S. dates completed into the New Year of 1976, supporting Zappa along with Dr. John. Van Vliet now found himself stuck in a web of contractual hang-ups. At this point Zappa had begun to extend a helping hand, with Vliet already having performed incognito as Rollin' Red on Zappa's One Size Fits All (1975) and then joining with him on the Bongo Fury album and its later support tour. Two Vliet-penned numbers on the Bongo Fury album are Sam With The Showing Scalp Flat Top and Man With The Woman Head. The form, texture and imagery of this album's first track Debra Kadabra, sung by Vliet, has 'angular similarities' to the work he would later produce in his next three albums. On the Bongo Fury album Vliet also sings "Poofter's Froth, Wyoming Plans Ahead", harmonizes on "200 Years Old" and "Muffin Man" and plays harmonica and soprano saxophone.In early 1976 Zappa put on his producer hat and, once again, opened up his studio facilities and finance to Vliet. This was for the production of an album provisionally titled Bat Chain Puller. The band were John French (drums), John Thomas (keyboards) and Jeff Moris Tepper and Denny Walley (guitars). Much of the work on this album had been finalized and some demos had been circulated when fate once again struck the Beefheart camp. In May 1976 the long association between Zappa and his manager/business partner Herb Cohen ceased. This resulted in Zappa's finances and ongoing works becoming part of protracted legal negotiations. The Bat Chain Puller project went 'on ice' and did not see an official release until 2011, when it was announced that the Zappa Family Trust would release the album.     After this recording John Thomas joined ex-Magic Band members in Mallard.Prior to his next album Beefheart appeared in 1977 on the Tubes' album Now, playing saxophone on the song "Cathy's Clone",  and the album also featured a cover of the Clear Spot song "My Head Is My Only House Unless It Rains". In 1978 he appeared on Jack Nitzsche's soundtrack to the film Blue Collar. 
Shiny Beast (Bat Chain Puller)Having extricated himself from a mire of contractual difficulties Beefheart emerged with this new album, in 1978, on the Warner Bros label. Shiny Beast (Bat Chain Puller) contained re-workings of the shelved Bat Chain Puller album and still retained this works' original guitarist, Jeff Moris Tepper. However, he and Vliet were now joined by a whole new line-up of Richard Redus (guitar, bass and accordion), Eric Drew Feldman (bass, piano and synthesizer), Bruce Lambourne Fowler (trombone and air bass), Art Tripp (percussion and marimba) and Robert Arthur Williams (drums). Thus, the album was suffixed Shiny Beast (Bat Chain Puller) and took on new musical directions. It was co-produced by Vliet with Pete Johnson. Members of this Magic Band and the 'Bat Chain' elements would later feature on Beefheart's last two albums. Shiny Beast (Bat Chain Puller) was described by Ned Raggett of Allmusic to be "...manna from heaven for those feeling Beefheart had lost his way on his two Mercury albums".  Following Vliet's death, John French claimed the 40-second spoken word track "Apes-Ma" to be an analogy of Van Vliet's deteriorating physical condition.  The album's sleeve features Van Vliet's 1976 painting Green Tom, one of the many works that would mark out his longed-for career as a painter of note.
Doc At The Radar Station 
Doc at the Radar Station (1980) helped establish Beefheart's late resurgence. Released by Virgin Records during the post-punk scene, the music was now accessible to a younger, more receptive audience. He was interviewed in a feature report on KABC-TV's Channel 7 Eyewitness News in which he was hailed as "the father of the New Wave. One of the most important American composers of the last fifty years, [and] a primitive genius"; Van Vliet said at this period, "I'm doing a non-hypnotic music to break up the catatonic state... and I think there is one right now."  Huey of Allmusic cited the Doc at the Radar Station as being "generally acclaimed as the strongest album of his comeback, and by some as his best since Trout Mask Replica", "even if the Captain's voice isn't quite what it once was, Doc at the Radar Station is an excellent, focused consolidation of Beefheart's past and then-present".  Van Vliet's biographer Mike Barnes speaks of "revamping work built on skeletal ideas and fragments that would have mouldered away in the vaults had they not been exhumed and transformed into full-blown, totally convincing new material."  During this period, Van Vliet made two appearances on David Letterman's late night television program on NBC, and also performed on Saturday Night Live.Richard Redus and Art Tripp departed on this album, with slide guitar and marimba duties taken up by the reappearance of John French. The guitar skills of Gary Lucas also feature on the track "Flavor Bud Living".
Ice Cream for Crow
The final Beefheart record, Ice Cream for Crow (1982), was recorded with Gary Lucas (who was also Van Vliet's manager), Jeff Moris Tepper, Richard Snyder and Cliff Martinez. This line-up made a video to promote the title track, directed by Van Vliet and Ken Schreiber, with cinematography by Daniel Pearl, which was rejected by MTV for being "too weird." However, the video was included in the Letterman broadcast on NBC-TV, and was also accepted into the Museum of Modern Art.   Van Vliet announced "I don't want MTV!" during his interview with Letterman, in reference to MTV's "I want my MTV" marketing campaign of the time. Lucas, Gary. "O Captain! My Captain Beefheart: An Appreciation" The Wall Street Journal. blogs.wsj.com Published and retrieved on 2010-19-12.  Ice Cream for Crow, along with songs such as its title track, features instrumental performances by the Magic Band with performance poetry readings by Van Vliet. Raggett of Allmusic called the album a "last entertaining blast of wigginess from one of the few truly independent artists in late 20th century pop music, with humor, skill, and style all still intact"; with the Magic Band "turning out more choppy rhythms, unexpected guitar lines, and outré arrangements, Captain Beefheart lets everything run wild as always, with successful results".  Barnes writes that "the most original and vital tracks (on the album) are the newer ones", saying that it "feels like an hors-d'oeuvre for a main course that never came".  Promotional work proposed to Beefheart by Virgin Records was as unorthodox as him making an appearance in the 1987 film Grizzly II: The Predator. Barnes, Mike (August 17, 1997). "Genius or madman—the jury is still out on Captain Beefheart". Daily Telegraph.  Soon after, Van Vliet retired from music and began a new career as a painter. Gary Lucas tried to convince him to record one more album, but to no avail.
Riding Some Kind Of Unusual Skull SleighReleased in 2004 by Rhino Handmade in a limited edition of 1,500 copies,  this prestigious signed and numbered box set contains a "Riding Some Kind of Unusual Skull Sleigh" CD of Vliet-recited poetry, the Anton Corbijn film of Vliet Some YoYo Stuff on DVD and two art books. One book, entitled Splinters, gives a visual 'scrapbook' insight into Vliet's life, from an early age to his painting in retirement. The second, eponymously titled, book is packed with art pages of Vliet's work. The first is bound in green linen, the second in yellow. These colors are counterpointed throughout the package, which comes in a green slipcase measuring 235 × 325 × 70 mm. An onion-skin wallet, nestling at the package's inner sanctum, contains a matching-numbered Vliet lithograph on hand-rolled paper, signed by the artist. The two books are by publishers "Artist Ink Editions".
PaintingsThroughout his musical career, Van Vliet remained interested in visual art. He placed his paintings, often reminiscent of Franz Kline's, on several of his albums.  In 1987, Van Vliet published Skeleton Breath, Scorpion Blush, a collection of his poetry, paintings and drawings. In the mid 1980s, Van Vliet became reclusive and abandoned music, stating he had gotten "too good at the horn"  and could make far more money painting. Needs, Kris (2005). "John Peel, his Producer Soulmate & the Mad Captain". trakMARX 18. Retrieved February 28, 2006.  Beefheart's first exhibition had been at Liverpool's Bluecoat Gallery during the Magic Band's 1972 tour of the UK. He was interviewed on Granada regional television standing in front of his bold black and white canvases.  He was inspired to begin an art career when a fan, Julian Schnabel, who admired the artwork seen on his album covers, asked to buy a drawing from him.  His debut exhibition as a serious painter was at the Mary Boone Gallery in New York in 1985 and was initially regarded as that of "another rock musician dabbling in art for ego's sake",  though his primitive, non-conformist work has received more sympathetic and serious attention since then, with some sales approaching $25,000.  Two books have been published specifically devoted to critique and analysis of his artwork: Riding Some Kind of Unusual Skull Sleigh: On The Arts Of Don Van Vliet (1999) by W.C. Bamberger  and Stand Up To Be Discontinued,  first published in 1993, a now rare collection of essays on Van Vliet's work. The limited edition version of the book contains a CD of Van Vliet reading six of his poems: "Fallin' Ditch", "The Tired Plain", "Skeleton Makes Good", "Safe Sex Drill", "Tulip" and "Gill". A deluxe edition was published in 1994; only 60 were printed, with etchings of Van Vliet's signature, costing £180. 
In the early 1980s Van Vliet established an association with the Michael Werner Gallery.  Eric Feldman stated later in an interview that at that time Michael Werner told Van Vliet he needed to stop playing music if he wanted to be respected as a painter, warning him that otherwise he would only be considered a "musician who paints".  In doing so, it was said that he had effectively "succeeded in leaving his past behind."  Gordon Veneklasen, one of the gallery's directors in 1995 described Van Vliet as an "incredible painter" whose work "doesn't really look like anybody else's work but his own."  Van Vliet has been described as a modernist, a primitivist, an abstract expressionist, and an outsider artist.  Morgan Falconer of Artforum concurs, mentioning both a "neo-primitivist aesthetic" and further stating that his work is influenced by the CoBrA painters. Don Van Vliet Morgan Falconer, Artforum, July 7, 2007. Retrieved November 27, 2008.  The resemblance to the CoBrA painters is also recognized by art critic Roberto Ohrt,  while others have compared his paintings to the work of Jackson Pollock, Franz Kline, Antonin Artaud,  Francis Bacon,   Vincent van Gogh and Mark Rothko.   According to Dr. John Lane, director of the San Francisco Museum of Modern Art, in 1997, although Van Vliet's work has associations with mainstream abstract expressionist painting, more importantly he was a self-taught artist and his painting "has that same kind of edge the music has."  Lane explained that in contrast to the busied, bohemian urban lives of the New York abstract expressionists, the rural desert environment Van Vliet was influenced by is a distinctly naturalistic one, making him a distinguished figure in contemporary art, whose work will survive in canon.  Van Vliet  stated of his own work, "I'm trying to turn myself inside out on the canvas. I'm trying to completely bare what I think at that moment"  and that "I paint for the simple reason that I have to. I feel a sense of relief after I do".  When asked about his artistic influences he stated that there were none. "I just paint like I paint and that's enough influence."  He did however state his admiration of Georg Baselitz,  the De Stijl artist Piet Mondrian, and Vincent van Gogh; after seeing van Gogh's paintings in person, Van Vliet quoted himself as saying that "the sun disappoints me so".   Exhibits of his paintings from the late 1990s at both the Anton Kern and Michael Werner Galleries of New York City received favorable reviews, the most recent of which were held between 2009 and 2010.  Falconer stated that the most recent exhibitions showed "evidence of a serious, committed artist." It was claimed that he stopped painting in the late 1990s.  A 2007 interview with Van Vliet through email by Anthony Haden-Guest, however, showed him to still be active artistically. He exhibited only few of his paintings because he immediately destroyed any that did not satisfy him. 
Life in retirement
After his retirement from music, Van Vliet rarely appeared in public. He resided near Trinidad, California, with his wife Janet "Jan" Van Vliet.    By the early 1990s he was using a wheelchair as a result of multiple sclerosis.       The severity of his illness was sometimes disputed. Many of his art contractors and friends considered him to be in good health.  Other associates such as his longtime drummer and musical director John French and bassist Richard Snyder have stated that they had noticed symptoms consistent with the onset of multiple sclerosis, such as sensitivity to heat, loss of balance, and stiffness of gait, by the late 1970s.One of Van Vliet's last public appearances was in the 1993 short documentary Some Yo Yo Stuff by filmmaker Anton Corbijn, described as an "observation of his observations". Around 13 minutes and shot entirely in black and white, with appearances by his mother and David Lynch, the film showed a noticeably weakened and dysarthric Van Vliet at his residence in California, reading poetry, and philosophically discussing his life, environment, music and art.  In 2000, he appeared on Gary Lucas' album Improve the Shining Hour and Moris Tepper's Moth to Mouth, and spoke on Tepper's 2004 song "Ricochet Man" from the album Head Off. He is credited for naming Tepper's 2010 album A Singer Named Shotgun Throat. Van Vliet often voiced concern over and support for environmentalist issues and causes, particularly the welfare of animals. He often referred to Earth as "God's Golfball" and this expression can be found on a number of his later albums. In 2003 he was heard on the compilation album Where We Live: Stand for What You Stand On: A Benefit CD for EarthJustice singing a version of "Happy Birthday to You" retitled "Happy Earthday". The track lasts 34 seconds and was recorded over the telephone. 
DeathThe Michael Werner Gallery announced on Friday, December 17, 2010, that Van Vliet had died at a hospital in Arcata, California,    weeks short of his 70th birthday. The gallery stated him to be "a complex and influential figure in the visual and performing arts," and "one of the most original recording artists of his time". The cause was named as complications from multiple sclerosis.  Tom Waits and Kathleen Brennan commented on his death, praising him: "Wondrous, secret... and profound, he was a diviner of the highest order." Dweezil Zappa dedicated the song "Willie the Pimp" to Beefheart at the "Zappa Plays Zappa" show at the Beacon Theater in New York City on the day of his death, while Jeff Bridges exclaimed "Rest in peace, Captain Beefheart!" at the conclusion of the December 18 episode of NBC's Saturday Night Live. 
Relationship with Frank Zappa 

Van Vliet met Frank Zappa when they were both teenagers and shared an interest in rhythm and blues and Chicago blues. Steve Taylor   They collaborated from this early stage, with Zappa's scripts for 'teenage operettas' such as "Captain Beefheart & The Grunt People" helping to elevate the Van Vliet persona of Captain Beefheart.  In 1963, the pair recorded a demo at the Pal Recording Studio in Cucamonga as the Soots, seeking support from a major label. Their efforts were unsuccessful, as "Beefheart's Howlin' Wolf vocal style and Zappa's distorted guitar" were "not on the agenda" at the time. The friendship between Zappa and Van Vliet over the years was sometimes expressed in the form of rivalry as musicians drifted back and forth between their groups.  Van Vliet embarked on the 1975 Bongo Fury tour with Zappa and The Mothers,  mainly because conflicting contractual obligations made him unable to tour or record independently. Their relationship grew acrimonious on the tour to the point that they refused to talk to one another. Zappa became irritated by Van Vliet, who drew constantly, including while on stage, filling one of his large sketch books with rapidly executed portraits and warped caricatures of Zappa. Musically, Van Vliet's primitive style contrasted sharply with Zappa's compositional discipline and abundant technique. Mothers of Invention drummer Jimmy Carl Black described the situation as "two geniuses" on "ego trips". 
Estranged for years afterwards, they reconnected at the end of Zappa's life, after his diagnosis with terminal prostate cancer.  Their collaborative work appears on the Zappa rarity collections The Lost Episodes (1996) and Mystery Disc (1996). Particularly notable is their song "Muffin Man", included on the Zappa/Beefheart Bongo Fury album, as well as Zappa's compilation album Strictly Commercial (1995). Zappa finished concerts with the song for many years afterwards. Beefheart also provided vocals for "Willie the Pimp" on Zappa's otherwise instrumental album Hot Rats (1969). One track on Trout Mask Replica, "The Blimp (mousetrapreplica)", features Magic Band guitarist Jeff Cotton talking on the telephone to Zappa superimposed onto an unrelated live recording of the Mothers of Invention (the backing track was later released in 1992 as "Charles Ives" on You Can't Do That on Stage Anymore, Vol. 5 ).  Van Vliet also played the harmonica on two songs on Zappa albums: "San Ber'dino" (credited as "Bloodshot Rollin' Red") on One Size Fits All (1975) and "Find Her Finer" on Zoot Allures (1976).  He is also the vocalist on "The Torture Never Stops (Original Version)" on Zappa's You Can't Do That on Stage Anymore, Vol. 4.
 
The Magic BandThe members of the original Magic Band had come together in 1965. At this time Van Vliet was simply the lead singer of the group, which had been brought together by guitarist Alex St. Clair. As in many emerging groups in California at the time, there were elements of psychedelia and the foundations of contemporary hippie counterculture.Thus, it seemed quite logical to promote the group as "Captain Beefheart and His Magic Band", around the concept that Captain Beefheart had 'magic powers' and, upon drinking a 'Pepsi', could summon up "His Magic Band" to appear and perform behind him.  The strands of this logic emanating from Vliet's Beefheart persona having been 'written in' as a character in a 'teenage operetta' that Zappa had formulated,  along with Van Vliet's renowned 'Pepsi-moods' with his mother Willie Sue and his generally spoilt teenage demeanor.
BeginningIn late 1965, after numerous car-club dances, juke joint gigs, appearances at the Avalon Ballroom and winning the Teenage Fair 'Battle of the Bands', the group finally bagged a contract for recording two singles with the newly-created A&M Records label with Leonard Grant as their manager. It was at this time that musical relationships had also been struck with members of Rising Sons who would later feature in the band's recordings. The A&M deal also brought some contention between members of the band, torn between a career as an experimental 'pop' group and that of a purist blues band. Working with young producer David Gates also opened up horizons for Vliet's skills as a poet-cum-lyricist, with his "Who Do You Think You're Fooling" on the flipside of the band's first single, a cover of the Ellas McDaniel/Willie Dixon-penned hit, "Diddy Wah Diddy". Fate and circumstance, not for the first time, would befall the band's success upon its release - which coincided with a singles cover of the same song by The Remains.  The initial line-up of the Magic Band that entered the studio for the A&M recordings was not that which emerged by the second release, "Moonchild", also backed by a Vliet-penned number, "Frying Pan". A 12" vinyl 45rpm mono EP was later released in 1987, with the four tracks of the two singles, plus "Here I Am, I Always Am" as a fifth previously unreleased song. This release was titled The Legendary A&M Sessions, with a red-marbled cover and (later) members Moon, Blakely, Vliet, Snouffer and Handley seated in a 'temperance dance band' photo-pose.The original Magic Band was primarily a rhythm and blues band, led by local Lancaster guitarist Alexis Snouffer, along with Doug Moon (guitar), Jerry Handley (bass), and Vic Mortenson (drums), the last being rotated with and finally replaced by Paul Blakely, known as 'P.G. Blakely'. For the first A&M recording Mortenson had been called up for active service and Snouffer stood in on drums, with a recently recruited Richard Hepner taking up the guitar role. By the time the single was aired on a pop television show P.G. Blakely was back in the drum seat. He then left for a career in television and was replaced by John French by the time the band cut their first album, as the first release on the new Buddah Records label.Personnel in the Magic Band for Beefheart's first album, Safe as Milk, were Alex St. Clair, Jerry Handley and John French. Earlier meetings with the Rising Sons had also secured them the guitar and arranging skills of Ry Cooder, which also brought about input from Taj Mahal on percussion and guitar work from Cooder's brother-in-law Russ Titelman. Further guests to this line-up included Milt Holland on percussion and the all-important and controversial theremin work on Electricity by Dr Samuel Hoffman. It was perhaps this track, above the others, which caused A&M to view the band as 'unsuitable' for their label with what was seen as weird and too psychedelic for popular consumption. Thus, this album was recorded for Buddah, with the band signed to Kama Sutra, which left them close to penniless after extricating themselves from A&M. A large proportion of the tracks on this album were co-written with Van Vliet by Herb Bermann, whom Vliet initially met up with at a bar gig near Lancaster. Part-time Hollywood television actor and budding scriptwriter Bermann and his then wife Cathleen spent some time in Vliet's company prior to this release.  Bermann would later write for Neil Young and script an early Spielberg-directed television medical drama. Gary 'Magic' Marker (the "Magic" added by Beefheart) was involved in early session work for this release, and his involvement with Rising Sons was also instrumental in acquiring the skills of Cooder, upon an unfulfilled suggestion that Marker might produce the album.  Marker would later lay down two uncredited bass tracks for Trout Mask Replica before being replaced by Mark Boston.French worked on five more Beefheart albums, while Snouffer worked with Beefheart on and off on three more albums. Bill Harkleroad joined the Magic Band as guitarist for Trout Mask Replica and stayed with Beefheart through May 1974.
Beefheart takes the leadWhile appearing humorous and kind-hearted in public, by all accounts Van Vliet was a severe taskmaster who abused his musicians verbally and sometimes physically. Vliet once told drummer John French he had been diagnosed as a paranoid schizophrenic and thus he would see inexistent conspiracies that explained this behaviour.    The band were reportedly paid little or nothing. French recalled that the musicians' contract with Van Vliet's company stipulated that Van Vliet and the managers were paid from gross proceeds before expenses, then expenses were paid, then the band members evenly split any remaining funds—in effect making band members liable for all expenses. As a result French was paid nothing at all for a 33-city U.S. tour in 1971 and a total of $78 for a tour of Europe and the U.S. in late 1975. In his 2010 memoir Beefheart: Through The Eyes of Magic French recounted being "screamed at, beaten up, drugged, ridiculed, humiliated, arrested, starved, stolen from, and thrown down a half-flight of stairs by his employer". "John ‘Drumbo’ French: Through The Eyes Of Magic review and interview" diskant.net. Retrieved 2010-04-07. The musicians also resented Van Vliet for taking complete credit for composition and arranging when the musicians themselves pieced together most of the songs from taped fragments or impressionistic directions such as "Play it like a bat being dragged out of oil and it's trying to survive, but it's dying from asphyxiation."  John French summarized the disagreement over composing and arranging credits metaphorically: 
 Post-Beefheart, receiving only a "grumpy" reception from him,  the band reformed in 2003 with John French on lead vocals, Gary Lucas and Denny Walley on guitars, Rockette Morton on bass, and Robert Williams on drums. At the start of their only European tour, Williams left and was replaced by Michael Traylor. The band released two albums and toured before disbanding in 2006.They toured the UK in 2005, playing a selection of small venues. John Peel was initially skeptical about the re-formed Magic Band. He played a live recording of the band recorded at the 2003 All Tomorrows Parties festival on his radio show; afterwards he couldn't speak and had to put on another record to regain his composure. Later the band did a live session for him.  The band's albums are Back to the Front (on the London-based ATP Recordings, 2003) and 21st Century Mirror Men (2005). They played over 30 shows throughout the United Kingdom and Europe, and one in the United States.    They have been chosen by Jeff Mangum of Neutral Milk Hotel to perform at the All Tomorrow's Parties festival that he will curate in March 2012 in Minehead, England. 
InfluenceVan Vliet has been the subject of at least two documentaries, the BBC's 1997 The Artist Formerly Known As Captain Beefheart narrated by John Peel, and the 2006 independent production Captain Beefheart: Under Review. According to Peel, "If there has ever been such a thing as a genius in the history of popular music, it's Beefheart... I heard echoes of his music in some of the records I listened to last week and I'll hear more echoes in records that I listen to this week."  His narration added: "A psychedelic shaman who frequently bullied his musicians and sometimes alarmed his fans, Don somehow remained one of rock's great innocents".  Mike Barnes referred to him as an "iconic counterculture hero", who with the Magic Band "went on to stake out startling new possibilities for rock music".  Lester Bangs cited Beefheart as "one of the four or five unqualified geniuses to rise from the hothouses of American music in the Sixties", Bangs, Lester (April 1, 1971). "Mirror Man" review for Rolling Stone. Accessed at beefheart.com.  while John Harris of The Guardian praised the music's "pulses with energy and ideas, the strange way the spluttering instruments meld together".   A Rolling Stone biography described his work as "a sort of modern chamber music for [a] rock band, since he plans every note and teaches the band their parts by ear. Because it breaks so many of rock's conventions at once, Beefheart's music has always been more influential than popular."  In this context, it is performed by the classical group, the Meridian Arts Ensemble.   Piero Scaruffi characterized "three basic elements": "the ballad out of tune, with guitar interlaced with jolting rhythm, vocal miasma and a rogue harmonica".    Scaruffi ranked Trout Mask Replica number one on his list of the greatest rock albums of all time.  He says that "the distance between Captain Beefheart and the rest of rock music is the same distance that there was between Beethoven and the symphonists of his time". Nicholas E. Tawa, in his 2005 book  Supremely American: Popular Song in the 20th Century: Styles and Singers and What They Said About America, included Beefheart among the prominent progressive rock musicians of the 1960s and 70s, N. E. Tawa, Supremely American: Popular Song in the 20th Century: Styles and Singers and What They Said About America (Lanham, MA: Scarecrow Press, 2005), ISBN 0-8108-5295-0, pp. 249–50.  while the Encyclopædia Britannica describes Beefheart's songs as conveying "deep distrust of modern civilization, a yearning for ecological balance, and that belief that all animals in the wild are far superior to human beings." Many artists have cited Van Vliet as an influence, beginning with the Edgar Broughton Band, who covered Dropout Boogie as Apache Drop Out (mixed with The Shadows' "Apache")  as early as 1970 and The Kills coverage of it 32 years later. The Minutemen were fans of Beefheart, and were arguably among the few to effectively synthesize his music with their own, especially in their early output, which featured disjointed guitar and irregular, galloping rhythms. Michael Azerrad describes the Minutemen's early output as "highly caffeinated Captain Beefheart running down James Brown tunes",  and notes that Beefheart was the group's "idol".  Others who arguably conveyed the same influence around the same time or before include John Cale of The Velvet Underground,  Little Feat,  Laurie Anderson,    The Residents and Henry Cow. Fred Frith, 1974, New Musical Express (exact date unknown), as quoted in Barnes.  Genesis P-Orridge of Throbbing Gristle and Psychic TV,  and poet mystic Z'EV,  both pioneers of industrial music, cited Van Vliet along with Zappa among their influences. More notable were those emerging during the early days of punk rock, such as The Clash  and John Lydon of the Sex Pistols (reportedly to manager Malcolm McLaren's disapproval), later of the post-punk band Public Image Ltd.   Cartoonist and writer Matt Groening tells of listening to Trout Mask Replica at the age of 15 and thinking "that it was the worst thing I'd ever heard. I said to myself, they're not even trying! It was just a sloppy cacophony. Then I listened to it a couple more times, because I couldn't believe Frank Zappa could do this to me—and because a double album cost a lot of money. About the third time, I realised they were doing it on purpose; they meant it to sound exactly this way. About the sixth or seventh time, it clicked in, and I thought it was the greatest album I'd ever heard."  Groening first saw Beefheart and the Magic Band perform in the front row at the Arlene Schnitzer Concert Hall in the early 1970s.    He later declared Trout Mask Replica to be the greatest album ever made. He considered the appeal of the Magic Band as outcasts who were even "too weird for the hippies".  Groening served as the curator of the All Tomorrow's Parties festival that reunited the post–Beefheart Magic Band. Another devotee from the film industry is Woody Allen, who was found singing along to Beefheart's music in the audience in New York. "Captain Beefheart Takes Up Cudgel Against Catatonia, Enlists Brave Shiny Beast".  "Genius or madman - the jury is still out on Captain Beefheart.". Van Vliet's influence on post–punk bands was demonstrated by Magazine's recording of "I Love You You Big Dummy" in 1978 and the tribute album Fast 'n' Bulbous - A Tribute to Captain Beefheart in 1988, featuring the likes of artists such as the Dog Faced Hermans, The Scientists, The Membranes, Simon Fisher Turner, That Petrol Emotion, the Primevals, The Mock Turtles, XTC, and Sonic Youth, who included a cover of Beefheart's "Electricity" as a bonus track on the deluxe edition of their 1988 album Daydream Nation. Other post-punk bands influenced by Beefheart include Gang of Four,  Siouxsie and the Banshees,  Pere Ubu, Babe the Blue Ox and Mark E. Smith of The Fall.  The Fall covered "Beatle Bones 'N' Smokin' Stones" in their 1993 session for John Peel. Beefheart is considered to have "greatly influenced" New Wave artists,  such as  David Byrne of Talking Heads, Blondie, Devo, The Bongos, and The B-52s. Tom Waits' shift in artistic direction, starting with 1983's Swordfishtrombones, was, Waits claims, a result of his wife Kathleen Brennan introducing him to Van Vliet's music. Simmons, Sylvie (October 2004). "The Mojo Interview: Tom Waits Speaks". Mojo.  "Once you've heard Beefheart," said Waits, "it's hard to wash him out of your clothes. It stains, like coffee or blood."   Guitarist John Frusciante of the Red Hot Chili Peppers cited Van Vliet as a prominent influence on the band's 1991 album Blood Sugar Sex Magik as well as his debut solo album Niandra Lades and Usually Just a T-Shirt (1994) and stated that during his drug-induced absence, after leaving the Red Hot Chili Peppers, he "would paint and listen to Trout Mask Replica."  Black Francis of the Pixies cited Beefheart's The Spotlight Kid as one of the albums he listened to regularly when first writing songs for the band,  and Kurt Cobain of Nirvana acknowledged Van Vliet's influence, mentioning him among his notoriously eclectic range. The White Stripes in 2000 released a 7" tribute single, Party of Special Things to Do, containing covers of that Beefheart song plus "China Pig" and "Ashtray Heart". The Kills included a cover of "Dropout Boogie" on their debut Black Rooster EP (2002). The Black Keys in 2008 released a free cover of Beefheart's "I'm Glad" from Safe as Milk.   In 2005 Genus Records produced a 20-track tribute to Captain Beefheart titled Mama Kangaroos - Philly Women Sing Captain Beefheart.  Beck included "Safe as Milk" and "Ella Guru" in a playlist of songs as part of his website's Planned Obsolescence series of mashups of songs by the musicians that influenced him.  Franz Ferdinand cited Beefheart's Doc At The Radar Station as a strong influence on their second LP, You Could Have It So Much Better.  Placebo briefly named themselves Ashtray Heart, after the track on Doc at the Radar Station; the band's album Battle for the Sun contains a track called "Ashtray Heart". Joan Osborne covered Beefheart's "(His) Eyes are a Blue Million Miles", which appears on Early Recordings. She cited Van Vliet as one of her influences.  PJ Harvey and John Parish discussed Beefheart's influence in an interview together. Harvey's first experience of Beefheart's music was as a child. Her parents had all of his albums; listening to them made her "feel ill". Harvey was reintroduced to Beefheart's music by Parish, who lent her a cassette copy of Shiny Beast (Bat Chain Puller) at the age of 16. She cited him as one of her greatest influences since. Parish described Beefheart's music as a "combination of raw blues and abstract jazz. There was humour in there, but you could tell that it wasn't [intended as] a joke. I felt that there was a depth to what he did that very few other rock artists have managed [to achieve]."  Ty Segall covered "Drop Out Boogie" on his 2009 album, Lemons.
Discography 



Safe as Milk (1967)
Strictly Personal (1968)
Trout Mask Replica (1969)
Lick My Decals Off, Baby (1970)
Mirror Man (1971)
The Spotlight Kid (1972)
 

Clear Spot (1972)
Unconditionally Guaranteed (1974)
Bluejeans & Moonbeams (1974)
Shiny Beast (Bat Chain Puller) (1978)
Doc at the Radar Station (1980)
Ice Cream for Crow (1982)
Bat Chain Puller (2012)
 

References 
Further reading

 
Courtier, Kevin (2007). Trout Mask Replica. New York: Continuum. ISBN 0-8264-2781-2
Delville, Michel & Norris, Andrew (2005). Frank Zappa, Captain Beefheart, and the Secret History of Maximalism. Cambridge: Salt Publishing. ISBN 1-84471-059-9.
 
Harkleroad, Bill (1998). Lunar Notes: Zoot Horn Rollo's Captain Beefheart Experience. Interlink Publishing. ISBN 0-946719-21-7.
 
Bamberger, W.C. (1999). Riding Some Kind Of Unusual Skull Sleigh: On The Arts Of Don Van Vliet. ISBN 978-0-917453-35-9
Beaugrand, Andreas and various (1994). Stand Up to Be Discontinued. (Paperback) ISBN 3-9801320-2-1.
Van Vliet, Don (Captain Beefheart) (1987). Skeleton Breath, Scorpion Blush. (All poems in English, preface in German and English). Bern-Berlin: Gachnang & Springer. ISBN 978-3-906127-15-6
 
Zappa, Frank & Occhiogrosso, Peter; The Real Frank Zappa Book, Poseidon Press (1989), ISBN 0-671-63870-X


External links 
 
 
 

Beefheart.com – The Captain Beefheart Radar Station
Captain Beefheart at Rolling Stone
[  Captain Beefheart at Allmusic]
 
Some Yo Yo Stuff by Anton Corbijn

  
 
DEFAULTSORT











































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Peter O'Toole
 
 
 
Peter Seamus Lorcan O'Toole O'Toole, Peter, Loitering With Intent, London: Macmillan London Ltd., 1992, p. 10  (born 2 August 1932) is an actor of stage and screen.  O'Toole achieved stardom in 1962 playing T. E. Lawrence in Lawrence of Arabia, and then went on to become a highly-honoured film and stage actor. He has been nominated for eight Academy Awards, and holds the record for most competitive Academy Award acting nominations without a win. He has won four Golden Globes, a BAFTA, and an Emmy, and was the recipient of an Honorary Academy Award in 2003 for his body of work.
Early lifePeter Seamus Lorcan O'Toole was born in 1932. Some sources give his birthplace as Connemara, County Galway, Ireland, and others as Leeds, in the West Riding of Yorkshire, England, where he grew up. O'Toole himself is not certain of his birthplace or date, noting in his autobiography that, while he accepts 2 August as his birthdate, he has a birth certificate from each country, with the Irish one giving a June 1932 birthdate.    O'Toole is the son of Constance Jane Eliot (née Ferguson), a Scottish  nurse, and Patrick Joseph O'Toole, an Irish metal plater, football player, and racecourse bookmaker.    When O'Toole was one year old, his family began a five-year tour of major racecourse towns in Northern England. He was brought up as a Catholic.   O'Toole was evacuated from Leeds early in World War II and went to a Catholic school for seven or eight years, where he was "implored" to become right-handed. “I used to be scared stiff of the nuns: their whole denial of womanhood – the black dresses and the shaving of the hair – was so horrible, so terrifying,” he later commented. “Of course, that's all been stopped. They're sipping gin and tonic in the Dublin pubs now, and a couple of them flashed their pretty ankles at me just the other day.” Upon leaving school O'Toole obtained employment as a trainee journalist and photographer on the Yorkshire Evening Post, until he was called up for national service as a signaller in the Royal Navy. As reported in a radio interview in 2006 on NPR, he was asked by an officer whether he had something he had always wanted to do. His reply was that he had always wanted to try being either a poet or an actor. O'Toole attended the Royal Academy of Dramatic Art (RADA) from 1952 to 1954 on a scholarship after being rejected by the Abbey Theatre's drama school in Dublin by the director Ernest Blythe, because he couldn't speak Irish. At RADA, he was in the same class as Albert Finney, Alan Bates and Brian Bedford. O'Toole described this as "the most remarkable class the academy ever had, though we weren't reckoned for much at the time. We were all considered dotty." 
Career
O'Toole began working in the theatre, gaining recognition as a Shakespearean actor at the Bristol Old Vic and with the English Stage Company, before making his television debut in 1954. He first appeared on film in 1959 in a bit part in The Day They Robbed the Bank of England.    O'Toole's major break came when he was chosen to play T. E. Lawrence in David Lean's Lawrence of Arabia (1962), after Marlon Brando proved unavailable and Albert Finney turned down the role.    His performance was ranked number one in Premiere magazine's list of the 100 Greatest Performances of All Time.  The role introduced him to U.S. audiences and earned him the first of his eight nominations for the Academy Award for Best Actor.O'Toole is one of a handful of actors to be Oscar-nominated for playing the same role in two different films; he played King Henry II in both 1964's Becket and 1968's The Lion in Winter. O'Toole played Hamlet under Laurence Olivier's direction in the premiere production of the Royal National Theatre in 1963. He has also appeared in Seán O'Casey's Juno and the Paycock at Gaiety Theatre, Dublin, and fulfilled a lifetime ambition when taking to the stage of the Irish capital's Abbey Theatre in 1970 to perform in Samuel Beckett's Waiting for Godot alongside Donal McCann. In 1980, he received wide critical acclaim for playing the director in the behind-the-scenes film The Stunt Man. He received good reviews as John Tanner in Man and Superman and Henry Higgins in Pygmalion, and won a Laurence Olivier Award for his performance in Jeffrey Bernard is Unwell (1989).  O'Toole was nominated for another Oscar for 1982's My Favorite Year, a light romantic comedy about the behind-the-scenes at a 1950s TV variety-comedy show, much like Your Show of Shows, in which O'Toole plays an ageing swashbuckling film star strongly reminiscent (intentionally) of Errol Flynn.In 1972, he played both Miguel de Cervantes and his fictional creation Don Quixote in Man of La Mancha, the motion picture adaptation of the 1965 smash hit Broadway musical, opposite Sophia Loren. Widely criticised for using mostly non-singing actors and shunned by the public at the time, the film has gone on to become more of a success on videocassette and DVD, though there are those who still find fault with it. O'Toole's singing was dubbed by tenor Simon Gilbert,  but the other actors sang their own parts. O'Toole and co-star James Coco, who played both Cervantes's manservant and Sancho Panza, both received Golden Globe nominations for their performances. In 1980, O'Toole starred as Tiberius in the Penthouse-funded biographical film Caligula.O'Toole won an Emmy Award for his role in the 1999 mini-series Joan of Arc. In 2004, O'Toole played King Priam in the summer blockbuster Troy. In 2005, he appeared on television as the older version of legendary 18th century Italian adventurer Giacomo Casanova in the BBC drama serial Casanova. O'Toole's role was mainly to frame the drama, telling the story of his life to serving maid Edith (Rose Byrne). The younger Casanova, seen for most of the action, was played by David Tennant, who had to wear contact lenses to match his brown eyes to O'Toole's blue.He was once again nominated for the Best Actor Academy Award for his portrayal of Maurice in the 2006 film Venus, directed by Roger Michell, his eighth such nomination. Most recently, O'Toole co-starred in the Pixar animated film Ratatouille, an animated film about a rat with dreams of becoming the greatest chef in Paris, as Anton Ego, a food critic. O'Toole appeared in the second season of Showtime's hit drama series The Tudors, portraying Pope Paul III, who excommunicates King Henry VIII from the church; an act that leads to a showdown between the two men in seven of the ten episodes.On 10 July 2012, O'Toole released a statement that he was retiring from acting. 
Personal lifeIn a BBC Radio interview in January 2007, O'Toole said that he had studied women for a very long time, had given it his best try, but knew "nothing." In 1959, he married Welsh actress Siân Phillips, with whom he had two daughters: award-winning actress Kate (b. 1960) and Patricia. Peter and Sîan were divorced in 1979. Phillips later revealed in two autobiographies that O'Toole had subjected her to mental cruelty — largely fuelled by drinking — and was subject to bouts of extreme jealousy when she finally left him for a younger lover.   O'Toole and his girlfriend, model Karen Brown, had a son, Lorcan Patrick O'Toole (born 14 March 1983, when O'Toole was fifty years old). Lorcan, now an actor, was a pupil at Harrow School, boarding at West Acre from 1996.Severe illness almost ended his life in the late 1970s. Owing to his heavy drinking and a digestive defect from birth, he underwent surgery in 1976 to have his pancreas and a large portion of his stomach removed, which resulted in insulin-dependent diabetes. In 1978 he nearly died from a blood disorder. He eventually recovered and returned to work, notably in The Stuntman (1980) and My Favorite Year (1982), both of which brought him Academy Award nominations. He also appeared in 1987's much-garlanded The Last Emperor. The late eighties and nineties brought fewer film roles but more work for television as well as the occasional stage performance. He resided on the Sky Road, just outside Clifden in Connemara in County Galway, Ireland, from 1963, and at the height of his career maintained homes in Dublin, London, and Paris (at The Hotel Ritz, which was where his character supposedly lived in the film How to Steal a Million). Currently, he makes his home solely in London. While studying at RADA in the early 1950s he was active in protesting against British involvement in the Korean War. Later, in the 1960s, he was an active opponent of the Vietnam War.He played a role in the creation of the current form of the well known folksong "Carrickfergus" which he related to Dominic Behan, who put it in print and made a recording in the mid-1960s.He is perhaps the only one of his "London" acting contemporaries not to be knighted. However, according to London's Daily Mail, he was offered a knighthood or honorary knighthood in 1987, but turned it down for personal and political reasons. In an interview with National Public Radio in December 2006, O'Toole revealed that he knows all 154 of Shakespeare's sonnets. A self-described romantic, O'Toole regards the sonnets as among the finest collection of English poems, reading them daily. In the film Venus,  he recites Sonnet 18, "Shall I Compare Thee To A Summer's Day." O'Toole has written two memoirs. Loitering With Intent: The Child chronicles his childhood in the years leading up to World War II and was a New York Times Notable Book of the Year in 1992. His second, Loitering With Intent: The Apprentice, is about his years spent training with a cadre of friends at the Royal Academy of Dramatic Art. The books have been praised by critics such as Charles Champlin of the Los Angeles Times, who wrote: "A cascade of language, a rumbling tumbling riot of words, a pub soliloquy to an invisible but imaginable audience, and the more captivating for it. O'Toole as raconteur is grand company." O'Toole spent parts of 2007 writing his third installment. This book will have (as he described it) "the meat," meaning highlights from his stage and filmmaking career.O'Toole is a noted fan of rugby union, and used to attend Five Nations matches with friends and fellow rugby fans Richard Harris, Kenneth Griffith, Peter Finch and Richard Burton. (O'Toole, Harris and Burton have a combined 17 Oscar nominations.) He is also a lifelong player, coach and enthusiast of cricket. O'Toole is licensed to teach and coach cricket to children as young as ten.O'Toole has been interviewed at least three times by Charlie Rose on The Charlie Rose Show. In the 17 January 2007 interview, O'Toole said that Eric Porter was the actor who had most influenced him. He also said that the difference between actors of yesterday and today is that actors of his generation were trained for "theatre, theatre, theatre." He also believes that the challenge for the actor is "to use his imagination to link to his emotion" and that "good parts make good actors." However, in other venues (including the DVD commentary for Becket), O'Toole has also credited Donald Wolfit as being his most important mentor. In an appearance on The Daily Show with Jon Stewart on 11 January 2007, O'Toole said that the actor he most enjoyed working with was Katharine Hepburn, his close friend; he played Henry II to her Eleanor of Aquitaine in The Lion in Winter.O'Toole remains close friends with his Lawrence of Arabia co-star Omar Sharif and his RADA classmate Albert Finney.O'Toole is a fan of Sunderland A.F.C., as he told Chris Evans on an episode of TFI Friday, dated Friday, 11 October 1996. The allegiance has lapsed, according to an article at the Salut! Sunderland website.  Coincidentally, however, the mother of T. E. Lawrence, Lawrence of Arabia, was born in Sunderland.Although he lost faith in organised religion as a teenager, O'Toole has expressed positive sentiments regarding the life of Jesus Christ. In an interview for The New York Times,    he said 'No one can take Jesus away from me...there’s no doubt there was a historical figure of tremendous importance, with enormous notions. Such as peace.' Earlier in the interview, he announced 'I am a retired Christian'.   Nevertheless, O'Toole played Samuel in One Night with the King, about Esther, in 2006.
Academy Award nominationsO'Toole has been nominated eight times for the Academy Award for Best Actor in a Leading Role, making him the most-nominated actor never to win the award.

Year Film Winner Also Nominated 
1962 Lawrence of Arabia Gregory Peck – To Kill a Mockingbird Burt Lancaster – Birdman of Alcatraz Jack Lemmon – Days of Wine and Roses Marcello Mastroianni – Divorce, Italian Style 
1964 Becket Rex Harrison – My Fair Lady Richard Burton – Becket Anthony Quinn – Zorba the Greek Peter Sellers – Dr. Strangelove 
1968 The Lion in Winter Cliff Robertson – Charly Alan Arkin – The Heart Is a Lonely Hunter Alan Bates – The Fixer Ron Moody – Oliver! 
1969 Goodbye, Mr. Chips John Wayne – True Grit Richard Burton – Anne of the Thousand Days Dustin Hoffman – Midnight Cowboy Jon Voight – Midnight Cowboy 
1972 The Ruling Class Marlon Brando – The Godfather (declined) Michael Caine – Sleuth Laurence Olivier – Sleuth Paul Winfield – Sounder 
1980 The Stunt Man Robert De Niro – Raging Bull Robert Duvall – The Great Santini John Hurt – The Elephant Man Jack Lemmon – Tribute 
1982 My Favorite Year Ben Kingsley – Gandhi Dustin Hoffman – Tootsie Jack Lemmon – Missing Paul Newman – The Verdict 
2006 Venus Forest Whitaker – The Last King of Scotland Leonardo DiCaprio – Blood Diamond Ryan Gosling – Half Nelson Will Smith – The Pursuit of Happyness 
In 2003, the Academy honoured him with an Academy Honorary Award for his entire body of work and his lifelong contribution to film.     O'Toole initially balked about accepting, and wrote the Academy a letter saying that he was "still in the game" and would like more time to "win the lovely bugger outright." The Academy informed him that they would bestow the award whether he wanted it or not. Further, as he related on The Charlie Rose Show in January 2007, his children admonished him, saying that it was the highest honour one could receive in the filmmaking industry. O'Toole agreed to appear at the ceremony and receive his Honorary Oscar. It was presented to him by Meryl Streep, who has the most Oscar nominations of any actress (17).
Filmography 
Stage appearances
1955–1958 Bristol Old Vic

King Lear (1956) (Cornwall)
The Recruiting Officer (1956) (Bullock)
Major Barbara (1956) (Peter Shirley)
Othello (1956) (Lodovico)
Pygmalion (1957) (Henry Higgins)
A Midsummer Night's Dream (1957) (Lysander)
Look Back in Anger (1957) (Jimmy Porter)
Man and Superman (1958) (Tanner)
Hamlet (1958) (Hamlet)
Amphitryon '38 (1958) (Jupiter)
Waiting for Godot (1957) (Vladimir)


1959 Royal Court Theatre

The Long and the Short and the Tall  (Bamforth)


1960 Royal Shakespeare Company, Stratford

The Taming of the Shrew  (Petruchio)
The Merchant of Venice  (Shylock)
Troilus and Cressida  (Thersites)


1963 National Theatre

Hamlet (title role) directed by Laurence Olivier


1963–1965

Baal (Phoenix Theatre, 1963) (Baal)
Ride a Cock Horse (Piccadilly Theatre, 1965)


1966 Gaiety Theatre, Dublin

Juno and the Paycock (Jack Boyle)
Man and Superman (Tanner)


1969 Abbey Theatre, Dublin

Waiting for Godot (Vladimir)


1973–1974 Bristol Old Vic

Uncle Vanya (Vanya)
Plunder
The Apple Cart (King Magnus)
Judgement (monologue)


1978 Toronto, Washington and Chicago

Uncle Vanya (Vanya)



Present Laughter (Gary Essendine)



Caligula (Tiberius)


1980–1999

Macbeth (1980) (Macbeth) (Old Vic Theatre)
Man and Superman (Theatre Royal, Haymarket)
Pygmalion (Professor Higgins)  (Shaftesbury Theatre, 1984, Yvonne Arnaud Theatre, Guildford, and Plymouth Theatre, New York, 1987)
The Apple Cart (Theatre Royal Haymarket, 1986)
Jeffrey Bernard is Unwell (Apollo Theatre, 1989, Shaftesbury Theatre, 1991 and Old Vic, 1999)
Our Song (Apollo Theatre, 1992).
Mary Mother of Christ (Apollo Theatre, 2013).


References 
External links 

 
 
 
 
 
"Peter O'Toole as Casanova"
University of Bristol Theatre Collection, University of Bristol
The Making of Lawrence of Arabia, Digitised BAFTA Journal, Winter 1962-3. With additional notes by Bryan Hewitt
  
DEFAULTSORT
























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	James I of Aragon
 
 
 
James I the Conqueror (Catalan: Jaume el Conqueridor, Aragonese: Chaime lo Conqueridor, Spanish: Jaime el Conquistador, Occitan: Jacme lo Conquistaire; 2 February 1208 – 27 July 1276) was the King of Aragon, Count of Barcelona, and Lord of Montpellier from 1213 to 1276. His long reign saw the expansion of the Crown of Aragon on all sides: into Valencia to the south, Languedoc to the north, and the Balearic Islands to the east. By a treaty with Louis IX of France, he wrested the county of Barcelona from nominal French suzerainty and integrated it into his crown. His part in the Reconquista was similar in Mediterranean Spain to that of his contemporary Ferdinand III of Castile in Andalusia. As a legislator and organiser, he occupies a high place among the Spanish kings. James compiled the Llibre del Consulat de Mar,   which governed maritime trade and helped establish Catalan-Aragonese supremacy in the western Mediterranean. He was an important figure in the development of Catalan, sponsoring Catalan literature and writing a quasi-autobiographical chronicle of his reign: the Llibre dels fets.
Early life and reign until majorityJames was born at Montpellier as the only son of Peter II of Aragon and Marie of Montpellier, heiress of William VIII of Montpellier and Eudokia Komnene. As a child, James was a pawn in the power politics of Provence, where his father was engaged in struggles helping the Cathar heretics of Albi against the Albigensian Crusaders led by Simon IV de Montfort, Earl of Leicester, who were trying to exterminate them. Peter endeavoured to placate the northern crusaders by arranging a marriage between his son James and Simon's daughter. He entrusted the boy to be educated in Montfort's care in 1211, but was soon forced to take up arms against him, dying at the Battle of Muret on 12 September 1213. Montfort would willingly have used James as a means of extending his own power had not the Aragonese and Catalans appealed to Pope Innocent III, who insisted that Montfort surrender him. James was handed over, at Carcassonne, in May or June 1214, to the papal legate Peter of Benevento.James was then sent to Monzón, where he was entrusted to the care of William of Montreuil, the head of the Knights Templar in Spain and Provence; the regency meanwhile fell to his great uncle Sancho, Count of Roussillon, and his son, the king's cousin, Nuño. The kingdom was given over to confusion until, in 1217, the Templars and some of the more loyal nobles brought the young king to Zaragoza. Chaytor, 82. In 1221, he was married to Eleanor, daughter of Alfonso VIII of Castile and Leonora of England. The next six years of his reign were full of rebellions on the part of the nobles. By the Peace of Alais of 31 March 1227, the nobles and the king came to terms. 
Acquisition of UrgellIn 1228, James faced the sternest opposition from a vassal yet. Guerau IV de Cabrera had occupied the County of Urgell in opposition to Aurembiax, the heiress of Ermengol VIII, who had died without sons in 1208. Although Aurembiax's mother, Elvira, had made herself a protegée of James's father, upon her death in 1220 Guerao had occupied the county and displaced Aurembiax, claiming that a woman could not inherit. James intervened on behalf of Aurembiax, whom he owed protection. He bought Guerau off and allowed Aurembiax to reclaim her territory, which she did at Lleida, probably also becoming one of James' earliest mistresses.  She surrendered Lleida to James and agreed to hold Urgell in fief from him. On her death in 1231, James exchanged the Balearic Islands for Urgell with her widower, Peter of Portugal.
Relations with France and Navarre
From 1230 to 1232, James negotiated with Sancho VII of Navarre, who desired his help against his nephew and closest living male relative, Theobald IV of Champagne. James and Sancho negotiated a treaty whereby James would inherit Navarre on the old Sancho's death, but when this did occur, the Navarrese nobles instead elevated Theobald to the throne (1234), and James disputed it. Pope Gregory IX was required to intervene.  In the end, James accepted Theobald's succession. James endeavoured to form a state straddling the Pyrenees in order to counterbalance the power of France north of the Loire. As with the much earlier Visigothic attempt, this policy was victim to physical, cultural, and political obstacles. As in the case of Navarre, he declined to launch into perilous adventures. By the Treaty of Corbeil, signed in May 1258, he ended his conflict with Louis IX of France, securing the renunciation of French claims to sovereignty over Catalonia.
ReconquestAfter his false start at uniting Aragon with the Kingdom of Navarre through a scheme of mutual adoption, James turned to the south and the Mediterranean Sea, where he conquered Majorca on 31 December in 1229 and the rest of the Balearic Islands; Minorca 1232; Ibiza 1235). Valencia capitulated to Aragonese rule on 28 September 1238 following an extensive campaign which included the Siege of Burriana and the decisive Battle of the Puig where the Aragonese commander, Bernardo Guillermo de Entenza who was also the king's cousin, died from wounds received in action. Chroniclers say he used gunpowder in the siege of Museros castle.During his remaining two decades after Corbeil, James warred with the Moors in Murcia, on behalf of his son-in-law Alfonso X of Castile. On 26 March 1244, the two monarchs signed the Treaty of Almizra to determine the zones of their expansion into Andalusia so as to prevent squabbling between them. Specifically, it defined the borders of the newly-created Kingdom of Valencia. James signed it on that date, but Alfonso did not affirm it until much later. According to the treaty, all lands south of a line from Biar to Villajoyosa through Busot were reserved for Castile.
Crusade of 1269The "khan of Tartary" (actually the Ilkhan) Abaqa corresponded with James in early 1267, inviting him to join forces with the Mongols and go on Crusade.  James sent an ambassador to Abaqa in the person of Jayme Alaric de Perpignan, who returned with a Mongol embassy in 1269. Runciman, History of the Crusades, pp. 330–332  Pope Clement IV tried to dissuade James from Crusading, regarding his moral character as sub-par, and Alfonso X did the same. Nonetheless, James, who was then campaigning in Murcia, made peace with Mohammed I ibn Nasr, the Sultan of Granada, and set about collecting funds for a Crusade. After organising the government for his absence and assembling a fleet at Barcelona in September 1269, he was ready to sail east. The troubadour Olivier lo Templier composed a song praising the voyage and hoping for its success. A storm, however, drove him off course and he landed at Aigues-Mortes. According to the continuator of William of Tyre, he returned via Montpellier por l'amor de sa dame Berenguiere ("for the love his lady Berengaria") and abandoned any further effort at a Crusade.  James' sons Pedro Fernández and Fernán Sánchez, who had been given command of part of the fleet, did continue on their way to Acre, where they arrived in December. They found that Baibars, the Mameluke sultan of Egypt, had broken his truce with the Kingdom of Jerusalem and was making a demonstration of his military power in front of Acre. During the demonstration, Egyptian troops hidden in the bushes ambushed a returning Frankish force which had been in Galilee. James' sons, initially eager for a fight, changed their minds after this spectacle and returned home via Sicily, where Fernán Sánchez was knighted by Charles of Anjou.
Patronage of art, learning, and literatureJames built and consecrated the Cathedral of Lleida, which was constructed in a style transitional between Romanesque and Gothic with little influence from Moorish styles. Chaytor, 96.  James was a patron of the University of Montpellier, which owed much of its development to his impetus.  He also founded a studium at Valencia in 1245 and received privileges for it from Pope Innocent IV, but it did not develop as splendidly.  In 1263, James presided over a debate in Barcelona between the Jewish rabbi Nahmanides and Pablo Christiani, a prominent converso. James was the first great sponsor and patron of vernacular Catalan literature. Indeed, he may himself be called "the first of the Catalan prose writers." Chaytor, 93.  James wrote or dictated at various stages a chronicle of his own life in Catalan, Llibre dels fets, the first autobiography by a Christian king. As well as being a fine example of autobiography, the "Book of Deeds" expresses concepts of the power and purpose of monarchy, examples of loyalty and treachery in the feudal order, and medieval military tactics.  More controversially, some historians have looked at these writings as a source of Catalan identity, separate from that of Occitania and Rome. James also wrote the Libre de la Saviesa or "Book of Wisdom." The book contains proverbs from various authors, reaching from the time of King Solomon  to nearly his own time with Albertus Magnus. It even contains maxims from the medieval Arab philosophers and from the Apophthegmata Philosophorum of Honein ben Ishak, which was probably translated at Barcelona during his reign. A Hebrew translator by the name of Jehuda was employed at James's court during this period. Though James was himself a prose writer and sponsored mostly prose works, he had an appreciation of verse. Chaytor, 94.  In consequence of the Albigensian Crusade, many troubadours were forced to flee southern France and many found refuge in Aragon. Notwithstanding his early patronage of poetry, by the influence of his confessor Ramon de Penyafort, James brought the Inquisition into his realm in 1233 to prevent any vernacular translation of the Bible. 
Succession
The favour James showed his illegitimate offspring led to protest from the nobles, and to conflicts between his legitimate and illegitimate sons. When one of the latter, Fernán Sánchez, who had behaved with gross ingratitude and treason to his father, was slain by the legitimate son Peter, the old king recorded his grim satisfaction.In his will, James divided his states between his sons by Yolanda of Hungary: the aforementioned Peter received the Hispanic possessions on the mainland and James, the Kingdom of Majorca (including the Balearic Islands and the counties of Roussillon and Cerdanya) and the Lordship of Montpellier. The division inevitably produced fratricidal conflicts. In 1276, the king fell very ill at Alzira and resigned his crown, intending to retire to the monastery of Poblet, but he died at Valencia on 27 July. His mummified body was later exhumed in 1856, when the monastery was under repair. A photograph of the king was taken.  The photograph of the head of the mummy clearly shows the wound in the left eyebrow that the King himself explained in a passage from his Llibre dels fets (Book of Deeds): 
 
As I was  coming with the men, I happened to turn my head towards the town in order to look at the Saracens, who had come out in great force, when a cross-bowman shot at me, and hit me beside the sun-hood, and the shot struck me on the head, the bolt lighting near the forehead. It was God's will it did not pass through the head, but the point of the arrow went half through it. In anger I struck the arrow so with my hand that I broke it: the blood came out down my face; I wiped it off with a mantle of  "sendal" I had, and went away laughing, that the army might not take alarm.  
Marriages and children 
James first married, in 1221, Eleanor, daughter of Alfonso VIII of Castile and Eleanor of England. Though he later had the marriage annulled, his one son by her was declared legitimate:

Alfonso (1229–1260), married Constance of Montcada, Countess of Bigorre

In 1235, James remarried to Yolanda, daughter of Andrew II of Hungary by his second wife Yolande de Courtenay. She bore him numerous children:

Yolanda, also known as Violant, (1236–1301), married Alfonso X of Castile
Constance (1239–1269), married Juan Manuel, Lord of Villena, son of Ferdinand III
Peter (1240–1285), successor in Aragon, Catalonia, and Valencia
James (1243–1311), successor in Balearics and Languedoc
Ferdinand (1245–1250)
Sancho (1246–1251)
Isabella (1247–1271), married Philip III of France
Mary (1248–1267), nun
Sancho, Archbishop of Toledo (1250–1279)
Eleanor (born 1251, died young)

James married thirdly Teresa Gil de Vidaure, but only by a private document, and left her when she developed leprosy. 

James (c.1255–1285), lord of Xèrica
Peter (1259–1318), lord of Ayerbe

The children in the third marriage were recognised in his last Will as being in the line of Succession to the Throne, should the senior lines fail.James also had several lovers, both during and after his marriages, and a few bore him illegitimate sons. By Blanca d'Antillón:

Ferran Sanchis (or Fernando Sánchez; 1240–1275), baron of Castro

By Berenguela Fernández:

Pedro Fernández, baron of Híjar

By Elvira Sarroca:

Jaume Sarroca (born 1248), Archbishop of Huesca


Ancestry   
Notes 
References

Chaytor, H. J. A History of Aragon and Catalonia. London: Methuen, 1933.
The book of deeds of James I of Aragon. A translation of the medieval Catalan Libre dels fets. Trans. Damian Smith and Helen Buffery (Aldershot: Ashgate, 2003) (Crusade Texts in Translation, 10.) Pp. xvii + 405 incl. 5 maps.


External links

libro.uca.edu
Full online book The Chronicle Of James I Of Aragon
The Worlds of Alfonso the Learned and James the Conqueror – Robert I. Burns, S.J., ed.
The Crusader Kingdom of Valencia – Robert Ignatius Burns, S.J.
1911 encyclopedia.org: James I of Aragon
Medieval Sourcebook: e-text of James's grant of trade privileges to Barcelona, 1232, freeing the city from tolls and imposts with his realms
James I at Find-A-Grave
The Barcelona Maritime Code of 1258
The life and times of James the first

 
 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
|-
 
 
|-
 
 
|-
 
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT








 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Frederick Sanger
 Frederick Sanger,   ( ) (born 13 August 1918) is a British biochemist who was twice the recipient of the Nobel Prize for Chemistry, the only person to have been so. In 1958 he was awarded a Nobel prize in chemistry "for his work on the structure of proteins, especially that of insulin". In 1980, Walter Gilbert and Sanger shared half of the chemistry prize "for their contributions concerning the determination of base sequences in nucleic acids". The other half was awarded to Paul Berg "for his fundamental studies of the biochemistry of nucleic acids, with particular regard to recombinant-DNA".He is the fourth person to have been awarded two Nobel Prizes, either individually or in tandem with others.
Early life and educationFrederick Sanger was born on 13 August 1918 in Rendcomb, a small village in Gloucestershire, the second son of Frederick Sanger, a general practitioner, and his wife, Cicely Sanger (née Crewdson).       He was one of three children. His brother, Theodore was only a year older while his sister May (Mary) was five years younger.  . A 200 min interview divided into 44 segments. Notes give the content of each segment.  His father had worked as an Anglican medical missionary in China but returned to England because of ill health. He was 40 in 1916 when he married Cicely who was 4 years younger. Sanger’s father converted to Quakerism soon after his two sons were born and brought up the children as Quakers. Sanger’s mother was the daughter of a wealthy cotton manufacturer and had a Quaker background but Cicely herself was not a Quaker.  When Sanger was around five years old the family moved to the small village of Tanworth-in-Arden in Warwickshire. The family were reasonably wealthy and employed a governess to teach the children. In 1927, at the age of nine, he was sent to the Downs School a residential preparatory school run by Quakers near Malvern. His brother Theo was a year ahead of him at the same school. In 1932, at the age of 14, he was sent to the recently established Bryanston School in Dorset. This used the Dalton system and had a more liberal regime which Sanger much preferred. At the school he liked his teachers and particularly enjoyed scientific subjects. He achieved good results in the School Certificate examinations and in 1936 moved as an undergraduate to St John's College, Cambridge to study natural sciences. His father had attended the same college. For Part I of his Tripos he took courses in physics, chemistry, biochemistry and mathematics but struggled with physics and mathematics.  Many of the other students had studied more mathematics at school. In his second year he replaced physics with physiology. He took three years to obtain his Part I. For his Part II he studied biochemistry. It was a relatively new department founded by Gowland Hopkins with enthusiastic lecturers who included Malcolm Dixon, Joseph Needham and Ernest Baldwin. Sanger graduated with a first class degree in 1939. Both his parents died from cancer during his first two years at Cambridge. His father was 60 and his mother was 58. As an undergraduate Sanger’s beliefs were strongly influenced by his Quaker upbringing. He was a pacifist and a member of the Peace Pledge Union. It was through his involvement with the Cambridge Scientists’ Anti-War Group that he met his future wife, Joan Howe, who was studying economics at Newnham College. They courted while he was studying for his Part II exams and married after he had graduated in December 1940. With the onset of the Second World War in 1939, he was granted unconditional exemption from military service as a conscientious objector. Sanger began studying for a PhD in October 1940 under N.W. "Bill" Pirie. His project was to investigate whether edible protein could be obtained from grass. After little more than a month Pirie left the department and Albert Neuberger became his adviser. Sanger changed his research project to study the metabolism of lysine and a more practical problem concerning the nitrogen of potatoes.  His thesis had the title: "The metabolism of the amino acid lysine in the animal body". He was examined by Charles Harington and Albert Charles Chibnall and awarded his doctorate in 1943. 
Research
Sequencing insulinNeuberger moved to the National Institute for Medical Research in London but Sanger stayed in Cambridge and in 1943 joined the group of Charles Chibnall, a protein chemist who had recently taken up the chair in the Department of Biochemistry. Chibnall had already done some work on the amino acid composition of bovine insulin  and suggested that Sanger look at the amino groups in the protein. Insulin could be purchased from Boots and was one of the very few proteins that were available in a pure form. Up to this time Sanger had been funding himself. In Chibnall's group he was initially supported by the Medical Research Council and then from 1944 until 1951 by a Beit Memorial Fellowship for Medical Research. Sanger's first triumph was to determine the complete amino acid sequence of the two polypeptide chains of bovine insulin in 1951.   . Sanger's Nobel lecture was also published in Science:    Prior to this it was widely assumed that proteins were somewhat amorphous. In determining these sequences, Sanger proved that proteins have a defined chemical composition.  For this purpose he used the "Sanger Reagent", fluorodinitrobenzene (FDNB), to react with the exposed amino groups in the protein and in particular with the N-terminal amino group at one end of the polypeptide chain. He then partially hydrolysed the insulin into short peptides (either with hydrochloric acid or using an enzyme such as trypsin). The mixture of peptides was fractionated in two dimensions on a sheet of filter paper: first by electrophoresis in one dimension and then, perpendicular to that, by chromatography in the other. The different peptide fragments of insulin, detected with ninhydrin, moved to different positions on the paper, creating a distinct pattern which Sanger called "fingerprints".  The peptide from the N-terminus could be recognised by the yellow colour imparted by the FDNB label and the identity of the labelled amino acid at the end of the peptide determined by complete acid hydrolysis and discovering which dinitrophenyl-amino acid was there. By repeating this type of procedure Sanger was able to determine the sequences of the many peptides generated using different methods for the initial partial hydrolysis. These could then be assembled into the longer sequences to deduce the complete structure of insulin.  Sanger's principal conclusion was that the two polypeptide chains of the protein insulin had precise amino acid sequences and, by extension, that every protein had a unique sequence.  It was this achievement that earned him his first Nobel prize in Chemistry in 1958.  This discovery was crucial for the later sequence hypothesis of Crick  for developing ideas of how DNA codes for proteins.
Sequencing RNAFrom 1951 Sanger was a member of the external staff of the Medical Research Council  and when they opened the Laboratory of Molecular Biology in 1962, he moved from his laboratories in the Biochemistry Department of the university to the top floor of the new building. He became head of the Protein Chemistry division. Soon after his move he started looking at the possibility of sequencing RNA molecules and began developing methods for separating ribonucleotide fragments generated with specific nucleases. One of the problems was to obtain a pure piece of RNA to sequence. In the course of this he discovered in 1964, with Kjeld Marcker, the formylmethionine tRNA which initiates protein synthesis in bacteria.  He was beaten in the race to be the first to sequence a tRNA molecule by a group led by Robert Holley from Cornell University who published the sequence of the 77 ribonucleotides of alanine tRNA from Saccharomyces cerevisiae in 1965.  By 1967 Sanger's group had determined the nucleotide sequence of the 5S ribosomal RNA from Escherichia coli, a small RNA of 120 nucleotides. 
Sequencing DNA 
He then turned to sequencing DNA which would require an entirely different approach. He looked at different ways of using DNA polymerase I from E. coli to copy single stranded DNA.  In 1975 together with Alan Coulson he published a sequencing procedure using DNA polymerase with radiolabelled nucleotides that he called the "Plus and Minus" technique.     This involved two closely related methods that generated short oligonucleotides with defined 3' termini. These could be fractionated by electrophoresis on a polyacrylamide gel and visualised using autoradiography. The procedure could sequence up to 80 nucleotides in one go and was a big improvement on what gone before but was still very laborious. Nevertheless his group were able to sequence most of the 5,386 nucleotides of the single-stranded bacteriophage φX174.  This was the first fully sequenced DNA-based genome. To their surprise they discovered that the coding regions of some of the genes overlapped with one another.In 1977 Sanger and colleagues introduced the "dideoxy" chain-termination method for sequencing DNA molecules, also known as the "Sanger method".   This was a major breakthrough and allowed long stretches of DNA to be rapidly and accurately sequenced. It earned him his second Nobel prize in Chemistry in 1980, which he shared with Walter Gilbert and Paul Berg.  The new method was used by Sanger and colleagues to sequence human mitochondrial DNA (16,569 base pairs)  and bacteriophage λ (48,502 base pairs).  The dideoxy method was eventually used to sequence the entire human genome.He is thus far (2012) the only person to have been awarded two Nobel Prizes in Chemistry, and one of only four two-time Nobel laureates: the other three were Marie Curie (Physics, 1903 and Chemistry, 1911), Linus Pauling (Chemistry, 1954 and Peace, 1962) and John Bardeen (twice Physics, 1956 and 1972).
Marriage and familySanger married Margaret Joan Howe in 1940. They have three children: Robin, born in 1943, Peter born in 1946 and Sally Joan born in 1960. 
Later life
Sanger retired in 1983 to his home, "Far Leys", in Swaffham Bulbeck outside Cambridge and next to Sanger Wood.In 1992, the Wellcome Trust and the Medical Research Council founded the Sanger Centre (now the Sanger Institute), named after him.    The Institute is located on the Wellcome Trust Genome Campus near Hinxton, only a few miles from Sanger's home. He agreed to having the Centre named after him when asked by John Sulston, the founding director, but warned, "It had better be good."   It was opened by Sanger himself on 4 October 1993, with a staff of less than 50 people, and went on to take a leading role in the sequencing of the human genome.  The Institute now has over 900 people and is one of the world's largest genomic research centres.He has lost his religious faith and calls himself an agnostic.  . This interview, which took place on 16 September 1997, was republished in:    In an interview published in the Times newspaper in 2000 Sanger is quoted as saying: "My father was a committed Quaker and I was brought up as a Quaker, and for them truth is very important. I drifted away from those beliefs - one is obviously looking for truth but one needs some evidence for it. Even if I wanted to believe in God I would find it very difficult. I would need to see proof."    He declined the offer of a knighthood as he did not wish to be addressed as "Sir" but later accepted the award of an Order of Merit.  In 2007 the British Biochemical Society was given a grant by the Wellcome Trust to catalogue and preserve the 35 laboratory notebooks in which Sanger recorded his remarkable research from 1944 to 1983. In reporting this matter, Science magazine noted that Sanger, "the most self-effacing person you could hope to meet", was now spending his time gardening at his Cambridgeshire home. 
Awards and honours 

Fellow of the Royal Society -  1954
Commander of the Order of the British Empire - 1963
Order of the Companions of Honour - 1981
Order of Merit (Commonwealth) - 1986
William Bate Hardy Prize - 1976
 

Nobel Prize in Chemistry - 1958, 1980
Corday–Morgan Medal - 1951
Royal Medal - 1969
Gairdner Foundation International Award - 1971
Copley Medal - 1977
 

G.W. Wheland Award - 1978
Louisa Gross Horwitz Prize - 1979
Albert Lasker Award for Basic Medical Research - 1979
Association of Biomolecular Resource Facilities Award - 1994
 
Notes 
Selected publications by Frederick Sanger 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 . According to the Institute for Scientific Information (ISI) database, by October 2010 this paper had been cited over 64,000 times.
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 
Further reading

 .
 .


External links

The Sanger Institute
About the 1958 Nobel Prize
About the 1980 Nobel Prize
Fred Sanger 2001 Video Documentary by The Vega Science Trust
National Portrait Gallery
Frederick Sanger interviewed by Alan Macfarlane, 24th August 2007 (film)
 . Interviewed by Lewis Wolpert. Duration 1 hour.

 
  
DEFAULTSORT























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Mikhail Lavrentyev
 
Mikhail Alekseevich Lavrentyev or Lavrentiev ( ) (November 19, 1900 – October 15, 1980) was an outstanding Soviet mathematician and hydrodynamicist.
BiographyLavrentiev was born in Kazan, where his father was an instructor at a college (he later became a professor at Kazan University, then Moscow University).Lavrentiev entered Kazan University, and, when his family moved to Moscow in 1921, he transferred to the Department of Physics and Mathematics of Moscow University. He graduated in 1922. He continued his studies in the university in 1923-26 as a graduate student of  Nikolai Luzin.Although Luzin was alleged to plagiarize in science and indulge in anti-Sovietism by some of his students in 1936, Lavrentiev did not participate in the notorious political persecution of his teacher which is known as the Luzin case or Luzin affair. In 1927 Lavrentiev spent half a year in France, collaborating with French mathematicians, and upon returned took up a position with Moscow University.  Later he became a member of the staff of the Steklov Institute.  His main contributions relate to conformal mappings and partial differential equations.  
Mstislav Keldysh was one of his students. One of Lavrentiev's scientific interests was the physics of explosive processes, in which he had become involved when doing defense work during World War II.  A better understanding of the physics of explosions made it possible to use controlled explosions in construction, the best-known example being the construction of the Medeu Mudflow Control Dam outside of Almaty in Kazakhstan.Mikhail Lavrentiev was one of the main organizers and the first Chairman of the Siberian Division of the Russian Academy of Sciences (in his time the Academy of Sciences of the USSR) from its founding in 1957 to 1975. The foundation of the Siberia's "Academic Town" Akademgorodok (now a district of Novosibirsk) remains his most widely known achievement.He was also a founder of the Institute of Hydrodynamics of the Siberian Division of the Russian Academy of Sciences which since 1980 has been named after Lavrentiev.   Lavrentiev was awarded the honorary title of Hero of the Socialist Labour, a Lenin Prize and USSR State Prize, and a Lomonosov Gold Medal. He was elected a member of several world-renowned  academies, and an honorable citizen of Novosibirsk. Mikhail A. Lavrentiev's son, also named Mikhail (Mikhail M. Lavrentiev),  a talented mathematician in his own right, is a member of the leadership of Akademgorodok today. 
References 
External links

 
 
Mikhail Lavrentiev's biography, at the site of Lavrentiev Hydrodynamics Institute.  

 
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Mikhail Lomonosov
 
 
Mikhail Vasilyevich Lomonosov ( ;   –  ) was a Russian polymath, scientist and writer, who made important contributions to literature, education, and science. Among his discoveries was the atmosphere of Venus. His spheres of science were natural science, chemistry, physics, mineralogy, history, art, philology, optical devices and others. Lomonosov was also a poet and influenced the formation of the modern Russian literary language.
Early life and familyLomonosov was born in the village of Denisovka (later renamed Lomonosovo in his honor) in Archangelgorod Governorate, on an island not far from Kholmogory, in the far north of Russia.  His father, Vasily Dorofeyevich Lomonosov, was a prosperous peasant fisherman turned ship owner, who amassed a small fortune transporting goods from Arkhangelsk to Pustozyorsk, Solovki, Kola, and Lapland.  Lomonosov's mother was Vasily's first wife, a deacon’s daughter, Elena Ivanovna Sivkova. He remained at Denisovka until he was ten, when his father decided that he was old enough to participate in his business ventures, and Lomonosov began accompanying Vasily on trading missions. Learning was young Lomonosov's passion, however, not business. The boy's thirst for knowledge was insatiable. Lomonosov had been taught to read as a boy by his neighbor Ivan Shubny, and he spent every spare moment with his books.  He continued his studies with the village deacon, S.N. Sabelnikov, but for many years the only books he had access to were religious texts. When he was fourteen, Lomonosov was given copies of Meletius Smotrytsky's Modern Church Slavonic (a grammar book) and Leonty Magnitsky's Arithmetic. In 1724, his father married for the third and final time. Lomonosov and his stepmother Irina had an acrimonious relationship. Unhappy at home and intent on obtaining a higher education, which Lomonosov could not receive in Denisovka, he was determined to leave the village. 
Education in Moscow
In 1730, at nineteen, Lomonosov went to Moscow on foot, because he was determined to study.  Not long after arriving, Lomonosov obtained admission into the Slavic Greek Latin Academy by falsely claiming to be a priest’s son.  That initial falsehood would nearly get him expelled from the academy a few years later when discovered. Lomonosov lived on three kopecks a day, living off only black bread and kvas, but he made rapid progress scholastically.  After three years in Moscow he was sent to Kiev to study for one year at the Kyiv-Mohyla Academy. He quickly became dissatisfied with the education he was receiving there, and returned to Moscow several months ahead of schedule, resuming his studies there.  He completed a twelve-year study course in only five years, graduating at the top of his class. In 1736, Lomonosov was awarded a scholarship to Saint Petersburg State University.  He plunged into his studies and was rewarded with a two-year grant to study abroad at the University of Marburg, in Germany. 
Education abroadThe University of Marburg was among Europe's most important universities in the mid-18th century due to the presence of the philosopher Christian Wolff, a prominent figure of the German Enlightenment. Lomonosov became one of Wolff’s personal students while at Marburg. Both philosophically and as a science administrator, this connection would be the most influential of Lomonosov’s life. Between 1739-1740 he studied mineralogy, metallurgy, and mining at Bergrat Henckel´s laboratories in Freiberg, Saxony; there he intensified his studies of German literature. 

Lomonosov quickly mastered the German language, and in addition to philosophy, seriously studied chemistry, discovered the works of 17th century English theologian and natural philosopher, Robert Boyle, and even began writing poetry. He also developed an interest in German literature. He is said to have especially admired Günther. His Ode on the Taking of Khotin from the Turks, composed in 1739, attracted a great deal of attention in Saint Petersburg. During his residence in Marburg, Lomonosov boarded with Catharina Zilch, a brewer’s widow.  He fell in love with Catharina’s daughter Elisabeth Christine Zilch. They were married in June 1740.  Lomonosov found it extremely difficult to maintain his growing family on the scanty and irregular allowance granted him by the Russian Academy of Science. As his circumstances became desperate, he resolved to return to Saint Petersburg. 
Return to RussiaLomonosov returned to Russia in 1741. A year later he was named adjutant to the Russian Academy of Science in the physics department.  In May 1743, Lomonosov was accused, arrested, and held under house arrest for eight months, after he supposedly insulted various people associated with the Academy. He was released and pardoned in January 1744 after apologising to all involved. Lomonosov was made a full member of the Academy, and named professor of chemistry, in 1745.  He established the Academy's first chemistry laboratory. Cornwell, Neil and Christian, Nicole. Reference Guide to Russian Literature, Page 514. Taylor & Francis: London, 1998  Eager to improve Russia’s educational system, in 1755, Lomonosov joined his patron Count Ivan Shuvalov in founding the Moscow State University. 
Physicist
In 1756, Lomonosov tried to replicate Robert Boyle's experiment of 1673.  He concluded that the commonly accepted phlogiston theory was false. Anticipating the discoveries of Antoine Lavoisier, he wrote in his diary: "Today I made an experiment in hermetic glass vessels in order to determine whether the mass of metals increases from the action of pure heat. The experiments– of which I append the record in 13 pages– demonstrated that the famous Robert Boyle was deluded, for without access of air from outside the mass of the burnt metal remains the same".He regarded heat as a form of motion, suggested the wave theory of light, contributed to the formulation of the kinetic theory of gases, and stated the idea of conservation of matter in the following words: "All changes in nature are such that inasmuch is taken from one object insomuch is added to another. So, if the amount of matter decreases in one place, it increases elsewhere. This universal law of nature embraces laws of motion as well, for an object moving others by its own force in fact imparts to another object the force it loses" (first articulated in a letter to Leonhard Euler dated 5 July 1748, rephrased and published in Lomonosov's dissertation "Reflexion on the solidity and fluidity of bodies", 1760).
AstronomerLomonosov was the first person to hypothesize the existence of an atmosphere on Venus based on his observation of the transit of Venus of 1761 in a small observatory near his house in Petersburg. 
In June 2012 a group of astronomers carried out experimental reconstruction of Lomonosov's discovery of Venusian atmosphere with antique refractors during the transit of Venus (June 5–6, 2012).  They concluded that Lomonosov's telescope was fully adequate to the task of detecting the arc of light around Venus off the Sun's disc during ingress or egress if proper experimental techniques as described by Lomonosov in his 1761 paper    are employed.
In 1762, Lomonosov presented an improved design of a reflecting telescope to the Russian Academy of Sciences forum. His telescope had its primary mirror adjusted at an angle of four degrees to the telescope's axis. This made the image focus at the side of the telescope tube, where the observer could view the image with an eyepiece without blocking the image. However, this invention was not published until 1827, so this type of telescope has become associated with a similar design by William Herschel, the Herschelian telescope. 
ChemistLomonosov was the first person to record the freezing of mercury.  Believing that nature is subject to regular and continuous evolution, he demonstrated the organic origin of soil, peat, coal, petroleum and amber. In 1745, he published a catalogue of over 3,000 minerals, and in 1760, he explained the formation of icebergs. 
GeographerLomonosov's observation of iceberg formation led into his pioneering work in geography. Lomonosov got close to the theory of continental drift,  theoretically predicted the existence of Antarctica (he argued that icebergs of the South Ocean could be formed only on a dry land covered with ice),  and invented sea tools which made writing and calculating directions and distances easier. In 1764, he organized an expedition (led by Admiral Vasili Chichagov) to find the Northeast Passage between the Atlantic and Pacific oceans by sailing along the northern coast of Siberia. 
MosaicistLomonosov was proud to restore the ancient art of mosaics. In 1754, in his letter to Leonard Euler, he wrote that his three years of experiments on the effects of chemistry of minerals on their colour led to his deep involvement in the mosaic art. In 1763, he set up a glass factory that produced the first stained glass mosaics outside of Italy. There were forty mosaics attributed to Lomonosov, with only twenty-four surviving to the present day. Among the best is the portrait of Peter the Great and the Battle of Poltava, measuring 4.8 × 6.4 meters.   
PoetIn 1755, he wrote a grammar that reformed the Russian literary language by combining Old Church Slavonic with the vernacular tongue. To further his literary theories, he wrote more than 20 solemn ceremonial odes, notably the Evening Meditation on the God's Grandeur. He applied an idiosyncratic theory to his later poems– tender subjects needed words containing the front vowel sounds E, I, Y and U, whereas things that may cause fear (like "anger", "envy", "pain" and "sorrow") needed words with back vowel sounds O, U and Y. That was a version of what is now called sound symbolism. Lomonosov published a history of Russia in 1760. In addition, he unsuccessfully attempted to write an epic about Peter the Great, to be based on the Aeneid by Vergil. In 1761, he was elected a foreign member of the Royal Swedish Academy of Sciences. In 1764, Lomonosov was appointed to the position of secretary of state. He died one year later in Saint Petersburg. Most of his accomplishments were unknown outside Russia until long after his death.
Legacy
His granddaughter Sophia Konstantinova (1769–1844) married Russian military hero and statesman General Nikolay Raevsky. His great-granddaughter was Princess Maria (Raevskaya) Volkonskaya, the wife of the Decembrist Prince Sergei Volkonsky. A lunar crater bears his name, as does a crater on Mars. In 1948, the underwater Lomonosov Ridge in the Arctic Ocean was named in his honor.  Moscow State University was renamed ‘’M. V. Lomonosov Moscow State University’’ in his honor in 1940.The Lomonosov Gold Medal was established in 1959 and is awarded annually by the Russian Academy of Sciences to a Russian and a foreign scientist.
See also

Imperial Porcelain Factory
Ivan Kulibin
Lomonosov, Russia
Lomonosov Ridge


Notes 
References

 


English translations

 


Further reading

 
 
 
 
 
Peter Hoffmann: Michail Vasil'evič Lomonosov (1711 - 1765). Ein Enzyklopädist im Zeitalter der Aufklärung. Frankfurt am Main: Peter Lang,  2011. ISBN 978-3-631-61797-7
Norbert Nail (March 2012): Russi intra muros: Studenten aus Sankt Petersburg 1736-1739 bei Christian Wolff in Marburg. Zum 300. Geburtstag des Universalgelehrten Michail Vasil'evič Lomonosov am 19. November 2011. In: Studenten-Kurier 1/2012, pp. 15–19. ISSN 0931-0444


External links 

Сайт о М. В. Ломоносове — жизнь, научная деятельность, творчество, историческая родина, туризм на родину Ломоносова, 300-летний юбилей М. В. Ломоносова  
Lomonosov and His Time — electronic collection at the Russian Academy of Sciences website  
Illustrated chronology of Lomonosov's life
Evening Meditation on the Greatness of God on the occasion of the Northern Lights
 
  The descendants Mikhail Vasilyevich Lomonosov
 
Kutateladze S.S. The Mathematical Background of Lomonosov's Contribution
Lomonosov's matriculation, Marburg 1736
Lomonosov's Passport, Marburg 1741

   
DEFAULTSORT
























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Evelyn Waugh
 
 Arthur Evelyn St. John Waugh   (28 October 1903 – 10 April 1966), known as Evelyn Waugh, was an English writer of novels, biographies and travel books. He was also a prolific journalist and reviewer. His best-known works include his early satires Decline and Fall (1928) and A Handful of Dust (1934), his novel Brideshead Revisited (1945) and his trilogy of Second World War novels collectively known as Sword of Honour (1952–61). Waugh is widely recognised as one of the great prose stylists of the 20th century.The son of a publisher, Waugh was educated at Lancing and Hertford College, Oxford, and worked briefly as a schoolmaster before becoming a full-time writer. As a young man, he acquired many fashionable and aristocratic friends, and developed a taste for country house society that never left him.  In the 1930s he travelled extensively, often as a special newspaper correspondent; he was reporting from Abyssinia at the time of the 1935 Italian invasion. He served in the British armed forces throughout the Second World War, first in the Royal Marines and later in the Royal Horse Guards.  All these experiences, and the wide range of people he encountered, were used in Waugh's fiction, generally to humorous effect; even his own mental breakdown in the early 1950s, brought about by misuse of drugs, was fictionalised.Waugh had converted to Roman Catholicism in 1930, after the failure of his first marriage. His traditionalist stance led him to oppose strongly all attempts to reform the Church; the changes brought about in the wake of the Second Vatican Council of 1962–65, particularly the introduction of the vernacular Mass, greatly disturbed him. This blow, together with a growing dislike for the welfare state culture of the postwar world and a decline in his health, saddened his final years, although he continued to write. To the public at large he generally displayed a mask of indifference, but he was capable of great kindness to those he considered his friends, many of whom remained devoted to him throughout his life.  After his death in 1966, he acquired a new following through film and television versions of his work, such as Brideshead Revisited in 1982.
Biography
Family background
Arthur Evelyn St. John Waugh was born on 28 October 1903 to Arthur Waugh (1866–1943) and Catherine Charlotte Raban (1870–1954), into a family with English, Scottish, Welsh, Irish and Huguenot origins. Distinguished  forbears include Lord Cockburn (1779–1854), a leading Scottish advocate and judge,  William Morgan (1750–1833), a pioneer of actuarial science who served The Equitable Life Assurance Society for 56 years, and  Philip Henry Gosse (1810–88), a natural scientist who became notorious through his depiction as a religious fanatic in his  son Edmund's memoir Father and Son.  Of those bearing the Waugh name, the Rev. Alexander Waugh (1754–1827) was a minister in the Secession Church of Scotland  who helped found the London Missionary Society, and was one of the leading Nonconformist preachers of his day.  His grandson Alexander Waugh (1840–1906) was a country medical practitioner who bullied his wife and children and became known  in the Waugh family as "the Brute". The elder of his two sons, born in 1866, was  Arthur Waugh. After attending  Sherborne School and New College, Oxford, Arthur Waugh  began a career in publishing and as a literary critic.  In 1902 he became managing director of  Chapman and Hall, publishers of the works of Charles Dickens.  He had married Catherine Raban (1870–1954)  in 1893; their first son Alexander Raban Waugh (always known as Alec) was born on 8 July 1898. Alec Waugh later became a novelist of note. At the time of his birth the family were living in North London, at Hillfield Road, West Hampstead where,  on 28 October 1903, the couple's second son was born, "in great haste before Dr Andrews could arrive", Catherine recorded.  On 7 January 1904 the boy was christened Arthur Evelyn St John Waugh, but was known in the family and in the wider world as Evelyn. Some biographers have recorded his forenames as "Evelyn Arthur St. John", but Waugh gives the "Arthur Evelyn" order in A Little Learning, p. 27. The confusion may in part be attributable to differences in forename order between Waugh's birth and death certificates. The former specifies "Arthur Evelyn St. John," and the latter "Evelyn Arthur St. John."
Childhood
Golders Green and Heath MountIn 1907 the family left Hillfield Road for Underhill, a house which Arthur had had built in nearby Golders Green,  then a semi-rural area of dairy farms, market gardens and  bluebell woods.   Evelyn received his first lessons at home from his mother, with whom he formed a particularly close relationship—Arthur Waugh was a more distant figure, whose bond with his elder son Alec was such that Evelyn often felt excluded.   In September 1910 Evelyn began as a day pupil at Heath Mount preparatory school.  He was by then a lively child of many interests, who had already written his first complete story, "The Curse of the Horse Race". Stannard, Vol. I p. 40  Waugh spent six relatively contented years at Heath Mount; on his own assertion he was "quite a clever little boy", who was seldom distressed or overawed by his lessons.    Physically pugnacious, he was inclined to bully weaker boys; among his victims was the future society photographer Cecil Beaton, who never forgot the experience.  Outside school, Waugh and other children in the neighbourhood performed  dramatic works usually written by him. Hastings, pp. 30–32  On the basis of a belief then being fostered in the press that the Germans were about to invade England, he organised his friends into a gang called "The Pistol Troop", which  built a fort, went on manoeuvres and paraded in makeshift uniforms.   After the First World War broke out in 1914, Waugh and other boys from Heath Mount's Boy Scout troop were sometimes employed at the War Office as messengers. He hung about in the corridors hoping to get a glimpse of Lord Kitchener, but never did. Stannard, Vol I pp. 42–47  Family holidays were usually spent with the Waugh aunts at Midsomer Norton, in a house lit by oil lamps that Waugh recalled with delight many years later.  At Midsomer Norton he became deeply interested in high Anglican church rituals—the first stirrings of the spiritual dimension that would later dominate his life—and  served as an altar boy at the local Anglican church.  During his last year at Heath Mount Waugh devised and edited a school magazine, The Cynic. A blue plaque commemorates Waugh at 145 North End Road, Golders Green.    
Lancing
Alec Waugh, like his father, had gone to school at Sherborne, and it was assumed that Evelyn would follow. However, in 1915, Alec was asked to leave, after a homosexual relationship came to light. He departed for military training and, while waiting for his commission to be confirmed, wrote a novel of school life, The Loom of Youth, which was published by Chapman and Hall. The novel, which alluded to homosexual friendships in what was recognisably Sherborne, caused a public sensation and offended the school sufficiently to make it impossible for Evelyn to go there.  Much to his annoyance, he was sent in May 1917 to Lancing, in his view a decidedly  inferior establishment. Waugh soon overcame his initial aversion to the school and settled down. He began to establish a reputation as an aesthete and, in November 1917, had an essay "In Defence of Cubism"  accepted by the arts magazine Drawing and Design—his first published article.   Within the school, he became mildly subversive, mocking the school's cadet corps and founding the Corpse Club "for those who were weary of life".      The end of the war saw the return to the school of younger masters such as J. F. Roxburgh, who encouraged Waugh to write and predicted a great future for him.  A biography of Roxburgh (who went on to be first headmaster of Stowe School) was the last work given a literary review by Waugh, in The Observer on 17 October 1965.  Another mentor, Francis Crease, taught Waugh the arts of calligraphy and decorative design; some of the boy's work was good enough to be used by Chapman and Hall on book jackets. In his later years at Lancing, Waugh achieved conventional success, becoming a house-captain, editor of the school magazine, president of the debating society, and winning numerous art and literature prizes.  He also shed most of his religious beliefs.  He started a novel of school life, untitled, but after around 5,000 words, the attempt was abandoned.  He ended his schooldays by winning a scholarship to Hertford College, Oxford, and left Lancing in December 1921. 
Oxford
Waugh arrived in Oxford in January 1922. He was  soon writing to old friends at Lancing about the pleasures of his new life; he informed Tom Driberg: "I do no work here and never go to Chapel".  During his first two terms he generally followed convention; he smoked a pipe, bought a bicycle, chewed sweets, and gave his maiden speech at the Oxford Union, opposing the motion that "This House would welcome Prohibition".  Waugh wrote reports on Union debates for both Oxford magazines, Cherwell and Isis, and acted as a film critic for Isis.   He also became secretary of the Hertford College debating society, "an onerous but not honorific post", he told Driberg.  Although Waugh tended to regard his scholarship as a reward rather than a stepping-stone to academic success, he did sufficient work in his first two terms to pass his "History Previous", or preliminary examinations. The arrival in Oxford in October 1922 of the sophisticated Etonians Harold Acton and Brian Howard changed Waugh's Oxford life.  Acton and Howard rapidly became the centre of an avant-garde circle known as the Hypocrites, whose artistic, social and homosexual values Waugh adopted enthusiastically;  he later wrote: "It was the stamping ground of half my Oxford life".  He began drinking heavily, and embarked on the first of several homosexual relationships, the most lasting of which were with Richard Pares and Alastair Graham.   He continued to write reviews and short stories for the university journals, and developed a reputation as a talented graphic artist, but formal study largely ceased.  This neglect led to a bitter feud between Waugh and his history tutor, C. R. M. F. Cruttwell, dean (and later principal) of Hertford College. When Cruttwell advised him to mend his ways, Waugh responded in  a manner he admitted later was "fatuously haughty",  from which point relations between the two descended into mutual hatred.  Waugh continued the feud long after his Oxford days, by using Cruttwell's name in his early novels  for a succession of ludicrous, ignominious or odious minor characters. "Cruttwell" is a brutal burglar in Decline and Fall, a snobbish Member of Parliament in Vile Bodies, a social parasite in Black Mischief, a disreputable osteopath in A Handful of Dust, and a salesman with a fake tan in Scoop.  The homicidal Loveday in "Mr. Loveday's Little Outing" was originally "Mr. Cruttwell". See Hastings, pp. 173, 209, 373; Stannard, Vol. I pp. 342, 389Waugh's dissipated lifestyle continued into his final Oxford year, 1924. A letter written that year to a Lancing friend, Dudley Carew, hints at severe emotional pressures: "I have been living very intensely these last three weeks. For the last fortnight I have been nearly insane ... I may perhaps one day in a later time tell you some of the things that have happened."  He did just enough work to pass his final examinations in the summer of 1924 with a third class degree, a poor result which led to the loss of his scholarship. This effectively prevented him from returning to Oxford to complete the nine terms' residence that, under the University's statutes, were necessary before his degree could be awarded, so he left without one.Having begun at Hertford in the second term of the 1921–22 year, Waugh had completed only eight terms when he sat his final examinations in June 1924. He had been anticipating a final term of pleasurable idleness, but the withdrawal of his scholarship put paid to this.    Back at Underhill he began a novel, The Temple at Thatch, and worked with some of his fellow-Hypocrites on a film, The Scarlet Woman, which was shot partly in the gardens at Underhill.   He spent much of the rest of the summer in the company of Alastair Graham;  after Graham departed for Kenya, Waugh  enrolled for the autumn at a London art school, Heatherley's. Stannard, Vol. I pp. 93–96 
Early career
Schoolmaster and incipient writer
Waugh began at Heatherley's in late September 1924, but  became bored  with the routine and soon abandoned his course.  He spent weeks partying in London and Oxford before the overriding need for money led him to apply through an agency for a teaching job. Almost at once he secured a post at Arnold House, a boys' preparatory school in North Wales, beginning in January 1925. He took with him the notes for his  novel, The Temple at Thatch, intending to work on it in his spare time. Despite the gloomy ambience of the school, Waugh did his best to fulfil the requirements of his position, but a  brief return to London and Oxford during the Easter vacation only exacerbated his sense of isolation. In the summer  of 1925 Waugh's outlook briefly improved, with the prospect of a job in Pisa as secretary to the Scottish writer Charles Scott Moncrieff who was engaged on the English translations of Proust's works. Believing that the job was his, Waugh resigned his position at Arnold House. He had meantime sent the early chapters of his novel to Acton for assessment and criticism. Acton's reply was coolly dismissive, so that Waugh immediately burnt his manuscript; shortly afterwards, before he had left North Wales, he received the news that the Moncrieff job had fallen through.  These twin blows were sufficient for him to consider suicide. He records that he went down to a nearby beach and, leaving a note with his clothes, walked out to sea. An attack by jellyfish changed his mind, and he returned quickly to the shore. During the following two years Waugh taught at schools in Aston Clinton (from which he was dismissed for the attempted drunken seduction of a school matron) and Notting Hill in London.  He considered alternative careers in printing or cabinet-making, and attended evening classes in carpentry at Holborn Polytechnic while continuing to write.  A short story, "The Balance", written in an experimental modernist style, became his first commercially published fiction when it was included by Chapman and Hall in a 1926 anthology, Georgian Stories.  An extended essay on the Pre-Raphaelite Brotherhood was printed privately by Alastair Graham, using by agreement the press of the Shakespeare Head Press, Stratford-upon-Avon where he was undergoing training as a printer.   This led to a contract from the publishers Duckworth for a full-length biography of Dante Gabriel Rossetti, which Waugh wrote during 1927. Sykes, pp. 73–75  He also began working on a comic novel;  after several temporary working titles this became Decline and Fall.  Hastings, pp. 168–70  Having  given up teaching, he had no regular employment except for a short, unsuccessful stint as a reporter on the Daily Express in April–May 1927.  That year he met (possibly through brother Alec) and fell in love with Evelyn Gardner, the daughter of Lord and Lady Burghclere. 
"He-Evelyn" and "She-Evelyn"
In December 1927 Waugh and Evelyn Gardner became engaged, despite the  opposition of Lady Burghclere  who felt that Waugh lacked moral fibre and kept unsuitable company.  Among their friends they quickly became known as "He-Evelyn" and "She-Evelyn".  Waugh was at this time dependent on a £4-a-week allowance from his father, and the small sums he could earn from book reviewing and journalism.  The Rossetti biography was published to a generally favourable reception in April 1928: J. C. Squire in The Observer praised the book's elegance and wit; Acton gave cautious approval, and the novelist Rebecca West wrote saying how much she had enjoyed the book. Less pleasing to Waugh was the Times Literary Supplements  references to him as "Miss Waugh". When Decline and Fall was completed, Duckworth objected to its "obscenity", but Chapman and Hall agreed to publish it.  This was sufficient for Waugh and Evelyn Gardner to bring forward their wedding plans. They were married in St Paul's Church, Portman Square, on 27 June 1928, with only Acton, Alec Waugh and the bride's friend Pansy Pakenham present.  The couple made their home in a small flat in Canonbury Square, Islington.  The first months of the marriage were overshadowed by a lack of money, and by She-Evelyn's poor health, which persisted into the autumn. In September 1928 Decline and Fall  was published to almost unanimous praise. By December the book was into its third printing, and the American publishing rights had been sold for $500.  In the afterglow of this success Waugh was commissioned to write travel articles in return for a free Mediterranean cruise, which he and She-Evelyn began in February 1929 as an extended delayed honeymoon. The trip was disrupted when She-Evelyn contracted severe pneumonia and was carried ashore to the British hospital in Port Said. She recovered, and the couple were home in June. In July, without warning, She-Evelyn revealed that their mutual friend, John Heygate, had become her lover, an admission that shocked and dismayed Waugh. After an attempted  reconciliation failed, Waugh filed for divorce on 3 September 1929. The couple apparently met again only once, during the process for the annulment of the marriage a few years later. 
Years of celebrity
RecognitionWaugh's biographer, Christopher Sykes, records that after the divorce friends "saw, or believed they saw, a new hardness and bitterness" in Waugh's outlook.  Nevertheless, despite  a letter to Acton in which he wrote that he "did not know it was possible to be so miserable and live", Amory (ed.), p. 39  Waugh soon resumed his professional and social life. He finished his second novel, Vile Bodies,  and  wrote articles including (ironically he thought) one for the Daily Mail on the meaning of the marriage ceremony.  Between September and January 1930, when the novel was published, Waugh moved between the various houses of his friends, a practice he was to continue as he was to have no settled home  for the next eight years. Vile Bodies, a satire on the Bright Young People of the 1920s, was published on 19 January 1930 and was Waugh's first major commercial success. Despite its quasi-biblical title, the book is dark, bitter, "a manifesto of disillusionment", according to biographer Martin Stannard.  As a best-selling author Waugh could now command larger fees for his journalism. Patey, pp. 33–34  Amid regular work for The Graphic, Town and Country and Harper's Bazaar, he quickly wrote Labels, a detached account of his honeymoon cruise with She-Evelyn. 
Conversion to CatholicismOn 29 September 1930 Waugh was received into the Roman Catholic Church. This shocked his family and surprised some of his friends, but the step had been contemplated for some time. Patey, pp. 35–39  Although he had lost his Anglicanism at Lancing and had led an irreligious life at Oxford, from the mid-1920s there are  references in his diaries to religious discussion and regular church-going. On 22 December 1925 Waugh writes: "Claud and I took Audrey to supper and sat up until 7 in the morning arguing about the Roman Church".  The entry for 20 February 1927 includes "I am to visit a Father Underhill about being a parson".  Throughout this period Waugh was influenced by his friend Olivia Plunket-Greene, who had converted in 1925 and of whom Waugh wrote later: "She bullied me into the Church".  It was she who led him to Father Martin D'Arcy, who persuaded Waugh "on firm intellectual convictions but little emotion" that "the Christian revelation was genuine". In 1949 Waugh explained that his conversion followed his realisation that life was "unintelligible and unendurable without God". "Come Inside", first published in The Road to Damascus (1949), ed. John O'Brien. London, W.H. Allen, reprinted in Gallagher (ed.). pp. 366–68 
Writer and traveller
On 10 October 1930 Waugh, representing several newspapers, departed for Abyssinia to cover the coronation of Haile Selassie. He reported the event as "an elaborate propaganda effort" to convince the world that Abyssinia was a civilised nation, concealing the truth that the emperor had achieved power through barbarous means.  A subsequent journey through the British East Africa colonies and  the Belgian Congo formed the basis of two books; the travelogue Remote People (1931) and the comic novel Black Mischief (1932).  Waugh's next extended trip, in the winter of 1932–33, was to British Guiana (now Guyana) in South America, possibly taken to distract him from a long and unrequited passion for the socialite Teresa Jungman.  On arrival in Georgetown, Waugh arranged a river trip by steam launch into the interior.  He travelled on via several staging-posts to Boa Vista in Brazil, then took a convoluted overland journey back to Georgetown.  His various adventures and encounters found their way into two further books: his travel account Ninety-two days, and the novel A Handful of Dust, both published in 1934. Back from South America, Waugh faced accusations of obscenity and blasphemy from the Catholic journal The Tablet, which objected to passages in  Black Mischief. He defended himself in an open letter to the Archbishop of Westminster, Cardinal Francis Bourne, which remained unpublished until 1980.  In the summer of 1934 he went on an expedition to Spitsbergen in the Arctic, an experience he did not enjoy and of which he made minimal literary use.  On his return, determined to write a major Catholic biography, he selected the Jesuit martyr Edmund Campion as his subject. The book, published in 1935, caused controversy through its forthright pro-Catholic, anti-Protestant stance but brought its writer the Hawthornden Prize.   He returned to Abyssinia in August 1935, to report the  opening stages of the Second Italo-Abyssinian War for the Daily Mail. Waugh, on the basis of his earlier visit, considered Abyssinia  "a savage place which Mussolini was doing well to tame", according to his fellow-reporter William Deedes.  Waugh saw little action, and was not wholly serious in his role as a war correspondent.  Deedes remarks on the older writer's snobbery: "None of us quite measured up to the company he liked to keep back at home".  However, in the face of imminent Italian air attacks, Deedes found Waugh's courage "deeply reassuring".  Waugh wrote up his Abyssinian experiences in a book, Waugh in Abyssinia (1936), which Rose Macaulay dismissed as a "fascist tract" on account of its pro-Italian tone.   A better-known account is his novel Scoop (1938), in which the protagonist, William Boot, is loosely based on Deedes. Waugh's  social circle in the 1930s expanded and he relied on aristocratic friends for places to stay when he returned from his travels. Amongst his acquaintances were Diana Guinness and Bryan Guinness (dedicatees of Vile Bodies), Lady Diana Cooper and her husband Duff Cooper,  Nancy Mitford who was originally a friend of Evelyn Gardner's,  and the Lygon sisters. Waugh had known Hugh Patrick Lygon at Oxford; now he was introduced to the girls and their country house, Madresfield Court, which became the closest that he had to a home during his years of wandering.  In 1933, on a Greek islands cruise, he was introduced by Father D'Arcy to Gabriel Herbert, eldest daughter of the late explorer Aubrey Herbert.  When the cruise ended Waugh was invited to stay at the Herbert family's villa in Portofino, where he was introduced to Gabriel's 17-year-old sister, Laura Herbert. 
Second marriageOn his conversion, Waugh had accepted that he would be unable to remarry while Evelyn Gardner was alive. However, he wanted a wife and children, and in October 1933 began proceedings for the annulment of the marriage on the grounds of "lack of real consent". The case was heard by an ecclesiastical tribunal in London,  but a delay in the submission of the papers to Rome meant that the annulment was not granted until 4 July 1936.  In the meantime, following their initial encounter in Portofino, Waugh had fallen in love with Laura Herbert.  He proposed marriage, by letter, in Spring 1936.  There were initial misgivings from the Herberts, an aristocratic Catholic family; as a further complication, Laura Herbert was a cousin of Evelyn Gardner.  Despite some family hostility the marriage took place on 17 April 1937. As a wedding present the bride's grandmother bought the couple Piers Court, a country house near Stinchcombe in Gloucestershire.  Their first child, a daughter, Maria Teresa, was born on 9 March 1938 and a son, Auberon Alexander, on 17 November 1939.  Between these events, Scoop was published in May 1938 to wide critical acclaim.  In August 1938 Waugh, with Laura, made a three-month trip to Mexico after which he wrote Robbery under Law, based on his experiences there. In the book he spelled out clearly his conservative credo; he later described the book as dealing "little with travel and much with political questions". 
World War II
Royal Marine and commando
At the outbreak of the war in September 1939, Waugh left Piers Court and moved his young family to Pixton Park in Somerset, the Herbert family's country seat, while he sought military employment.  He also began a  novel, in a new  style using  first-person narration.  Work on this project ceased when in December Waugh was commissioned into the Royal Marines and began training at Chatham naval base.   The novel was never completed; fragments were eventually published under the title Work Suspended. Waugh was soon involved in a daily training routine that left him with "so stiff a spine that he found it painful even to pick up a pen".  In April he was promoted temporarily to captain and given command of a company,  but even after the German invasion of the Low Countries his battalion was not called into action.  Waugh's inability to adapt to regimental life meant that he  soon lost his command and became the battalion's Intelligence Officer. In this role he finally saw action, as part of the force sent in August 1940 to Dakar in Western Africa to support an attempt by Free French troops to  install General de Gaulle as leader there. Hampered by fog, and misinformed about the extent of the town's defences, the mission was a failure, and on 26 September the British forces withdrew. Waugh commented that "Bloodshed has been avoided at the cost of honour." Stannard, Vol. II pp. 16–20  In November 1940 Waugh was posted to a commando unit and after further training became a member of "Layforce" under Brigadier Robert Laycock.  In February 1941 the unit sailed to the Mediterranean, where it participated in an  unsuccessful attempt to recapture Bardia, on the Libyan coast.  In May the force was required to assist in the evacuation of Crete; Waugh was shocked by the disorder, loss of discipline and, as he saw it, cowardice of the departing troops.  On the roundabout journey home in July by troopship Waugh wrote Put Out More Flags, a novel of the early months of the war written in his familiar 1930s style.   Back in England, more training and waiting followed, until in May 1942 Waugh was transferred, on Laycock's recommendation, to the Royal Horse Guards.  On 10 June 1942 Laura gave birth to a fourth child, Margaret. Laura had given birth to a daughter, christened Mary, on 1 December 1940, but the child only lived for a few hours. 
Frustration, Brideshead and YugoslaviaWaugh's elation at his transfer soon descended into disillusion as he failed to find opportunities for active service. The death of his father on 26 June 1943, and the need to deal with family affairs, prevented Waugh from departing with his brigade for North Africa, as part of Operation Husky.  Despite his undoubted courage, his unmilitary and insubordinate character was making him effectively unemployable.  After  spells of idleness at the regimental depot in Windsor, Waugh began parachute training at Tatton Park, landed awkwardly and fractured a fibula. Recovering at Windsor, he applied for three months' unpaid leave to write the  novel that was forming in his mind. His request was granted, and on 31 January 1944 he departed for Chagford in Devon, where he could work in seclusion. The result of his labours was Brideshead Revisited,  the first of Waugh's explicitly "Catholic" novels and, biographer Douglas Lane Patey observes, "the book that seemed to confirm his new sense of his writerly vocation". Waugh managed to extend his leave until June 1944.  Soon after his return to duty he was recruited by Randolph Churchill to serve in a military mission to Yugoslavia, and early in July flew with Churchill to the Croatian island of Vis. Here they were introduced to Marshal Tito, leader of the Partisans who, with Allied support, were leading the fight against the occupying Axis forces.  Waugh and Churchill returned  to Bari in Italy before flying back to Yugoslavia to begin their mission, but their plane crashed on landing, injuring both and delaying them for a month. Eventually the mission arrived at Topusko, where they established themselves in a deserted farmhouse. The group's duties—liaising between the British army and the Partisans—were light; in any event, Waugh had little sympathy with the communist-led Partisans and despised Tito. His chief interest became the welfare of the Catholic Church in Croatia, which he believed had suffered at the hands of the Serbian Orthodox Church and would fare worse when the communists took control.  He expressed these thoughts in a long report, "Church and State in Liberated Croatia". After spells in Dubrovnik and Rome, Waugh returned to London on 15 March 1945 to present his report, which was suppressed by the Foreign Office who were anxious to maintain good relations with Tito. 
Postwar years
Fame and fortuneBrideshead Revisited was published in London in May 1945. Hastings, pp. 494–95  Waugh had been convinced of the book's qualities, "my first novel rather than my last".  It was a tremendous success, bringing its author fame, fortune and literary status.  Happy though he was with this outcome, Waugh's principal concern as the war ended was the fate of the large populations of Eastern European Catholics, betrayed (as he saw it) into the hands of Stalin's Soviet Union by the Allies. He now saw little difference in morality between the war's combatants, and later described it as "a sweaty tug-of-war between teams of indistinguishable louts".  Although he took momentary pleasure from the defeat of Churchill and the Conservatives in the July 1945 Election, he saw the accession to power of the Labour Party as a triumph of barbarism and the onset of a "Dark Age". 

In September 1945, after release by the army, he returned to Piers Court with his family  (another daughter, Harriet, had been born at Pixton in 1944),  but spent much of the next seven years either in London, or travelling. In March 1946 he visited the Nuremberg Trials, and later that year he was in Spain for a celebration of the 400th anniversary of the death of Francisco de Vittoria, said to be the founder of International Law.   Waugh wrote up his experiences of the frustrations of post-war European travel in a novella, Scott-King's Modern Europe. Patey, p. 251  In February 1947 he made the first of several trips to the United States, in the first instance to discuss filming of Brideshead. This project collapsed, but Waugh used  his time in Hollywood to visit the Forest Lawn cemetery, which provided the basis for his satire of American perspectives on death, The Loved One.  In 1951 he visited the Holy Land with his future biographer, Christopher Sykes,  and in 1953 he travelled to Goa to witness the final exhibition before burial of the remains of the 16th century Jesuit missionary-priest St Francis Xavier. Hastings, p. 554  In between his journeys Waugh worked intermittently on Helena, a long-planned novel about the discoverer of the True Cross, "far the best book I  have ever written or ever will write". Its success with the public was limited, although it was, his daughter Harriet later said, "the only one of his books that he ever cared to read aloud".  In 1952 Waugh published Men at Arms, the first of his semi-autobiographical war trilogy, in which he depicted many of his personal experiences and encounters from the early stages of the war.  Other books published during this period included When The Going Was Good (1946),  an anthology of his pre-war travel writing, The Holy Places (published by the Ian Fleming-managed Queen Anne Press, 1952) and  Love Among the Ruins (1953), a dystopian tale in which Waugh displays his contempt for the modern world.   At 50, Waugh was old for his years, "selectively deaf, rheumatic, irascible", increasingly dependent on alcohol and on drugs to relieve his insomnia and depression.  Two more children, James (born 1946) and Septimus (born 1950), completed his family. From 1945 onwards Waugh became an avid collector of objects, particularly Victorian paintings and furniture. He filled Piers Court with his acquisitions, often from London's Portobello Market and from house clearance sales.  His diary entry for 30 August 1946 records a visit to Gloucester where he bought "a lion of wood, finely carved for £25, also a bookcase £35 ... a charming Chinese painting £10, a Regency easel £7".  Some of his buying was shrewd and prescient; he paid £10 for Rossetti's  "Spirit of the Rainbow" to begin a collection of Victorian paintings that eventually acquired great value. Waugh also began, from 1949, to write knowledgeable reviews and articles on the subject of painting. Patey, pp. 153–54 See, for example, "Rossetti Revisited", 1949 (Gallagher (ed.), pp. 377–79; "Age of Unrest", 1954 (Gallagher (ed.), pp. 459–60; "The Death of Painting", 1956 (Gallagher (ed.) pp. 503–07
BreakdownBy 1953 Waugh's popularity as a writer was declining. He was perceived as out of step with the Zeitgeist, and the large fees he demanded were no longer easily available.  His money was running out, and progress on the second book of his war trilogy, Officers and Gentlemen, had stalled. Partly because of his dependency on drugs, his health was steadily deteriorating.  Shortage of cash led him to agree in November 1953 to be interviewed on BBC radio, where the  panel took an aggressive line. "[T]hey tried to make a fool of me, and I don't think they entirely succeeded", Waugh wrote to Nancy Mitford.  Peter Fleming in The Spectator likened the interview to "the goading of a bull by matadors". Early in 1954 Waugh's doctors, concerned by his physical deterioration, advised a change of scene. On 29 January he took a ship bound for Ceylon, hoping that he would be able to finish his novel. Within a few days he was writing home complaining of "other passengers whispering about me" and of hearing voices, including that of his recent BBC interlocutor Stephen Black.  He left the ship in Egypt and flew on to Colombo but, he wrote to Laura, the voices followed him.  Alarmed, Laura sought help from her friend Frances Donaldson, whose husband agreed to fly out to Ceylon and bring Waugh home. In fact Waugh made his own way back, by now believing that he was being possessed by devils.  A brief medical examination indicated that Waugh was suffering from bromide poisoning  from his drugs regime. When his medication was changed the voices and other hallucinations quickly disappeared.  Waugh was delighted, informing all of his friends that he had been mad: "Clean off my onion!". The experience was semi-fictionalised a few years later in The Ordeal of Gilbert Pinfold (1957). 
Late works
Restored to health, Waugh returned to work and finished Officers and Gentlemen. In June 1955  the Daily Express journalist and reviewer Nancy Spain, accompanied by her friend Lord Noel-Buxton, arrived uninvited at Piers Court and demanded an interview. Waugh saw the pair off, and wrote a wry account  for The Spectator,  but was troubled by the incident, and decided to sell Piers Court; "I felt it was polluted", he told Nancy Mitford.  Late in 1956 the family moved to the manor house in the Somerset village of Combe Florey.  In January 1957 Waugh avenged the Spain–Noel-Buxton intrusion by winning libel damages from the Express and Spain. The paper had printed an article by Spain, suggesting that the sales of Waugh's books were much lower than they were and that his worth as a journalist was low. Pinfold was published in the summer of 1957, "my barmy book", Waugh called it.  The extent to which the story is self-mockery rather than true autobiography became a subject of critical debate. Patey, pp. 339–41  Waugh's next major book was a biography of his long-time friend, the Catholic writer and theologian  Fr. Ronald Knox, who had died in August 1957. Research and writing extended over two years, during which time Waugh did  little other work, delaying the third volume of his war trilogy. In June 1958 his son Auberon was severely wounded in a shooting accident while serving with the army in Cyprus. Waugh remained detached; he did not go to Cyprus, nor did he immediately visit Auberon on the latter's return to England. Critic and literary biographer David Wykes calls Waugh's sang-froid "astonishing", and the family's apparent acceptance of his behaviour even more so. Although most of Waugh's books had sold well, and he had been well-rewarded for his journalism, his levels of expenditure meant that money problems and tax bills were a recurrent feature in his life.  In 1950, as a means of tax avoidance, he had set up a trust fund for his children (he termed it the "Save the Children Fund", after the well-established charity of that name) into which he placed the initial advance and all future royalties from the Penguin (paperback) editions of his books.  He was able to augment his personal finances by charging household items to the trust, or by selling his own possessions to it.  Nonetheless, by 1960 shortage of money led him to agree to an interview on BBC Television, in the Face to Face series conducted by John Freeman. The interview was broadcast on 26 June 1960;  according to his biographer Selena Hastings, Waugh restrained his instinctive hostility and coolly answered the questions put to him by Freeman, assuming what she calls a "pose of world-weary boredom". Hastings, pp. 591–92 In 1960 Waugh was offered the honour of a CBE but declined, believing that he should have been given the superior status of a knighthood.  In September he produced his final travel book, A Tourist in Africa, based on a visit made in January–March 1959. He enjoyed the trip, but "despised" the book. Critic Cyril Connolly called it "the thinnest piece of book-making that Mr Waugh has undertaken".   This book done, he worked on the last of the war novels, which was published in 1961 as Unconditional Surrender. 
Decline and death
As he approached his sixties, Waugh was in poor health, prematurely aged, "fat, deaf, short of breath" according to Patey.  Biographer Martin Stannard likened his appearance around this time to that of "an exhausted rogue jollied up by drink".  In 1962 Waugh began work on his autobiography, and that same year wrote his final fiction, the long short story Basil Seal Rides Again.  This revival of the main protagonist of Put Out More Flags was published in 1963; the Times Literary Supplement called it a "nasty little book".   When the first volume of autobiography, A Little Learning, was published in 1964 its often oblique tone and discreet name-changes ensured that  friends avoided the embarrassments that some had feared. Waugh had welcomed the accession in 1958 of Pope John XXIII,  and  wrote an appreciative tribute on the pope's death in 1963.  However, he became increasingly concerned by the decisions emerging from the Second Vatican Council, which was convened by Pope John in October 1962 and continued under his successor until 1965. Waugh, a staunch opponent of Church reform, was particularly distressed by the replacement of the universal Latin Mass with the vernacular.  In a Spectator article of 23 November 1962 he argued the case against change in a manner described by a later commentator as "sharp-edged reasonableness".    He wrote to Nancy Mitford that "the buggering up of the Church is a deep sorrow to me...  We write letters to the paper. A fat lot of good that does." In 1965 a new financial crisis arose from an apparent flaw in the terms of the "Save the Children" trust, whereby a large sum of back tax was being demanded. Waugh's agent, AD Peters, negotiated a settlement with the tax authorities for a manageable amount,  but in his concern to generate funds Waugh signed contracts to write several books, including a history of the papacy, an illustrated book on the crusades and a second volume of autobiography. Waugh's  physical and mental deterioration prevented any work on these projects, and the contracts were cancelled.  He described himself as "toothless, deaf, melancholic, shaky on my pins, unable to eat, full of dope, quite idle",  and expressed the belief that "all fates were worse than death". Wykes, pp. 209–11.  His only significant literary activity in 1965 was the editing of the three war novels into a single volume, published as Sword of Honour. On Easter Day, 10 April 1966, after attending a Latin Mass in a neighbouring village with members of his family, Waugh died suddenly of heart failure at his Combe Florey home. He was buried, by special arrangement, in a consecrated plot outside the Anglican churchyard in Combe Florey. A Requiem Mass, in Latin, was celebrated in Westminster Cathedral on 21 April 1966. 
Character and opinionsIn the course of his lifetime, Waugh made enemies and offended many people; writer James Lees-Milne asserted that he was "the nastiest-tempered man in England".   He had been a bully at school and retained an intimidating presence throughout his life; his son Auberon remarked that the force of his father's personality was such that, despite his lack of height, "generals and chancellors of the exchequer, six foot six and exuding self-importance from every pore, quail[ed] in front of him." However, according to Paula Byrne, whose partial biography Mad World was published in 2009, the common view of Waugh as a "snobbish misanthrope" is a caricature; she asks: "Why would a man who was so unpleasant be so beloved by such a wide circle of friends?"  His generosity to individuals and causes, particularly Catholic causes,  extended to small gestures; after his libel court victory over Nancy Spain, he sent her a bottle of champagne.   Hastings suggests that his outward belligerence to strangers was not entirely serious but, rather, an attempt at "finding a sparring partner worthy of his own wit and ingenuity".  He mocked himself as well as others; Byrne believes that the elderly buffer, "crusty colonel" image he presented in his later life was a comic impersonation, rather than his real self.  As an instinctive conservative, Waugh believed that class divisions, with inequalities of wealth and position, were natural and that "no form of government [was] ordained by God as being better than any other".  In the postwar "Age of the Common Man," he attacked socialism (the "Cripps–Attlee terror")  and complained, after Churchill's  return to power in 1951, that "the Conservative Party have never put the clock back a single second".  He  never voted in elections; in 1959 he expressed a hope that the Conservatives would win the General Election but would not vote for them since "I should feel I was morally inculpated in their follies". He added: "I do not aspire to advise my sovereign in her choice of servants." Waugh's Catholicism was fundamental: "The Church... is the normal state of man from which men have disastrously exiled themselves."   He believed the Church was the last great defence against the encroachment of the Dark Age being ushered in by the welfare state and the spread of working-class culture. Hastings, pp. 503–09  Strictly observant, he admitted to Diana Cooper that his most difficult task was how to square the obligations of his faith with his indifference to his fellow men.  When asked by Nancy Mitford how he reconciled his often objectionable conduct with being a Christian, he replied that "were he not a Christian he would be even more horrible". Waugh's conservatism was aesthetic as well as political and religious. Although he praised younger writers such as Angus Wilson, Muriel Spark and V.S. Naipaul, he was scornful of the 1950s writers' group known as "The Movement".  He expressed a belief that the literary world was "sinking into black disaster" and that literature itself might die within thirty years.  Waugh, who as a schoolboy had praised Cubism, soon abandoned his interest in artistic modernism.  In 1945, he was writing that Picasso's standing was the result of a "mesmeric trick"; his paintings "could not be intelligently discussed in the terms used of the civilised masters".   In his 1953 radio interview, he named Augustus Egg (1816–63) as a painter for whom he had particular esteem.Excerpts from the text of the broadcast, on 16 November 1953, are given in the 1998 Penguin Books edition of The Ordeal of Gilbert Pinfold, pp. 135–43  He came to admire George Orwell because of their shared patriotism and sense of morality. Waugh's racial and antisemitic prejudices are freely expressed in his works, particularly in those written before the war. The writer V.S. Pritchett observes that Waugh's antisemitism, "like Mount Everest, is there, nonviolent but undeniable";  Wykes calls it Waugh's "most persistent nastiness". The events of the Second World War may, Wykes observes, have modified Waugh's attitudes, though not to an extent discernible in his social behaviour.  Waugh's racism, Wykes further asserts, was "an illogical extension of his views on the naturalness and rightness of hierarchy as the [main] principle of social organisation".  Orwell, an admirer of Waugh's writing, concluded that Waugh was "almost as good a novelist as it is possible to be ... while holding untenable opinions". 
Writing

For a listing of Waugh's works, see Evelyn Waugh bibliography


Themes and styleWykes observes that Waugh's novels  reprise and fictionalise the main events of his life,  although in an early essay Waugh declares that "Nothing is more insulting to a novelist than to assume that he is incapable of anything but the mere transcription of what he observes".  Nor, Waugh emphasises, should it be taken that the author agreed with the opinions expressed by his characters.  Nevertheless, according to Ann Pasternak Slater in her introduction to Waugh's Complete Short Stories, "[the] delineation of social prejudices and the language in which they are expressed is part of Waugh's meticulous observation of his contemporary world". Waugh is widely regarded as a master of style. In the view of critic Clive James, "Nobody ever wrote a more unaffectedly elegant English ... its hundreds of years of steady development culminate in him".  As his talent developed and matured he maintained what literary critic Andrew Michael Roberts calls  "an exquisite sense of the ludicrous, and a fine aptitude for exposing false attitudes".  In the first stages of his 40-year writing career, before his conversion to Catholicism in 1930, Waugh was the novelist of the Bright Young People generation.  His first two novels, Decline and Fall and Vile Bodies,  comically reflect a society of utter futility, peopled by two-dimensional, basically unbelievable characters in circumstances too fantastic to evoke the reader's emotions. Hollis, pp. 5–7  Much use is made of what Slater describes as a typical Waugh trademark: rapid, unattributed dialogue in which the participants can still be easily identified.  Alongside these works Waugh mixed into his journalism a few serious essays,  such as  "The War and the Younger Generation", in which he castigates his own "crazy and sterile" generation.  Waugh's conversion did not significantly change the nature of his next two novels, Black Mischief and A Handful of Dust although, in the latter at least, the farcical elements are muted and its protagonist, Tony Last, is recognisably a person rather than a comic cipher.  Waugh's first fiction on a Catholic theme  was the 1933 short story "Out of Depth", about the immutability of the Mass.   From the  mid-1930s onwards his journalism and  non-fiction writings   were increasingly concerned with Catholicism and conservative politics,  before he reverted to his former manner with Scoop,  published in 1938. Patey, p. 157 In the 1939 fragment Work Suspended,  Waugh's style changes to a form which, with "real" characters and a first-person narrator, presages Brideshead Revisited five years later.   Brideshead, which questions the meaning of human existence without God, is the first of Waugh's novels in which his political and religious views come clearly into view.  In his 1946 article in Life magazine, "Fan Fare", Waugh writes that "you can only leave God out [of fiction] by making your characters pure abstractions", and in the same article declares his future novelistic intentions as "the attempt to represent man more fully which, to me, means only one thing, man in his relation to God." "Fan Fare", first published in Life magazine, 8 April 1946, reprinted in Gallagher (ed.), pp. 300–04   His next novel was Helena, the most uncompromisingly Christian of his books. In Brideshead, through the person of the proletarian junior officer Hooper, Waugh  introduces a further theme that persists in his post-war fiction: the rise of mediocrity in the Age of the Common Man.  In the Sword of Honour trilogy this process is depicted through the semi-comical figure of Trimmer, a sloven and fraud who through  contrivance emerges triumphant.  Waugh's pessimistic view of the future is summarised in the 1947  story "Scott-King's Modern Europe", by the schoolmaster's admonition: "I think it would be very wicked indeed to do anything to fit a boy for the modern world".  This cynicism pervades the short novel Love Among the Ruins (1952),  set in a world so disagreeable that euthanasia is the most sought-after social service.  Of the post-war novels, Pinfold stands apart  as, in Patey's description, "a kind of mock-novel, a sly invitation to a game".  Waugh's last fiction, "Basil Seal Rides Again", in which several characters from the prewar novels are resurrected, was "[a] senile attempt to recapture the manner of my youth".  Slater notes that this last story begins in identical fashion to Waugh's first, "The Balance", with a  "fusillade of unattributed dialogue". Slater, p. xii 
ReceptionOf Waugh's early books,  Decline and Fall was hailed by Arnold Bennett in the Evening Standard as "an uncompromising and brilliantly malicious satire".  The critical reception of Vile Bodies two years later was even more enthusiastic, with Rebecca West predicting that Waugh was "destined to be the dazzling figure of his age".  However, A Handful of Dust, later widely regarded as Waugh's masterpiece, received a more muted welcome from critics, despite Waugh's own high estimation of the work.  The book's ending, with Tony Last condemned forever to read Dickens to his mad jungle captor, was thought by author and critic Henry Yorke to reduce an otherwise believable book to "phantasy". Cyril Connolly's first reaction to the book was that Waugh's powers were failing, an opinion he later revised. In the latter 1930s Waugh's inclination to Catholic and conservative polemics affected his standing with the general reading public.  The Campion biography is said by David Wykes to be "so rigidly biased that it has no claims to make as history".  The pro-fascist  tone in parts of Waugh in Abyssinia  offended readers and critics, and prevented its publication in America.  There was general relief among critics when Scoop, in 1938, indicated a return to Waugh's earlier comic style; critics had begun to think that his wit had been displaced by partisanship and propaganda. Waugh maintained his reputation in 1942 with Put Out More Flags, which sold well, despite wartime restrictions on paper and printing.  Its public reception, however, did not compare with that accorded to Brideshead Revisited three years later, on both sides of the Atlantic. Bridesheads selection as the American Book of the Month swelled its US sales to an extent that dwarfed those in Britain, which was affected by paper shortages.  Despite the public's enthusiasm, critical opinion was split. Brideshead's  Catholic standpoint offended some critics who had greeted Waugh’s earlier novels with warm praise.  Its perceived snobbery and its deference to the aristocracy were attacked by, among others, Conor Cruise O'Brien who, in the Irish literary magazine The Bell, wrote of Waugh's "almost mystical veneration" for the upper classes.   Fellow-writer Rose Macaulay believed that Waugh's genius had been adversely affected by the intrusion of his right-wing partisan alter ego, and that he had lost his detachment: "In art so naturally ironic and detached as his, this is a serious loss".   Conversely, the book was praised by Yorke, Graham Greene, and in glowing terms by Harold Acton, who was particularly impressed by its evocation of 1920s Oxford.  In 1959, at the request of publishers Chapman and Hall and in some deference to his critics, Waugh revised the book and wrote in a preface: "I have modified the grosser passages but not obliterated them because they are an essential part of the book". In "Fan Fare", Waugh forecasts that his future books will be unpopular because of their religious theme.  On publication in 1950, Helena was received indifferently by the public and by critics, who disparaged the awkward mixing of 20th-century schoolgirl slang with otherwise reverential prose.  Otherwise, Waugh's prediction proved unfounded; all the fiction remained in print and sales stayed healthy. During his successful 1957 lawsuit against the Daily Express, Waugh's counsel produced figures showing total sales to that time of over four million books, two-thirds in Britain and the rest in America. Stannard, Vol. II pp. 382–85  Men at Arms, the first volume of his war trilogy, won the James Tait Black Memorial Prize in 1953;  initial critical comment was lukewarm,  with Connolly likening Men at Arms to beer rather than champagne.  Connolly changed his view later, calling the completed trilogy "the finest novel to come out of the war".  Of Waugh's other major postwar works, the Knox biography was admired within Waugh's close circle but criticised by others in the Church for its depiction of Knox as an unappreciated victim of the Catholic hierarchy.  The book did not sell well—"like warm cakes", according to Waugh.  Pinfold surprised the critics by its originality; its plainly autobiographical content, Hastings suggests, gave the public a fixed image of Waugh—"stout, splenetic, red-faced and reactionary, a figure from burlesque complete with cigar, bowler hat and loud checked suit." 
ReputationIn 1973  Waugh's diaries were serialised in The Observer, prior to  publication in book form in 1976. The revelations on his private life, thoughts and attitudes created  controversy. Although Waugh had removed embarrassing entries relating to his Oxford years and his first marriage, there was sufficient left on the record to enable enemies to project a  negative image of the writer as intolerant, snobbish and sadistic, with pronounced fascist leanings.  Some of this picture, it was maintained by Waugh's supporters, arose from poor editing of the diaries, and a desire to transform Waugh from a writer to a "character". Review by Geoffrey Wheatcroft of The Letters of Evelyn Waugh, Spectator, 11 October 1980. Reprinted in Stannard: Evelyn Waugh: The Critical Heritage, pp. 504–07  Nevertheless, a popular conception developed of Waugh as a monster. Hastings, p. 627  When, in 1980, a selection of his letters was published, his reputation became the subject of further discussion. Philip Larkin, reviewing the collection in The Guardian, thought that it demonstrated Waugh's elitism; to receive a letter from him, it seemed, "one would have to have a nursery nickname and be a member of White's, a Roman Catholic, a high-born lady or an Old Etonian novelist". 

The publication of the diaries and letters promoted increased interest in Waugh and his works, and the publication of much new material.  Christopher Sykes's biography had appeared in 1975; between 1980 and 1998 three more full biographies were issued, and other biographical and critical studies have continued to be produced. A collection of Waugh's journalism and reviews was published in 1983, revealing a fuller range of his ideas and beliefs. This new material provided further grounds for debate between Waugh's supporters and detractors.   The 1982 Granada Television adaptation of Brideshead Revisited introduced a new generation to Waugh's works, in Britain and in America.  There had been earlier television treatment of Waugh's fiction—Sword of Honour had been serialised by the BBC in 1967—but the impact of Granada's Brideshead was much wider. Its nostalgic depiction of a vanished form of Englishness appealed to the American mass market;  Time magazine's TV critic described the series as "a novel ... made  into a poem", and listed it among the "100 Best TV Shows of All Time".  There have been further cinematic Waugh adaptations: A Handful of Dust in 1988, Vile Bodies (filmed as Bright Young Things) in 2003 and Brideshead again in 2008. These popular treatments have maintained the public's appetite for Waugh's novels, all of which remain in print and continue to sell.  Several have been listed among various  compiled lists of the world's greatest novels.See Time magazine's "All Time 100 Novels";  The Observer critics' "100 greatest novels of all time";  Random House Modern Library's "100 Best Novels". Beneath his public mask, Stannard concludes, Waugh was "a dedicated artist and a man of earnest faith, struggling against the dryness of his soul."   Graham Greene, in a letter to The Times shortly after Waugh's death, acknowledged him as "the greatest novelist of my generation",  while  Time magazine's obituarist called him "the grand old mandarin of modern British prose", and asserted that his novels "will continue to survive as long as there are readers who can savor what critic V. S. Pritchett calls 'the beauty of his malice' ".  Nancy Mitford said of him in a television interview; "What nobody remembers about Evelyn is that everything with him was jokes. Everything. That's what none of the people who wrote about him seem to have taken into account at all." 
References in other mediaIn 2003's Lost in Translation, Anna Faris' character "Kelly" uses the pseudonym Evelyn Waugh, suggesting that she thinks that Evelyn Waugh is a female.In Sue Townsend's The Growing Pains of Adrian Mole (1984), Adrian reads Scoop, which he thinks is written by a woman.A play about Waugh - Waugh In Winter - was written by English playwright Roy Smiles in 2011.
Notes and referencesNotes
 

References
 
Sources

  (Originally published by Weidenfeld and Nicolson, London 1980)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  (Originally published by Chatto & Windus, London 1976)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  (Originally published by Chapman and Hall, 1964)
 


Further reading

Ker, Ian Turnbull (2003), The Catholic Revival in English Literature (1845-1961). Newman, Hopkins, Belloc, Chesterton, Greene, Waugh. Notre Dame (Indiana): University of Notre Dame Press, pp. 149–202. (And also: Leominster [Herefordshire, UK]: Gracewing, 2004).


External links 

The Evelyn Waugh Society
An Evelyn Waugh Web Site by David Cliffe
Works by or about Evelyn Waugh at Internet Archive and Google Books (scanned books)
Portraits of Evelyn Waugh in the National Portrait Gallery (London).
 

 

    
DEFAULTSORT





























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Meryl Streep
 
 
 
Meryl Streep (born Mary Louise Streep; June 22, 1949)    is an American actress who has worked in theater, television, and film. She is widely regarded as one of the most talented actors of all time.   Streep made her professional stage debut in The Playboy of Seville (1971), before her screen debut in the television movie The Deadliest Season (1977). In that same year, she made her film debut with Julia (1977). Both critical and commercial success came quickly with roles in The Deer Hunter (1978) and Kramer vs. Kramer (1979), the former giving Streep her first Academy Award nomination and the latter her first win. She later won the Academy Award for Best Actress for her performances in Sophie's Choice (1982) and The Iron Lady (2011).Streep has received 17 Academy Award nominations, winning three, and 26 Golden Globe nominations, winning eight, more nominations than any other actor in the history of either award. Her work has also earned her two Emmy Awards, two Screen Actors Guild Awards, a Cannes Film Festival award, five New York Film Critics Circle Awards, two BAFTA awards, an Australian Film Institute Award, five Grammy Award nominations, and a Tony Award nomination, amongst others. She was awarded the AFI Life Achievement Award in 2004 and the Kennedy Center Honor in 2011 for her contribution to American culture through performing arts, the youngest actress in each award's history.
Early life and educationStreep was born in Summit, New Jersey.  Her mother, Mary Wolf (née Wilkinson; 1915–2001), was a commercial artist and former art editor, and her father, Harry William Streep, Jr. (1910–2003), was a pharmaceutical executive.          She has two brothers, Dana David and Harry William III.  Her patrilineal ancestry originates in Loffenau, Germany, from where her second great-grandfather, Gottfried Streep, emigrated to the United States, and where one of her ancestors served as mayor. Another line of her father's family was from Giswil in the canton of  Obwalden, a small town in Switzerland. Her maternal ancestors lived in Pennsylvania and Rhode Island, and were descended from 17th century immigrants from England.  Her eighth great-grandfather, Lawrence Wilkinson, was one of the first Europeans to settle Rhode Island. Streep is also a distant relative of William Penn, the founder of Pennsylvania, and records show that her family is among the first purchasers of land in the state.       She was raised a Presbyterian,   and grew up in Bernardsville, New Jersey, where she attended Bernards High School.  She had many school friends who were Catholic, and regularly attended Mass because she loved its rituals.  She received her B.A., in Drama, at Vassar College in 1971 (where she briefly received instruction from actress Jean Arthur), but also enrolled as an exchange student at Dartmouth College for a quarter before it became coeducational. She subsequently earned an M.F.A. from the Yale School of Drama. While at Yale, she played a variety of roles onstage,  from the glamorous Helena in A Midsummer Night's Dream to an eighty-year-old woman in a wheelchair in a comedy written by then-unknown playwrights Christopher Durang and Albert Innaurato.   
Personal lifeStreep lived with actor John Cazale for three years until his death in March 1978.   Streep married sculptor Don Gummer on September 30, 1978.  They have four children: Henry Wolfe Gummer (born November 13, 1979), Mary Willa "Mamie" Gummer (born August 3, 1983), Grace Jane Gummer (born May 9, 1986), and Louisa Jacobson Gummer (born June 12, 1991). Both Mamie and Grace are actresses.  Henry is a musician who performs under the name Henry Wolfe. When asked if religion plays a part in her life, in an interview in 2009, Streep replied, "I follow no doctrine. I don't belong to a church or a temple or a synagogue or an ashram."  She also said "I've always been really, deeply interested in faith, because I think I can understand the solace that's available in the whole construct of religion." Streep does not rule out the possibility that God exists; “I do have a sense of trying to make things better. Where does that come from?”   
Career

1970s
Streep performed in several theater productions in New York and New Jersey after graduating from Yale School of Drama,    including the New York Shakespeare Festival productions of Henry V, The Taming of the Shrew with Raúl Juliá, and Measure for Measure opposite Sam Waterston and John Cazale. At this time she entered a relationship with Cazale, with whom she lived until his death three years later. She starred on Broadway in the Brecht/Weill musical Happy End, and won an Obie for her performance in the all-sung off-Broadway production of Alice at the Palace.
Streep began auditioning for film roles, and later recalled an unsuccessful audition for Dino De Laurentiis for the leading female role in King Kong. De Laurentiis commented to his son in Italian, "She's ugly. Why did you bring me this thing?" and was shocked when Streep replied to the insult in fluent Italian.    In New York City, she appeared in the 1976 Broadway double bill of Tennessee Williams' 27 Wagons Full of Cotton and Arthur Miller's A Memory of Two Mondays. For the former, she received a Tony Award nomination for Best Featured Actress in a Play. Her other early Broadway credits include Anton Chekhov's The Cherry Orchard and the Bertolt Brecht-Kurt Weill musical Happy End in which she originally appeared off-Broadway at the Chelsea Theater Center. She received Drama Desk Award nominations for both productions.Streep's first feature film was Julia (1977), in which she played a small but pivotal role during a flashback scene. Streep was living in New York City with Cazale, who had been diagnosed with bone cancer.  He was cast in The Deer Hunter (1978), and Streep was delighted to secure a small role because it allowed her to remain with Cazale for the duration of filming. She was not specifically interested in the part, commenting, "They needed a girl between the two guys and I was it."   citing   She played a leading role in the television miniseries Holocaust (1978) as a German woman married to a Jewish artist in Nazi era Germany. She later explained that she had considered the material to be "unrelentingly noble",  and had taken the role only because she had needed money.   citing    Streep travelled to Germany and Austria for filming while Cazale remained in New York. Upon her return, Streep found that Cazale's illness had progressed, and she nursed him until his death on March 12, 1978. She spoke of her grief and her hope that work would provide a diversion; she accepted a role in The Seduction of Joe Tynan (1979) with Alan Alda, later commenting that she played it on "automatic pilot",  and performed the role of Katherine in The Taming of the Shrew for Shakespeare in the Park.  With an estimated audience of 109 million, Holocaust brought a degree of public recognition to Streep, who was described in August 1978 as "on the verge of national visibility".  She won the Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actress – Miniseries or a Movie  for her performance.The Deer Hunter (1978) was released a month later, and Streep was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress for her performance.Streep played a supporting role in Manhattan (1979) for Woody Allen, later stating that she had not seen a complete script and was given only the six pages of her own scenes,  and that she had not been permitted to improvise a word of her dialogue.  Asked to comment on the script for Kramer vs. Kramer (1979), in a meeting with the producer Stan Jaffee, director Robert Benton and star Dustin Hoffman, Streep insisted that the female character was not representative of many real women who faced marriage breakdown and child custody battles, and was written as "too evil".  Jaffee, Benton and Hoffman agreed with Streep, and the script was revised.  In preparing for the part, Streep spoke to her own mother about her life as a mother and housewife with a career,  and frequented the Upper East Side neighborhood in which the film was set.  Benton allowed Streep to write her dialogue in two of her key scenes, despite some objection from Hoffman.  Jaffee and Hoffman later spoke of Streep's tirelessness, with Hoffman commenting, "She's extraordinarily hardworking, to the extent that she's obsessive. I think that she thinks about nothing else but what she's doing." Streep drew critical acclaim for her performance in each of her three films released in 1979: the romantic comedy Manhattan, the political drama The Seduction of Joe Tynan and the family drama, Kramer vs. Kramer.  She was awarded the Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Supporting Actress, National Board of Review Award for Best Supporting Actress and National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Supporting Actress for her collective work in the three films. Among the awards won for Kramer vs. Kramer were the Academy Award and Golden Globe Award for Best Supporting Actress. 
1980sAfter prominent supporting roles in two of the 1970s' most successful films, the consecutive winners of the Academy Award for Best Picture, The Deer Hunter and Kramer vs. Kramer, and praise for her versatility in several supporting roles, Streep progressed to leading roles. Her first was The French Lieutenant's Woman (1981). A story within a story drama, the film paired Streep with Jeremy Irons as contemporary actors, telling their modern story as well as the Victorian era drama they were performing. A New York Magazine article commented that, while many female stars of the past had cultivated a singular identity in their films, Streep was a "chameleon", willing to play any type of role.    Streep was awarded a BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role for her work.Her next film, the psychological thriller, Still of the Night (1982) reunited her with Robert Benton, the director of Kramer vs. Kramer, and co-starred Roy Scheider and Jessica Tandy. Vincent Canby, writing for The New York Times, noted that the film was an homage to the works of Alfred Hitchcock, but that one of its main weaknesses was a lack of chemistry between Streep and Scheider, concluding that Streep "is stunning, but she's not on screen anywhere near long enough". As the Polish holocaust survivor in Sophie's Choice (1982), Streep's emotional dramatic performance and her apparent mastery of a Polish accent drew praise.  William Styron wrote the novel with Ursula Andress in mind for the part of Sophie, but Streep was very determined to get the role. After she obtained a pirated copy of the script, she went to Alan J. Pakula and threw herself on the ground begging him to give her the part.."  Streep filmed the "choice" scene in one take and refused to do it again, as she found shooting the scene extremely painful and emotionally exhausting.  Among several notable acting awards, Streep won the Academy Award for Best Actress for her performance. Roger Ebert said of her performance, "Streep plays the Brooklyn scenes with an enchanting Polish-American accent (she has the first accent I've ever wanted to hug), and she plays the flashbacks in subtitled German and Polish. There is hardly an emotion that Streep doesn't touch in this movie, and yet we're never aware of her straining. This is one of the most astonishing and yet one of the most unaffected and natural performances I can imagine." She followed this success with a biographical film, Silkwood (1983), in which she played her first real-life character, the union activist Karen Silkwood. She discussed her preparation for the role in an interview with Roger Ebert and said that she had met with people close to Silkwood to learn more about her, and in doing so realized that each person saw a different aspect of Silkwood.    Streep concentrated on the events of Silkwood's life and concluded, "I didn't try to turn myself into Karen. I just tried to look at what she did. I put together every piece of information I could find about her... What I finally did was look at the events in her life, and try to understand her from the inside." Her next films were a romantic drama, Falling in Love (1984) opposite Robert De Niro, and a British drama, Plenty (1985). Roger Ebert said of Streep's performance in Plenty that she conveyed "great subtlety; it is hard to play an unbalanced, neurotic, self-destructive woman, and do it with such gentleness and charm... Streep creates a whole character around a woman who could have simply been a catalogue of symptoms." Out of Africa (1985) starred Streep as the Danish writer Karen Blixen and co-starred Robert Redford. A significant critical success, the film received a 63% "fresh" rating from Rotten Tomatoes.  Streep co-starred with Jack Nicholson in her next two films, the dramas Heartburn (1986) and Ironweed (1987), in which she sang onscreen for the first time since the television movie, Secret Service, in 1977. In A Cry in the Dark, aka Evil Angels (1988), she played the biographical role of Lindy Chamberlain, an Australian woman who had been convicted of the murder of her infant daughter although Chamberlain said the baby had been taken by a dingo. Filmed in Australia, Streep won the Australian Film Institute Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role, a Best Actress at the Cannes Film Festival, the New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress and was nominated for several other awards for her portrayal of Chamberlain. Chamberlain has recently been vindicated in her claim that the baby was taken by a dingo.In She-Devil (1989), Streep played her first comedic film role, opposite Roseanne Barr. Richard Corliss, writing for Time, commented that Streep was the "one reason" to see the film and observed that it marked a departure from the type of role for which she had been known, saying, "Surprise! Inside the Greer Garson roles Streep usually plays, a vixenish Carole Lombard is screaming to be cut loose." 
1990s
In the 1990s, Streep continued to choose a great variety of roles. From 1984 to 1990, she won six People's Choice Awards for Favorite Motion Picture Actress, and in 1990 was named World Favorite. Biographer Karen Hollinger described this period as a downturn in the popularity of Streep's films, attributing this partly to a critical perception that her comedies had been an attempt to convey a lighter image following several serious but commercially unsuccessful dramas, and more significantly to the lack of options available to an actress in her forties. p. 78  Streep commented that she had limited her options by her preference to work in Los Angeles, close to her family,  a situation that she had anticipated in a 1981 interview when she commented, "By the time an actress hits her mid-forties, no one's interested in her anymore. And if you want to fit a couple of babies into that schedule as well, you've got to pick your parts with great care." Streep played a drug-addicted movie actress in a screen adaptation of Carrie Fisher's novel Postcards from the Edge, with Dennis Quaid and Shirley MacLaine. Streep and Goldie Hawn had established a friendship and were interested in making a film together. After considering various projects, they decided upon Thelma and Louise, until Streep's pregnancy coincided with the filming schedule, and the producers decided to proceed with Susan Sarandon and Geena Davis.  They subsequently filmed the farcical black comedy, Death Becomes Her, with Bruce Willis as their co-star. Times Richard Corliss wrote approvingly of Streep's "wicked-witch routine" but dismissed the film as "She-Devil with a make-over". In 1995, Streep played opposite Clint Eastwood in the love story The Bridges of Madison County (1995). Based on a best-selling novel by Robert James Waller,  it relates the story of Robert Kincaid (Eastwood), a photographer working for National Geographic, who has a love affair with a middle-aged Italian farm wife in Iowa named Francesca (Streep). Streep and Eastwood got along famously during production and such was their on-screen chemistry that a number of people believed that the two were having an affair off-camera, although this was denied by both. McGilligan, p.499  The film was a hit at the box office and grossed $70 million in the United States. McGilligan, p.503  The film, unlike the novel, surprised film critics and was warmly received. Janet Maslin of The New York Times wrote that Clint had managed to create "a moving, elegiac love story at the heart of Mr. Waller's self-congratulatory overkill", while Joe Morgenstern of the The Wall Street Journal described The Bridges of Madison County as "one of the most pleasurable films in recent memory". In 1996, Streep starred as Lee in Marvin's Room, an adaptation of the play by Scott McPherson. Diane Keaton played her estranged sister Bessie, a woman battling leukemia, although Streep had initially been considered for the role. The film also starred a young Leonardo DiCaprio as Streep's rebellious son. Roger Ebert stated that "Streep and Keaton, in their different styles, find ways to make Lee and Bessie into much more than the expression of their problems."  Although critically acclaimed, the film was not released on a wide scale. Streep, however, earned antoher Golden Globe nomination for the film. In 1999, Streep portrayed Roberta Guaspari, a real-life New Yorker who found passion and enlightenment teaching violin to inner-city kids in East Harlem, in the music drama Music of the Heart. A departure from director Wes Craven’s previous work on films like A Nightmare on Elm Street and the Scream series, Streep replaced singer Madonna who left the project before filming began due to creative differences with Craven. Required to perform on the violin, Streep went through two months of intense training, four to six hours a day. 
2000s Streep entered the 2000s with Steven Spielberg's A.I. Artificial Intelligence, a science fiction film about a childlike android, played by Haley Joel Osment, uniquely programmed with the ability to love, voicing the Blue Fairy.  The same year, Streep co-hosted the annual Nobel Peace Prize Concert concert with Liam Neeson which was held in Oslo, Norway on December 11, 2001 in honour of the Nobel Peace Prize laureate, the United Nations and Kofi Annan. In 2002, Streep returned to the stage for the first time in more than twenty years, playing Arkadina in The Public Theater's revival of Anton Chekhov's The Seagull, directed by Mike Nichols and co-starring Kevin Kline, Natalie Portman, and Philip Seymour Hoffman.  The same year, she began work on Spike Jonze's comedy-drama Adaptation (2002), in which she portrayed real-life journalist Susan Orlean. Lauded by critics and viewers alike,  the film won Streep her fourth Golden Globe in the Best Supporting Actress category.    Also in 2002, Streep appeared alongside Nicole Kidman and Julianne Moore in Stephen Daldry's The Hours, based on the 1999 novel by Michael Cunningham. Focusing on three women of different generations whose lives are interconnected by the novel Mrs. Dalloway by Virginia Woolf, the film was generally well received and won all three leading actresses a Silver Bear for Best Actress the following year.  The following year, Streep had a cameo as herself in the Farrelly brothers comedy Stuck on You (2003) and reunited with Mike Nichols to star with Al Pacino and Emma Thompson in the HBO adaptation of Tony Kushner's six-hour play Angels in America, the story of two couples whose relationships dissolve amidst the backdrop of Reagan Era politics. Streep, who was cast in four roles in the mini-series, received her second Emmy Award and fifth Golden Globe for her performance.  In 2004, Streep was awarded the AFI Life Achievement Award by the Board of Directors of the American Film Institute,.   She appeared in Jonathan Demme's  moderately successful remake of The Manchurian Candidate,  co-starring Denzel Washington, playing the role of a woman who is both a U.S. senator and the manipulative, ruthless mother of a vice-presidential candidate.  The same year, she played the supporting role of Aunt Josephine in Lemony Snicket's A Series of Unfortunate Events alongside Jim Carrey, based on the first three novels in Snicket's book series. The black comedy received generally favorable reviews from critics,  and won the Academy Award for Best Makeup. Streep was next cast in the 2005 comedy Prime, directed by Ben Younger. In the film, she played Lisa Metzger, the Jewish psychoanalyst of a divorced and lonesome business-woman, played by Uma Thurman, who enters a relationship with Metzger's 23-year-old son (Bryan Greenberg). A modest mainstream success, it eventually grossed US$67.9 million internationally.  In August and September 2006, she starred onstage at The Public Theater's production of Mother Courage and Her Children at the Delacorte Theatre in Central Park.  The Public Theater production was a new translation by playwright Tony Kushner (Angels in America), with songs in the Weill/Brecht style written by composer Jeanine Tesori (Caroline, or Change); veteran director George C. Wolfe was at the helm. Streep starred alongside Kevin Kline and Austin Pendleton in this three-and-a-half-hour play in which she sang and appeared in almost every scene.Also in 2006, Streep, along with Lily Tomlin, portrayed the last two members of what was once a popular family country music act in Robert Altman's final film A Prairie Home Companion. A comedic ensemble piece featuring Tommy Lee Jones, Kevin Kline and Woody Harrelson, the film revolves around the behind-the-scenes activities at the long-running public radio show of the same name. The film grossed over US$26 million, the majority of which came from domestic markets.  Commercially, Streep fared better with a role in The Devil Wears Prada (2006), a loose screen adaptation of Lauren Weisberger's 2003 novel of the same name. Streep portrayed the powerful and demanding Miranda Priestly, fashion magazine editor (and boss of a recent college graduate played by Anne Hathaway), and her performance drew rave reviews from critics and earned her many award nominations, including her record-setting 14th Oscar bid, as well as another Golden Globe. Upon its commercial release, the film became Streep's biggest commercial success yet, grossing more than US$326.5 million worldwide. In 2007, Streep was cast in four films. She portrayed a wealthy university patron in Chen Shi-zheng's much-delayed feature drama Dark Matter (2007), a film about a Chinese science graduate student who becomes violent after dealing with academic politics at a U.S. university. Inspired by the events of the 1991 University of Iowa shooting,  and initially scheduled for a 2007 release, producers and investors decided to shelve Dark Matter out of respect for the Virginia Tech massacre in April 2007.  The drama received negative to mixed reviews upon its limited 2008 release.  Streep played a U.S. government official who investigates an Egyptian foreign national suspected of terrorism in the political thriller Rendition (2007), directed by Gavin Hood.  Keen to get involved in a thriller film, Streep welcomed the opportunity to star in a film genre for which she was not usually offered scripts and immediately signed on to the project.  Upon its release, Rendition was less commercially successful,  and received mixed reviews. Also in 2007, Streep had a short role alongside Vanessa Redgrave, Glenn Close and her eldest daughter Mamie Gummer in Lajos Koltai's drama film Evening, based on the 1998 novel of the same name by Susan Minot. Switching between the present and the past, it tells the story of a bedridden woman, who remembers her tumultuous life in the mid-1950s.    The film was released to lukewarm reactions by critics, who called it "beautifully filmed, but decidedly dull [and] a colossal waste of a talented cast."   Streep's last film of 2007 was Robert Redfords Lions for Lambs, a film about the connection between a platoon of United States soldiers in Afghanistan, a U.S. senator, a reporter, and a California college professor.In 2008, Streep found major commercial success when she starred in Phyllida Lloyd's Mamma Mia!, a film adaptation of the musical of the same name, based on the songs of Swedish pop group ABBA. Co-starring Amanda Seyfried, Pierce Brosnan, Stellan Skarsgård and Colin Firth, Streep played a single mother and a former backing singer, whose daughter (Seyfried), a bride-to-be who never met her father, invites three likely paternal candidates to her wedding on an idyllic Greek island.  An instant box office success, Mamma Mia! became Streep's highest-grossing film to date, with box office receipts of US$602.6 million,  also ranking it first among the highest-grossing musical films of all-time.  Nominated for another Golden Globe, Streep's performance was generally well received by critics, with Wesley Morris of the Boston Globe commenting "the greatest actor in American movies has finally become a movie star."  Streep's other film of 2008 was Doubt featuring Philip Seymour Hoffman, Amy Adams, and Viola Davis. A drama revolving around the stern principal nun (Streep) of a Bronx Catholic school in 1964 who brings charges of pedophilia against a popular priest (Hoffman), the film became a moderate box office success,  but was hailed by many critics as one of the best of 2008.  The film received five Academy Awards nominations, for its four lead actors and for Shanley's script. In 2009, Streep played chef Julia Child in Nora Ephron's Julie & Julia, co-starring Amy Adams and Stanley Tucci. The first major motion picture based on a blog, it contrasts the life of Child in the early years of her culinary career with the life of young New Yorker Julie Powell (Adams), who aspires to cook all 524 recipes in Child's cookbook Mastering the Art of French Cooking in 365 days, a challenge she described on her popular blog, The Julie/Julia Project, that would make her a published author. The same year, Streep also starred in Nancy Meyers' romantic comedy It's Complicated, with Alec Baldwin and Steve Martin. She also received nominations for the Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy for both of these films and won the award for the former.  Streep later received her 16th Oscar nomination for Julie & Julia.  She also lent her voice to Mrs. Felicity Fox in the stop-motion film Fantastic Mr. Fox.
2010s
Streep's first film of the 2010s was Phyllida Lloyd's The Iron Lady (2011), a British biographical film about Margaret Thatcher, which takes a look at the Prime Minister during the Falklands War and her years in retirement.  Streep, who sat through a session at the House of Commons to observe  British MPs in action in preparation for her role,  called her cast "a daunting and exciting challenge," and further added: "I am trying to approach the role with as much zeal, fervour and attention to detail as the real Lady Thatcher possesses – I can only hope my stamina will begin to approach her own."  While the film met with mixed critics, Streep's performance got rave reviews, earning her Best Actress awards at the Golden Globes and the BAFTAs as well as her third win at the 84th Academy Awards.   In 2012, Streep reunited with David Frankel on the set of the comedy-drama film Hope Springs, co-starring Tommy Lee Jones and Steve Carell. In it, Streep and Jones play a middle-aged couple, who attend a week of intensive marriage counseling to try to bring back the intimacy missing in their relationship.  Reviews for the film were mostly positive, with critics praising the "mesmerizing performances from Meryl Streep and Tommy Lee Jones" which offer "filmgoers some grown-up laughs -- and a thoughtful look at mature relationships". Streep will star alongside Julia Roberts in the upcoming film August: Osage County, which is being filmed on-site in Oklahoma as of September 2012 and is slated for release in mid-2013. The film is based on Tracy Letts's Pulitzer Prize-winning play of the same name and is being directed by John Wells. In September 2012, it was reported that Streep along with Hilary Swank will join the production of The Homesman, Tommy Lee Jones' sophomore directorial effort. 
Accents and dialectsStreep is well known for her ability to imitate foreign and domestic accents,  from Danish in Out of Africa (1985); to British RP in Plenty (also 1985), The French Lieutenant's Woman (1981) and The Iron Lady (2011); and from Italian in The Bridges of Madison County (1995); to a Minnesota accent in A Prairie Home Companion (2006). In A Cry in the Dark (1988), critics were impressed with Streep's ability to master an Australian accent with shades of New Zealand English.   For her role in the film Sophie's Choice (1982), she spoke in a Polish accent, and took language courses as the role required her to speak both German and Polish fluently in key scenes. In The Iron Lady, she reproduced the vocal style of Margaret Thatcher, from the time before she became Britain's Prime Minister, and after she had taken elocution lessons to change her pitch, pronunciation and delivery. Despite the accolades accorded to her, Streep has emphasised that adopting accents is an element she simply considers an obvious part of creating a character.  When asked whether accents helped her get into character, she responded, "I'm always baffled by this question... How could I play that part and talk like me?" When questioned as to how she reproduces different accents, Streep replied, "I listen." 
MusicAfter Streep appeared in Mamma Mia!, her rendition of the song "Mamma Mia" rose to popularity in the Portuguese music charts, where it peaked at #8 in October 2008. At the 35th People's Choice Awards, her version of Mamma Mia won an award for "Favorite Song From A Soundtrack".  In 2008, Streep was nominated for a Grammy Award (her fifth nomination) for her work on the Mamma Mia! soundtrack.
PhilanthropyStreep is the spokesperson for the National Women's History Museum, to which she has donated a significant amount of money (including her fee for The Iron Lady) and hosted numerous events. On October 4, 2012, Streep donated $1 million dollars to The Public Theater in honor of both its late founder, Joseph Papp, and her friend, the author Nora Ephron. 
Awards and nominations 

Academy Awards   
Year  Film  Category  Result 
1978 The Deer Hunter Best Supporting Actress   
1979 Kramer vs. Kramer   
1981 The French Lieutenant's Woman Best Actress   
1982 Sophie's Choice   
1983 Silkwood   
1985 Out of Africa   
1987 Ironweed   
1988 A Cry in the Dark   
1990 Postcards from the Edge   
1995 The Bridges of Madison County   
1998 One True Thing   
1999 Music of the Heart   
2002 Adaptation. Best Supporting Actress   
2006 The Devil Wears Prada Best Actress   
2008 Doubt   
2009 Julie & Julia   
2011 The Iron Lady   
Streep has been recognized with multiple awards and nominations for his work in film, television, and music. She holds the record for the most Academy Award nominations of any actor, having been nominated 17 times since her first nomination in 1979 for her performance in The Deer Hunter (fourteen for Best Actress and three for Best Supporting Actress) – five more than both Katharine Hepburn and Jack Nicholson, who are tied in second place.  With her third Oscar win for her performance as Margaret Thatcher in The Iron Lady (2011) in 2012, Streep became the fifth performer to receive three Academy Awards: Nicholson, Ingrid Bergman and Walter Brennan all earned three, while Hepburn won four. 
In 2009, Streep became the most-nominated performer in Golden Globe Awards history when her double lead actress nods for Doubt (2008) and Mamma Mia! (2008) gave her 23 in total, breaking the tie with Jack Lemmon, who had received 22 lead nominations before his death in 2001.    The following year, Streep surpassed Jack Nicholson and Angela Lansbury, with six Golden Globe awards wins each, after receiving her seventh Globe for her performance as Julia Child in Julie & Julia (2009).  In 2012, she broke her own record when she garnered her 26th nomination and overall eighth win for The Iron Lady at the 69th Golden Globe Awards.Streep holds the BAFTA record for most nominations at 14 in total.    She received her second Best Actress award for The Iron Lady at the 65th ceremony in February 2012, following her first win in 1981 for her performance in Sophie's Choice (1981). In 1983, Yale University, from which Streep graduated in 1975,  awarded her an honorary degree, a Doctorate of Fine Arts.  The first university to award her an honorary degree was Dartmouth College, where she spent time as a transfer student in 1970, in 1981. In 1998, Women in Film awarded Streep with the Crystal Award, an honor for outstanding women who, through their endurance and the excellence of their work, have helped to expand the role of women within the entertainment industry.  The same year, she received a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame. In 1999, she was awarded a George Eastman Award, given by George Eastman House for distinguished contribution to the art of film.  In 2003, Streep was awarded an honorary César Award by the French Académie des Arts et Techniques du Cinéma. In 2004, at the Moscow International Film Festival, she was honored with the Stanislavsky Award for the outstanding achievement in the career of acting and devotion to the principles of Stanislavsky's school. Also in 2004, she received the AFI Life Achievement Award. In 2008, Streep was inducted into the New Jersey Hall of Fame.  In 2009, she was awarded an honorary Doctorate of Fine Arts by Princeton University.  In 2010, she was elected to the American Academy of Arts and Letters and was awarded an honorary Doctor of Arts degree by Harvard University.   On December 4, 2011, Streep, along with Neil Diamond, Yo-Yo Ma, Sonny Rollins, and Barbara Cook, received the 2011 Kennedy Center Honor. On February 14, 2012, she received the Honorary Golden Bear at the 62nd Berlin International Film Festival.      
Selected filmography 

year film role Notes 
1978 The Deer Hunter Linda American Movie Award for Best Supporting Actress National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated - Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated - BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Supporting Actress – Motion Picture 
1979 Manhattan Jill Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Supporting Actress  National Board of Review Award for Best Supporting Actress National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated - BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Supporting Role 
1979 Kramer vs. Kramer Joanna Kramer Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress Golden Globe Award for Best Supporting Actress – Motion Picture Kansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Supporting Actress National Board of Review Award for Best Supporting Actress National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Supporting Actress New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Supporting Actress  (and also The Seduction of Joe Tynan)  Nominated - BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role 
1981 The French Lieutenant's Woman Sarah/Anna BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Academy Award for Best Actress 
1982 Sophie's Choice Sophie Zawistowski Academy Award for Best Actress Boston Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actress Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama Kansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress National Board of Review Award for Best Actress National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actress New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Nominated - BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role 
1983 Silkwood Karen Silkwood Kansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Nominated - Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated - BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama 
1984 Falling in Love Molly Gilmore David di Donatello Award for Best Foreign Actress (Migliore Attrice Straniero) 
1985 Out of Africa Karen Blixen David di Donatello Award for Best Foreign Actress (Migliore Attrice Straniero) Kansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated - BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama 
1986 Heartburn Rachel Samstat Valladolid International Film Festival for Best Actress 
1987 Ironweed Helen Archer Nominated - Academy Award for Best Actress 
1988 A Cry in the Dark Lindy Chamberlain Australian Film Institute Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Best Actress Award (Cannes Film Festival) Nominated - Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama 
1989 She-Devil Mary Fisher Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy 
1990 Postcards from the Edge Suzanne Vale American Comedy Award for Funniest Actress in a Motion Picture (Leading Role) Nominated - Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy 
1992 Death Becomes Her Madeline Ashton Nominated - Saturn Award for Best Actress Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy 
1994 The River Wild Gail Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Leading Role 
1995 The Bridges of Madison County Francesca Johnson Nominated - Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Leading Role 
1996 Marvin's Room Lee Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama Nominated - Chlotrudis Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Cast in a Motion Picture 
1997 ...First Do No Harm Lori Reimuller Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Miniseries or Television Film Nominated - Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actress in a Miniseries or a Movie Nominated - Satellite Award for Best Actress – Miniseries or Television Film 
1998 One True Thing Kate Gulden Nominated - Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama Nominated - Satellite Award for Best Supporting Actress – Motion Picture Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Leading Role 
1998 Dancing at Lughnasa Kate Mundy Nominated - Irish Film and Television Awardsfor Best Actor in a Female Role 
1999 Music of the Heart Roberta Guaspari Nominated - Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Leading Role 
2002 Adaptation.   Susan Orlean Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Supporting Actress Florida Film Critics Circle Award for Best Supporting Actress Golden Globe Award for Best Supporting Actress – Motion Picture Satellite Award for Best Supporting Actress – Motion Picture Silver Bear for Best Actress Southeastern Film Critics Association Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated - Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated - BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Supporting Role Nominated - Broadcast Film Critics Association Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated - London Film Critics Circle Award for Actress of the Year Nominated - Online Film Critics Society Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated - Phoenix Film Critics Society Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated - Phoenix Film Critics Society Award for Best Cast Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Cast in a Motion Picture 
2002 The Hours Clarissa Vaughan Silver Bear for Best Actress in Berlin International Film Festival  (with Julianne Moore and Nicole Kidman)  Nominated - BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama Nominated - Las Vegas Film Critics Society Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated - Phoenix Film Critics Society Award for Best Cast Nominated - Satellite Award for Best Supporting Actress – Motion Picture Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Cast in a Motion Picture 
2003 Angels in America Ethel Rosenberg The Rabbi Hannah Pitt Angel Australia Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Miniseries or Television Film Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actress in a Miniseries or a Movie Satellite Award for Best Actress – Miniseries or Television Film Gracie Award for Outstanding Female Lead in a Drama Special Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Miniseries or Television Movie 
2004 The Manchurian Candidate Eleanor Shaw Nominated - BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Supporting Role Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Supporting Actress – Motion Picture Nominated - Saturn Award for Best Supporting Actress 
2006 The Devil Wears Prada Miranda Priestly Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy London Film Critics Circle Award for Actress of the Year National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Supporting Actress Online Film Critics Society Award for Best Actress Satellite Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy Nominated - Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated - BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated - Broadcast Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Teen Choice Awards for Choice Chemistry Nominated - Teen Choice Awards for Choice Sleazebag Nominated - MTV Movie Award for Best Villain Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Leading Role 
2008 Mamma Mia! Donna Kansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Phoenix Film Critics Society Award for Best Actress Washington D.C. Area Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy Nominated - London Film Critics Circle Award for Actress of the Year  
2008 Doubt Sister Aloysius Beauvier Broadcast Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Kansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress National Board of Review Award for Best Cast Phoenix Film Critics Society Award for Best Actress Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Leading Role Washington D.C. Area Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated - BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated - Broadcast Film Critics Association Award for Best Cast Nominated - Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama Nominated - London Film Critics Circle Award for Actress of the Year Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Cast in a Motion Picture 
2009 Julie & Julia Julia Child Boston Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actress Broadcast Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy Kansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Phoenix Film Critics Society Award for Best Actress Satellite Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy Southeastern Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated - BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated - Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - London Film Critics Circle Award for Actress of the Year Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Leading Role 
2009 It's Complicated Jane Adler Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy 
2011 The Iron Lady Margaret Thatcher Academy Award for Best Actress AACTA International Award for Best Actress BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Denver Film Critics Society Award for Best Actress Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama  New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress New York Film Critics Online Award for Best Actress London Film Critics Circle Award for Actress of the Year  Southeastern Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Boston Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actress  Nominated - Broadcast Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Dallas-Fort Worth Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Detroit Film Critics Society Award for Best Actress Nominated - Houston Film Critics Society Award for Best Actres Nominated - Iowa Film Critics Awards for Best Actress Nominated - Irish Film & Television Award for Best International Actress Nominated - National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actress Nominated - Online Film Critics Society Award for Best Actress Nominated - Toronto Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Satellite Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Nominated - St. Louis Gateway Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress  Nominated - Vancouver Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Nominated - Washington D.C. Area Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Leading Role 
2012 Hope Springs Kay Soames  

See also 

List of people from New Jersey
List of American actresses
List of actors with two or more Academy Awards in acting categories
 
References 
Bibliography

Napoleon, Davi (1991). Chelsea on the Edge: The Adventures of an American Theater. Includes discussion of Streep's performance in Robert Kalfin's production of Happy End at the Chelsea Theater and on Broadway. Iowa State University Press. ISBN-0-8138-1713-7.
Finding Herself: The Prime of Meryl Streep by Molly Haskell, Film Comment, May/June 2008.
 


External links 

Official web site
 
 
 
 
Meryl Streep at BAFTA forty-minute webcast, January 2009
Meryl Streep at Emmys.com

  
 
DEFAULTSORT





























 
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Stephen Fry
 
 
 
 Stephen John Fry (born 24 August 1957) is an English actor, screenwriter, author, playwright, journalist, poet, comedian, television presenter, film director and a director of Norwich City Football Club.   After a troubled childhood and adolescence, during which he was expelled from two schools and spent three months in prison for credit card fraud, he secured a place at Queens' College, Cambridge where he studied English Literature.Whilst at university, Fry became involved with the Cambridge Footlights, where he met his longtime collaborator Hugh Laurie. As half of the comic double act Fry and Laurie, he co-wrote and co-starred in A Bit of Fry & Laurie, and took the role of Jeeves (with Laurie playing Wooster) in Jeeves and Wooster.Fry's acting roles include the lead in the film Wilde, Melchett in the BBC television series Blackadder, the titular character in the the television series Kingdom, a recurring guest role as Dr. Gordon Wyatt on the crime series Bones, and as Gordon Deitrich in the dystopian thriller V for Vendetta. He has also written and presented several documentary series including Stephen Fry: The Secret Life of the Manic Depressive, which saw him explore his mental illness and earned an Emmy Award. He is also the longtime host of the quiz show QI.As well as his work in television, Fry has contributed columns and articles for newspapers and magazines, and has written four novels and two volumes of autobiography, Moab Is My Washpot and The Fry Chronicles. He also appears frequently on BBC Radio 4, starring in the comedy series Absolute Power, being a frequent guest on panel games such as Just a Minute, and acting as chairman for I'm Sorry I Haven't a Clue, where he was one of a trio of hosts who succeeded the late Humphrey Lyttelton. Fry is also known for his voice-overs, reading all seven of the Harry Potter novels for the UK audiobook recordings, and as the narrator in the LittleBigPlanet series of  video games.
Early life
Fry was born in Hampstead, London, on 24 August 1957, the son of Marianne Eve Fry (née Newman) and Alan John Fry, who was an English physicist and inventor.     His maternal grandparents, Martin and Rosa Neumann,  were Hungarian Jewish immigrants from Šurany, which is now in Slovakia.    His mother's aunt and cousins died in Auschwitz.  Fry grew up in the village of Booton near Reepham, Norfolk, having moved from Chesham, Buckinghamshire at an early age. Fry briefly attended Cawston Primary School, Cawston, Norfolk,  before going on to Stouts Hill Preparatory School, in Uley, Gloucestershire, at the age of seven, and then to Uppingham School, Rutland, where he joined Fircroft house and was described as a "near-asthmatic genius".    He was expelled from Uppingham when he was 15, and subsequently from the Paston School.At 17, after leaving Norfolk College of Arts and Technology, Fry absconded with a credit card stolen from a family friend, was arrested in Swindon, and as a result spent three months in Pucklechurch Prison on remand.   Following his release he resumed his education at City College Norwich, promising administrators that he would study rigorously to sit the Cambridge entrance exams. He scored well enough to gain a scholarship to Queens' College, Cambridge. At Cambridge, Fry joined the Cambridge Footlights, appeared on University Challenge, and gained a degree in English literature.  At the Footlights Fry met his future comedy collaborator Hugh Laurie.
Career 
Television

Comedy
Fry's career in television began with the 1982 broadcasting of The Cellar Tapes, the 1981 Cambridge Footlights Revue which was written by Fry, Hugh Laurie, Emma Thompson and Tony Slattery. The revue caught the attention of Granada Television, who, keen to replicate the success of the BBC's Not the Nine O'Clock News, hired Fry, Laurie and Thompson to star alongside Ben Elton in There's Nothing to Worry About!. A second series, re-titled Alfresco, was broadcast in 1983 and a third in 1984; it established Fry and Laurie's reputation as a comedy double act. In 1983, the BBC offered them their own show, which became The Crystal Cube, a mixture of science fiction and mockumentary that was cancelled after the first episode. Undeterred, Fry and Laurie appeared in an episode of The Young Ones in 1984, and Fry in Ben Elton's 1985 series, Happy Families. In 1986 and 1987 Fry and Laurie also performed sketches on the LWT/Channel 4 show Saturday Live.Forgiving Fry and Laurie for The Crystal Cube, the BBC commissioned a sketch show in 1986 that was to become A Bit of Fry & Laurie. The programme ran for 26 episodes spanning four series between 1986 and 1995, and was very successful. During this time Fry starred in Blackadder II as Lord Melchett, made a guest appearance in Blackadder the Third as the Duke of Wellington, then returned to a starring role in Blackadder Goes Forth as General Melchett. In the 1988 television special Blackadder's Christmas Carol he played the roles of Lord Melchett and Lord Frondo.Between 1990 and 1993, Fry starred as Jeeves (alongside Hugh Laurie's Bertie Wooster) in Jeeves and Wooster, 23 hour-long adaptations of P.G. Wodehouse's novels and short stories.Towards the end of 2003, Fry starred alongside John Bird in the television adaptation of Absolute Power, previously a radio series on BBC Radio 4.In 2010 Fry took part in a Christmas series of short films called 'Little Crackers'. Fry's short is based on a story from his childhood at school.  He appeared as the Christian God in 2011's Holy Flying Circus.
Drama
Fry has appeared in a number of BBC adaptations of plays and books, including a 1992 adaptation of the Simon Gray play The Common Pursuit (Fry had previously appeared in the West End stage production); a 1998 Malcolm Bradbury adaptation of the Mark Tavener novel, In the Red, with Fry taking the part of the Controller of BBC Radio 2; and in 2000 Fry took the role of Professor Bellgrove in the BBC serial Gormenghast which was adapted from the first two novels of Mervyn Peake's Gormenghast series. In 2011, Fry portrayed Professor Mildeye in the BBC adaption of Mary Norton's 1952 novel The Borrowers.Fry narrates the English language version of the Spanish children's animated series Pocoyo. From 2007 to 2009, Fry played the lead role in (and was executive producer for) the legal drama Kingdom, which ran for three series on ITV1.  He has also taken up a recurring guest role as psychiatrist Dr. Gordon Wyatt in the popular American drama Bones.In 2010, having learned some Irish for the role,  he filmed a cameo role in Ros na Rún, an Irish language soap opera broadcast in Ireland, Scotland and the United States.   
Documentaries and other factual programmesFry's first documentary was the Emmy Award-winning Stephen Fry: The Secret Life of the Manic Depressive in 2006.  The same year, he appeared in the genealogy series Who Do You Think You Are?, tracing his maternal family tree to investigate his Jewish ancestry.    Fry narrated The Story of Light Entertainment, which was shown from July–September 2006.       In 2007 he presented a documentary on the subject of HIV and AIDS, HIV and Me.   On 7 May 2008, Fry gave a speech as part of a series of BBC lectures on the future of public service broadcasting in the United Kingdom,    which he later recorded for a podcast.    His six-part travel series Stephen Fry in America began on BBC One in October 2008 and saw him travel to each of the 50 US states;    in the same year he narrated the nature documentaries Spectacled Bears: Shadow of the Forest for the BBC Natural World series.   In the 2009 television series Last Chance to See, Fry and zoologist Mark Carwardine sought out endangered species, some of which had been featured in Douglas Adams' and Carwardine's 1990 book and radio series of the same name    Also in 2009, Fry briefly hosted CBBC series Horrible Histories, an educational TV show for school children.In August 2011 Stephen Fry's 100 Greatest Gadgets was shown on Channel 4 as one of the 100 Greatest strand.     His choice for the greatest gadget was the cigarette lighter which he described as "fire with a flick of the fingers".  In the same month, the nature documentary series Ocean Giants, narrated by Fry, premiered.In September 2011 Fry's Planet Word, a five-part documentary about language, aired on BBC HD and BBC Two.      In November 2011 an episode of Living The Life featured Fry in an intimate conversation discussing his life and career with Rolling Stones bass player Bill Wyman.   
QIIn 2003, Fry began hosting QI (Quite Interesting), a comedy panel game television quiz show. QI was created and co-produced by John Lloyd, and features permanent panellist Alan Davies. QI has the highest viewing figures for any show on BBC Four and UKTV G2 (now Dave).   In 2006, Fry won the Rose d'Or award for "Best Game Show Host" for his work on the series. 
FilmHaving made his film debut in the 1985 film The Good Father, Fry had a brief appearance in A Fish Called Wanda (in which he is knocked out by Kevin Kline, who is posing as an airport security man) and then appeared in the lead role for Kenneth Branagh's Peter's Friends in 1992. In the 1994 romantic comedy film I.Q., he played the role of James Moreland.  Portraying Oscar Wilde (of whom he had been a fan since the age of 13) in the 1997 film Wilde, he fulfilled to critical acclaim a role that he has said he was "born to play". It also earned him a nomination for Best Actor – Drama in the 1998 Golden Globe Award. A year later, Fry starred in David Yates' small independent film The Tichborne Claimant, and in 2001 he played the detective in Robert Altman's period costume drama, Gosford Park. In the same year he also appeared in the Dutch film The Discovery of Heaven, directed by Jeroen Krabbé and based on the novel by Harry Mulisch.In 2003, Fry made his directorial debut with Bright Young Things, adapted by him from Evelyn Waugh's Vile Bodies. In 2001, he began hosting the BAFTA Film Awards, a role from which he stepped down in 2006.  Later that same year, he wrote the English libretto and dialogue for Kenneth Branagh's film adaptation of The Magic Flute.Fry continues to make regular film appearances, notably in treatments of literary cult classics. He portrayed Maurice Woodruff in The Life and Death of Peter Sellers, served as narrator in the 2005 film version of The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy, and in 2005 appeared in both A Cock and Bull Story, based on Tristram Shandy, and as a non-conforming TV presenter who challenges the fascist state in V for Vendetta.   In 2006, he played the role of gadget-master Smithers in Stormbreaker, and in 2007 he appeared as himself hosting a quiz in St Trinian's. In 2007, Fry wrote a script for a remake of The Dam Busters for director Peter Jackson. 
Fry was offered a role in Valkyrie but was unable to participate.  Fry starred in the Tim Burton version of Alice in Wonderland, as the voice of the Cheshire Cat.  He played Mycroft Holmes in the sequel to Sherlock Holmes directed by Guy Ritchie.  In 2010, Fry provided the voice of Socrates the Lion in the environmental animated film Animals United. He will portray the Master of Lake-town in the 2012 film adaptation of J. R. R. Tolkien's The Hobbit.   
Feature filmography

1985: The Good Father – Creighton
1988: A Fish Called Wanda – Hutchison
1992: Peter's Friends – Peter
1994: I.Q. – James Moreland
1997: Wilde – Oscar Wilde
1998: The Tichborne Claimant – Hawkins
1998: A Civil Action – Pinder
1999: Whatever Happened to Harold Smith? – Dr. Peter Robinson
2001: Gosford Park – Inspector Thompson
2001: The Discovery of Heaven – Onno
2002: Thunderpants – Sir Antony Silk (judge)
2003: Bright Young Things – Director
2004: The Life and Death of Peter Sellers – Maurice Woodruff
2004: A Bear Named Winnie – Protheroe
2005: V for Vendetta – Deitrich
2005: The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy – The Narrator (voice)
2006: A Cock and Bull Story – Parson Yorick / Patrick Curator / Stephen Fry
2006: The Magic Flute – Writer
2006: Stormbreaker – Smithers
2007: St. Trinian's – Himself
2007: Eichmann – Minister Tormer
2009: House of Boys – Dr. Marsh
2010: Alice in Wonderland – Cheshire Cat (voice)
2010: Animals United – Socrates the Lion (voice)
2011: Sherlock Holmes: A Game of Shadows – Mycroft Holmes
2013: The Hobbit: The Desolation of Smaug – Master of Lake-town


RadioFry came to the attention of radio listeners with the 1986 creation of his alter-ego, Donald Trefusis, whose "wireless essays" were broadcast on the BBC Radio 4 programme Loose Ends. In the 1980s he starred as David Lander in four series of the BBC Radio 4 show Delve Special, written by Tony Sarchet, which became the six part Channel 4 series This is David Lander in 1988. In 1988, Fry wrote and presented a six-part comedy series entitled Saturday Night Fry; frequent radio appearances have ensued (notably on panel games Just a Minute and I'm Sorry I Haven't a Clue). In 2000, he began starring as Charles Prentiss in the Radio 4 comedy Absolute Power, reprising the role for three further series on radio and two on television. In 2002, Fry voiced Winnie-the-Pooh and was one of the narrators of A.A. Milne's Winnie-the-Pooh and The House at Pooh Corner. He presented a 20-part, two-hour series, The Incomplete and Utter History of Classical Music, a "witty guide" to the genre over the past 1,000 years, on Classic FM.In 2007, he hosted Current Puns, an exploration of wordplay, and Radio 4: This Is Your Life, to celebrate the radio station's 40th anniversary. He also interviewed Tony Blair as part of a series of podcasts released by 10 Downing Street.   In February 2008, Fry began presenting podcasts entitled Stephen Fry's Podgrams, in which he recounts his life and recent experiences.  In July 2008, he appeared as himself in I Love Stephen Fry, an Afternoon Play for Radio 4 written by former Fry and Laurie script editor Jon Canter. Since August 2008 he has presented Fry's English Delight, a series on BBC Radio 4 about the English language.    As of 2011, it has been running for five series and 17 episodes.In the summer 2009 series of I'm Sorry I Haven't a Clue, Fry was one of a trio of hosts replacing Humphrey Lyttelton (the others being Jack Dee and Rob Brydon).   In 2012 he appeared as a guest panellist in the BBC Radio 4 comedy panel show Wordaholics.   
TheatreFry wrote the play Latin! or Tobacco and Boys for the 1980 Edinburgh Festival, where it won the Fringe First prize.  It had a revival in 2009 at London's Cock Tavern Theatre, directed by Adam Spreadbury-Maher.  The Cellar Tapes, the Footlights Revue of 1981, won the Perrier Comedy Award. In 1984, Fry adapted the hugely successful 1930s musical Me and My Girl for the West End, where it ran for eight years.
He was also cast in a lead role in Simon Gray's 1995 play, Cell Mates, which he left three days into the West End run, pleading stage fright. He later recalled the incident as a hypomanic episode in his documentary about bipolar disorder, The Secret Life of the Manic Depressive. In 2007, Fry wrote a Christmas pantomime, Cinderella, which ran at London's Old Vic Theatre. Fry is a long-standing fan of the anarchic 1960s British musical comedy group, the Bonzo Dog Band and, particularly, of its eccentric front man, the late Vivian Stanshall. Fry helped to fund a 1988 London re-staging of Stanshall's Stinkfoot, a Comic Opera, written by Vivian and Ki Longfellow-Stanshall for the Bristol-based Old Profanity Showboat. Fry performed several of Stanshall's numbers as part of the Bonzos' 2006 reunion concert at the London Astoria. He also appears as a shiny New Millennium Bonzo on their post-reunion album, Pour l'Amour des Chiens, on which he recites a recipe for "Salmon Proust", plays a butler in "Hawkeye the Gnu", and voices ads for the fictitious "Fiasco" stores.Following three one-man shows in Australia, Fry announced a "sort of stand-up" performance at The Royal Albert Hall in London for September 2010. 
Audio booksFry has been the reader for the British versions of all of J.K.Rowling's Harry Potter series of audio books. He discussed this project in an interview with J.K. Rowling in 2005. 
He has also been the reader for Douglas Adams's The Hitchhiker's Guide To The Galaxy film tie-in edition. He has also made recordings of his own books, such as The Stars' Tennis Balls and Moab Is My Washpot; and works by Roald Dahl, Michael Bond, A. A. Milne and Anthony Buckeridge.
Video gamesFry's distinctive voice has been featured in a number of video games, including an appearance as Reaver, a primary antagonist in Lionhead Studios games Fable II and Fable III, and as the narrator in LittleBigPlanet and its sequel on PlayStation 3 and PlayStation Portable. He is also lending his voice for the spin-off game of LittleBigPlanet Karting, which will be released in 2012.   He also served as narrator on the first four Harry Potter games (Philosopher's Stone, Chamber of Secrets, Prisoner of Azkaban and the Goblet of Fire).
AdvertisementsFry has lent himself and his voice to many advertisements, starting with an appearance as "Count Ivan Skavinsky Skavar" in a 1982 advert for Whitbread Best Bitter. Fry has said in his memoirs that after receiving his payment for this work – £25,000 – he has never subsequently experienced "what one could call serious money troubles".  He has since appeared in adverts for products and companies such as Marks and Spencer, Twinings, Kenco, Vauxhall, Honda, Direct Line, Calpol, Heineken, Alliance & Leicester, After Eights, Trebor, Panama cigars, Virgin Media and Orange Mobile.
LiteratureSince the publication of his first novel, The Liar (1991), Fry has written three further novels, several non-fiction works and two volumes of autobiography. Making History (1997) is partly set in an alternative universe where Adolf Hitler's father is made infertile and his replacement proves a rather more effective Führer. The book won the Sidewise Award for Alternate History. The Hippopotamus (1994) is about Edward (Ted/Tedward) Wallace and his stay at his old friend Lord Logan's country manor in Norfolk. The Stars' Tennis Balls (2000) is a modern retelling of The Count of Monte Cristo. Fry's book, The Ode Less Travelled: Unlocking the Poet Within, is a guide to writing poetry.When writing a book review for Tatler, Fry wrote under a nom de plume, Williver Hendry, editor of A Most Peculiar Friendship: The Correspondence of Lord Alfred Douglas and Jack Dempsey, a field close to Fry's heart as an Oscar Wilde enthusiast. Once a columnist in The Listener and The Daily Telegraph, he now writes a weekly technology column in the Saturday edition of The Guardian. His blog attracted more than 300,000 visitors in its first two weeks. In May 2009, Fry unveiled The Dongle of Donald Trefusis, an audiobook series following Donald Trefusis (a fictional character from Fry's novel The Liar and from the BBC Radio 4 series Loose Ends), set over 12 episodes.  After its release, it reached No. 1 on the UK Album Chart list.Fry's use of the word " " (spelled "lovie" by Fry) in The Guardian on 2 April 1988 is given by the Oxford English Dictionary as the earliest recorded use of the word as a humorous synonym for "actor". 
FootballIn August 2010, Fry joined the Board of Directors at Norwich City Football Club. A lifelong fan of "the Canaries" and a regular visitor to Carrow Road, he said on being appointed "Truly this is one of the most exciting days of my life and I am as proud and pleased as I could be."   
TwitterIn October 2008, Fry began posting to the social networking site Twitter,  which he regularly updates.  On 16 May 2009, he celebrated the 500,000-follower mark: "Bless my soul 500k followers. And I love you all. Well, all except that silly one. And that's not you." Fry wields a considerable amount of influence through his use of Twitter.   He is frequently asked to promote various charities and causes, often inadvertently causing their websites to crash because of the volume of traffic generated by his large number of followers; as Fry notes on his website: "Four thousand hits a second all diving down the pipeline at the same time for minutes on end."  Fry uses his influence to recommend underexposed musicians and authors (who often see large increases in web hits and sales)   and to raise awareness of contemporary issues in the world of media and politics, notably the dropping of an injunction against The Guardian   and the lambasting of Daily Mail columnist Jan Moir over her article on the death of Boyzone member Stephen Gately.   In October 2009 Fry again sparked debate amongst users when he announced his intention to leave the social networking site after criticism from another user on Twitter. He retracted the intention the next day.  In October 2010, Fry left Twitter for a few days following press criticism of a quote taken from an interview he had given, with a farewell message of "Bye bye". After returning, Fry explained that he had left Twitter to "avoid being sympathised with or told about an article I would otherwise never have got wind of".  In some quarters the general methods Fry uses on Twitter have been criticised.   In November 2009 Fry's Twitter account reached one million followers. He commemorated the million followers milestone with a humorous video blog in which a 'Step Hen Fry' clone speaks from the year 2034 where MySpace, Facebook and Twitter have combined to form 'Twit on MyFace'.  In November 2010 Fry welcomed his two millionth follower with a blog entry detailing his opinions and experiences of Twitter.  On 11 March 2012, Fry noted his passing of the four million follower mark with a tweet: "Lordy I've breasted the 4 million followers tape. Love you all. Yes even YOU. But let's dedicate today to Douglas Adams's diamond jubilee". 
Acclaim
In 1995, Fry was presented with an honorary doctorate from the University of Dundee, which named their main Students' Association bar after his novel The Liar. Fry is a patron of its Lip Theatre Company.  He also served two consecutive terms – 1992 to 1995 and 1995 to 1998 – as the student-elected Rector of the University of Dundee. Such was his popularity, he was unopposed when he sought re-election to office in 1995, and by the time he completed his second term in office he had won the widespread admiration of the University's staff and students.        He was awarded the AoC Gold Award in 2004, and was entered into their hall of fame.  Fry was also awarded an honorary degree from Anglia Ruskin University in 2005.   He was made honorary president of the Cambridge University Quiz Society and honorary fellow of his alma mater Queens' College, Cambridge. On 13 July 2010, he was made an honorary fellow of Cardiff University  and on 28 January 2011 he was awarded an honorary doctorate at the University of Sussex for his work campaigning for people suffering from mental health problems, bipolar disorder and HIV. He is a Patron of the Norwich Playhouse theatre and a Vice President of The Noël Coward Society.  Fry was the last person to be named Pipe Smoker of the Year before the award was discontinued. In December 2006 he was ranked sixth for the BBC's Top Living Icon Award,  was featured on The Culture Show, and was voted Most Intelligent Man on Television by readers of Radio Times. The Independent on Sunday Pink List named Fry the second most influential gay person in Britain in May 2007; he had taken the twenty-third position on the list the previous year.  Later the same month he was announced as the 2007 Mind Champion of the Year    in recognition of the success of his documentary The Secret Life of a Manic Depressive in raising awareness of bipolar disorder. Fry was also nominated in "Best Entertainment Performance" for QI and "Best Factual Series" for Secret Life of the Manic Depressive at the 2007 British Academy Television Awards.  That same year, Broadcast magazine listed Fry at number four in its "Hot 100" list of influential on-screen performers, describing him as a polymath and a "national treasure".  He was also granted a lifetime achievement award at the British Comedy Awards on 5 December 2007  and the Special Recognition Award at the National Television Awards on 20 January 2010. BBC Four dedicated two nights of programming to Fry on 17 and 18 August 2007, in celebration of his 50th birthday. The first night, comprising programs featuring Fry, began with a sixty-minute documentary entitled Stephen Fry: 50 Not Out. The second night was composed of programmes selected by Fry, as well as a 60-minute interview with Mark Lawson and a half-hour special, Stephen Fry: Guilty.  The weekend programming proved such a ratings hit for BBC Four that it was repeated on BBC Two on 16 and 17 September 2007.In 2011, he was the subject of Molly Lewis's song An Open Letter to Stephen Fry, in which the singer jokingly offers herself as a surrogate mother for his child.  In February 2011, Fry was awarded the Outstanding Lifetime Achievement Award in Cultural Humanism by the Humanist Chaplaincy at Harvard University, the Harvard Secular Society and the American Humanist Association. 
Personal lifeFry struggled to keep his homosexuality secret during his teenage years at public school, and has claimed not to have engaged in sexual activity for 16 years from 1979 until 1995.   When asked when he first acknowledged his sexuality, Fry quipped: "I suppose it all began when I came out of the womb. I looked back up at my mother and thought to myself, 'That's the last time I'm going up one of those.'"    Fry was in a 14-year relationship with Daniel Cohen, which ended in 2010. "Stephen Fry dumps long-term partner for young actor as love life becomes Quite Interesting" Daily Mail 14 July 2010. Retrieved 14 July 2010.      Fry has stated that he is 90% homosexual, but has been attracted to women on occasion.  Fry has a home in London and another in Hollywood.  He also has a home near King's Lynn, Norfolk. When in London, he drives a dark green TX4 London cab.Fry was an active supporter of the Labour Party for many years, and appeared in a party political broadcast on its behalf with Hugh Laurie and Michelle Collins in November 1993. He did not vote in the 2005 General Election because of the stance of both the Labour and Conservative parties with regard to the Iraq War. Despite his praise of the Blair/Brown government's work on social reform, Fry has been critical of the Labour Party's "Third Way" concept. Fry appeared in literature to support changing the British electoral system from first-past-the-post to alternative vote for electing Members of Parliament to the House of Commons in the Alternative Vote referendum in 2011. He is on cordial terms with Prince Charles (despite a mild parody Fry performed in his role of King Charles I in the comedy programme Blackadder: The Cavalier Years), through his work with the Prince's Trust. He attended the Prince of Wales' and Camilla Parker Bowles' wedding in 2005. Fry is a friend of comedian and actor (and Blackadder co-star) Rowan Atkinson and was best man at Atkinson's wedding to Sunetra Sastry at the Russian Tea Room in New York City. Fry was a friend of British actor John Mills.  His best friend is Hugh Laurie,  whom he met while both were at Cambridge and with whom he has collaborated many times over the years. He was best man at Laurie's wedding and is godfather to all three of his children. A fan of cricket, Fry has claimed to be related to former England cricketer C.B. Fry,    and was interviewed for the Ashes Fever DVD, reporting on England's victory over Australia in the 2005 Ashes series. Regarding football, he is a supporter of Norwich City, and is a regular visitor to Carrow Road. He has been described as "deeply dippy for all things digital", claims to have bought the third Macintosh computer sold in the UK (his friend Douglas Adams bought the first two) and jokes that he has never encountered a smartphone that he has not bought.  He counts Wikipedia among his favourite websites "because I like to find out that I died, and that I'm currently in a ballet in China, and all the other very accurate and important things that Wikipedia brings us all." Fry has a long-standing interest in Internet production, including having his own website since 1997. His current site, The New Adventures of Mr Stephen Fry, has existed since 2002 and has attracted many visitors following his first blog in September 2007, which comprised a 6,500 word "blessay" on smartphones. In February 2008, Fry launched his private podcast series, Stephen Fry's Podgrams, and a forum, including discussions on depression and activities in which Fry is involved. The website content is created by Stephen Fry and produced by Andrew Sampson. Fry is also a supporter of GNU and the Free Software Foundation.  For the 25th anniversary of the GNU operating system, Fry appeared in a video explaining some of the philosophy behind GNU by likening it to the sharing found in science. On 30 April 2008, Fry signed an open letter, published in The Guardian newspaper by some well known Jewish personalities, stating their opposition to celebrating the 60th anniversary of the founding of the State of Israel.  Furthermore, he is a signatory member of the British Jews for Justice for Palestinians organisation, which campaigns for Palestinian rights.  Fry was among over 100 signatories to a statement published by Sense About Science on 4 June 2009, condemning British libel laws and their use to "severely curtail the right to free speech on a matter of public interest." 
Poland controversy On 6 October 2009, Fry was interviewed by Jon Snow on Channel 4 News  as a signatory of a letter to British Conservative Party leader David Cameron expressing concern about the party's relationship with Poland's opposition national conservative Law and Justice party in the European Parliament.  During the interview, he stated:
 
The remark prompted a complaint from the Polish Embassy in London, an editorial in The Economist and criticism from British Jewish historian David Cesarani.     Fry has since posted an apology in a six-page post on his personal blog, in which he stated: 
HealthFry has been diagnosed with bipolar disorder,  specifically stating he suffers from cyclothymia, referring to it as "bipolar lite".       He suffered a nervous breakdown in 1995 while appearing in a West End play called Cell Mates and subsequently walked out of the production, prompting its early closure and incurring the displeasure of co-star Rik Mayall and playwright Simon Gray. Mayall's comedy partner, Adrian Edmondson, made light of the subject in his and Mayall's second Bottom live show. After walking out of the production, Fry went missing for several days while contemplating suicide. He abandoned the idea and left the United Kingdom by ferry, eventually resurfacing in Belgium. Fry has spoken publicly about his experience with bipolar disorder, which was also depicted in the documentary Stephen Fry: The Secret Life of the Manic Depressive.   In the programme, he interviewed other sufferers of the illness including Carrie Fisher, Richard Dreyfuss and Tony Slattery. Also featured were chef Rick Stein, whose father committed suicide, Robbie Williams, who talks of his experience with major depression, and comedienne and former mental health nurse Jo Brand. He is also involved with the mental health charity Stand to Reason. In 2009, Fry lent his support to a campaign led by the human rights organisation Reprieve to prevent the execution of heroin trafficker Akmal Shaikh, a British citizen originally from Pakistan. Some of Shaikh's supporters have said he suffered from undiagnosed bipolar disorder. Despite calls for clemency, Shaikh was executed in the People's Republic of China for drug trafficking.   In January 2008, he broke his arm while filming Last Chance to See in Brazil.  He later explained in a podcast how the accident happened: while climbing aboard a boat, he slipped between it and the dock, and, while stopping himself from falling into the water, his body weight caused his right humerus to snap. The damage was more severe than first thought: the resulting vulnerability to his radial nerve – he was at risk of losing the use of his arm – was not diagnosed until he saw a consultant in the UK.  As the host of QI, Fry has stated that he is allergic to both champagne  and bumble bee stings. Appearing on Top Gear in 2009, Fry had lost a significant amount of weight, prompting host Jeremy Clarkson to ask jokingly, "Where's the rest of you?" Fry explained that he had shed a total of  , attributing the weight loss to doing a lot of walking while listening to downloaded Audiobooks.  Fry is between   and   in height.  
Views on religionFry has repeatedly expressed opposition to organised religion, and has identified himself as an atheist and humanist, while declaring some sympathy for the ancient Greek belief in capricious gods. In his first autobiography he wrote, "I knew I couldn't believe in God, because I was fundamentally Hellenic in my outlook." "   He has accepted that religion can have positive effects, "Sometimes belief means credulity, sometimes an expression of faith and hope which even the most sceptical atheist such as myself cannot but find inspiring." In 2009, The Guardian published a letter from Fry addressing his younger self, explaining how his future is soon to unfold, reflecting on the positive progression towards gay acceptance and openness around him, and yet not everywhere, while warning on how "the cruel, hypocritical and loveless hand of religion and absolutism has fallen on the world once more".  Later that year, he and Christopher Hitchens participated in an "Intelligence Squared" debate in which they argued against Ann Widdecombe and Archbishop John Onaiyekan, who supported the view that the Catholic Church was a force for good. Fry and Hitchens argued that the church did more harm than good. Fry attacked the Catholic Church's teachings on sexuality and denounced its wealth. In 2010 he was made a Distinguished Supporter of the British Humanist Association, stating: "it is essential to nail one’s colours to the mast as a humanist."  Later that year, Fry, along with 54 other public figures, signed an open letter published in The Guardian, stating their opposition to Pope Benedict XVI's visit to the United Kingdom being a state visit.  On 22 February 2011, Fry was presented with the Lifetime Achievement Award in Cultural Humanism by the Humanist Chaplaincy at Harvard University, joining a list of previous honorees including novelist Salman Rushdie, screenwriter Joss Whedon, and Mythbusters Adam Savage and Jamie Hyneman. 
BusinessIn 2008, Fry formed SamFry Ltd, with long-term collaborator Andrew Sampson, to produce and fund new material, as well as manage his official website. 
Bibliography

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


References 
External links

 
 
 
 
 

  
   
DEFAULTSORT




















































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Brian Mulroney
 
The Rt. Hon. Martin Brian Mulroney,   (born March 20, 1939) was the 18th Prime Minister of Canada from September 17, 1984 to June 25, 1993, and was leader of the Progressive Conservative Party of Canada from 1983 to 1993. His tenure as Prime Minister was marked by the introduction of major economic reforms, such as the Canada-U.S. Free Trade Agreement and the Goods and Services Tax, and the rejection of constitutional reforms such as the Meech Lake Accord and the Charlottetown Accord. Prior to his political career, he was a prominent lawyer and businessman in Montreal.
Early lifeMulroney was born on March 20, 1939, in Baie-Comeau, Quebec, a remote and isolated town in the eastern part of the province. He is the son of Irish Canadian Catholic parents, Mary Irene (née O'Shea) and Benedict Martin Mulroney,  who was a paper mill electrician. Six of the couple's children survived infancy. As there was no English-language Catholic high school in Baie-Comeau, Mulroney completed his high school education at a Roman Catholic boarding school in Chatham, New Brunswick operated by St. Thomas University (in 2001, St. Thomas University named its newest academic building in his honour). Benedict Mulroney worked overtime and ran a repair business to earn extra money for his children's education, and he encouraged his oldest son to attend university. Mulroney: The Politics of Ambition, by John Sawatsky, 1991 Mulroney would frequently tell stories about newspaper publisher Robert R. McCormick, whose company had founded Baie-Comeau. Mulroney would sing Irish songs for McCormick,  and the publisher would slip him $50.  He grew up speaking English and French fluently. Donaldson, p. 310. 
FamilyOn May 26, 1973, he married Mila Pivnički, the daughter of a Serbian doctor, Dimitrije Mita Pivnički, from Sarajevo.  The Mulroneys have four children: Caroline, Benedict (Ben), Mark and Nicolas. Ben is a CTV media personality and the most recent host of Canadian Idol. In 1991, Frank magazine ran a satirical ad for a contest inviting young Tories to "deflower Caroline Mulroney," the then-Prime Minister's oldest child. The magazine took the position that they were simply saying in a satirical fashion that Mulroney was using his daughter as an election campaign prop. Many groups and commentators joined Mulroney in denouncing the ad as an incitement to rape.  On September 16, 2000, Caroline Mulroney married Andrew Lapham, the son of magazine editor Lewis H. Lapham. Among the 400 guests were many dignitaries and business leaders, including former US President George H. W. Bush and Barbara Bush, Queen Noor of Jordan, Prince Alexander of Yugoslavia and his Greek-born wife Katherine, Galen Weston and Ontario Lieutenant-Governor Hilary Weston, U.S. television personality Kathie Lee Gifford, and media magnate Ted Rogers. Caroline Mulroney is currently associate director of the New York University's Center for Law and Business, having graduated from NYU with a law degree in 2001.  Mulroney is the grandfather of Lewis H. Lapham III, and twins Pierce Lapham and Elizabeth Theodora Lapham, and Miranda Brooke Lapham from daughter, Caroline, and twins Brian Gerald Alexander and John Benedict Dimitri by son Ben.
EducationMulroney had not been involved in politics at any level prior to entering St. Francis Xavier University in the fall of 1955 as a 16-year-old freshman. His political life began when he was recruited to the campus Progressive Conservative group by Lowell Murray and others, early in his first year. Murray would become a close friend, mentor, and adviser who was appointed to the Canadian Senate in 1979. Other important, lasting friendships made there by Mulroney included Gerald Doucet, Fred Doucet, Sam Wakim, and Patrick MacAdam. Mulroney enthusiastically embraced political organization, and assisted the local PC candidate in his successful 1956 Nova Scotia provincial election campaign; the PCs, led provincially by Robert Stanfield, swept to a surprise victory. Mulroney became a youth delegate and attended the 1956 leadership convention in Ottawa. While initially undecided, Mulroney was captivated by John Diefenbaker's powerful oratory and easy approachability. Mulroney joined the "Youth for Diefenbaker" committee which was led by Ted Rogers, a future scion of Canadian business. Mulroney struck an early friendship with Diefenbaker (who won the leadership) and received telephone calls from him. Mulroney won several public speaking contests at St. Francis Xavier, was a star member of the school's debating team, and never lost an interuniversity debate. He was also very active in campus politics, serving with distinction in several Model Parliaments, and was campus prime minister in a grandiose Maritimes-wide Model Parliament in 1958. Mulroney also assisted with the 1958 national election campaign at the local level in Nova Scotia; this led to the biggest majority in Canadian history.  After graduating from St. Francis Xavier with a degree in political science in 1959, Mulroney at first pursued a law degree from Dalhousie Law School in Halifax. It was around this time that Mulroney also cultivated friendships with the Tory premier of Nova Scotia, Robert Stanfield, and his chief adviser Dalton Camp. Mulroney significantly assisted with Stanfield's successful 1960 re-election campaign, in the role of an advance man. Mulroney neglected his studies, then fell seriously ill during the winter term, was hospitalized, and, despite getting extensions for several courses because of his illness, flunked out of Dalhousie his first year.  He then applied to Université Laval in Quebec City, and restarted first-year law there the next year.In Quebec City, Mulroney befriended future Quebec Premier Daniel Johnson, Sr, and frequented the provincial legislature, making connections with politicians, aides, and journalists. At Laval, Mulroney built a network of friends that would play a prominent role in Canadian politics for years to come,  including Lucien Bouchard, Bernard Roy, Michel Cogger, Michael Meighen, and Jean Bazin. During this time, Mulroney was still involved in the Conservative youth wing and was acquainted with the President of the Student Federation, Joe Clark. Mulroney secured a plum temporary appointment in Ottawa during the summer of 1962, as the executive assistant to Alvin Hamilton, minister of agriculture. Then a federal election was called, and Prime Minister Diefenbaker appointed Hamilton as the acting prime minister for the rest of the campaign. Hamilton took Mulroney with him on the campaign trail, where the young organizer gained valuable experience. 
Builds reputation, gains publicityAfter graduating from Laval in 1964, Mulroney joined the Montreal law firm now known as Ogilvy Renault, which at the time was the largest law firm in the Commonwealth of Nations. Mulroney twice failed his bar exams, but the firm kept him due to his charming personality.  After ultimately passing his bar exams, Mulroney was admitted to the Quebec bar in 1965, and became a labour lawyer, which was then a new and exciting field of law in Quebec. Mulroney's superb political skills of conciliation and negotiation, with opponents often polarized and at odds, proved ideal for this field. He was noted for ending several strikes along the Montreal waterfront where he met fellow lawyer W. David Angus, who would later become a valuable fundraiser for his campaigns.It was in 1966 that Dalton Camp, who was by then President of the Progressive Conservative Party, ran for re-election in what was widely believed to be a referendum on Diefenbaker's leadership. Diefenbaker had reached his 70th birthday in 1965. Mulroney joined with most of his generation in supporting Camp and opposing Diefenbaker, but due to his past friendship with Diefenbaker, he attempted to stay out of the spotlight. With Camp's narrow victory, Diefenbaker called for a 1967 leadership convention in Toronto. Mulroney joined with Joe Clark and others in supporting former Justice minister E. Davie Fulton. Once Fulton dropped off the ballot, Mulroney helped in swinging most of his organization over to Robert Stanfield, who won. Mulroney, then 28, would soon become a chief adviser to the new leader in Quebec.Mulroney's professional reputation was further enhanced when he ended a strike that was considered impossible to resolve at the Montreal newspaper La Presse. In doing so, Mulroney became friends with the paper's owner, Canadian business mogul Paul Desmarais. After his initial difficulties, Mulroney's reputation in his firm steadily increased, and he was made a partner in 1971. Mulroney's big break came during the Cliche Commission in 1974, Jim Lotz, Prime Ministers of Canada, Bison Books, 1987, p. 144.  which was set up by Quebec premier Robert Bourassa to investigate the situation at James Bay, Canada's largest hydroelectric project. Violence and dirty tactics had broken out as part of a union accreditation struggle. To ensure the commission was non-partisan, Bourassa, the Liberal premier, placed Robert Cliche, a former leader of the provincial New Democratic Party in charge. Cliche asked Mulroney, a Progressive Conservative and a former student of his, to join the commission. Mulroney asked Lucien Bouchard to join as counsel. The committee's unravellings, which showed Mafia infiltration of the unions, made Mulroney well known in Quebec, as the hearings were extensively covered in the media.  The Cliche Commission's report was largely adopted by the Bourassa government. A notable incident included the revelation that the controversy may have involved the office of the Premier of Quebec. Although Bouchard favoured calling in Robert Bourassa as a witness, Mulroney refused, deeming it a violation of 'executive privilege'.  Mulroney and Bourassa would later cultivate a friendship that would turn out to be extremely beneficial when Mulroney ran for re-election in 1988.
Loses first leadership race, 1975–76The Stanfield-led Progressive Conservatives lost the 1974 election to the Pierre Trudeau-led Liberals. Following the party's third consecutive loss, Stanfield decided to resign the leadership. Mulroney, despite never having run for elected office, was encouraged to run in the leadership race to replace Stanfield, and entered the contest. Mulroney and provincial rival Claude Wagner were both seen as potentially able to appeal to Quebec, which had supported the federal Liberals for decades. Ironically, it had been Mulroney who had played the lead role in recruiting Wagner to the PC party a few years earlier, and the two wound up as rivals for Quebec delegates, most of whom were snared by Wagner, who even blocked Mulroney from becoming a voting delegate.  In the leadership race, Mulroney would spend an estimated $500,000, at that time an incredible sum, far more than the other candidates. He earned the nickname 'Cadillac candidate'. At the 1976 leadership convention, Mulroney placed second on the first ballot behind Wagner. However, his expensive campaign, slick image, lack of parliamentary experience, and vague policy positions did not endear him to many delegates, and he was unable to build upon his base support, being overtaken by eventual winner Joe Clark on the second ballot. Mulroney was the only one of the eleven leadership candidates who did not provide full financial disclosure on his campaign expenses, and his campaign finished deeply in debt.  Following the convention, Mulroney turned down the offer of a shadow cabinet portfolio in Clark's caucus.
Successful business executiveMulroney took the job of Executive Vice President of the Iron Ore Company of Canada, a joint subsidiary of three major U.S. steel corporations. Mulroney earned a lucrative salary, well into the six-figure range. In 1977, he was appointed company President. He instituted improved labour relations, drawing upon his labour law experience, and, with commodity prices on the rise, company profits soared during the next several years. Mulroney in 1983 successfully negotiated the closing of the Schefferville mine, winning a generous settlement for the affected workers.  Under his leadership, the company was sold off to foreign interests. In the wake of his loss in the 1976 leadership race, Mulroney battled alcohol abuse and depression for several years; he credits his loyal wife Mila with helping him recover from that dark period. In 1979, he completely quit drinking. During his IOC term, he made liberal use of the company's executive jet, frequently flying business associates and friends on fishing trips.  Mulroney also maintained and expanded his extensive political networking among business leaders and conservatives across the country. As his business reputation grew, he was invited onto several corporate boards. He turned down an offer to run in a Quebec by-election as a federal Liberal.
Party leaderBy late 1982, Joe Clark's leadership of the Progressive Conservatives was being questioned in many party circles and among many Tory members of Parliament, despite his solid national lead over Prime Minister Pierre Trudeau in opinion polls, which stretched to 19 percent in summer 1982. Clark's reputation as a leader had taken a beating when, as Prime Minister, he carelessly lost a non-confidence motion over his minority government's budget in December 1979, leading to the fall of his government; the PCs subsequently lost the federal election held two months later when Trudeau rescinded his announced retirement, and returned to lead the Liberals to a majority. Many Tories were also annoyed with Clark over his slowness in dispensing patronage appointments after he became prime minister in June 1979.

Mulroney, in spite of publicly endorsing Clark, organized behind the scenes to defeat Clark at the party's leadership review. Clark's key Quebec organizer Rodrigue Pageau was in fact a double agent, working for Mulroney, undermining Clark's support.  When Clark received an endorsement by only 66.9 per cent of delegates at the party convention in January 1983 in Winnipeg, Clark resigned and ran to regain his post at the 1983 leadership convention. Mulroney, despite still not being a member of Parliament, ran against him again, and he campaigned more shrewdly than he had done seven years before. Mulroney had been criticized in 1976 for lacking policy depth and substance. He addressed that weakness by making several major speeches across the country in the early 1980s, and collected them into a book, Where I Stand, published in 1983.  Mulroney also avoided most of the flash of his earlier campaign, for which he had been criticized. Mulroney was elected party leader on June 11, 1983, beating Clark on the fourth ballot. He attracted broad support from the many factions of the party and especially from representatives of his native Quebec. Two months later, Mulroney entered Parliament as the MP for Central Nova in Nova Scotia, winning a by-election in what was then considered a safe Tory seat after Elmer MacKay stood down in his favour. This is standard practice in most parliamentary systems.Throughout his political career, Mulroney's fluency in English and French, with Quebec roots in both cultures, gave him two trumps which eventually proved decisive. Because of health problems shortly after becoming party leader, Mulroney quit smoking in 1983.By the start of 1984, the Tories had taken a substantial lead in opinion polling, as Mulroney began learning the realities of parliamentary life in the House of Commons. It was almost taken for granted that Trudeau would be heavily defeated by Mulroney in the general election due no later than 1985. Trudeau announced his retirement in February, and the Liberal Party chose John Turner, previously the Minister of Finance under Trudeau in the 1970s, as its new leader. The Liberals then surged in the polls, to take a lead, after trailing by more than 20 percentage points. Only four days after being sworn in as Prime Minister, Turner called a general election for September. In doing so, he had to postpone a planned Canadian summer visit by Queen Elizabeth II, who makes it her policy to not travel abroad during foreign election campaigns. But the Liberal election campaign machinery was in disarray, leading to a weak campaign. The campaign is best remembered for Mulroney's attacks of a raft of Liberal patronage appointments. In his final days in office, Trudeau had controversially appointed a flurry of Senators, judges, and executives on various governmental and crown corporation boards, widely seen as a way to offer "plum jobs" to loyal members of the Liberal Party. Upon assuming office, Turner, who had been out of politics for nine years while he earned a lucrative salary as a Toronto lawyer, showed that his political instincts had diminished. Turner had been under pressure to cancel the appointments, but chose not to, and instead proceeded to appoint several more Liberals to prominent political offices, per a signed, legal agreement with Trudeau. Ironically, Turner had planned to attack Mulroney over the patronage machine that the latter had set up in anticipation of victory. In a televised leaders' debate, Turner launched what appeared to be the start of a blistering attack on Mulroney by comparing his patronage machine to that of the old Union Nationale in Quebec. However, Mulroney successfully turned the tables by pointing to the recent raft of Liberal patronage appointments. Newman, pp. 71–72.  He demanded that Turner apologize to the country for making "these horrible appointments." Turner replied that "I had no option" except to let the appointments stand. Mulroney famously responded:

"You had an option, sir. You could have said, 'I am not going to do it. This is wrong for Canada, and I am not going to ask Canadians to pay the price.' You had an option, sir--to say 'no' — and you chose to say 'yes' to the old attitudes and the old stories of the Liberal Party." 

Turner froze and wilted under this withering riposte from Mulroney.  He could repeat only, "I had no option." A visibly angry Mulroney called this "an avowal of failure" and "a confession of non-leadership." The exchange led most papers the next day, with most of them paraphrasing Mulroney's counterattack as "You had an option, sir--you could have said 'no.'" Many observers believe that at this point, Mulroney assured himself of becoming prime minister. In September, Mulroney and the Tories won the largest majority government in Canadian history. They took 211 seats, three more than their previous record in 1958. The Liberals won only 40 seats, their worst performance ever at the time. At the time, it was also the worst defeat for a governing party at the federal level in Canada. The Conservatives won just over half of the popular vote (compared to 53.4 percent in 1958) and led in every province, emerging as a national party for the first time since 1958. Especially important was the Tories' performance in Mulroney's home province, Quebec. The Tories had only won the most seats in that province only once since 1896--the 1958 Tory landslide. However, largely due to anger at Trudeau and Mulroney's promise of a new deal for Quebec, the province swung over dramatically to support him. The Tories had only won one seat out of 75 in 1980, but took 58 seats in 1984. Mulroney himself yielded Central Nova back to MacKay to run in the eastern Quebec riding of Manicouagan, which included Baie-Comeau.In 1984, the Canadian Press named Mulroney "Newsmaker of the Year" for the second straight year, making him only the second prime minister to have received the honor both before becoming prime minister and when prime minister (the other being Lester Pearson).
Prime minister
First term
The 1984 federal election resulted in the first Conservative majority government in 26 years—and only the second in 54 years—initially seemed to give Mulroney a very formidable position. The Tories had won just over half the popular vote, and no other party crossed the 50-seat mark. On paper, he was free to take Canada in any direction he wanted. However, his position was far more precarious than his parliamentary majority would suggest. His support was based on a "grand coalition" of socially conservative populists from the West, Quebec nationalists, and fiscal conservatives from Ontario and Atlantic Canada. Such diverse interests became difficult for Mulroney to juggle.He attempted to appeal to the Western provinces, whose earlier support had been critical to his electoral success, by cancelling the National Energy Program and including a large number of Westerners in his Cabinet (including Clark as minister of external affairs). However, he was not completely successful, even aside from economic and constitutional policy. For example, he moved CF-18 servicing from Manitoba to Quebec in 1986, even though the Manitoba bid was lower and the company was better rated,  and received death threats for exerting pressure on Manitoba over French language rights. Newman, p. 427. Many of Mulroney's ministers had little government experience, resulting in conflicts of interest and embarrassing scandals. Many Tories expected patronage appointments due to the long time out of government.  Indeed, Mulroney made a number of unscripted gaffes regarding patronage, including the reference to Ambassador Bryce Mackasey as "there's no whore like an old whore". Hamovitch, Eric, Rae Murphy, Robert Chodos. Selling Out: Four Years of the Mulroney Government, 1988. Page 115.  The new Prime Minister's handlers were concerned by his seeming unpredictability and rumours of drinking.
One of Mulroney's main priorities, at least publicly, was to lower the deficit, which was running into the billions of dollars. However, the country's debt increased substantially through his term. His attempts to reduce spending limited his ability to deliver on many promises. Also impeding his progress was the Senate, where the Liberals had a large majority due to their previous long tenure in power. Led by Allan MacEachen, the Senate took a very assertive role in legislation, forcing the government to compromise on several points despite its considerable House majority.A major undertaking by Mulroney's government was an attempt to resolve the divisive issue of national unity. Quebec was the only province that did not sign the new Canadian constitution negotiated by Prime Minister Pierre Trudeau in 1982, and Mulroney wanted to include Quebec in a new agreement with the rest of Canada. In 1987, he negotiated the Meech Lake Accord with the provincial premiers, a package of constitutional amendments designed to satisfy Quebec's demand for recognition as a "distinct society" within Canada, and to devolve some powers to the provinces.Another of Mulroney's priorities was the privatization of many of Canada's crown corporations. In 1984, the Government of Canada held 61 different crown corporations.  It sold off 23 of them. Air Canada was completely privatized by 1989, although the Air Canada Public Participation Act  continued to make certain requirements of the airline. Petro-Canada was later privatized.The Air India Flight 182 bombing, which originated in Montreal, happened during Mulroney's first term. This is considered to be the largest terrorist act before September 11, 2001, with the majority of the 329 victims being Canadian citizens. Mulroney sent a letter of condolence to then Indian Prime Minister Rajiv Gandhi, which sparked an uproar in Canada since he did not call families of the actual victims to offer condolences. Gandhi replied that he should be the one providing condolences to Mulroney, given that the majority of victims were Canadian or lived in Canada. Many Indo-Canadians considered this to be a racist act because they felt Mulroney did not consider them to be true Canadian citizens as they were not of European descent.  Furthermore, there were several warnings from the Indian government to the Mulroney government about terrorist threats towards Air India flights. Questions remain as to why these warnings were not taken more seriously and whether the events leading to the bombing could have been prevented.    A public inquiry into the Air India bombing is currently underway to answer some of these questions.Mulroney's government opposed the apartheid regime in South Africa. Mulroney met with many opposition leaders throughout his ministry. His position put him at odds with the American and British governments, but also won him respect elsewhere. Also, external affairs minister Joe Clark was the first foreign affairs minister to land in previously isolated Ethiopia to lead the Western response to the 1984–1985 famine in Ethiopia; Clark landed in Addis Ababa so quickly he had not even seen the initial CBC report that had created the initial and strong public reaction. Canada's response was overwhelming and led the US and Britain to follow suit almost immediately — an unprecedented situation in foreign affairs at that time, since Ethiopia had a Marxist regime and had previously been isolated by Western governments.The government took a strong stand against the U.S. intervention in Nicaragua under Reagan, and accepted refugees from El Salvador, Guatemala, and other countries with regimes supported directly by the Reagan administration.Near the end of his first term, Mulroney gave a formal apology and a $300 million compensation package to the families of the 22,000 Japanese Canadians who had been divested of their property and interned during World War II.During his tenure as prime minister, Brian Mulroney's close relationship with U.S. President Ronald Reagan helped result in both a landmark treaty on acid rain and the ratification of a free-trade treaty with the United States under which all tariffs between the two countries would be eliminated by 1998.Critics noted that Mulroney had originally professed opposition to free trade during the 1983 leadership campaign. Donaldson, p. 334.  This agreement was controversial, and the Senate demanded an election before proceeding on voting, although Mulroney planned on calling an election before the treaty had been signed. The free trade was the central issue of the 1988 election, with the Liberals and NDP opposing it. With the Liberals gaining the initial momentum, a successful counterattack by Allan Gregg resulted in the PCs being re-elected with a solid but reduced majority and 43 percent of the popular vote. Mulroney thus became the only Conservative to lead his party to two consecutive majority governments in peacetime during the 20th century. In this election, Mulroney was elected as the MP for Charlevoix, which included Baie-Comeau after redistribution of the electoral boundaries.On election day, November 21, 1988, Mulroney made a controversial order in council which allowed the establishment of the AMEX Bank of Canada (owned by American Express).
Second term 
Mulroney's second term was marked by an economic recession. He proposed the introduction of a national sales tax, the Goods and Services Tax (GST), in 1989. When it was introduced in 1991, it replaced the Manufacturers' Sales Tax (MST) that had previously been applied at the wholesale level on goods manufactured in Canada. A bitter Senate battle ensued, and many polls showed that as many as 80% of Canadians were opposed to the tax. Mulroney had to use Section 26 (the Deadlock Clause), a little known Constitutional provision, allowing him in an emergency situation to ask the Queen to appoint 8 new Senators. Although the government argued that the tax was not a tax increase, but a tax shift, the highly visible nature of the tax was extremely unpopular, and many resented Mulroney's use of an "emergency" clause in the constitution.The Meech Lake Accord also met its doom in 1990. It was not ratified by the provincial governments of Manitoba and Newfoundland before the June ratification deadline. This failure sparked a revival of Quebec separatism,  and led to another round of meetings in Charlottetown in 1991 and 1992. These negotiations culminated in the Charlottetown Accord, which outlined extensive changes to the constitution, including recognition of Quebec as a distinct society. However, the agreement was overwhelmingly defeated in a national referendum in October 1992. Many blamed the GST battle and Mulroney's unpopularity for the fall of the Accord.In 1990 Mulroney nominated Ray Hnatyshyn, an MP from Saskatoon and a former Cabinet minister, to be Governor General (1990–1995).The worldwide recession of the early 1990s significantly damaged the government's financial situation. Mulroney's inability to improve the government's finances, as well as his use of tax increases to deal with it, were major factors in alienating the western conservative portion of his power base. At the same time, the Bank of Canada began to raise interest rates in order to meet a zero inflation target; the experiment was regarded as a failure that exacerbated the effect of the recession in Canada. Annual budget deficits ballooned to record levels, reaching $42 billion in his last year of office. These deficits grew the national debt dangerously close to the psychological benchmark of 100% of GDP, further weakening the Canadian dollar and damaging Canada's international credit rating.Mulroney supported the United Nations coalition during the 1991 Gulf War and when the UN authorized full use of force in the operation, Canada sent a CF-18 squadron with support personnel and a field hospital to deal with casualties from the ground war as well as a company of The Royal Canadian Regiment to safeguard these ground elements. In August he sent the destroyers HMCS Terra Nova and HMCS Athabaskan to enforce the trade blockade against Iraq. The supply ship HMCS Protecteur was also sent to aid the gathering coalition forces. When the air war began, Canada's planes were integrated into the coalition force and provided air cover and attacked ground targets. This was the first time since the fighting on Cyprus in 1974 that Canadian forces participated directly in combat operations.For the Canadian Forces, the Mulroney years began with hope but ended with disappointment. Most members of the CF welcomed the return to distinctive uniforms for the three services, replacing the single green uniform worn since unification (1967–70). A White Paper proposed boosting the CF's combat capability, which had, according to Canadian Defence Quarterly, declined so badly that Canada would have been unable to send a brigade to the Gulf War had it desired to. The CF in this period did undergo a much-needed modernization of a range of equipment from trucks to a new family of small arms. Many proposed reforms, however, failed to occur, and according to historian J.L. Granatstein, Mulroney "raised the military's hopes repeatedly, but failed to deliver." In 1984, he had promised to increase the military budget and the regular force to 92,000 troops, but the budget was cut and the troop level fell to below 80,000 by 1993. This was, however, in step with other NATO countries after the end of the Cold War.  The Mulroney government undertook a defence policy review, publishing a new statement in late 1991, but political considerations meant that no comprehensive policy for the post-Cold War era was arrived at before the government's defeat in 1993. According to Granatstein, this meant that Canada was not able to live up to its post-Cold War military commitments.The decline of cod stocks in Atlantic Canada led the Mulroney government to impose a moratorium on the cod fishery there, putting an end to a large portion of the Newfoundland fishing industry, and causing serious economic hardship. The government instituted various programmes designed to mitigate these effects but still became deeply unpopular in the Atlantic provinces.The environment was a key focus of Mulroney's government, as Canada became the first industrialized country to ratify both the biodiversity convention and the climate change convention agreed to at the UN Conference on the Environment. His government added significant new national parks (Bruce Peninsula, South Moresby, and Grasslands), and passed the Canadian Environmental Assessment Act and Canadian Environmental Protection Act.
RetirementWidespread public resentment of the Goods and Services Tax, an economic slump, the dilapidation of his political coalition, and his lack of results regarding the Quebec situation caused Mulroney's popularity to decline considerably during his second term. An ominous sign was a 1989 by-election in the Alberta riding of Beaver River. In this election, called when Tory MP John Dahmer died, Reform Party candidate Deborah Grey won by a hefty 4,200 votes after finishing fourth in the general election just five months earlier. This turned out to be the first sign that Mulroney's grand coalition was coming apart at the seams; the PCs had dominated Alberta's federal politics since the 1968 election. Another sign came after the failure of Meech Lake, when Bouchard and several other Tories broke with the party to form the Bloc Québécois, a pro-sovereigntist (i.e. independentist) party.Mulroney entered 1993 facing a statutory general election (under Canadian law, Canadian federal governments can have a maximum duration of five years, but they often have lesser duration as they must enjoy the confidence of the Parliament of Canada in order to continue to exist). By this time, his approval ratings had dipped into the teens, and were at 11% in a 1992 Gallup poll, making him one of the most unpopular prime ministers since opinion polling began in Canada in the 1940s.  When Mulroney announced he was stepping aside as leader of the party, his standing was 21% in the latest Gallup Poll in February 1993.  The consensus was that Mulroney would be heavily defeated by Jean Chrétien and the Liberals if he led the Tories into the next election—ironically, the same situation that led to Trudeau's departure from the scene nine years earlier. He announced his retirement from politics in February and was replaced as Prime Minister by Defence Minister Kim Campbell in June.In his final days in office, Mulroney made several decisions that hampered the Tory campaign later that year. He took a lavish international "farewell" tour  mostly at taxpayers' expense, without transacting any official business. Also, by the time he handed power to Campbell, there were only two-and-a-half months left in the Tories' five-year mandate. Mulroney also did not immediately vacate 24 Sussex Drive after Campbell was sworn in as Prime Minister—as their new private residence in Montreal was still undergoing renovations, Brian and Mila Mulroney did not move out of 24 Sussex until their new home was ready. Instead, Campbell took up residence at Harrington Lake, the Prime Minister's official summer retreat.The 1993 election was an unmitigated disaster for the Tories. The oldest party in Canada was reduced from a 151-seat majority to two seats in the worst defeat ever suffered for a governing party at the federal level. The Progressive Conservatives were no longer recognized as a political party in the House of Commons, since the required minimum number of seats for official party status is 12. The 149-seat loss far exceeded the 95-seat loss the Liberals suffered in 1984. As an example of the antipathy toward Mulroney, his former riding fell to the Bloc by a lopsided margin; the Tory candidate finished a distant third, with only 6,800 votes—just a few votes shy of losing his electoral deposit.  In her memoirs, Time and Chance, and in her response in the National Post to The Secret Mulroney Tapes, Campbell stated that Mulroney left her with almost no time to salvage the Progressive Conservatives' tattered reputation once the bounce from the leadership convention wore off. Campbell went as far as to claim that Mulroney knew the Tories would be defeated regardless of who led them into the election, and wanted a "scapegoat who would bear the burden of his unpopularity" rather than a true successor.
Airbus/Schreiber affair 
In 1997, Mulroney settled a libel lawsuit he had brought against the Government of Canada two years previously. Mulroney received an apology and a $2.1 million reimbursement for legal and public relations costs. At issue were allegations that Mulroney had accepted bribes in the "Airbus affair" concerning government contracts. The government said the charges could not be substantiated. The principal Royal Canadian Mounted Police (RCMP) investigator on the case retired a year later. The government later dropped the investigation entirely.But a key fact was unknown in 1997, and had not been elicited under sworn testimony in which Mulroney had denied business dealings or significant meetings with a business associate: Mulroney later confirmed that he had personally accepted cash payments from his business associate Karlheinz Schreiber, a German-Canadian businessman who had been a paid broker for Airbus and other companies. The cash changed hands in three secret meetings in hotels in Montreal and New York City, in brown paper bags of $1000 bills totaling either $225,000 (according to Mulroney) or $300,000 (according to Schrieber). The payments occurred over an 18-month period, beginning in 1993 when Mulroney had stepped down as Prime Minister but was still a member of Parliament. In 2007, Mulroney stated that he had kept the cash paid in New York in a New York safety deposit box (thus implying that he had not illegally carried it undeclared across the US-Canada border) and in a safe in his Montreal home. The cash payments had not then been declared as income for tax purposes.Schreiber had at his disposal $20 million from Airbus for the payment of secret commissions. CBC Television reported on February 8, 2006  that the money Schreiber paid to Mulroney originated in a Swiss bank account code-named "Frankfurt". Schreiber used the same account to pay the secret Airbus commissions. Schreiber transferred $500,000 from "Frankfurt" to an account in Zürich code-named "Britan" on July 26, 1993 and used these funds to make the three cash payments to Mulroney in 1993 and 1994.Five years after the payments began, Mulroney and Schreiber met again in a suite at the Hotel Savoy in Zurich, Switzerland. Schreiber claims Mulroney tried to extract a promise: Schreiber would never reveal the payments. Schreiber also claims Mulroney's attorneys later tried to induce him into perjury by asking that he sign an affidavit falsely stating that he had never paid any money to Mulroney. Mulroney denies this, and also denies Schreiber's claim that the payments totaled $300,000.Testifying before the House of Commons Ethics Committee on December 13, 2007, Mulroney said the cash payments were for lobbying foreign leaders to buy armored vehicles from Thyssen industries, a company Schreiber represented. Mulroney said Schreiber had paid him as a consultant for this task only, in the context of the potential Bear Head project, which had actually been canceled three years prior to his accepting payment. Mulroney said he never had a written contract, made written reports, or issued receipts for the cash payments. Mulroney said he had destroyed records related to the transactions and received the payments in cash at Schreiber's insistence. Mulroney denied any legal wrongdoing. He admitted only to errors in judgment and apologized for the appearance of impropriety. Mulroney described the affair as "a near death experience" and said his family had suffered greatly.For many years, Mulroney had not acknowledged receiving money from Schreiber. The payments were not disclosed in Mulroney's 1995 lawsuit against the Government of Canada. Mulroney had falsely testified under oath that he "never had any dealings" with Schreiber, knew him only "peripherally" and they had a cup of coffee "once or twice." In his 2004 book A Secret Trial, former law professor William Kaplan describes Mulroney's testimony as evasive, incomplete and misleading.In his testimony, Schreiber made allegations that described "...a Canadian party leader subverted and deposed by foreign interests, of federal contracts being used to funnel money back to those interests, of bid-rigging and kickbacks." Mulroney and Schreiber question each other's truthfulness and credibility. In his testimony to the Canadian House of Commons Ethics Committee on December 13, 2007, Mulroney pointed out contradictory statements Schreiber has made over the years, including statements made under oath. Mulroney also stated that the work he had performed for his arms-trading business associate Schreiber was out-of-country, rather than lobbying his own Canadian government – such as lobbying the late President Boris Yeltsin that Russia buy arms yet to be made in Canada. Schreiber had been incarcerated in Canada following his 1999 arrest on a German warrant for tax evasion, and is currently (June 2008) free on bail. Mulroney did not declare the income or pay taxes on it until years later, when Schreiber had come under criminal investigation in Germany. Erik Nielsen, former Deputy Prime Minister for Mulroney, stated disbelief in Mulroney's account, and denied his credibility: "I think there was a phrase that attached to Brian years ago where he was known as Lyin' Brian, and for my own part, I believe that they're both in the same boat — Schreiber and Mulroney." Canadian Prime Minister Stephen Harper had called a public inquiry in November 2007, and appointed future Governor General David Lloyd Johnston as a special adviser, to study the matter and prepare terms of reference for the inquiry. Johnston had once reported directly to Mulroney during his term as prime minister. Johnston reported to Harper on January 11, 2008 that he had found 16 significant questions which required further examination. Harper accepted the report, and stated that a limited public inquiry process would begin once the House of Commons Ethics Committee finished its work. Schreiber lost his fight against extradition to Germany, where he is at the center of a political bribery scandal that helped bring down a government and damaged the legacy of former Chancellor Helmut Kohl. He appeared before the House of Commons Ethics Committee three times in late November and early December 2007, and again in February 2008, and will likely be called upon to testify at the future limited public inquiry. Mulroney appeared before the Ethics Committee on December 13, 2007. Six weeks later, his lawyers submitted a letter to Paul Szabo, the Ethics Committee chairman, indicating that their client would not appear again before the committee because of his "unfair" treatment on December 13.  On February 26, 2008, two days before that scheduled appearance, CTV News reported that Mr. Mulroney's lawyer had reiterated Mulroney's refusal to reappear before the Committee. 
After politicsSince leaving office, Mulroney has served as an international business consultant and remains a partner with the law firm Ogilvy Renault. He currently sits on the board of directors of multiple corporations, including Barrick Gold, Quebecor Inc., Archer Daniels Midland, TrizecHahn Corp. (Toronto), Cendant Corp. (New York), AOL Latin America, Inc. (New York) and Cognicase Inc. (Montreal). He is a senior counselor to Hicks, Muse, Tate & Furst, a global private equity fund in Dallas, chairman of Forbes Global (New York), and was a paid consultant and lobbyist for Karl-Heinz Schreiber beginning in 1993. He is also chairman of various international advisory boards and councils for many international companies, including Power Corp. (Montreal), Bombardier (Montreal), the China International Trust and Investment Corp. (Beijing), J.P. Morgan Chase and Co. (New York), Violy, Byorum and Partners (New York), VS&A Communications Partners (New York), Independent Newspapers (Dublin) and General Enterprise Management Services Limited (British Virgin Islands). In 1998, Mulroney was accorded Canada's highest civilian honour when he was made a Companion of the Order of Canada.
In 2003, Mulroney received the Woodrow Wilson Award for Public Service from the Woodrow Wilson International Center for Scholars of the Smithsonian Institution at a ceremony in Montreal. The award was in recognition of his career in politics.In January 2004, Mulroney delivered a keynote speech in Washington, D.C. celebrating the tenth anniversary of the North American Free Trade Agreement. In June 2004, Mulroney presented a eulogy for former U.S. President Ronald Reagan during the latter's state funeral. Mulroney and former British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher were the first foreign dignitaries to eulogize at a funeral for an American president. Two years later, at the request of Prime Minister Stephen Harper, Mulroney traveled to Washington, DC along with Michael Wilson, Canada's ambassador to the United States, as Canada's representatives at the state funeral of former president Gerald Ford.In February 2005, Mulroney was diagnosed with a lesion on one of his lungs. In his youth, Mulroney had been a heavy smoker. He underwent successful surgery and was recovered well enough to tape a speech for the Conservative Party of Canada's 2005 Policy Convention in Montreal in March, though he could not attend in person. Though his surgery was initially reported to have gone on without incident, he later developed pancreatitis and he remained in hospital for several weeks. It was not until April 19 that his son, Ben Mulroney, announced he was recovering and would soon be released.On September 12, 2005, veteran writer and former Mulroney confidant Peter C. Newman released The Secret Mulroney Tapes: Unguarded Confessions of a Prime Minister. Based in large part on remarks from the former prime minister which Newman had taped with Mulroney's knowledge, the book set off national controversy. Newman had been given unfettered access to Mulroney for a thorough biography, and claims Mulroney did not honour an agreement to allow him access to confidential papers.  After the falling out, Mulroney began work on his autobiography, without Newman's help. Mulroney himself has declared that he showed poor judgement in making such unguarded statements, but he says that he will have to live with it.This led Mulroney to respond at the annual Press Gallery Dinner, which is noted for comedic moments, in Ottawa, October 22, 2005. The former Prime Minister appeared on tape and very formally acknowledged the various dignitaries and audience groups before delivering the shortest speech of the night: "Peter Newman: Go fuck yourself. Thank you ladies and gentlemen, and good night." Thirteen years after leaving office, Mulroney was named the "greenest" Prime Minister in Canadian history by a 12-member panel at an event organized by Corporate Knights magazine. On June 15, 2007, the University of Western Ontario awarded Brian Mulroney an honorary Doctor of Laws degree (LLD). 
Current political affiliationMulroney joined the Conservative Party of Canada following its creation in 2003 by the merger of the Progressive Conservatives and the Canadian Alliance. According to press reports his membership lapsed in 2006. In early 2009, Mulroney "called a high-ranking person in the party and asked that his name be removed from all party lists" due to his anger at the continued inquiry into his financial affairs,  although he denies this claim. 
LegacyMulroney's legacy is complicated and even emotional. Mulroney makes the case that his once radical policies on the economy and free trade were not reversed by subsequent governments, and regards this as vindication.  His Deputy Prime Minister Don Mazankowski said that his greatest accomplishment will be seen as, "Dragging Canada kicking and screaming into the 21st century." Mulroney's legacy in Canada is associated mostly with the 1988 Free Trade Agreement  and the Goods and Services Tax (GST).Although the Tories were re-elected in 1988 campaigning on free trade, they won with only 43% of the popular vote, compared to 56% of the vote which went to the Liberals and the New Democratic Party who campaigned mostly against the agreement. However, when the Liberals under Jean Chrétien came to office in 1993 promising to re-negotiate key parts of the agreement, they continued the deal with only slight changes, and signed the North American Free Trade Agreement which expanded the free trade area to include Mexico.The visibility of the GST proved to be very unpopular. The GST was created to help eliminate the ever-growing deficit and to replace the hidden Manufacturer's sales tax, which Mulroney argued was hurting business. Mulroney's usage of a rare Constitutional clause to push the tax through,  prices not falling very much with the MST removed, and the "in your face" nature of the tax infuriated politicians and the public. The succeeding Liberal government of Jean Chrétien campaigned in 1993 on a promise to eliminate the GST (as per the Red Book), but ultimately backed away from that promise. This prompted two of their members Sheila Copps and John Nunziata to resign or be expelled in protest. Mulroney's supporters argue that the GST helped the subsequent government eliminate the deficit, and that the visible nature of the tax kept politicians more accountable.Mulroney's intense unpopularity at the time of his resignation led many Conservative politicians to distance themselves from him for some years. His government had flirted with 10 percent approval ratings in the early 1990s, when Mulroney's honesty and intentions were frequently questioned in the media, by Canadians in general and by his political colleagues.  During the 1993 election, the Progressive Conservative Party was reduced to just two seats, which was seen as partially due to a backlash against Mulroney, as well as due to the fracturing of his "Grand Coalition".Social conservatives found fault with Mulroney's government in a variety of areas. These include Mulroney's opposition to capital punishment  and an attempted compromise on abortion.  Fiscal conservatives likewise didn't appreciate his tax increases and his failure to curtail expansion of "big government" programs and political patronage.In the 1993 election, nearly all of the Tories' Western support transferred into Reform, which replaced the PCs as the major right-wing force in Canada. The Tories only won two seats west of Quebec in the next decade and recovered only upon reunification the elements that had split from the party in the late 1980s. The Canadian right was not reunited until they merged with Reform's successor, the Canadian Alliance, in December 2003 to form the new Conservative Party of Canada. Mulroney played an influential role by supporting the merger at a time when former PC leaders Joe Clark, Jean Charest and Kim Campbell either opposed it or expressed ambivalence.Military historians Norman Hillmer and J.L. Granatstein ranked Mulroney eighth among Canada's prime ministers in their 1999 book Prime Ministers: Ranking Canada's Leaders.On March 31, 2009 it was reported by various news outlets that a Conservative official claimed Mulroney was no longer a member of the party. They claimed his membership expired in 2006 and was not renewed. Additionally, Mulroney allegedly "called a senior party official two months ago to ask that his name be pulled off all party lists and materials and that communications with him cease." However, A Mulroney confidante, speaking on condition of anonymity, called the party's claims preposterous. 'He's part of the history of this party, you can't rewrite history. If they're worried about branding, then shut the inquiry down. They're the ones who called the inquiry.' " 
Memoir
Mulroney's Memoirs: 1939-1993 was released on September 10, 2007. Mulroney criticizes Trudeau for avoiding military service in World War II, and favourably references sources that describe the young Trudeau as holding anti-Semitic nationalist views and having an admiration for fascist dictators.   Tom Axworthy, a prominent Liberal strategist, responded that Trudeau should be judged on his mature views. Historian and former MP and Trudeau biographer John English said "I don't think it does any good to do this kind of historical ransacking to try to destroy reputations".  
HonoursAccording to Canadian protocol, as a former Prime Minister, he is styled "The Right Honourable" for life.

Companion of the Order of Canada
GC of the National Order of Quebec
Grand Cross with Collar of the Order of Kniaz Yaroslav the Wise (Ukraine) 
Grand Cordon of the Order of the Rising Sun  


Order of Canada Citation
Brian Mulroney was appointed a Companion of the Order of Canada on May 6, 1998. His citation reads: 
 As the eighteenth Prime Minister of Canada, he led the country for nine consecutive years. His accomplishments include, among others, the signing of the Free Trade Agreement with the United States, the North American Free Trade Agreement with Mexico and the United States, and the Acid Rain Treaty. In other international activities, he assumed the leadership of the Commonwealth countries against apartheid in South Africa and was appointed Co-chair of the United Nations' World Summit for Children. Fiscal reform, important environmental initiatives and employment equity were also highlights of his political career. 
 
Supreme Court appointmentsMulroney chose the following jurists to be appointed as justices of the Supreme Court of Canada by the Governor General:

Gerard La Forest (January 16, 1985 – September 30, 1997)
Claire L'Heureux-Dubé (April 15, 1987 – July 1, 2002)
John Sopinka (May 24, 1988 – November 24, 1997)
Charles Gonthier (February 1, 1989 – August 1, 2003)
Peter Cory (February 1, 1989 – June 1, 1999)
Beverly McLachlin (March 30, 1989 – present)
Antonio Lamer (as Chief Justice, July 1, 1990 – January 6, 2000; appointed a Puisne Justice under Prime Minister Trudeau, March 28, 1980)
William Stevenson (September 17, 1990 – June 5, 1992)
Frank Iacobucci (January 7, 1991 – June 30, 2004)
John C. Major (November 13, 1992 – December 25, 2005)


Notable cabinet ministers



Joe Clark
Jake Epp
Barbara McDougall
Michael Wilson
Pat Carney
John Crosbie
Kim Campbell
 

Jean Charest
Lucien Bouchard
Bernard Valcourt
Erik Nielsen
Don Mazankowski
Perrin Beatty
 

Arms 
See also 

List of Canadian Prime Ministers
Mulroney: The Opera
Shamrock Summit


References 
Further reading 
 

Blake, Raymond B. ed. Transforming the Nation: Canada and Brian Mulroney (McGill-Queen's University Press), 2007. 456pp; ISBN 978-0-7735-3214-4
Winners, Losers, by Patrick Brown (journalist), Rae Murphy, and Robert Chodos, 1976.
Where I Stand, by Brian Mulroney, 1983.
Discipline of Power: the Conservative Interlude and the Liberal Restoration, by Jeffrey Simpson, Macmillan of Canada, 1984, ISBN 0-920510-24-8.
Brian Mulroney: The Boy from Baie Comeau, by Nick Auf der Maur, Rae Murphy, and Robert Chodos, 1984.
Mulroney: The Making of the Prime Minister, by L. Ian MacDonald, 1984.
The Insiders: Government, Business, and the Lobbyists, by John Sawatsky, 1987.
Prime Ministers of Canada, by Jim Lotz, 1987.
Selling Out: Four Years of the Mulroney Government, by Eric Hamovitch, Rae Murphy, and Robert Chodos, 1988.
Friends in high places: politics and patronage in the Mulroney government, by Claire Hoy, 1989.
Mulroney: The Politics of Ambition, by John Sawatsky, 1991.
Right Honourable Men: the Descent of Canadian Politics from Macdonald to Mulroney, by Michael Bliss, 1994.
On the Take: Crime, Corruption and Greed in the Mulroney Years, by Stevie Cameron, 1994.
The Prime Ministers of Canada, by Gordon Donaldson (journalist), 1997.
Presumed Guilty: Brian Mulroney, the Airbus Affair, and the Government of Canada, by William Kaplan, 1998.
Prime Ministers: Rating Canada's Leaders, by Norman Hillmer and J.L. Granatstein, 1999. ISBN 0-00-200027-X.
The Last Amigo: Karlheinz Schreiber and the Anatomy of a Scandal, by Stevie Cameron and Harvey Cashore, 2001.
Egotists and Autocrats: The Prime Ministers of Canada, by George Bowering, 1999.
Bastards and Boneheads: Canada's Glorious Leaders, Past and Present, by Will Ferguson, 1999.
A Secret Trial: Brian Mulroney, Stevie Cameron, and the Public Trust, by William Kaplan, 2004.
The Secret Mulroney Tapes: Unguarded Confessions of a Prime Minister, by Peter C. Newman, 2005.
 
External links 
 

 
The 'Greenest' PM in History
Ubben Lecture at DePauw University
  Brian Mulroney's personal site for releasing documents and statements about his public activity.
CBC Digital Archives – Brian Mulroney: The Negotiator
  Brian Mulroney," by Norman Hillmer

  
DEFAULTSORT































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Thomas Middleton
 
 
  
Thomas Middleton (1580–1627) was an English Jacobean playwright and poet. Middleton stands with John Fletcher and Ben Jonson as among the most successful and prolific of playwrights who wrote their best plays during the Jacobean period. He was one of the few Renaissance dramatists to achieve equal success in comedy and tragedy. Also a prolific writer of masques and pageants, he remains one of the most noteworthy and distinctive of Jacobean dramatists.
LifeMiddleton was born in London and baptised on 18 April 1580. He was the son of a bricklayer who had raised himself to the status of a gentleman and who, interestingly, owned property adjoining the Curtain theatre in Shoreditch. Middleton was just five when his father died and his mother's subsequent remarriage dissolved into a fifteen year battle over the inheritance of Thomas and his younger sister: an experience which must surely have informed and perhaps even incited his repeated satirising of the legal profession.Middleton attended Queen’s College, Oxford, matriculating in 1598, although he did not graduate. Before he left Oxford (sometime in 1600 or 1601 ), he wrote and published three long poems in popular Elizabethan styles; none appears to have been especially successful, and one, his book of satires, ran afoul of the Anglican Church's ban on verse satire and was burned. Nevertheless, his literary career was launched.In the early 17th century, Middleton made a living writing topical pamphlets, including one—Penniless Parliament of Threadbare Poets—that enjoyed many reprintings as well as becoming the subject of a Parliamentary inquiry. At the same time, records in the diary of Philip Henslowe show that Middleton was writing for the Admiral's Men. Unlike Shakespeare, Middleton remained a free agent, able to write for whichever company hired him. His early dramatic career was marked by controversy. His friendship with Thomas Dekker brought him into conflict with Ben Jonson and George Chapman in the War of the Theatres. The grudge with Jonson continued as late as 1626, when Jonson's play The Staple of News indulges a slur on Middleton's great success, A Game at Chess.[1] It has been argued that Middleton's Inner Temple Masque (1619) sneers at Jonson (then absent in Scotland) as a "silenced bricklayer." In 1603, Middleton married. The same year, an outbreak of plague forced the closing of the theatres in London, and James I assumed the English throne. These events marked the beginning of Middleton's greatest period as a playwright. Having passed the time during the plague composing prose pamphlets (including a continuation of Thomas Nashe's Pierce Penniless), he returned to drama with great energy, producing close to a score of plays for several companies and in several genres, most notably city comedy and revenge tragedy. He continued his collaborations with Dekker, and the two produced The Roaring Girl, a biography of contemporary thief Mary Frith.In the 1610s, Middleton began his fruitful collaboration with the actor William Rowley, producing Wit at Several Weapons and A Fair Quarrel; working alone he produced his comic masterpiece, A Chaste Maid in Cheapside, in 1613. His own plays from this decade reveal a somewhat mellowed temper; certainly there is no comedy among them with the satiric depth of Michaelmas Term and no tragedy as bloodthirsty as The Revenger's Tragedy. Middleton was also branching out into other dramatic endeavours; he was apparently called on to help revise Macbeth and Measure for Measure, and at the same time he was increasingly involved with civic pageants. This last connection was made official when, in 1620, he was appointed City Chronologer of the City of London. He held this post until his death in 1627, at which time it was passed to Jonson.Middleton's official duties did not interrupt his dramatic writings; the 1620s saw the production of his and Rowley's tragedy The Changeling, and several tragicomedies. In 1624, he reached a pinnacle of notoriety when his dramatic allegory A Game at Chess was staged by the King's Men. The play used the conceit of a chess game to present and satirise the recent intrigues surrounding the Spanish Match. Though Middleton's approach was strongly patriotic, the Privy Council shut down the play after nine performances on the complaint of the Spanish ambassador. Middleton faced an unknown, but probably frightening, degree of punishment. Since no play later than A Game at Chess is recorded, it has been hypothesized that his punishment included a ban on writing for the stage.Middleton died at his home in Newington Butts in 1627.
WorksMiddleton wrote in many genres, including tragedy, history and city comedy. His best-known plays are the tragedies The Changeling (written with William Rowley) and Women Beware Women, and the cynically satirical city comedy A Chaste Maid in Cheapside. Although earlier editions of The Revenger's Tragedy attribute the play to Cyril Tourneur,  or refused to arbitrate between Middleton and Tourneur,  since the massive and widely acclaimed statistical studies by David Lake  and MacDonald P. Jackson,  Middleton's authorship has not been seriously contested, and no scholar has mounted a new defence of the discredited Tourneur attribution.  The Oxford Middleton and its companion piece, Thomas Middleton and Early Modern Textual Culture, offer the most extensive and decisive evidence to date not only for Middleton's authorship of The Revenger's Tragedy, but also for his collaboration with Shakespeare on Timon of Athens and his adaptation and revision of Shakespeare's Macbeth and Measure for Measure. It has also been argued that Middleton collaborated with Shakespeare on All's Well That Ends Well. Middleton's work is diverse even by the standards of his age. He did not have the kind of official relationship with a particular company that Shakespeare or Fletcher had; instead, he appears to have written on a freelance basis for any number of companies. Particularly in the early years of his career, this freedom led to a great diversity in his output, which ranges from the "snarling" satire of Michaelmas Term (performed by the Children of Paul's) to the bleak intrigues of The Revenger's Tragedy (performed by the King's Men), assuming he is the author of the latter.Also contributing to the variety of the works is the scope of Middleton's career. His early work was informed by the flourishing of satire in the late-Elizabethan period,  while his maturity was influenced by the ascendancy of Fletcherian tragicomedy. If many of these plays have been judged less compelling than his earlier work, his later work, in which satiric fury is tempered and broadened, also includes three of his acknowledged masterpieces.  A Chaste Maid in Cheapside, produced by the Lady Elizabeth's Men, skilfully combines Middleton's typically cutting presentation of London life with an expansive view of the power of love to effect reconciliation.  The Changeling, a late tragedy, returns Middleton to an Italianate setting like that in The Revenger's Tragedy; here, however, the central characters are more fully drawn and more compelling as individuals, again, assuming he wrote The Revenger's Tragedy.   Similar changes may be seen in Women Beware Women. Middleton's plays are characterised by their cynicism about the human race, a cynicism that is often very funny. True heroes are a rarity in Middleton; in his plays, almost every character is selfish, greedy, and self-absorbed. This quality is best observed in the A Chaste Maid in Cheapside, a panoramic view of a London populated entirely by sinners, in which no social rank goes unsatirised. It can also be seen in the tragedies Women Beware Women and The Revenger's Tragedy, in which enjoyably amoral Italian courtiers endlessly plot against each other, resulting in a climactic bloodbath. When Middleton does portray good people, the characters have very small roles, and are flawless to perfection. Thanks to a theological pamphlet attributed to him, Middleton is thought by some to have been a strong believer in Calvinism, among the dominant strains in the theology of the English church of his time, which rigidly divides humanity into the damned and the elect, which focuses on human sinfulness and inadequacy more than in the other denominations of Christianity.
ReputationMiddleton's work has long been praised by literary critics, among them Algernon Charles Swinburne and T. S. Eliot. The latter thought Middleton was second only to Shakespeare. In his own time, he was thought talented enough to revise Shakespeare's Macbeth and Measure for Measure. Middleton's plays were staged throughout the twentieth century and into the twenty-first, each decade offering more productions than the last. Even less familiar works have been staged: A Fair Quarrel was performed at the National Theatre, and The Old Law has been performed by the Royal Shakespeare Company.  The Changeling has been adapted for film several times, and the tragedy Women Beware Women remains a stage favourite. The Revenger's Tragedy was adapted into Alex Cox's film Revengers Tragedy, the opening credits of which attribute the play's authorship to Middleton.
Middleton's canonNote: The Middleton canon is beset by complications involving collaboration and debated authorship. The most recent and authoritative Middleton canon has been established by the editors of the Oxford Middleton (2007). All dates of plays are dates of composition, not of publication.
Plays

The Phoenix (1603–4)
The Honest Whore, Part 1, a city comedy (1604), co-written with Thomas Dekker
Michaelmas Term, a city comedy, (1604)
A Trick to Catch the Old One, a city comedy (1605)
A Mad World, My Masters, a city comedy (1605)
A Yorkshire Tragedy, a one-act tragedy (1605); attributed to Shakespeare on its title page, but stylistic analysis favours Middleton.
Timon of Athens a tragedy (1605–1606); stylistic analysis indicates that Middleton may have written this play in collaboration with William Shakespeare.
The Puritan (1606)
The Revenger's Tragedy (1606). Earlier editions often attribute authorship to Cyril Tourneur.
Your Five Gallants, a city comedy (1607)
The Bloody Banquet (1608–9); co-written with Thomas Dekker.
The Roaring Girl, a city comedy depicting the exploits of Mary Frith (1611); co-written with Thomas Dekker.
No Wit, No Help Like a Woman's, a tragicomedy (1611)
The Second Maiden's Tragedy, a tragedy (1611); an anonymous manuscript; stylistic analysis indicates Middleton's authorship (though one scholar, Charles Hamilton, has attributed it to Shakespeare; see The History of Cardenio for details).
A Chaste Maid in Cheapside, a city comedy (1613)
Wit at Several Weapons, a city comedy (1613); printed as part of the Beaumont and Fletcher Folio, but stylistic analysis indicates comprehensive revision by Middleton and William Rowley.
More Dissemblers Besides Women, a tragicomedy (1614)
The Widow (1615–16)
The Witch, a tragicomedy (1616)
Macbeth, a tragedy. Various evidence indicates that the extant text of Shakespeare's Macbeth was partly adapted by Middleton in 1616, using passages from The Witch.
A Fair Quarrel, a tragicomedy (1616). Co-written with William Rowley.
The Old Law, a tragicomedy (1618–19). Co-written with William Rowley and perhaps a third collaborator, who may have been Philip Massinger or Thomas Heywood.
Hengist, King of Kent, or The Mayor of Quinborough, a tragedy (1620)
Women Beware Women, a tragedy (1621)
Measure for Measure. Stylistic evidence indicates that the extant text of Shakespeare's Measure for Measure was partly adapted by Middleton in 1621.
Anything for a Quiet Life, a city comedy (1621). Co-written with John Webster.
The Changeling, a tragedy (1622). Co-written with William Rowley.
The Nice Valour (1622). Printed as part of the Beaumont and Fletcher Folio, but stylistic analysis indicates comprehensive revision by Middleton.
The Spanish Gypsy, a tragicomedy (1623). Believed to be a play by Middleton and William Rowley revised by Thomas Dekker and John Ford.
A Game at Chess, a political satire (1624). Satirized the negotiations over the proposed marriage of Prince Charles, son of James I of England, with the Spanish princess. Closed after nine performances.


Masques and entertainments

The Whole Royal and Magnificent Entertainment Given to King James Through the City of London (1603–4). Co-written with Thomas Dekker, Stephen Harrison and Ben Jonson.
The Manner of his Lordship's Entertainment
The Triumphs of Truth
Civitas Amor
The Triumphs of Honour and Industry (1617)
The Masque of Heroes, or, The Inner Temple Masque (1619)
The Triumphs of Love and Antiquity (1619)
The World Tossed at Tennis (1620). Co-written with William Rowley.
Honourable Entertainments (1620–1)
An Invention (1622)
The Sun in Aries (1621)
The Triumphs of Honour and Virtue (1622)
The Triumphs of Integrity with The Triumphs of the Golden Fleece (1623)
The Triumphs of Health and Prosperity (1626)


Poetry

The Wisdom of Solomon Paraphrased (1597)
Microcynicon: Six Snarling Satires (1599)
The Ghost of Lucrece (1600)
Burbage epitaph (1619)
Bolles epitaph (1621)
Duchess of Malfi commendatory poem (1623)
St James (1623)
To the King (1624)


Prose

The Penniless Parliament of Threadbare Poets (1601)
News from Gravesend. Co-written with Thomas Dekker (1603)
The Nightingale and the Ant (1604), also published under the title Father Hubbard's Tales
The Meeting of Gallants at an Ordinary (1604). Co-written with Thomas Dekker.
Plato's Cap Cast at the Year 1604 (1604)
The Black Book (1604)
Sir Robert Sherley his Entertainment in Cracovia (1609) (translation).
The Two Gates of Salvation (1609), or The Marriage of the Old and New Testament.
The Owl's Almanac (1618)
The Peacemaker (1618)


Notes 
References 
 
 

Covatta, Anthony.   "Thomas Middleton's City Comedies."  Lewisburg: Bucknell Univ. Press, 1973.
Barbara Jo Baines.  The Lust Motif in the Plays of Thomas Middleton. Salzburg, 1973.
 
J.R. Mulryne, Thomas Middleton ISBN 0-582-01266-X
Pier Paolo Frassinelli.  "Realism, Desire, and Reification: Thomas Middleton's A Chaste Maid in Cheapside."  Early Modern Literary Studies 8 (2003).
Kenneth Friedenreich, editor, "Accompaninge the players": Essays Celebrating Thomas Middleton, 1580–1980 ISBN 0-404-62278-X
Margot Heinemann.  Puritanism and Theatre: Thomas Middleton and Opposition Drama Under the Early Stuarts. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1980.
Herbert Jack Heller.  Penitent Brothellers: Grace, Sexuality, and Genre in Thomas Middleton's City Comedies. Cranbury, NJ: Associated University Press, 2000.
Ben Jonson.  The Staple of News. London, 1692. Holloway e-text.
Bryan Loughrey and Neil Taylor.  "Introduction."  In Thomas Middleton, Five Plays. Bryan Loughrey and Neil Taylor, eds. Penguin, 1988.
Jane Milling and Peter Thomson, editors.  The Cambridge History of British Theatre. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 2004.
Mary Beth Rose. The Expense of Spirit:  Love and Sexuality in English Renaissance Drama. Ithaca, NY: Cornell University Press, 1988.
 
Algernon Charles Swinburne.  The Age of Shakespeare. New York: Harpers, 1908. Gutenberg e-text
Ceri Sullivan, ‘Thomas Middleton’s View of Public Utility’, Review of English Studies 58 (2007), pp. 160–74.
Ceri Sullivan, The Rhetoric of Credit. Merchants in Early Modern Writing (Madison/London: Associated University Press, 2002.
Gary Taylor.  "Thomas Middleton."  Oxford Dictionary of National Biography. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2004.
Stanley Wells.  Select Bibliographical Guides: English Drama, Excluding Shakespeare. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1975.
The Cambridge History of English and American Literature in 18 Volumes (1907–21). Volume VI. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1907–21. Bartleby e-text
The Oxford Middleton Project
The Plays of Thomas Middleton
Bilingual editions (English/French) of two Middleton plays by Antoine Ertlé:(A Game at Chess); (The Old Law)


External linksPotential collaboration on All's Well That Ends Well 
DEFAULTSORT








 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Greta Garbo
  
Greta Garbo (18 September 1905 – 15 April 1990), born Greta Lovisa Gustafsson, was a Swedish film actress and an international star and icon during Hollywood's silent and classic periods. Many of her films were sensational hits, and all but three of her twenty-four Hollywood films were profitable.  Garbo was nominated four times for an Academy Award and received an honorary one in 1954 for her "luminous and unforgettable screen performances". She also won the New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress for both Anna Karenina (1935) and Camille (1936). In 1999, the American Film Institute ranked Garbo fifth on their list of greatest female stars of all time, after Katharine Hepburn, Bette Davis, Audrey Hepburn, and Ingrid Bergman.Garbo launched her career with a secondary role in the 1924 Swedish film The Saga of Gosta Berling. Her performance caught the attention of Louis B. Mayer, chief executive of Metro Goldwyn Mayer (MGM), who brought her to Hollywood in 1925. She immediately stirred interest with her first silent film, Torrent, released in 1926; a year later, her performance in Flesh and the Devil, her third movie, made her an international star. With her first talking film, Anna Christie (1930), she received an Academy Award nomination. MGM marketers enticed the public with the catch-phrase "Garbo talks!" That same year she won a second Oscar nomination for her performance in Romance. In 1932, popularity allowed her to dictate the terms of her contract and she became increasingly choosy about her roles. Many critics and film historians consider her performance as the doomed courtesan Marguerite Gautier in Camille to be her finest. The role gained her a third Academy Award nomination. After working exclusively in dramatic films, Garbo turned to comedy with Ninotchka (1939), which earned her a fourth Academy Award nomination, and Two-Faced Woman (1941).In 1941, she retired after appearing in only twenty-eight films. Although she was offered many opportunities to return to the screen, she declined most of them. Instead, she lived a private life, shunning publicity.
Childhood and youthGreta Lovisa Gustafsson was born in Stockholm, Sweden. She was the third and youngest child of Anna Lovisa (née Karlsson, 1872–1944)—a homemaker and later worked at a jam factory—and Karl Alfred Gustafsson (1871–1920), a laborer.   Garbo had an older brother, Sven Alfred (1898–1967), and an older sister, Alva Maria (1903–1926). Her parents met in Stockholm where her father visited from Frinnaryd. He moved to Stockholm to become independent, and worked in various odd jobs - street cleaner, grocer, factory worker and butcher's assistant.  He married Anna, who recently had relocated from Högsby.   The Gustafssons were impoverished and lived in a three-bedroom cold-water flat at Blekingegatan No. 32. They raised their three children in a working-class district regarded as the city's slum.  Garbo would later recall: Garbo was a shy daydreamer as a child.     She hated school   and preferred to play alone.  Yet she was an imaginative child and a natural leader  who became interested in theatre at an early age.  She directed her friends in make-believe games and performances  and dreamed of becoming an actress.   Later, she would participate in amateur theatre with her friends and frequent the Mosebacke Theater.    At the age of 13, Garbo graduated from school  and typical of a Swedish working-class girl at that time, she did not attend high school; she would later confess she had an inferiority complex about this. In the winter of 1919 the Spanish flu spread throughout Stockholm, and Garbo's father, to whom she was very close, became ill. He began missing work and eventually lost his job.    Garbo stayed at home looking after him and taking him to the hospital for weekly treatments. He died in 1920 when she was 14 years old.  
Career
Early career (1920–1924)She began her first job in 1920 as a soap-lather girl in a barbershop. Eventually, her friends advised her to look for a better job. She then applied for, and accepted, a position in the PUB department store running errands and working in the millinery department. Before long, she began modeling hats for the store's catalogs.  Her success led to a more lucrative job as a fashion model for PUB. In late 1920, a director of film commercials for the store began casting Garbo in roles advertising women's clothing. The first film premiered 12 December 1920, and she appeared in several other commercials during the following year. "Herrskapet Stockholm ute på inköp (1920)" The Swedish Film Database, Swedish Film Institute. Retrieved 2012-04-03.    Thus began Garbo's cinematic career. In 1922, Garbo caught the attention of director Erik Arthur Petschler who gave her a part in his short comedy, Peter the Tramp. 
From 1922 to 1924, she studied at The Royal Dramatic Theatre's Acting School in Stockholm. She was recruited in 1924 by the prominent Swedish director, Mauritz Stiller, to play a principal part in his classic film The Saga of Gosta Berling, a dramatization of the famous novel by Nobel Prize winner Selma Lagerlöf. She played opposite Lars Hanson, a well-known Swedish actor. Stiller became her mentor, training her as a film actress and managing all aspects of her nascent career.  She followed her role in Gosta Berling with a starring role in the 1925 German film Die freudlose Gasse (The Joyless Street or The Street of Sorrow), directed by G. W. Pabst and co-starring Asta Nielsen. Accounts differ on the circumstances of her first contract with Louis B. Mayer, at that time vice president and general manager of Metro Goldwyn Mayer (MGM).
Victor Seastrom, a respected Swedish director at MGM, was good friends with Stiller and encouraged Mayer to meet him on a trip to Berlin. There are two recent versions of what happened next. In one,  Mayer, always looking for new talent, had done his research and was interested in Stiller. He made an offer but Stiller demanded that Garbo be part of any contract, convinced that she would be an asset to his career. Mayer balked, but eventually agreed to a private viewing of Gosta Berling. He was immediately struck by Garbo's magnetism and became more interested in her than in Stiller. "It was her eyes", his daughter recalled him saying; "I can make a star out of her". In the second version,  Mayer had already seen Gosta Berling before his Berlin trip and Garbo, not Stiller, was his primary interest. On the way to the screening, Mayer said to his daughter, "This director is wonderful but what we really ought to look at is the girl.... The girl, look at the girl!" After the screening, his daughter reported, he was unwavering: "I’ll take her without him. I’ll take her with him. "Number one is the girl".  In any case, a contract was drafted that included both of them and after several months, the two set sail for America on the last day of June 1925.
Films during the silent era (1925–1929)
Stiller and Garbo, who was then age twenty and unable to speak English, arrived in New York where they remained for three months without any word from MGM. She and Stiller then went to Los Angeles on their own   but another three weeks passed with little contact from MGM. During this period, the studio arranged for a dentist to straighten her teeth and made sure she lost weight.  Although she expected to work with Stiller on her first film,  she was cast in Torrent (1926), an adaptation of a novel by Vicente Blasco Ibáñez, with director Monta Bell. She displaced Aileen Pringle, ten years her senior, and played a vamp opposite Ricardo Cortez.   Torrent was a hit and despite its cool reception by the trade press,  Garbo's performance was acclaimed.   The success led Irving Thalberg, head of production at MGM,  to cast her in a similar role in The Temptress (1926), based on another Ibáñez novel. After only one film, she was given top billing, playing opposite Antonio Moreno.  Her mentor Stiller, who had persuaded her to take the part, was assigned to direct.  For both Garbo (who did not want to play another vamp and did not like the script any more than she did the first one)  and Stiller, The Temptress was a harrowing experience. Stiller, who spoke little English, had difficulty adapting to the studio system,  and did not get on with Moreno,  was fired by Thalberg and replaced by Fred Niblo. Reshooting The Temptress was expensive. Even though it became one of the top-grossing films of the 1926–27 season, with nearly   in receipts,  it was, because of its cost, the only Garbo film of the period to lose money.  However, Garbo again got good reviews     and MGM had a new star.  Garbo went on to make eight more silent films and, with the exception of Torrent, all of them were profitable and most were highly successful.  She starred in three of them with popular leading man John Gilbert.  Their on-screen erotic intensity soon translated into an off-camera romance and by the end of their first production, Flesh and the Devil (1927), they began living together.  The film also marked a turning point in Garbo's career. Film historian Mark Vieira writes, "Audiences were mesmerized by her beauty and titillated by her love scenes with Gilbert. She was a sensation".  Profits from her third movie with Gilbert, A Woman of Affairs, catapulted her to top Metro star of the 1928-29 box office season.  In 1929, reviewer Pierre de Rohan wrote in the New York Telegraph, "She has a glamour and fascination for both sexes which have never been equaled on the screen".  Despite her popularity as a silent movie star,  the studio feared that her Swedish accent might impair her work in sound and delayed the shift for as long as possible.   MGM itself made a slow changeover to sound.  Her last silent movie, The Kiss (1929), was also the studio's.  During this period, Garbo began to require unusual conditions during the shooting of her scenes. She prohibited visitors—including the studio brass—from her sets and demanded that black flats or screens surround her to prevent extras and technicians from watching her. When asked about these eccentric requirements, she said,	"If I am by myself, my face will do things I cannot do with it otherwise". Film historian and critic David Denby argues that Garbo introduced a subtlety of expression to the art of silent acting and that its effect on audiences cannot be exaggerated. She "lowers her head to look calculating, or flutters her lips", he says. "Her face darkens with a slight tightening around the eyes and mouth; she registers a passing idea with a contraction of her brows or a drooping of her lids. Worlds turned on her movements". 
Films during the "Golden Age" (1930-1939)Publicized with the slogan "Garbo talks!", Anna Christie (1930), a film adaptation of the 1922 play by Eugene O'Neill, provided her first speaking role. In her first line, she famously utters, "Give me a whiskey, ginger ale on the side, and don't be stingy, baby." The movie was the highest-grossing film of the year  and she received her first Academy Award nomination. She was nominated for an Academy Award again that year for her performance in Romance (1930). A German version of Anna Christie was also made in 1930.  Garbo had successfully made the transition to talkies and after three less profitable films, Romance (1930), Inspiration (1931), and Susan Lenox (Her Fall and Rise) (1931), she performed two of her most famous roles. In 1931, she played the World War I spy in Mata Hari, opposite screen idol Ramón Novarro, and in 1932 she was part of an all-star cast in Grand Hotel in which she played a Russian ballerina. 
Both films were big hits,  with the latter winning the Academy Award for Best Picture, and the phenomenon of "Garbomania" reached its zenith.  By this time she was earning $250,000 to $300,000 a film—an unprecedented salary for an actor—and had become a multimillion dollar industry   with a fanatical following world-wide. Although her domestic popularity was undiminished through the early 1930s, high profits from her films after Queen Christina in 1933 depended on the foreign market.  Following a contract dispute with MGM, Garbo signed a new contract with the studio in 1932 which gave her more control over her films and co-stars.  She demonstrated loyalty to John Gilbert, whose career was faltering, and insisted, despite Mayer's objection, that he co-star in Queen Christina in which she played one of her most celebrated roles.  (Laurence Olivier had originally been chosen to play the part.)    In 1935, David O. Selznick wanted to cast her as the dying heiress in Dark Victory, but Garbo chose Tolstoy's Anna Karenina (1935) in which she played another of her renowned roles.  Her subsequent part as the doomed courtesan opposite Robert Taylor in George Cukor's Camille (1936) earned her a third Academy Award nomination. Many film critics regard it as her finest performance.
After the disappointing Conquest (1937), Garbo was one of several major stars—including Joan Crawford, Bette Davis, Marlene Dietrich, and Katharine Hepburn—called "box office poison" in an open letter published by the National Theater Distributors of America.  She then made a comeback in her first comedy playing opposite Melvyn Douglas in Ernst Lubitsch's Ninotchka (1939).  Ninotchka succeeded in lightening her somber and melancholy image and she earned a fourth Academy Award nomination. The film was marketed with the tagline "Garbo laughs!", playing off the one for Anna Christie.From the early days of her career, Garbo avoided the social functions in Hollywood, preferring to spend her time alone or with friends. She refused to sign autographs,   answered no fan mail,    and gave few interviews.    Her refusal to give interviews gave rise to press reporters' expressions, "pulling a Garbo" or "going Garbo".  She is closely associated with a line from Grand Hotel, one which the American Film Institute in 2005 voted the 30th most memorable movie quote of all time,  "I want to be alone, I just want to be alone", a theme echoed in several of her other roles. For example, in Love (1927) a title card reads, "I like to be alone"; in The Single Standard (1929) her character says, "I am walking alone because I want to be alone"; in Susan Lenox (Her Fall and Rise) (1931) she says to a suitor, "This time I rise... and fall... alone"; in Inspiration (1931) she tells a fickle lover, "I just want to be alone for a little while"; in Mata Hari (1931) she says to her new amour, "I never look ahead. By next spring I shall probably be... quite alone"; and in Ninotchka (1939) emissaries from Russia ask her, "Do you want to be alone, comrade"? "No", she answers bluntly. By the early 1930s, the phrase had become indelibly linked to Garbo's public and private personae.    
 
Last work and early retirement (1941–1948)With George Cukor's Two-Faced Woman (1941), MGM attempted to capitalize on Garbo's success in Ninotchka by casting her in a romantic comedy which sought to portray her as an ordinary girl. She played a double role that featured her dancing the rumba, swimming, and skiing. The film was a critical, although not entirely a commercial, failure.  Garbo referred to the film as "my grave".  Two-Faced Woman was her last film; she was thirty-six and had made only twenty-eight feature films in sixteen years.
Although Garbo was humiliated by the negative reviews of Two-Faced Woman, she did not at first intend to retire.   But her films depended on the European market and when it fell through with the war, finding a vehicle was problematic for MGM.   She signed a one picture deal in 1942 to make The Girl from Leningrad but the project quickly dissolved.  She still thought she would continue when the war was over   though she was ambivalent and indecisive about returning to the screen. Salka Viertel, Garbo's close friend and collaborator, said in 1945, "Greta is impatient to work. But on the other side, she's afraid of it".  Garbo also worried about her age. "Time leaves traces on our small faces and bodies. It's not the same anymore, being able to pull it off".  George Cukor, director of Two-Faced Woman, and often blamed for its failure, said, "People often glibly say that the failure of Two-Faced Woman finished Garbo's career. That's a grotesque oversimplification. It certainly threw her, but I think that what really happened was that she just gave up. She didn’t want to go on".  Still, Garbo signed a contract in 1948 for $200,000 with producer Walter Wanger, who had produced Queen Christina, to shoot a picture based on Balzac's La Duchesse de Langeais. Max Ophüls was slated to adapt and direct.    She made several screen tests, learned the script, and arrived in Rome in the summer of 1949 to shoot the picture. However, the financing failed to materialize and the project was abandoned.  The screen tests—the last time Garbo stepped in front of a movie camera—were thought to have been lost for forty-one years until they were rediscovered in 1990 by film historians Leonard Maltin and Jeanine Basinger.  Parts of the footage were included in the 2005 TCM documentary Garbo.   She was offered many roles in the 1940s and throughout her retirement years but she rejected all but a few of them. In the few instances when she accepted, the slightest problem led her to drop out.  Although she refused to talk to friends throughout her life about her reasons for retiring, she told Swedish biographer Sven Broman four years before her death, "I was tired of Hollywood. I did not like my work. There were many days when I had to force myself to go to the studio.... I really wanted to live another life". 
In retirementIn general, Garbo in retirement led a private life of simplicity and leisure. She made no public appearances and assiduously tried to avoid the publicity she loathed.  As she had been during her Hollywood years, Garbo, with her innate need for solitude, was often reclusive. But contrary to myth, she always had many friends and acquaintances with whom she socialized, and later, traveled.   Occasionally, she jet-setted with well-known and wealthy personalities, striving to guard her privacy as she had during her career. She has been forever linked to her famous line in Grand Hotel: "I want to be alone." But she later remarked, "I never said, 'I want to be alone.' I only said, 'I want to be let alone.' There is a world of difference".  
Still, she often floundered about what to do and how to spend her time ("drifting" was the word she often used), always struggling with her many eccentricities,   and her lifelong melancholy, or depression, and moodiness.   As she approached her sixtieth birthday, she told a frequent walking companion, "In a few days, it will be the anniversary of the sorrow that never leaves me, that will never leave me for the rest of my life".  To another friend she said in 1971, "I suppose I suffer from very deep depression".  It is also arguable, says one biographer, that she was bipolar. "I am very happy one moment, the next there is nothing left for me", she said in 1933.  Beginning in the 1940s, She became something of an art collector. Many of the paintings she purchased were of negligible value, but she did buy paintings by Renoir, Rouault, Kandinski, Bonnard,  and Jawlensky.  Her art collection was worth millions when she died in 1990.  On 9 February 1951, she became a naturalized citizen of the United States.    In 1953, she bought a seven-room apartment at 450 East 52nd Street in Manhattan, New York City,    where she lived for the rest of her life. In 1969, Italian motion picture director Luchino Visconti allegedly attempted to bring Garbo back to the screen with a small part, Maria Sophia, Queen of Naples, in his adaptation of Proust's Remembrance of Things Past. He exclaimed: "I am very pleased at the idea that this woman, with her severe and authoritarian presence, should figure in the decadent and rarefied climate of the world described by Proust".  Claims that Garbo was interested in the part cannot be substantiated.  Although she became increasingly withdrawn in her final years,  she had become close over time to her house-keeper and cook of thirty-one years, Claire Koger. “We were very close—like sisters", Koger said. Throughout her life, Garbo was known for taking long, daily walks with companions or by herself. In retirement, she walked the streets of New York City dressed casually and wearing large sunglasses. "Garbo-watching" became a sport for photographers, the media, admirers, and curious New Yorkers,  but she maintained her elusive mystique to the end.
RelationshipsGarbo never married, had no children, and lived alone as an adult. Her most famous romance was with her frequent co-star, John Gilbert, with whom she lived intermittently in 1926 and 1927.   MGM capitalized on her relationship with Gilbert after their huge hit, Flesh and the Devil by costarring them again in two more hits, Love (1927) and A Woman of Affairs (1928). Gilbert allegedly proposed to her numerous times. Legend has it that when a double marriage was arranged in 1926 (with Eleanor Boardman and King Vidor), Garbo failed to appear at the ceremony. Her recent biographers, however, question the veracity of this story.    In 1937, she met conductor Leopold Stokowski with whom she had a highly publicized friendship or romance while traveling throughout Europe the following year.   In his diary, Erich Maria Remarque discusses a liaison with Garbo in 1941  and in his memoir, Cecil Beaton described an affair with her in 1947 and 1948.   In 1940, she met the Russian-born millionaire, George Schlee, who was married to fashion designer Valentina. Schlee, who split his time between the two, became Garbo's close companion and advisor until his death in 1964.  Recent biographers and others believe that Garbo was bisexual or lesbian, and that she had intimate relationships with women as well as with men.      In 1927 Garbo was introduced to stage and screen actress Lilyan Tashman and strong evidence indicates that the two began an affair;   silent film star Louise Brooks stated that she and Garbo had a brief liaison the following year.  In 1931, Garbo befriended the writer, socialite, and avowed lesbian Mercedes de Acosta,    introduced to her by her close friend, Salka Viertel, and, according Garbo's and de Acosta's biographers, began a sporadic and volatile romance. The two remained friends—with ups and downs—for almost thirty years during which time Garbo wrote de Acosta 181 letters, cards, and telegrams which are kept at the Rosenbach Museum & Library in Philadelphia.  Garbo's family, which controls her estate,  has made only 87 of them available to the public.  In 2005 Swedish actress, Mimi Pollak, a close friend in drama school, released sixty letters Garbo had written her in their long correspondence. Several letters suggest she may have had romantic feelings for Pollak for many years. After learning of Pollak's pregnancy in 1930, for example, Garbo wrote, "We cannot help our nature, as God has created it. But I have always thought you and I belonged together".     In 1975, she wrote a poem about not being able to touch the hand of her friend with whom she might have been walking through life. 
Death
Greta Garbo died on 15 April 1990, aged 84, in New York Hospital as a result of pneumonia and renal failure. 
She had been successfully treated for breast cancer in 1984.     Garbo was cremated and her ashes were interred in 1999 at Skogskyrkogården Cemetery just south of her native Stockholm.   She had invested wisely, primarily in stocks and bonds, and left her entire estate, $32,042,429, to her niece, Gray Reisfield. 
Legacy
Garbo was an international superstar during the late silent era and the "Golden-Age" of Hollywood and is widely regarded as a cinematic legend.  Almost immediately, with the sudden popularity of her first pictures, she became a screen icon.  For most of her career she was the highest paid actor or actress at MGM, making her for many years its biggest "prestige" star.   It has been said that at the peak of her popularity she had become a virtual cult figure. During the silent period, Garbo developed an acting technique that is thought to have been ahead of its time, one that set her apart from other actors and actresses of the period. Vance, Jeffrey (2005). The Mysterious Lady, The Garbo Silents Collection: Audio commentary, DVD; Disk 1/3. (TCM Archives).  Noted film historian Jeffrey Vance said that Garbo communicated her characters' innermost feelings through her movement, gestures, and most importantly, her eyes. With the slightest movement of them, he argues, she subtlety conveyed complex attitudes and feelings toward other characters and the truth of the situation. This approach demonstrated a deep bond with the character, with actions seemingly made on the basis of internal motivation—now referred to as working "from the inside-out".  Director Clarence Brown, who made seven of Garbo's pictures, once said. "You could see thought. If she had to look at one person with jealousy, and another with love, she didn't have to change her expression. You could see it in her eyes as she looked from one to the other." Critics have argued that few of Garbo's twenty-four Hollywood films are artistically exceptional, and that many are simply bad.  It has been said, however, that her commanding and magnetic performances usually overcome the weaknesses of plot and dialogue.  Because Garbo was suspicious and mistrustful of the media, and often at odds with MGM executives, she spurned Hollywood's publicity rules. Except at the start of her career, Garbo conducted few interviews (she gave only fourteen in her life),  signed no autographs, attended few industry social functions, and turned down all but a few requests for public appearances. She was routinely referred to by the press as the "Swedish Sphinx". Her reticence and fear of strangers perpetuated the mystery and mystique that she projected both on screen and in real life. In spite of her strenuous efforts to avoid publicity, Garbo paradoxically became one of the twentieth-century's most publicized women in the world.  Garbo is the subject of several documentaries, including four made in the United States between 1990 and 2005:

The Divine Garbo (1990), TNT, produced by Ellen M. Krass and Susan F. Walker, narrated by Glenn Close 
Greta Garbo: The Mysterious Lady (1998), Biography Channel, narrated by Peter Graves 
Greta Garbo: A Lone Star (2001), AMC 
Garbo (2005), TCM, directed by silent film expert Kevin Brownlow, narrated by Julie Christie 

She has been praised in the media and by personalities in cinema and culture, including:Ephraim Katz (The Film Encyclopedia: The Complete Guide to Film and the Film Industry): 
Of all the stars who have ever fired the imaginations of audiences, none has quite projected a magnetism and a mystique equal to Garbo's. "The Divine", the "dream princess of eternity", the "Sarah Bernhardt of films", are only a few of the superlatives writers used in describing her over the years.... She played heroines that were at once sensual and pure, superficial and profound, suffering and hopeful, world-weary and life-inspiring.Bette Davis:  Her instinct, her mastery over the machine, was pure witchcraft. I cannot analyze this woman's acting. I only know that no one else so effectively worked in front of a camera.George Cukor  She had a talent that few actresses or actors possess. In close-ups she gave the impression, the illusion of great movement. She would move her head just a little bit and the whole screen would come alive, like a strong breeze that made itself felt.
Awards and honorsGarbo was nominated four times for an Academy Award for Best Actress, including twice in 1930, for Anna Christie and Romance. 
   
  
She lost out to Irving Thalberg's wife, Norma Shearer, who won for The Divorcee. In 1937, Garbo was nominated for Camille, but Luise Rainer won for The Good Earth. Finally, in 1939, Garbo was nominated for Ninotchka, but again came away empty-handed. Gone With the Wind swept the major awards, including Best Actress, which went to Vivien Leigh.       She was awarded an Academy Honorary Award "for her luminous and unforgettable screen performances" in 1954.  She did not show up at the ceremony, and the statuette was mailed to her home address.   She twice received the New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress for Anna Karenina, 1935, and Camille, 1936.She won the National Board of Review Best Acting Award for Camille, 1936, Ninotchka, 1939, and Two-Faced Woman, 1941.The Swedish royal medal, Litteris et Artibus, awarded to people who have made important contributions to culture, especially music, dramatic art or literature, was presented to Garbo in January 1937. 
In a 1950 Daily Variety opinion poll, Garbo was voted Best Actress of the Half Century, In 1957, Garbo was awarded The George Eastman Award, given by George Eastman House for distinguished contribution to the art of film. In November 1983, Garbo was made a Commander of the Swedish Order of the Polar Star by order of King Carl XVI Gustaf, the King of Sweden. In 1999, the American Film Institute ranked Garbo fifth on their list of greatest female stars of all time, after Katharine Hepburn, Bette Davis, Audrey Hepburn, and Ingrid Bergman. For her contributions to cinema, she has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame at 6901 Hollywood Boulevard.She was once designated the most beautiful woman who ever lived by the Guinness Book of World Records.   Garbo appears on a number of postage stamps, and in September 2005, the United States Postal Service and Swedish Posten jointly issued two commemorative stamps bearing her image.   On 6 April 2011, Sveriges Riksbank announced that Garbo's portrait will be featured on the 100 krona banknote, beginning in 2014–15. 
Filmography

Film credits
Year Title Role Director Co-star Notes 
1920 Mr. and Mrs. Stockholm Go Shopping Elder sister      ;  An advertisement. Garbo's segment  is often known as How Not to Dress. The commercial premiered 12 December 1920.     
1921 The Gay Cavalier Garbo played an extra.      ;  Uncredited. The film is lost. 
1921 Our Daily Bread Companion      ;  An advertisement 
1922 Peter the Tramp Greta      ;  A two-reel comedy; Garbo's first part in a commercial film 
1924   Elizabeth Dohna      ; Garbo’s first leading part in a feature-length film, directed by her mentor, the celebrated Mauritz Stiller. 
1925   Greta Rumfort      ; Garbo plays the principal role in this German film made by renowned director Pabst 
1926 Torrent Leonora Moreno aka La Brunna     First American movie. All of Garbo's subsequent movies were made in Hollywood and produced by MGM. 
1926   Elena     Stiller was originally assigned to direct; his directing methods and personality led to conflicts with MGM producer Irving Thalberg who fired him. 
1926 Flesh and the Devil Felicitas     First of seven Garbo movies directed by Clarence Brown and first of four with co-star John Gilbert 
1927 Love Anna Karenina     Adapted from the novel Anna Karenina by Tolstoy 
1928   Marianne     The film is lost; only a 9 minute reel exists. 
1928   Tania Fedorova       
1928   Diana Merrick Furness     The first of seven Garbo films with actor Lewis Stone who, with the exception of Wild Orchids, played secondary roles. 
1929 Wild Orchids Lillie Sterling       
1929   Arden Stuart Hewlett    ,     
1929   Irene Guarry     Garbo's, and MGM's, last silent picture 
1930 Anna Christie Anna Christie    ,   Garbo's first talkie and first Academy Award nomination for Best Actress 
1930 Romance Madame Rita Cavallini     Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress 
1930 Anna Christie Anna Christie    ,   MGM's German version of Anna Christie was also released in 1930; Salka Viertel, Garbo's close friend, later co-wrote several of her screenplays. 
1931 Inspiration Yvonne Valbret       
1931 Susan Lenox (Her Fall and Rise) Susan Lenox       
1931 Mata Hari Mata Hari     After the multi-star Grand Hotel, Garbo's highest grossing film 
1932 Grand Hotel Grusinskaya    ,  ,  ,   Academy Award for Best Picture 
1932 As You Desire Me Zara aka Marie    ,   First of three movies with Douglas 
1933 Queen Christina Queen Christina       
1934   Katrin Koerber Fane       
1935 Anna Karenina Anna Karenina     New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress 
1936 Camille Marguerite Gautier     New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress National Board of Review Best Acting Award Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress 
1937 Conquest Countess Marie Walewska     Because the final cost for this extravagant production vastly exceeded its budget, coupled with its poor box office receipts, the film lost $1,397,000. 
1939 Ninotchka Nina Ivanovna "Ninotchka" Yakushova     National Board of Review Best Acting Award Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress  Nominated—New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress 
1941 Two-Faced Woman Karin Borg Blake     National Board of Review of Motion Pictures Best Acting Award 

Gallery 
File:Greta Garbo08.jpg|The Joyless Street (1925) publicity still
File:Garbo wild orchids.jpg|Wild Orchids (1929) publicity still File:Greta Garbo-1935-Karenina.JPG|Anna Karenina (1935) publicity still
File:Garbo & Taylor - Camille 1936.jpg|Camille (1936) with Robert Taylor
File:Douglas-Ninotchka.jpg|Ninotchka (1939) with Melvyn Douglas
 
References 
Bibliography and further reading 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Italo Moscati, "Greta Garbo, diventare star per sempre", Edizioni Sabinae, Roma, 2010.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
External links 
 

 
 
 

Greta Garbo Biography—Yahoo! Movies
Garbo History
Greta Garbo at Virtual History
Reklamfilmer PUB Greta Garbo, commercials done in 1920 and 1922, Filmarkivet.se, Swedish Film Institute

  
 
 
DEFAULTSORT




















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Jack Tramiel
 Jack Tramiel   ( ,    Trzmiel means "bumblebee"; December 13, 1928 – April 8, 2012) was a Polish-born American businessman, best known for founding Commodore International,    the manufacturer of the Commodore PET, Commodore VIC-20, Commodore 64, Commodore 128, Amiga, and other Commodore models of home computers.
Early yearsTramiel was born as Jacek Trzmiel   in Łódź, Poland,    into a Jewish family.After the German invasion of Poland in 1939 his family was transported by German occupiers to the Jewish ghetto in Łódź, where he worked in a garment factory.  When the ghettos were liquidated his family was sent to the Auschwitz concentration camp. He was examined by Dr. Mengele and selected for a work party, after which he and his father were sent to the labor camp Ahlem near Hanover, while his mother remained at Auschwitz. Like many other inmates, his father was reported to have died of typhus in the work camp; however, Tramiel believed he was killed by an injection of gasoline. Tramiel was rescued from the labor camp in April 1945 by the 84th Infantry Division.In November 1947, Tramiel emigrated to the United States. He soon joined the U.S. Army, where he learned how to repair office equipment, including typewriters.
Commodore 
Typewriters and calculatorsIn 1953, while working as a taxi driver, Tramiel bought a shop in the Bronx to repair office machinery,    securing a $25,000 loan for the business from a U.S. Army entitlement.    He named it Commodore Portable Typewriter. In 1955, Tramiel signed a deal with a Czechoslovak company to assemble and sell their typewriters in North America. However, as Czechoslovakia was part of the Warsaw Pact, they could not be imported directly into the U.S., so Tramiel set up Commodore Business Machines in Toronto.  Tramiel wanted a military-style name for his company, but names like Admiral and General were already taken, so he settled on the Commodore name.   In 1962, Commodore went public. But the arrival of Japanese typewriters in the U.S. market made the selling of Czechoslovakian typewriters unprofitable. Struggling for cash, the company sold 17% of its stock to Canadian businessman Irving Gould, taking in $400,000.  It used the money to re-launch the company in the adding machine business, which was profitable for a time before the Japanese entered that field as well. Stung twice by the same source, Gould suggested that Tramiel travel to Japan to learn why they were able to outcompete North Americans in their own local markets. It was during this trip that Tramiel saw the first digital calculators, and decided that the mechanical adding machine was a dead end.   When Commodore released its first calculators, combining an LED display from Bowmar and an integrated circuit from Texas Instruments (TI), it found a ready market. However, after slowly realizing the size of the market, TI decided to cut Commodore out of the middle, and released their own calculators at a price point below Commodore's cost of just the chips. Gould once again rescued the company, injecting another $3 million, which allowed Commodore to purchase MOS Technology, Inc. an IC design and semiconductor manufacturer, a company which had also supplied Commodore with calculator ICs.  When their lead designer, Chuck Peddle, told Tramiel that calculators were a dead end and computers were the future, Tramiel told him to build one to prove the point.
Home computersPeddle responded with the Commodore PET, based on his company's MOS Technology 6502 processor. It was first shown, privately, at the Chicago Consumer Electronics Show in 1977, and soon the company was receiving 50 calls a day from dealers wanting to sell the computer.  The PET would go on to be a success — especially in the education field, where its all-in-one design was a major advantage. Much of their success with the PET came from the business decision to sell directly to large customers, instead of selling to them through a dealer network.  The first PET computers were sold primarily in Europe, where Commodore had also introduced the first wave of digital handheld calculators. As prices dropped and the market matured, the monochrome (green text on black screen) PET was at a disadvantage in the market when compared to machines like the Apple II and Atari 800, which offered color graphics, and could be hooked to a television as an inexpensive display. Commodore responded with the VIC-20, and then the Commodore 64, which would go on to be the best-selling home computer of all time [citation needed]. The Commodore VIC-20 was the first microcomputer to sell one million units.  The Commodore 64 sold several million units.  It was during this time period that Tramiel coined the famous phrase, "We need to build computers for the masses, not the classes." 
Atari In January 1984, Tramiel resigned from Commodore, because of disagreement "on the basic principles—how to run the company".  After a short break from the computer industry, he formed a new company named Tramel Technology, Ltd., in order to design and sell a next-generation home computer.    The company was named "Tramel" to help ensure that it would be pronounced correctly (i.e., "tra - mel" instead of "tra - meal").   In July 1984, Tramel Technology bought the Consumer Division of Atari Inc. from Warner Communications.  The division had fallen on hard times, due to the video game crash of 1983.  TTL was then renamed Atari Corporation.In the late 1980s, Tramiel decided to step away from day-to-day operations at Atari, naming his son, Sam, President and CEO.  In 1995, Sam suffered a heart attack, and his father returned to oversee operations. In 1996, Tramiel sold Atari to disk-drive manufacturer Jugi Tandon Storage in a reverse merger deal. The newly merged company was named JTS Corporation, and Tramiel joined the JTS board.
Later yearsTramiel was a co-founder of the United States Holocaust Memorial Museum, which was opened in 1993. He was among many other survivors of the Ahlem labor camp who tracked down U.S. Army veteran Vernon Tott, who was among the 84th Division which rescued survivors from the camp and had taken and kept photographs of at least 16 of the survivors in storage until 2003. Tott, who died of cancer in 2003, was personally commemorated by Tramiel with an inscription on one of the Holocaust Museum's walls saying "To Vernon W. Tott, My Liberator and Hero". Tramiel died on April 8, 2012, of heart failure  at the age of 83.
References 
Further reading

The Home Computer Wars: An Insider's Account of Commodore and Jack Tramiel by Michael Tomczyk, Compute, 1984, ISBN 0-942386-75-2
On the Edge: The Spectacular Rise and Fall of Commodore by Brian Bagnall, Variant Press, 2005, ISBN 0-9738649-0-7


External links

1985 episode of The Computer Chronicles featuring an extended interview with Tramiel
The Color Computers - 1979 to 1980 — Excerpt from the book On the Edge: The Spectacular Rise and Fall of Commodore (2005), Variant Press. (ISBN 0-9738649-0-7) documenting Tramiel's involvement with Commodore
You Don't Know Jack at a Commodore history site
Biography about Jack Tramiel at History Corner (in German)

 
DEFAULTSORT











 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Antoine Laurent de Jussieu
 
 
Antoine Laurent de Jussieu (12 April 1748 – 17 September 1836) was a French botanist, notable as the first to publish a natural classification of flowering plants; much of his system remains in use today. His classification was based on and extended unpublished work by his uncle, the botanist Bernard de Jussieu.
LifeJussieu was born in Lyon. He went to Paris to study medicine, graduating in 1770. He was professor of botany at the Jardin des Plantes from 1770 to 1826. His son Adrien-Henri also became a botanist. In his study of flowering plants, Genera plantarum (1789), Jussieu adopted a methodology based on the use of multiple characters to define groups, an idea derived from Scottish-French naturalist Michel Adanson. This was a significant improvement over the "artificial" system of Linnaeus, whose most popular work classified plants into classes and orders based on the number of stamens and pistils. Jussieu did keep Linnaeus' binomial nomenclature, resulting in a work that was far-reaching in its impact; many of the present-day plant families are still attributed to Jussieu. Morton's 1981 History of botanical science counts 76 of Jussieu's families conserved in the ICBN, versus just 11 for Linnaeus, for instance. Writing of the natural system, Sydney Howard Vines remarked  In 1788, he was elected a foreign member of the Royal Swedish Academy of Sciences.He was a member of the Masonic Lodge, Les Neuf Sœurs.
Works

 
 
  error

 
References 
 
 

Duane Isely, One hundred and one botanists (Iowa State University Press, 1994), pp. 118–120
 
 

  
 
DEFAULTSORT









 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Bill James
 
 
George William "Bill" James (born October 5, 1949) is an American baseball writer, historian, and statistician whose work has been widely influential.  Since 1977, James has written more than two dozen books devoted to baseball history and statistics. His approach, which he termed sabermetrics in reference to the Society for American Baseball Research (SABR),  scientifically analyzes and studies baseball, often through the use of statistical data, in an attempt to determine why teams win and lose. His Baseball Abstract books in the 1980s are the modern predecessor to websites using sabermetrics such as Baseball Prospectus and Baseball Primer (now Baseball Think Factory). In 2006, Time named him in the Time 100 as one of the most influential people in the world.  He is currently a Senior Advisor on Baseball Operations for the Boston Red Sox. In 2010, Bill James was inducted into the Irish American Baseball Hall of Fame.
Early lifeJames was born in Holton, Kansas. After four years at the University of Kansas residing at Stephenson Scholarship hall, James joined the Army in 1971. He was the last person in Kansas to be sent to fight in the Vietnam War, although he never saw action there. Instead, he spent two years stationed in South Korea, during which time he wrote to KU about taking his final class. He was told he actually had met all his graduation requirements, so he returned to Lawrence in 1973 with degrees in English and economics. He also finished an Education degree in 1975, likewise from the University of Kansas. 
The Bill James Baseball AbstractsAn aspiring writer and obsessive fan, James began writing baseball articles after leaving the United States Army in his mid-twenties.  Many of his first baseball writings came while he was doing night shifts as a security guard at the Stokely-Van Camp's pork and beans cannery.  Unlike most writers, his pieces did not recount games in epic terms or offer insights gleaned from interviews with players.  A typical James piece posed a question (e.g., "Which pitchers and catchers allow runners to steal the most bases?"), and then presented data and analysis written in a lively, insightful, and witty style that offered an answer. Editors considered James's pieces so unusual that few believed them suitable for their readers. In an effort to reach a wider audience, James self-published an annual book titled The Bill James Baseball Abstract beginning in 1977.  The first edition of the book presented 80 pages of in-depth statistics compiled from James's study of box scores from the preceding season, and was offered for sale through a small advertisement in The Sporting News.Over the next three years James's work won respect, including a very favorable review by Daniel Okrent in Sports Illustrated.   New annual editions added essays on teams and players.  By 1982 sales had increased tenfold, and a media conglomerate agreed to publish and distribute future editions.While writers had published books about baseball statistics before (most notably Earnshaw Cook's Percentage Baseball, in the 1960s), few had ever reached a mass audience. Attempts to imitate James's work spawned a flood of books and articles that continues to this day.
Post-Abstracts WorkIn 1988, James ceased writing the Abstract, citing workload-related burnout and concern about the volume of statistics on the market.  He has continued to publish hardcover books about baseball history, which have sold well and received admiring reviews.  These books include three editions of The Bill James Historical Baseball Abstract (1985, 1988, 2001, the last entitled The New Bill James Historical Baseball Abstract.)James has also written several series of new annuals:

The Baseball Book (1990–1992) was a loosely-organized collection of commentary, profiles, historical articles, and occasional pieces of research.  James' assistant Rob Neyer was responsible for much of the research, and wrote several short pieces.  Neyer went on to become a featured baseball columnist at ESPN and SB Nation.
The Player Ratings Book (1993–95) offered statistics and 50-word profiles aimed at the fantasy baseball enthusiast.
The Bill James Handbook (2003–present) provides past-season statistics and next-season projections for Major League players and teams, and career data for all current Major League players. Results for the Fielding Bible Awards, an alternative to the Gold Glove Awards voted on by a 10-person panel that includes James, are also included.  
The Bill James Gold Mine (2008–2010) was a collection of new essays and never-before-seen statistics, as well as profiles of players and teams.
Playing off the name of the earlier series, Solid Fool's Gold:  Detours on the Way to Conventional Wisdom (2011) was a mixed collection of both baseball-related and miscellaneous pieces, culled from the Bill James Online archives (see below).

In 2008, James launched Bill James Online. Subscribers can read James' new, original writing and interact with one another —- as well as with James —- in a question-and-answer format. The web site also offers new "profiles" of teams and players full of facts and statistics that hope to one day map what James has termed "the lost island of baseball statistics."
InnovationsAmong the statistical innovations attributable to James are:

Runs Created.  A statistic intended to quantify a player's contribution to runs scored, as well as a team's expected number of runs scored. Runs created is calculated from other offensive statistics. James's first version of it was: Runs Created = (Total Bases * (Hits + Walks))/(Plate Appearances).  Applied to an entire team or league, the statistic correlates closely to that team's or league's actual runs scored. Since James first created the statistic, sabermetricians have refined it to make it more accurate, and it is now used in many different variations.
Range factor.  A statistic that quantifies the defensive contribution of a player, calculated in its simplest form as RF = (Assists + Put Outs)/(Games Played).  The statistic is premised on the notion that the total number of outs that a player participates in is more relevant in evaluating his defensive play than the percentage of cleanly handled chances as calculated by the conventional statistic Fielding Percentage.
Defensive Efficiency Rating.  A statistic that shows the percentage of balls in play a defense turns into an out.  It is used to help determine a team's defensive ability. Calculated by: 1 - ((Opp. Hits + Reached on Error - Opp. Home runs) / (Plate appearances - Walks - Strikeouts - HitByPitch - Opp. Home runs)).
Win Shares.  A unifying statistic intended to allow the comparison of players at different positions, as well as players of different eras.  Win Shares incorporates a variety of pitching, hitting and fielding statistics.  One drawback of Win Shares is the difficulty of computing it.   
Pythagorean Winning Percentage.  A statistic explaining the relationship of wins and losses to runs scored and runs allowed.  In its simplest form: Pythagorean Winning Percentage equals Runs squared divided by the square of Runs plus the square of Runs Allowed.  The statistic correlates closely to a team's actual winning percentage.
Game Score is a metric to determine the strength of a pitcher in any particular baseball game.
Major League Equivalency.  A metric that uses minor league statistics to predict how a player is likely to perform at the major league level.
The Brock2 System.  A system for projecting a player's performance over the remainder of his career based on past performance and the aging process.
Similarity scores. Scoring a player's statistical similarity to other players, providing a frame of reference for players of the distant past. Examples: Lou Gehrig comparable to Don Mattingly; Joe Jackson to Tony Oliva.
Secondary average. A statistic that attempts to measure a player's contribution to an offense in ways not reflected in batting average. The formula is (Extra bases on hits+Walks+Stolen Bases)/At bats. Secondary averages tend to be similar to batting averages, but can vary widely, from less than .100 to more than .500 in extreme cases. Extra bases on hits is calculated with the formula (Doubles)+(Triplesx2)+(Homerunsx3) or more easily, (Total Bases)-(Hits).
Power/Speed Number. A statistic that attempts to consolidate the various "clubs" of players with impressive numbers of both home runs and stolen bases (e.g., the "30/30" club (Bobby Bonds was well known for being a member), the "40/40" club (José Canseco was the first to perform this feat), and even the "25/65" club (Joe Morgan in the '70s)). The formula: (2x(Home Runs)x(Stolen Bases))/(Home Runs + Stolen Bases).
Approximate Value.  A system of cutoffs designed to estimate the value a player contributed to various category groups (including his team) to study broad questions such as "how do players age over time".
"Temperature gauge" to determine how "hot" a player is, based on recent performance.  The gauge has been used in NESN Red Sox telecasts and has provoked mixed reactions from critics.  

Although James may be best known as an inventor of statistical tools, he has often written on the limitations of statistics and urged humility concerning their place amidst other kinds of information about baseball.  To James, context is paramount: he was among the first to emphasize the importance of adjusting traditional statistics for park factors and to stress the role of luck in a pitcher's win-loss record.  Many of his statistical innovations are arguably less important than the underlying ideas. When he introduced the notion of secondary average, it was as a vehicle for the then-counterintuitive concept that batting average represents only a fraction of a player's offensive contribution. (The runs-created statistic plays a similar role vis-à-vis the traditional RBI.) Some of his contributions to the language of baseball, like the idea of the "defensive spectrum", border on being entirely non-statistical.
STATS, Inc.In an essay published in the 1984 Abstract, James vented his frustration about Major League Baseball's refusal to publish play-by-play accounts of every game. James proposed the creation of Project Scoresheet, a network of fans that would work together to collect and distribute this information. While the resulting non-profit organization never functioned smoothly, it worked well enough to collect accounts of every game from 1984 through 1991. James's publisher agreed to distribute two annuals of essays and data - the 1987 and 1988 editions of Bill James Presents The Great American Baseball Statbook (though only the first of these featured writing by James).The organization was eventually disbanded, but many of its members went on to form for-profit companies with similar goals and structure. STATS, Inc., the company James joined, provided data and analysis to every major media outlet before being acquired by Fox Sports in 2001. 
Acceptance and employment in mainstream baseballOakland Athletics general manager Billy Beane began applying sabermetric principles to running his low-budget team in the late 1990s, to notable effect, as chronicled in Michael Lewis' book Moneyball.In 2003, James was hired by a former reader, John Henry, the new owner of the Boston Red Sox.One point of controversy was in handling the relief pitching of the Red Sox.   James had previously published analysis of the use of the closer in baseball, and had concluded that the traditional use of the closer both overrated the abilities of that individual, and used him in suboptimal circumstances. He wrote that it is "far better to use your relief ace when the score is tied, even if that is the seventh inning, than in the ninth inning with a lead of two or more runs."  The Red Sox in 2003 staffed their bullpen with several marginally talented relievers. Baseball Prospectus 2005, p.69   Red Sox manager Grady Little was never fully comfortable with the setup, and designated unofficial closers and reshuffled roles after a bad outing. When Boston lost a number of games due to bullpen failures, Little reverted to a traditional closer approach and moved Byung-Hyun Kim from being a starting pitcher to a closer. Baseball Prospectus 2005, p.70  The Red Sox did not follow James' idea of a bullpen with no closer, but with consistent overall talent that would allow the responsibilities to be shared.  Red Sox reliever Alan Embree thought the plan could have worked if the bullpen had not suffered injuries.  During the 2004 regular season Keith Foulke was used primarily as a closer in the conventional model; however, Foulke's usage in the 2004 postseason was along the lines of a relief ace with multiple inning appearances at pivotal times of the game.  Houston Astros manager Phil Garner also employed a relief ace model with his use of Brad Lidge in the 2004 postseason. As of 2012, James is still employed by the Red Sox, having published several new sabermetric books during his tenure (see Bibliography, below). Indeed, although James is typically tight-lipped about his activities on behalf of the Red Sox, he is credited with advocating some of the moves that led to the team's first World Series championship in 86 years, including the signing of non-tendered free agent David Ortiz, the trade for Mark Bellhorn, and the team's increased emphasis on on-base percentage. After the Red Sox suffered through a disastrous 2012 season, Henry stated that James had fallen "out of favor [in the front office] over the last few years for reasons I really don’t understand. We’ve gotten him more involved recently in the central process and that will help greatly." During his time with the Red Sox, Bill James has received two World Series rings for the team's 2004 and 2007 victories. 
In cultureJames was profiled on 60 Minutes on March 30, 2008, in his role as a sabermetric pioneer and Red Sox advisor.James made a guest appearance on the Simpsons episode "MoneyBART". Stephen Soderbergh's planned film adaptation of Moneyball would have featured an animated version of James as a "host".   This script was discarded when director Bennett Miller and writer Aaron Sorkin succeeded Soderbergh on the project.Ultimately, the film as produced mentions James several times. His unlikely bio is briefly recapped, and Billy Beane is depicted telling John Henry that Henry's hiring of James is the reason Beane is interested in the Red Sox general manager job.
Dowd Report controversyIn his Baseball Book 1990, James heavily criticized the methodology of the Dowd Report, which was an investigation (commissioned by baseball commissioner Bart Giamatti) on the gambling activities of Pete Rose.  James reproached commissioner Giamatti and his successor, Fay Vincent, for their acceptance of the Dowd Report as the final word on Rose's gambling.James expanded his defense of Rose in his 2001 book The New Historical Baseball Abstract, with a detailed explanation of why he found the case against Rose flimsy. James wrote "I would characterize the evidence that Rose bet on baseball as...well, not quite non-existent. It is extremely weak."  This countered the popular opinion that the case against Rose was a slam dunk, and several critics claimed that James misstated some of the evidence in his defense of Rose. Derek Zumsteg of Baseball Prospectus wrote an exhaustive review of the case James made and concluded: "James' defense of Rose is filled with oversights, errors in judgment, failures in research, and is a great disservice to the many people who have looked to him for a balanced and fair take on this complicated and important issue." In 2004, Rose admitted publicly that he had bet on baseball and confirmed the Dowd Report was correct. James remained steadfast, continuing to insist that the evidence available to Dowd at the time was insufficient to reach the conclusion that it did.
Attacks on Dick AllenChuck Tanner who managed the World Series winning 1979 Pittsburgh Pirates said about James that  "He's full of shit, and you be sure to tell him that." when James said Dick Allen was a cancer in the clubhouse. Tanner had managed Allen earlier in the decade  with the Chicago White Sox. James also claimed that Allen  was to blame for the collapse of the 1965 Philadelphia Phillies because of a fight with Frank Thomas. However according to teammate Pat Corrales Thomas was a bigot who swung a bat at Allen. Phillies manager Gene Mauch said about Allen, ""Never. His teammates always liked him. You could go forever and not meet a more charming fellow." 
Paterno controversyOn November 4, 2011, Jerry Sandusky was indicted for committing sex crimes against young boys, which brought the Penn State child sex abuse scandal to national attention.  On December 11, 2011, James published an article called "The Trial of Penn State", depicting an imaginary trial in which Penn State defended itself against charges of "acting rashly and irresponsibly in the matter of Joe Paterno, in such a manner that [they] defamed, libeled and slandered Paterno, unfairly demolishing his reputation."   On July 12, 2012, the Freeh report was released, charging Paterno and three other University officials with covering up reports of sexual assaults and enabling the attacker to prey on other children for more than a decade, often in Penn State facilities.  Soon afterwards, during an interview on ESPN radio, James claimed that the Freeh report's characterizations of Paterno as a powerful figure were wrong, and that it wasn't Paterno's responsibility to report allegations of child molestation to the police. "[Paterno] had very few allies. He was isolated and he was not nearly as powerful as people imagine him to have been."    When asked if he knew anyone who had showered with a boy they were not related to, James said it was a common practice when he was growing up.  "That was actually quite common in the town I grew up in. That was quite common in America 40 years ago."   The July 2012 interview comments were widely criticized.         Rob Neyer wrote in defense of James.   James' employer, the Boston Red Sox, issued a statement disavowing the comments James made and saying that he has been asked not to make further public comments on the matter. 
Other activitiesJames is a fan of the University of Kansas men's basketball team and has written about basketball. He has created a formula for what he calls a "safe lead" in the sport.  James has written a true crime book titled Popular Crime: Reflections on the Celebration of Violence. 
Bibliography

Bill James Baseball Abstract (annual editions published 1977-1988)
The Bill James Historical Baseball Abstract (1985;  revised edition 1988)
This Time Let's Not Eat the Bones (1989)
The Bill James Baseball Book (annual editions published 1990-1992)
The Politics of Glory (1994) (revised as Whatever Happened to the Hall of Fame?)
The Bill James Player Ratings Book (annual editions published 1993-1996)
The Bill James Guide to Baseball Managers (1997)
The New Bill James Historical Baseball Abstract (2001)
Win Shares (2002)
The Bill James Handbook (annual editions published 2003–present)
The Neyer/James Guide to Pitchers (2004, with co-author Rob Neyer)
The Bill James Gold Mine (annual editions published 2008–2010)
Popular Crime - Reflections on the Celebration of Violence (ISBN 978-1-4165-5273-4, published 2011)
Solid Fool's Gold (2011)


Books about James


The Mind of Bill James (2006)
How Bill James Changed Our View of Baseball: by Colleagues, Critics, Competitors and Just Plain Fans (2007)


See also 

Baseball Prospectus
Defensive spectrum
Keltner list
Rain Delay (essay)
Similarity score
Win shares


Notes 
References

 


Further reading

 


External links

Bill James Online (Interactions with Bill James through statistics, articles, conversations and more)
Works of Bill James
Audio interview with James on public radio program The Sound of Young America
Lawrence Journal-World article
Bill James Interview at Baseball Digest Daily - Part I
Bill James Interview at Baseball Digest Daily - Part II
Bill James Interview at Baseball Digest Daily - Part III
New Yorker Article about Bill James
WSJ profile
Does Bill James Belong in the Hall of Fame?
 
  sports}} 
 
DEFAULTSORT









 
 
	Bette Davis
 
 Ruth Elizabeth "Bette" Davis (April 5, 1908 – October 6, 1989) was an American actress of film, television and theater. Noted for her willingness to play unsympathetic characters, she was highly regarded for her performances in a range of film genres, from contemporary crime melodramas to historical and period films and occasional comedies, although her greatest successes were her roles in romantic dramas.After appearing in Broadway plays, Davis moved to Hollywood in 1930, but her early films for Universal Studios were unsuccessful. She joined Warner Bros. in 1932 and established her career with several critically acclaimed performances. In 1937, she attempted to free herself from her contract and although she lost a well-publicized legal case, it marked the beginning of the most successful period of her career. Until the late 1940s, she was one of American cinema's most celebrated leading ladies, known for her forceful and intense style. Davis gained a reputation as a perfectionist who could be highly combative, and confrontations with studio executives, film directors and costars were often reported. Her forthright manner, clipped vocal style and ubiquitous cigarette contributed to a public persona which has often been imitated and satirized.Davis was the co-founder of the Hollywood Canteen, and was the first female president of the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences. She won the Academy Award for Best Actress twice, was the first person to accrue 10 Academy Award nominations for acting, and was the first woman to receive a Lifetime Achievement Award from the American Film Institute. Her career went through several periods of eclipse, and she admitted that her success had often been at the expense of her personal relationships. Married four times, she was once widowed and thrice divorced, and raised her children as a single parent. Her final years were marred by a long period of ill health, but she continued acting until shortly before her death from breast cancer, with more than 100 films, television and theater roles to her credit. 
In 1999, Davis was placed second, after Katharine Hepburn, on the American Film Institute's list of the greatest female stars of all time.
Life and career
Background and early acting career (1908–1929)Ruth Elizabeth Davis, known from early childhood as "Betty", was born in Lowell, Massachusetts, the daughter of Ruth Augusta "Ruthie" (née Favor) and Harlow Morrell Davis, a patent attorney;  her sister, Barbara "Bobby", was born October 25, 1909. The family was Protestant, of English, French, and Welsh ancestry. In 1915, Davis's parents separated and Betty and Bobby attended a Spartan boarding school called Crestalban in Lanesborough, which is located in the Berkshires.  In 1921, Ruth Davis moved to New York City with her daughters, where she worked as a portrait photographer. Betty was inspired to become an actress after seeing Rudolph Valentino in The Four Horsemen of the Apocalypse (1921) and Mary Pickford in Little Lord Fauntleroy (1921),  and changed the spelling of her name to "Bette" after Honoré de Balzac's La Cousine Bette.  She received encouragement from her mother, who had aspired to become an actress.She attended Cushing Academy, a boarding school in Ashburnham, Massachusetts, where she met her future husband, Harmon O. Nelson, known as "Ham". In 1926, she saw a production of Henrik Ibsen's The Wild Duck with Blanche Yurka and Peg Entwistle. Davis later recalled that it inspired her full commitment to her chosen career, and said, "Before that performance I wanted to be an actress. When it ended, I had to be an actress ... exactly like Peg Entwistle."  She auditioned for admission to Eva LeGallienne's Manhattan Civic Repertory, but was rejected by LeGallienne who described her attitude as "insincere" and "frivolous".  She was accepted by the John Murray Anderson School of Theatre, and studied dance with Martha Graham.She auditioned for George Cukor's stock theater company, and although he was not very impressed, he gave Davis her first paid acting assignment anyway—a one-week stint playing the part of a chorus girl in the play Broadway. She was later chosen to play Hedwig, the character she had seen Entwistle play, in The Wild Duck. After performing in Philadelphia, Washington and Boston, she made her Broadway debut in 1929 in Broken Dishes, and followed it with Solid South. A Universal Studios talent scout saw her perform and invited her to Hollywood for a screen test.
Early years in Hollywood (1930–1936)Accompanied by her mother, Davis traveled by train to Hollywood, arriving on December 13, 1930. She later recounted her surprise that nobody from the studio was there to meet her; a studio employee had waited for her, but left because he saw nobody who "looked like an actress". She failed her first screen test but was used in several screen tests for other actors. In a 1971 interview with Dick Cavett, she related the experience with the observation, "I was the most Yankee-est, most modest virgin who ever walked the earth. They laid me on a couch, and I tested fifteen men ... They all had to lie on top of me and give me a passionate kiss. Oh, I thought I would die. Just thought I would die."  A second test was arranged for Davis, for the film A House Divided (1931). Hastily dressed in an ill-fitting costume with a low neckline, she was rebuffed by the director William Wyler, who loudly commented to the assembled crew, "What do you think of these dames who show their chests and think they can get jobs?"  Carl Laemmle, the head of Universal Studios, considered terminating Davis's employment, but cinematographer Karl Freund told him she had "lovely eyes" and would be suitable for The Bad Sister (1931), in which she subsequently made her film debut.  Her nervousness was compounded when she overheard the Chief of Production, Carl Laemmle, Jr., comment to another executive that she had "about as much sex appeal as Slim Summerville", one of the film's co-stars.  The film was not a success, and her next role in Seed (1931) was too brief to attract attention.Universal Studios renewed her contract for three months, and she appeared in a small role in Waterloo Bridge (1931) before being lent to Columbia Pictures for The Menace and to Capital Films for Hell's House (all 1932). After nine months, and six unsuccessful films, Laemmle elected not to renew her contract. George Arliss chose Davis for the lead female role in The Man Who Played God (1932), and for the rest of her life, Davis credited him with helping her achieve her "break" in Hollywood. The Saturday Evening Post wrote, "she is not only beautiful, but she bubbles with charm", and compared her to Constance Bennett and Olive Borden.  Warner Bros. signed her to a five-year contract.In 1932, she married Harmon "Ham" Nelson, who was scrutinized by the press; his $100 a week earnings compared unfavorably with Davis's reported $1,000 a week income. Davis addressed the issue in an interview, pointing out that many Hollywood wives earned more than their husbands, but the situation proved difficult for Nelson, who refused to allow Davis to purchase a house until he could afford to pay for it himself.  Davis had several abortions during the marriage. After more than 20 film roles, the role of the vicious and slatternly Mildred Rogers in the RKO Radio production of Of Human Bondage (1934), a film adaptation of W. Somerset Maugham's novel, earned Davis her first major critical acclaim. Many actresses feared playing unsympathetic characters and several had refused the role, but Davis viewed it as an opportunity to show the range of her acting skills. Her costar, Leslie Howard, was initially dismissive of her, but as filming progressed his attitude changed and he subsequently spoke highly of her abilities. The director, John Cromwell, allowed her relative freedom, and commented, "I let Bette have her head. I trusted her instincts." She insisted that she be portrayed realistically in her death scene, and said, "the last stages of consumption, poverty and neglect are not pretty and I intended to be convincing-looking". The film was a success, and Davis's confronting characterization won praise from critics, with Life magazine writing that she gave "probably the best performance ever recorded on the screen by a U.S. actress".  Davis anticipated that her reception would encourage Warner Bros. to cast her in more important roles, and was disappointed when Jack Warner refused to lend her to Columbia Studios to appear in It Happened One Night, and instead cast her in the melodrama Housewife.  When Davis was not nominated for an Academy Award for Of Human Bondage, The Hollywood Citizen News questioned the omission and Norma Shearer, herself a nominee, joined a campaign to have Davis nominated. This prompted an announcement from the Academy president, Howard Estabrook, who said that under the circumstances "any voter ... may write on the ballot his or her personal choice for the winners", thus allowing, for the only time in the Academy's history, the consideration of a candidate not officially nominated for an award. Wiley (1987), p 55  Claudette Colbert won the award for It Happened One Night but the uproar led to a change in Academy voting procedures the following year, whereby nominations were determined by votes from all eligible members of a particular branch, rather than by a smaller committee,  with results independently tabulated by the accounting firm Price Waterhouse. Davis appeared in Dangerous (1935) as a troubled actress and received very good reviews. E. Arnot Robertson wrote in Picture Post, "I think Bette Davis would probably have been burned as a witch if she had lived two or three hundred years ago. She gives the curious feeling of being charged with power which can find no ordinary outlet." The New York Times hailed her as "becoming one of the most interesting of our screen actresses".  She won the Academy Award for Best Actress for the role, but commented it was belated recognition for Of Human Bondage, calling the award a "consolation prize".  For the rest of her life, Davis maintained that she gave the statue its familiar name of "Oscar" because its posterior resembled that of her husband, whose middle name was Oscar,   although her claim has been disputed by the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences, among others.In her next film, The Petrified Forest (1936), Davis co-starred with Leslie Howard and Humphrey Bogart, but Bogart, in his first important role, received most of the critics' praise. Davis appeared in several films over the next two years but most were poorly received.
Legal case
Convinced that her career was being damaged by a succession of mediocre films, Davis accepted an offer in 1936 to appear in two films in Britain. Knowing that she was breaching her contract with Warner Bros., she fled to Canada to avoid legal papers being served upon her. Eventually, Davis brought her case to court in Britain, hoping to get out of her contract with Warner Bros. Sperling, Millner, and Warner, p. 219-221.  She later recalled the opening statement of the barrister, Sir Patrick Hastings, who represented Warner Bros. Hastings urged the court to "come to the conclusion that this is rather a naughty young lady and that what she wants is more money". He mocked Davis's description of her contract as "slavery" by stating, incorrectly, that she was being paid $1,350 per week. He remarked, "if anybody wants to put me into perpetual servitude on the basis of that remuneration, I shall prepare to consider it." The British press offered little support to Davis, and portrayed her as overpaid and ungrateful. Davis explained her viewpoint to a journalist, saying "I knew that, if I continued to appear in any more mediocre pictures, I would have no career left worth fighting for."  Davis's counsel presented her complaints—that she could be suspended without pay for refusing a part, with the period of suspension added to her contract, that she could be called upon to play any part within her abilities regardless of her personal beliefs, that she could be required to support a political party against her beliefs, and that her image and likeness could be displayed in any manner deemed applicable by the studio. Jack Warner testified, and was asked, "Whatever part you choose to call upon her to play, if she thinks she can play it, whether it is distasteful and cheap, she has to play it?" Warner replied, "Yes, she must play it."  The case, decided by Branson J. in the English High Court, was reported as Warner Bros. Studios Incorporated v. Nelson in [1937] 1 KB 209. Davis lost the case and returned to Hollywood, in debt and without income, to resume her career. Olivia de Havilland mounted a similar case in 1943 and won.
Success with Warner Bros. (1937–1941)Davis began work on Marked Woman (1937), as a prostitute in a contemporary gangster drama inspired by the case of Lucky Luciano. For her performance in the film she was awarded the Volpi Cup at the 1937 Venice Film Festival.  Her next picture was Jezebel (1938), and during production Davis entered a relationship with director William Wyler. She later described him as the "love of my life", and said that making the film with him was "the time in my life of my most perfect happiness".  The film was a success, and Davis's performance as a spoiled Southern belle earned her a second Academy Award, which led to speculation in the press that she would be chosen to play a similar character, Scarlett O'Hara, in Gone with the Wind. Davis expressed her desire to play Scarlett, and while David O. Selznick was conducting a search for the actress to play the role, a radio poll named her as the audience favorite. Warner offered her services to Selznick as part of a deal that also included Errol Flynn and Olivia de Havilland, but Selznick did not consider Davis as suitable, and rejected the offer,  while Davis did not want Flynn cast as Rhett Butler.Jezebel marked the beginning of the most successful phase of Davis's career, and over the next few years she was listed in the annual "Quigley Poll of the Top Ten Money Making Stars", which was compiled from the votes of movie exhibitors throughout the U.S. for the stars that had generated the most revenue in their theaters over the previous year.  In contrast to Davis's success, her husband, Ham Nelson, had failed to establish a career for himself, and their relationship faltered. In 1938, Nelson obtained evidence that Davis was engaged in a sexual relationship with Howard Hughes and subsequently filed for divorce citing Davis's "cruel and inhuman manner". She was emotional during the making of her next film, Dark Victory (1939), and considered abandoning it until the producer Hal B. Wallis convinced her to channel her despair into her acting. The film became one of the highest grossing films of the year, and the role of Judith Traherne brought her an Academy Award nomination. In later years, Davis cited this performance as her personal favorite.  She appeared in three other box office hits in 1939, The Old Maid with Miriam Hopkins, Juarez with Paul Muni and The Private Lives of Elizabeth and Essex with Errol Flynn. The latter was her first color film and her only color film made during the height of her career. To play the elderly Elizabeth I of England, Davis shaved her hairline and eyebrows. During filming she was visited on the set by the actor Charles Laughton. She commented that she had a "nerve" playing a woman in her sixties, to which Laughton replied, "Never not dare to hang yourself. That's the only way you grow in your profession. You must continually attempt things that you think are beyond you, or you get into a complete rut." Recalling the episode many years later, Davis remarked that Laughton's advice had influenced her throughout her career. By this time, Davis was Warner Bros.' most profitable star, and she was given the most important of their female leading roles. Her image was considered with more care; although she continued to play character roles, she was often filmed in close-ups that emphasized her distinctive eyes. All This and Heaven Too (1940) was the most financially successful film of Davis's career to that point, while The Letter (1940) was considered "one of the best pictures of the year" by The Hollywood Reporter, and Davis won admiration for her portrayal of an adulterous killer, a role originated by famed actress Katharine Cornell.  During this time, she was in a relationship with her former costar George Brent, who proposed marriage. Davis refused, as she had met Arthur Farnsworth, a New England innkeeper. Davis and Farnsworth were married at Home Ranch, in Lake Montezuma, Arizona, in December 1940.In January 1941, Davis became the first female president of the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences but antagonized the committee members with her brash manner and radical proposals. Faced with the disapproval and resistance of the committee, Davis resigned, and was succeeded by Jean Hersholt, who implemented the changes she had suggested. Davis starred in three movies in 1941, the first being The Great Lie, opposite George Brent. It was a refreshingly different role for Davis, as she played a kind, sympathetic character. Brent tickled Davis during many of the film's scenes, which allowed the audience, used to Davis' strong-willed character, a rare glimpse of her succumbing to giggles and squirms. William Wyler directed Davis for the third time in Lillian Hellman's The Little Foxes (RKO, 1941), but they clashed over the character of Regina Giddens. Taking a role originally played on stage by Tallulah Bankhead, Davis felt Bankhead's original interpretation was appropriate and followed Hellman's intent, but Wyler wanted her to soften the character. Davis refused to compromise. She received another Academy Award nomination for her performance, and never worked with Wyler again.
War effort and personal tragedy (1942–1944)Following the attack on Pearl Harbor, Davis spent the early months of 1942 selling war bonds. After Jack Warner criticized her tendency to cajole crowds into buying, she reminded him that her audiences responded most strongly to her "bitch" performances. She sold two million dollars worth of bonds in two days, as well as a picture of herself in Jezebel for $250,000. She also performed for black regiments as the only white member of an acting troupe formed by Hattie McDaniel, which included Lena Horne and Ethel Waters. At John Garfield's suggestion of opening a servicemen's club in Hollywood, Davis—with the aid of Warner, Cary Grant and Jule Styne—transformed an old nightclub into the Hollywood Canteen, which opened on October 3, 1942. Hollywood's most important stars volunteered to entertain servicemen. Davis ensured that every night there would be a few important "names" for the visiting soldiers to meet.  She appeared as herself in the film Hollywood Canteen (1944), which used the canteen as the setting for a fictional story. Davis later commented, "There are few accomplishments in my life that I am sincerely proud of. The Hollywood Canteen is one of them." In 1980, she was awarded the Distinguished Civilian Service Medal, the United States Department of Defense's highest civilian award, for her work with the Hollywood Canteen.   Davis showed little interest in the film Now, Voyager (1942) until Hal Wallis advised her that female audiences needed romantic dramas to distract them from the reality of their lives. It became one of the best known of her "women's pictures." In one of the film's most imitated scenes, Paul Henreid lights two cigarettes as he stares into Davis's eyes and passes one to her. Film reviewers complimented Davis on her performance, the National Board of Review commenting that she gave the film "a dignity not fully warranted by the script". During the early 1940s, several of Davis's film choices were influenced by the war, such as Watch on the Rhine (1943), by Lillian Hellman, and Thank Your Lucky Stars (1943), a lighthearted all-star musical cavalcade, with each of the featured stars donating their fee to the Hollywood Canteen. Davis performed a novelty song, "They're Either Too Young or Too Old", which became a hit record after the film's release. Old Acquaintance (1943) reunited her with Miriam Hopkins in a story of two old friends who deal with the tensions created when one of them becomes a successful novelist. Davis felt that Hopkins tried to upstage her throughout the film. Director Vincent Sherman recalled the intense competitiveness and animosity between the two actresses, and Davis often joked that she held back nothing in a scene in which she was required to shake Hopkins in a fit of anger. In August 1943, Davis's husband, Arthur Farnsworth, collapsed while walking along a Hollywood street and died two days later. An autopsy revealed that his fall had been caused by a skull fracture he had suffered two weeks earlier. Davis testified before an inquest that she knew of no event that might have caused the injury. A finding of accidental death was reached. Highly distraught, Davis attempted to withdraw from her next film Mr. Skeffington (1944); but Jack Warner, who had halted production following Farnsworth's death, convinced her to continue. Although she had gained a reputation for being forthright and demanding, her behavior during filming of Mr. Skeffington was erratic and out of character. She alienated Vincent Sherman by refusing to film certain scenes and insisting that some sets be rebuilt. She improvised dialogue, causing confusion among other actors, and infuriated the writer, Julius Epstein, who was called upon to rewrite scenes at her whim. Davis later explained her actions with the observation, "when I was most unhappy I lashed out rather than whined". Some reviewers criticized Davis for the excess of her performance; James Agee wrote that she "demonstrates the horrors of egocentricity on a marathonic scale";  but despite the mixed reviews, she received another Academy Award nomination.
Professional setbacks (1945–1949)In 1945, Davis married artist William Grant Sherry, who also, when necessary, worked as a masseur. She had been drawn to him because he claimed he had never heard of her and was, therefore, not intimidated by her.  The same year, Davis refused the title role in Mildred Pierce (1945),  a role for which Joan Crawford won an Academy Award, and instead made The Corn Is Green (1945) based on a play by Emlyn Williams. Davis played Miss Moffat, an English teacher who saves a young Welsh miner (John Dall) from a life in the coal pits, by offering him education. The part had been played in the theatre by Ethel Barrymore, but Warner Bros. felt that the film version should depict the character as a younger woman. Davis disagreed and insisted on playing the part as written and wore a gray wig and padding under her clothes, to create a dowdy appearance.  The film was well received by critics and made a profit of $2.2 million.  The critic E. Arnot Robertson observed that "only Bette Davis . . . could have combated so successfully the obvious intention of the adaptors of the play to make frustrated sex the mainspring of the chief character's interest in the young miner." He concluded that "the subtle interpretation she insisted on giving" kept the focus on the teacher's "sheer joy in imparting knowledge". Her next film, A Stolen Life (1946), was the first and only film that Davis made with her own production company, BD Productions.  Davis played dual roles, as twins. The film received poor reviews and was described by Bosley Crowther as "a distressingly empty piece";  but, with a profit of $2.5 million, it was one of her biggest box-office successes.  In 1947, the U.S. Treasury named Davis as the highest paid woman in the country,  with her share of the film's profit accounting for most of her earnings. Her next film was Deception (1946), the first of her films to lose money. Possessed (1947) had been tailor-made for Davis  and was to have been her next project after Deception. However, she was pregnant and went on maternity leave. Joan Crawford played her role in Possessed and was nominated for an Academy Award as Best Actress. In 1947, at the age of 39, Davis gave birth to a daughter, Barbara Davis Sherry (known as B.D.) and later wrote in her memoir that she became absorbed in motherhood and considered ending her career. However, her relationship with Sherry began to deteriorate and she continued making films, but her popularity with audiences was steadily declining. Among the film roles offered to Davis following her return to film making was Rose Sayer in The African Queen (1951). When informed that the film was to be made in Africa, Davis refused the part, telling Jack Warner, "If you can't shoot the picture in a boat on the back lot, then I'm not interested." Katharine Hepburn played the role.  Davis was also offered a role in a film version of the Virginia Kellogg prison drama Women Without Men. Originally intended to pair Davis with Joan Crawford, Davis made it clear that she would not appear in any "dyke movie". It was filmed as Caged (1950), and the lead roles were played by Eleanor Parker and Agnes Moorehead.  She lobbied Jack Warner to make two films, Ethan Frome and a biography of Mary Todd Lincoln; however, Warner vetoed each proposal. 
In 1948, Davis was cast in the melodrama Winter Meeting; and, although she was initially enthusiastic, she soon learned that Warner had arranged for "softer" lighting to be used to disguise her age. She recalled that she had seen the same lighting technique "on the sets of Ruth Chatterton and Kay Francis, and I knew what they meant".  She began to regret accepting the role; and, to add to her disappointment, she was not confident in the abilities of her leading man, James Davis in his first major screen role. She disagreed with amendments made to the script because of censorship restrictions and found that many of the aspects of the role that had initially appealed to her had been cut. The film was later described by Bosley Crowther as "interminable"; and he noted that "of all the miserable dilemmas in which Miss Davis has been involved ... this one is probably the worst". It failed at the box office, and the studio lost nearly one million dollars. While making June Bride (1948), Davis clashed with co-star Robert Montgomery, later describing him as "a male Miriam Hopkins... an excellent actor, but addicted to scene-stealing".  The film marked her first comedy in several years and earned her some positive reviews; but it was not particularly popular with audiences and returned only a small profit. Despite the lackluster box office receipts from her more recent films, in 1949, she negotiated a four-film contract with Warner Bros., which paid $10,285 per week and made her the highest-paid woman in the United States.  Jack Warner refused to allow her script approval, however, and cast her in Beyond the Forest (1949). Davis reportedly loathed the script and begged Warner to recast the role, but he refused. After the film was completed, Warner released Davis from her contract, at her request. The reviews that followed were scathing; Dorothy Manners writing for the Los Angeles Examiner described the film as "an unfortunate finale to her brilliant career".  Hedda Hopper wrote, "If Bette had deliberately set out to wreck her career, she could not have picked a more appropriate vehicle."  The film contained the line, "What a dump!", which became closely associated with Davis after it was referenced in Edward Albee's Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf?, and impersonators began to use it in their acts. In later years, Davis often used it as her opening line at speaking engagements.
Starting a freelance career (1949–1960)By 1949, Davis and Sherry were estranged and Hollywood columnists were writing that Davis's career was at an end. She filmed The Story of a Divorce (released by RKO Radio Pictures in 1951 as Payment on Demand) but had received no other offers. Shortly before filming was completed, the producer Darryl F. Zanuck offered her the role of the aging theatrical actress Margo Channing in All About Eve (1950). Claudette Colbert, for whom the part had been written, had severely injured her back, and she was unable to continue. Davis read the script, described it as the best she had ever read, and accepted the role. Within days she joined the cast in San Francisco to begin filming. During production, she established what would become a lifelong friendship with her costar, Anne Baxter, and a romantic relationship with her leading man, Gary Merrill, which led to marriage. The film's director Joseph L. Mankiewicz later remarked, "Bette was letter perfect. She was syllable-perfect. The director's dream: the prepared actress." Critics responded positively to Davis's performance and several of her lines became well-known, particularly, "Fasten your seatbelts, it's going to be a bumpy night." She was again nominated for an Academy Award and critics such as Gene Ringgold described her Margo as her "all-time best performance".  Pauline Kael wrote that much of Mankiewicz's vision of "the theater" was "nonsense" but commended Davis, writing "[the film is] saved by one performance that is the real thing: Bette Davis is at her most instinctive and assured. Her actress–vain, scared, a woman who goes too far in her reactions and emotions–makes the whole thing come alive."  Davis won a "Best Actress" award from the Cannes Film Festival, and the New York Film Critics Circle Award. She also received the San Francisco Film Critics Circle Award as "Best Actress", having been named by them as the "Worst Actress" of 1949 for Beyond the Forest. During this time she was invited to leave her handprints in the forecourt of Grauman's Chinese Theatre.On July 3, 1950 Davis's divorce from William Sherry was finalized, and on July 28 she married Gary Merrill. With Sherry's consent, Merrill adopted B.D., Davis's daughter with Sherry, and in 1950, Davis and Merrill adopted a baby girl they named Margot. The family traveled to England, where Davis and Merrill starred in a murder-mystery film, Another Man's Poison (1951). When it received lukewarm reviews and failed at the box office, Hollywood columnists wrote that Davis's comeback had petered out, and an Academy Award nomination for The Star (1952) did not halt her decline.Davis and Merrill adopted a baby boy, Michael, in 1952, and Davis appeared in a Broadway revue, Two's Company directed by Jules Dassin. She was uncomfortable working outside of her area of expertise; she had never been a musical performer and her limited theater experience had been more than 20 years earlier. She was also severely ill and was operated on for osteomyelitis of the jaw. Margot was diagnosed as severely brain damaged due to an injury sustained during or shortly after her birth, and was eventually placed in an institution. Davis and Merrill began arguing frequently, with B.D. later recalling episodes of alcohol abuse and domestic violence. Few of Davis's films of the 1950s were successful and many of her performances were condemned by critics. The Hollywood Reporter wrote of mannerisms "that you'd expect to find in a nightclub impersonation of [Davis]", while the London critic, Richard Winninger, wrote, "Miss Davis, with more say than most stars as to what films she makes, seems to have lapsed into egoism. The criterion for her choice of film would appear to be that nothing must compete with the full display of each facet of the Davis art. Only bad films are good enough for her."  Her films of this period included The Virgin Queen (1955), Storm Center (1956), and The Catered Affair (1956). As her career declined, her marriage continued to deteriorate until she filed for divorce in 1960. The following year, her mother died. During the same time, she tried television, appearing in three episodes of the popular NBC western Wagon Train as three different characters in 1959 and 1961.
Renewed success (1961–1970)In 1961, Davis opened in the Broadway production The Night of the Iguana to mostly mediocre reviews, and left the production after four months due to "chronic illness". She then joined Glenn Ford and Ann-Margret for the Frank Capra film A Pocketful of Miracles (1961) (a remake of Capra's 1933 film, Lady for a Day), based on a story by Damon Runyon. She accepted her next role, in the Grand Guignol horror film What Ever Happened to Baby Jane? (1962) after reading the script and believing it could appeal to the same audience that had recently made Alfred Hitchcock's Psycho (1960) a success. She negotiated a deal that would pay her 10 percent of the worldwide gross profits, in addition to her salary. The film became one of the year's biggest successes. Davis and Joan Crawford played two aging sisters, former actresses forced by circumstance to share a decaying Hollywood mansion. The director, Robert Aldrich, explained that Davis and Crawford were each aware of how important the film was to their respective careers and commented, "It's proper to say that they really detested each other, but they behaved absolutely perfectly."  After filming was completed, their public comments against each other allowed the tension to develop into a lifelong feud. When Davis was nominated for an Academy Award, Crawford contacted the other Best Actress nominees (who were unable to attend the ceremonies) and offered to accept the award on their behalf should they win. Davis also received her only BAFTA Award nomination for this performance. Daughter B.D. played a small role in the film and when she and Davis visited the Cannes Film Festival to promote it, she met Jeremy Hyman, an executive for Seven Arts Productions. After a short courtship, she married Hyman at the age of 16, with Davis's permission.In early 1963 while Raymond Burr was recovering from surgery, Davis guest starred in the first of four episodes of Perry Mason, with Burr doing only cameo roles.  She portrayed a recently widowed attorney who defended Cal Leonard accused of murdering his cousin in "The Case of Constant Doyle."  Davis portrayed the title character in that episode.  In September 1962, Davis placed an advertisement in Variety under the heading of "Situations wanted—women artists", which read, "Mother of three—10, 11 & 15—divorcee. American. Thirty years experience as an actress in Motion Pictures. Mobile still and more affable than rumor would have it. Wants steady employment in Hollywood. (Has had Broadway)." 
   Davis said that she intended it as a joke, and she sustained her comeback over the course of several years. Dead Ringer (1964) was a crime drama in which she played twin sisters and Where Love Has Gone (1964) was a romantic drama based on a Harold Robbins novel. Davis played the mother of Susan Hayward but filming was hampered by heated arguments between Davis and Hayward.  Hush… Hush, Sweet Charlotte (1964) was Robert Aldrich's follow-up to What Ever Happened to Baby Jane?, in which he planned to reunite Davis and Crawford, but when Crawford withdrew allegedly due to illness soon after filming began, she was replaced by Olivia de Havilland. The film was a considerable success and brought renewed attention to its veteran cast, which also included Joseph Cotten, Mary Astor and Agnes Moorehead. The following year, Davis was cast as the lead in an Aaron Spelling sitcom, The Decorator.  A pilot episode was filmed, but was not shown, and the project was terminated. By the end of the decade, Davis had appeared in the British films The Nanny (1965), The Anniversary (1968), and Connecting Rooms (1970), but her career again stalled.
Late career (1971–1983)In the early 1970s, Davis was invited to appear in New York, in a stage presentation, Great Ladies of the American Cinema. Over five successive nights, a different female star discussed her career and answered questions from the audience; Myrna Loy, Rosalind Russell, Lana Turner, Sylvia Sidney, and Joan Crawford were the other participants. Davis was well received and was invited to tour Australia with the similarly themed, Bette Davis in Person and on Film, and its success allowed her to take the production to the United Kingdom. In 1972, she played the lead role in two television films that were each intended as pilots for upcoming series for NBC, Madame Sin with Robert Wagner, and The Judge and Jake Wyler, with Joan Van Ark, but in each case, NBC decided against producing a series. She appeared in the stage production, Miss Moffat, a musical adaptation of her film The Corn is Green, but after the show was panned by the Philadelphia critics during its pre-Broadway run, she cited a back injury and abandoned the show, which closed immediately. She played supporting roles in Burnt Offerings (1976) and The Disappearance of Aimee (1976), but clashed with Karen Black and Faye Dunaway, the stars of the two respective productions, because she felt that neither extended her an appropriate degree of respect, and that their behavior on the film sets was unprofessional. In 1977, Davis became the first woman to receive the American Film Institute's Lifetime Achievement Award. The televised event included comments from several of Davis's colleagues including William Wyler who joked that given the chance Davis would still like to refilm a scene from The Letter to which Davis nodded. Jane Fonda, Henry Fonda, Natalie Wood and Olivia de Havilland were among the actors who paid tribute, with de Havilland commenting that Davis "got the roles I always wanted".  Following the telecast she found herself in demand again, often having to choose between several offers. She accepted roles in the television miniseries The Dark Secret of Harvest Home (1978) and the theatrical film Death on the Nile (1978), an Agatha Christie murder mystery. The bulk of her remaining work was for television. She won an Emmy Award for Strangers: The Story of a Mother and Daughter (1979) with Gena Rowlands, and was nominated for her performances in White Mama (1980) and Little Gloria... Happy at Last (1982). She also played supporting roles in two Disney films, Return from Witch Mountain (1978) and The Watcher in the Woods (1980).Davis's name became well-known to a younger audience when Kim Carnes's song "Bette Davis Eyes" became a worldwide hit and the best-selling record of 1981 in the U.S., where it stayed at number one on the music charts for more than two months. Davis's grandson was impressed that she was the subject of a hit song and Davis considered it a compliment, writing to both Carnes and the songwriters, and accepting the gift of gold and platinum records from Carnes, and hanging them on her wall.   She continued acting for television, appearing in Family Reunion (1981) opposite her grandson J. Ashley Hyman, A Piano for Mrs. Cimino (1982) and Right of Way (1983) with James Stewart. In 1983, she was awarded the Women in Film Crystal Award.   
Illness, conflict and death (1983–1989)In 1983, after filming the pilot episode for the television series Hotel, Davis was diagnosed with breast cancer and underwent a mastectomy. Within two weeks of her surgery she suffered four strokes which caused paralysis in the left side of her face and in her left arm, and left her with slurred speech. She commenced a lengthy period of physical therapy and, aided by her personal assistant, Kathryn Sermak, gained partial recovery from the paralysis.During this time, her relationship with her daughter, B. D. Hyman, deteriorated when Hyman became a born-again Christian and attempted to persuade Davis to follow suit. With her health stable, she traveled to England to film the Agatha Christie mystery Murder with Mirrors (1985). Upon her return, she learned that Hyman had published a memoir, My Mother's Keeper, in which she chronicled a difficult mother-daughter relationship and depicted scenes of Davis's overbearing and drunken behavior. Several of Davis's friends commented that Hyman's depictions of events were not accurate; one said, "so much of the book is out of context". Mike Wallace rebroadcast a 60 Minutes interview he had filmed with Hyman a few years earlier in which she commended Davis on her skills as a mother, and said that she had adopted many of Davis's principles in raising her own children. Critics of Hyman noted that Davis had financially supported the Hyman family for several years and had recently saved them from losing their house. Despite the acrimony of their divorce years earlier, Gary Merrill also defended Davis. Interviewed by CNN, Merrill said that Hyman was motivated by "cruelty and greed". Davis's adopted son, Michael Merrill, ended contact with Hyman and refused to speak to her again, as did Davis, who also disinherited her.  In her second memoir, This 'N That (1987), Davis wrote, "I am still recovering from the fact that a child of mine would write about me behind my back, to say nothing about the kind of book it is. I will never recover as completely from B.D.'s book as I have from the stroke. Both were shattering experiences." Her memoir concluded with a letter to her daughter, in which she addressed her several times as "Hyman", and described her actions as "a glaring lack of loyalty and thanks for the very privileged life I feel you have been given". She concluded with a reference to the title of Hyman's book, "If it refers to money, if my memory serves me right, I've been your keeper all these many years. I am continuing to do so, as my name has made your book about me a success." Davis appeared in the television film As Summers Die (1986) and Lindsay Anderson's film The Whales of August (1987), in which she played the blind sister of Lillian Gish. The film earned good reviews, with one critic writing, "Bette crawls across the screen like a testy old hornet on a windowpane, snarling, staggering, twitching—a symphony of misfired synapses."  Her last performance was the title role in Larry Cohen's Wicked Stepmother (1989). By this time her health was failing, and after disagreements with Cohen she walked off the set. The script was rewritten to place more emphasis on Barbara Carrera's character, and the reworked version was released after Davis's death.After abandoning Wicked Stepmother and with no further film offers (though she was keen to play the centenarian in Craig Calman's The Turn Of The Century and worked with him on adapting the stage play to a feature length screenplay), Davis appeared on several talk shows and was interviewed by Johnny Carson, Joan Rivers, Larry King and David Letterman, discussing her career but refusing to discuss her daughter. Her appearances were popular; Lindsay Anderson observed that the public enjoyed seeing her behaving "so bitchy". He commented, "I always disliked that because she was encouraged to behave badly. And I'd always hear her described by that awful word, feisty." During 1988 and 1989, Davis was fêted for her career achievements, receiving the Kennedy Center Honor, the Legion of Honor from France, the Campione d'Italia from Italy and the Film Society of Lincoln Center Lifetime Achievement Award. She collapsed during the American Cinema Awards in 1989 and later discovered that her cancer had returned. She recovered sufficiently to travel to Spain where she was honored at the Donostia-San Sebastián International Film Festival, but during her visit her health rapidly deteriorated. Too weak to make the long journey back to the U.S., she traveled to France where she died on October 6, 1989, at 11:20 pm, at the American Hospital in Neuilly-sur-Seine. Davis was 81 years old. She was interred in Forest Lawn—Hollywood Hills Cemetery in Los Angeles, alongside her mother, Ruthie, and sister, Bobby, with her name in larger type size. On her tombstone is written: "She did it the hard way", an epitaph that she mentioned in her memoir Mother Goddam as having been suggested to her by Joseph L. Mankiewicz shortly after they had filmed All About Eve. Stine (1974), prologue ix 
Reception and legacyIn 1964, Jack Warner spoke of the "magic quality that transformed this sometimes bland and not beautiful little girl into a great artist",  and in a 1988 interview, Davis remarked that, unlike many of her contemporaries, she had forged a career without the benefit of beauty.    She admitted she was terrified during the making of her earliest films and that she became tough by necessity. "Until you're known in my profession as a monster, you are not a star", she said, "[but] I've never fought for anything in a treacherous way. I've never fought for anything but the good of the film." Shipman (1988), p 13  During the making of All About Eve, (1950) Joseph L. Mankiewicz told her of the perception in Hollywood that she was difficult, and she explained that when the audience saw her on screen, they did not consider that her appearance was the result of numerous people working behind the scenes. If she was presented as "a horse's ass ... forty feet wide, and thirty feet high", that is all the audience "would see or care about". While lauded for her achievements, Davis and her films were sometimes derided; Pauline Kael described Now, Voyager (1942) as a "shlock classic",  and by the mid-1940s her sometimes mannered and histrionic performances had become the subject of caricature. Edwin Schallert for the Los Angeles Times praised Davis's performance in Mr. Skeffington (1944), while observing, "the mimics will have more fun than a box of monkeys imitating Miss Davis", and Dorothy Manners at the Los Angeles Examiner said of her performance in the poorly received Beyond the Forest (1949), "no night club caricaturist has ever turned in such a cruel imitation of the Davis mannerisms as Bette turns on herself in this one". Time magazine noted that Davis was compulsively watchable even while criticizing her acting technique, summarizing her performance in Dead Ringer (1964) with the observation, "her acting, as always, isn't really acting: it's shameless showing off. But just try to look away!" She attracted a following in the gay subculture  and was frequently imitated by female impersonators such as Tracey Lee and Charles Pierce.  Attempting to explain her popularity with gay audiences, the journalist Jim Emerson wrote, "Was she just a camp figurehead because her brittle, melodramatic style of acting hadn't aged well? Or was it that she was 'Larger Than Life,' a tough broad who had survived? Probably some of both." Her film choices were often unconventional; she sought roles as manipulators and killers in an era when actresses usually preferred to play sympathetic characters, and she excelled in them. She favored authenticity over glamour and was willing to change her own appearance if it suited the character. Claudette Colbert commented that Davis was the first actress to play roles older than herself, and therefore did not have to make the difficult transition to character parts as she aged. As she entered old age, Davis was acknowledged for her achievements. John Springer, who had arranged her speaking tours of the early 1970s, wrote that despite the accomplishments of many of her contemporaries, Davis was "the star of the thirties and into the forties", achieving notability for the variety of her characterizations and her ability to assert herself, even when her material was mediocre.  Individual performances continued to receive praise; in 1987, Bill Collins analyzed The Letter (1940), and described her performance as "a brilliant, subtle achievement", and wrote, "Bette Davis makes Leslie Crosbie one of the most extraordinary females in movies."  In a 2000 review for All About Eve, (1950) Roger Ebert noted, "Davis was a character, an icon with a grand style, so even her excesses are realistic."  In 2006, Premiere magazine ranked her portrayal of Margo Channing in the film as fifth on their list of "100 Greatest Performances of All Time", commenting, "There is something deliciously audacious about her gleeful willingness to play such unattractive emotions as jealousy, bitterness, and neediness."  While reviewing What Ever Happened to Baby Jane? (1962) in 2008, Ebert asserted that "no one who has seen the film will ever forget her." A few months before her death in 1989, Davis was one of several actors featured on the cover of Life magazine. In a film retrospective that celebrated the films and stars of 1939, Life concluded that Davis was the most significant actress of her era, and highlighted Dark Victory (1939) as one of the most-important films of the year. "Hollywood 1939–1989, Today's Stars Meet the Screen Legends". Life Magazine. Spring 1989.  Her death made front-page news throughout the world as the "close of yet another chapter of the Golden Age of Hollywood". Angela Lansbury summed up the feeling of those of the Hollywood community who attended her memorial service, commenting after a sample from Davis's films were screened, that they had witnessed "an extraordinary legacy of acting in the twentieth century by a real master of the craft", that should provide "encouragement and illustration to future generations of aspiring actors". In 1977, Davis became the first woman to be honored with the AFI Life Achievement Award.  In 1999, the American Film Institute published its list of the "AFI's 100 Years... 100 Stars", which was the result of a film-industry poll to determine the "50 Greatest American Screen Legends" in order to raise public awareness and appreciation of classic film. Of the 25 actresses listed, Davis was ranked at number two, behind Katharine Hepburn. The United States Postal Service honored Davis with a commemorative postage stamp in 2008, marking the 100th anniversary of her birth. 
   The stamp features an image of her in the role of Margo Channing in All About Eve (1950). The First Day of Issue celebration took place September 18, 2008, at Boston University, which houses an extensive Bette Davis archive. Featured speakers included her son Michael Merrill and Lauren Bacall.In 1997, the executors of her estate, Michael Merrill, her son, and Kathryn Sermak, her former assistant, established "The Bette Davis Foundation" which awards college scholarships to promising actors and actresses. 
Academy Awards milestonesIn 1962 Bette Davis became the first person to secure ten Academy Award nominations for acting. Since then only four people have equalled or surpassed this figure, Meryl Streep (with seventeen nominations and three wins), Katharine Hepburn (twelve nominations and four wins), Jack Nicholson (twelve nominations and three wins) and Laurence Olivier (ten nominations and one win). Steven Spielberg purchased Davis's Oscars for Dangerous (1935) and Jezebel (1938) when they were offered for auction for $207,500 and $578,000, respectively, and returned them to the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences.  

1934: Davis's performance in Of Human Bondage (1934) was widely acclaimed and when she was not nominated for an Academy Award, several influential people mounted a campaign to have her name included. The Academy relaxed its rules for that year only to allow for the consideration of any performer nominated in a write-in vote; therefore, any performance of the year was technically eligible for consideration. Given the well-publicized hoopla, some sources still consider this as a nomination for Davis; however, the Academy does not officially record this as a nomination. 
1935: Won for Dangerous
1938: Won for Jezebel
1939: Nominated for Dark Victory
1940: Nominated for The Letter
1941: Nominated for The Little Foxes
1942: Nominated for Now, Voyager
1944: Nominated for Mr. Skeffington
1950: Nominated for All About Eve
1952: Nominated for The Star
1962: Nominated for What Ever Happened to Baby Jane?


Selected filmography 
 
 

Of Human Bondage (1934)
Dangerous (1935)
The Petrified Forest (1936)
Marked Woman (1937)
Jezebel (1938)
Dark Victory (1939)
The Old Maid (1939)
The Private Lives of Elizabeth and Essex (1939)
All This, and Heaven Too (1940)
The Letter (1940)
The Little Foxes (1941)
The Man Who Came to Dinner (1942)

 

In This Our Life (1942)
Now, Voyager (1942)
Watch on the Rhine (1943)
Mr. Skeffington (1944)
A Stolen Life (1946)
All About Eve (1950)
The Star (1952)
Pocketful of Miracles (1961)
What Ever Happened to Baby Jane? (1962)
Hush… Hush, Sweet Charlotte (1964)
The Nanny (1965) 
Death on the Nile (1978)
The Whales of August (1987)

 
Notes 
References

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


Further reading

 
 


External links 
 
 

bettedavis.com, Operated by the Estate of Bette Davis
 
 
 
 
 
Bette Davis photographs and bibliography at virtual-history.com

  
  
DEFAULTSORT



























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Jane Fonda
  
 Jane Fonda (born Lady Jayne Seymour Fonda; December 21, 1937) is an American actress, writer, political activist, former fashion model, and fitness guru. She rose to fame in the 1960s with films such as Barbarella and Cat Ballou. She has won two Academy Awards and received several other movie awards and nominations during more than 50 years as an actress. After 15 years of retirement, she returned to film in 2005 with Monster in Law, followed by Georgia Rule two years later. She also produced and starred in over 20 exercise videos released between 1982 and 1995, and once again in 2010.Fonda has been an activist for many political causes; her opposition to the Vietnam War and associated activities were controversial. She has also protested the Iraq War and violence against women. She describes herself as a liberal and a feminist. In 2005, Fonda worked alongside Robin Morgan and Gloria Steinem to co-found the Women's Media Center, an organization that works to amplify the voices of women in the media through advocacy, media and leadership training, and the creation of original content. Fonda currently serves on the board of the organization. Since 2001, Fonda has been a Christian. She published an autobiography in 2005, and in 2011, she published a second memoir, Prime Time.
Family backgroundLady Jayne Seymour Fonda was born in New York City, the daughter of actor Henry Fonda and the Canadian-born socialite Frances Ford Seymour Brokaw. Fonda's surname originates from her patrilineal Dutch ancestry; she is also of English descent.  She was named after the third wife of English king Henry VIII, Lady Jane Seymour, to whom she is distantly related on her mother's side.  Her brother, Peter Fonda (born 1940), and his daughter Bridget Fonda, also are actors. Fonda had a maternal half-sister, Frances, who died in 2008.  In 1950, when Fonda was 12, her mother committed suicide while under treatment at a psychiatric hospital.  Later that year Fonda's father married socialite Susan Blanchard (born 1928), nine years his daughter's senior; this marriage would end in divorce.At age 15, Fonda taught dance at Fire Island Pines, New York.  She attended the Emma Willard School in Troy, New York, and Vassar College in Poughkeepsie, but dropped out to become a fashion model.    She was twice featured on the cover of Vogue.   
Acting careerFonda became interested in acting in 1954, while appearing with her father in a charity performance of The Country Girl, at the Omaha Community Playhouse.  When she was five, she and her brother, Peter, used to act out Western stories similar to those their father played in the movies. While at Vassar, she went to Paris for two years to study art. Upon returning to the states, in 1958 she met Lee Strasberg, and started studying acting with him. Fonda said, "I went to the Actors Studio and Lee Strasberg told me I had talent. Real talent. It was the first time that anyone, except my father—who had to say so—told me I was good. At anything. It was a turning point in my life. I went to bed thinking about acting. I woke up thinking about acting. It was like the roof had come off my life!" 
1960sHer stage work in the late 1950s laid the foundation for her film career in the 1960s. She averaged almost two movies a year throughout the decade, starting in 1960 with Tall Story, in which she recreated one of her Broadway roles as a college cheerleader pursuing a basketball star, played by Anthony Perkins. Period of Adjustment and Walk on the Wild Side followed in 1962. In Walk on the Wild Side Fonda played a prostitute, and earned a Golden Globe for Most Promising Newcomer.
In 1963, she starred in the romantic comedy Sunday in New York. Newsday called her "the loveliest and most gifted of all our new young actresses". However, she also had her detractors—in the same year, the Harvard Lampoon named her the "Year's Worst Actress". Although already an established actress, Fonda did not become "bankable" until appearing in Cat Ballou (1965), in which she played a schoolmarm turned outlaw. This comedy Western received five Oscar nominations and was one of the year's top ten films at the box office. It was considered by many to have been the film that brought Fonda to superstardom at the age of twenty-eight. After this came the romantic comedies Any Wednesday (1966) and Barefoot in the Park (1967), the latter co-starring Robert Redford.In 1968, she played the title role in the science fiction spoof Barbarella, directed by her French film director husband Roger Vadim, which established her status as a sex symbol. In contrast, the tragedy They Shoot Horses, Don't They? (1969) won her critical acclaim, and she earned her first Oscar nomination for the role. Fonda was very selective by the end of the 1960s, turning down lead roles in Rosemary's Baby and Bonnie and Clyde.
1970sFonda won her first Academy Award for Best Actress in 1971, playing a high-class call girl, Bree Daniels, in the murder mystery Klute. She won her second Oscar in 1978 for Coming Home, as a Marine officer's wife who volunteers at a veterans' hospital and becomes involved with a disabled Vietnam War veteran (played by Jon Voight). Stated in interview on Inside the Actors Studio. Between Klute in 1971 and Fun With Dick and Jane in 1977, Fonda did not have a major film success. She appeared in A Doll's House (1973), Steelyard Blues and The Blue Bird (1976). At one point, she suggested her politics had worked against her: "I can't say I was blacklisted, but I was greylisted."  However, in her 2005 autobiography, My Life So Far, she rejected such simplification. "The suggestion is that because of my actions against the war my career had been destroyed ... But the truth is that my career, far from being destroyed after the war, flourished with a vigor it had not previously enjoyed."  She reduced acting because of her political activism providing a new focus in her life. Her return to acting in a series of 'issue-driven' films reflected this new focus.In 1972, Fonda starred as a reporter alongside Yves Montand in Jean-Luc Godard's and Jean-Pierre Gorin's film Tout Va Bien. The film's directors made Letter to Jane, in which the two spent nearly an hour discussing a news photograph of Fonda.Through her production company, IPC Films, she produced films that helped return her to star status. The 1977 comedy film Fun With Dick and Jane is generally considered her "comeback" picture. She also received positive reviews, BAFTA and Golden Globe Awards for Best Actress, and an Oscar nomination for her portrayal of the playwright Lillian Hellman in the 1977 film Julia.  During this period, Fonda announced that she would make only films that focused on important issues, and she generally stuck to her word. She turned down An Unmarried Woman because she felt the part was not relevant. She followed with popular and successful films such as The China Syndrome (1979), about a cover-up of an accident in a nuclear power plant; and The Electric Horseman (1979) with her previous co-star, Robert Redford.
1980sIn 1980, Fonda starred in Nine to Five with Lily Tomlin and Dolly Parton. The film was a critical and box office success. Fonda had long wanted to work with her father, hoping it would help their strained relationship.  She achieved this goal when she purchased the screen rights to the play On Golden Pond, specifically for her father and her.  On Golden Pond, which also starred Katharine Hepburn, brought Henry Fonda his only Academy Award for Best Actor, which Jane accepted on his behalf, as he was ill and could not leave home. He died five months later. Fonda continued appearing in feature films throughout the 1980s, most notably in the role of Dr. Martha Livingston in Agnes of God. She was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actress for her portrayal of an alcoholic murder suspect in the 1986 thriller The Morning After. She ended the decade by appearing in Old Gringo. This was followed by the romantic drama Stanley & Iris (1990), which was her final film for 15 years.
Exercise videosFor many years Fonda took ballet class to keep fit, but after fracturing her foot while filming The China Syndrome, she was no longer able to participate. To compensate, she began participating in aerobics and strengthening exercises under the direction of Leni Cazden. The Leni Workout became the Jane Fonda Workout, which began a second career for her, which continued for many years.  This was considered one of the influences that started the fitness craze among baby boomers, then approaching middle age.In 1982, Fonda released her first exercise video, titled Jane Fonda's Workout, inspired by her best-selling book, Jane Fonda's Workout Book. The Jane Fonda's Workout became the highest selling home video of the next few years, selling over a million copies.  The video's release led many people to buy the then-new VCR in order to watch and perform the workout at home. Fonda subsequently released 23 workout videos with the series selling a total of 17 million copies combined, more than any other exercise series.   She also released five workout books and thirteen audio programs, through 1995. After a fifteen-year hiatus, she released two new fitness videos on DVD in 2010, aiming at an older audience. 
Retirement and return
In the early 1990s, after three decades in film, Fonda announced her retirement from the film industry.  In May 2005, she returned to the screen with the box office success Monster-in-Law.  In July 2005 the British tabloid The Sun reported that when asked if she would appear in a sequel to her 1980 hit Nine to Five, Fonda replied, "I'd love to".  Fonda appeared in the 2007 Garry Marshall-directed Georgia Rule, starring with Felicity Huffman and Lindsay Lohan.In 2009, Fonda returned to theater with her first Broadway performance since 1963, playing Katherine Brandt in Moisés Kaufman's 33 Variations.   The role earned her a Tony nomination for Best Performance by a Leading Actress in a Play. She will star alongside Catherine Keener in the upcoming indie film, Peace, Love and Misunderstanding, to be released in 2012.  She made a return to French cinema, shooting Et Si On Vivait Tous Ensemble (...And If We All Lived Together) mid-2010.    In July 2011, Fonda's planned appearance on the QVC shopping network to promote her latest book, Prime Time: Making the Most of Your Life, was cancelled on short notice. Fonda said the cancellation was a response to viewer complaints about her activities during the Vietnam War.  Fonda said that she had "never done anything to hurt my country or the men and women who have fought and continue to fight for us" and blamed QVC's actions on "pressure by some well-funded and organized political extremist groups".   
Political activismDuring the 1960s, Fonda engaged in political activism in support of the Civil Rights Movement, and in opposition to the Vietnam War.  Fonda's visits to France brought her into contact with leftist French intellectuals who were opposed to war, an experience that she later characterized as "small-c communism". Along with other celebrities, she supported the Alcatraz Island occupation by American Indians in 1969, which was intended to call attention to failures of the government in treaty rights and the movement for greater Indian sovereignty. She likewise supported Huey Newton and the Black Panthers in the early 1970s, stating "Revolution is an act of love; we are the children of revolution, born to be rebels. It runs in our blood." She called the Black Panthers "our revolutionary vanguard", and said "we must support them with love, money, propaganda and risk." Fonda has also been involved in the feminist movement since the 1970s, which dovetails with her activism in support of civil rights.
Opposition to Vietnam War In April 1970, Fred Gardner, Fonda, and Donald Sutherland formed the FTA tour ("Free The Army", a play on the troop expression "Fuck The Army"), an anti-war road show designed as an answer to Bob Hope's USO tour. The tour, referred to as "political vaudeville" by Fonda, visited military towns along the West Coast, with the goal of establishing a dialogue with soldiers about their upcoming deployments to Vietnam. The dialogue was made into a movie (F.T.A.) that contained strong, frank criticism of the war by service men and women. It was released in 1972. On May 4, 1970, Fonda appeared before an assembly at the University of New Mexico, in Albuquerque, to speak on GI rights and issues. The end of her presentation was met with a discomforting silence. The quiet was broken when Beat poet, Gregory Corso staggered onto the stage. Drunk, Corso challenged Fonda, using a four-letter expletive: Why hadn't she addressed the shooting of four students at Kent State by the Ohio National Guard, which had just taken place? Fonda in her autobiography revisited the incident: "I was shocked by the news and felt like a fool." On the same day, she then immediately joined a protest march on the home of university president Ferrel Heady. The protestors called themselves "They Shoot Students, Don't They?"—a reference to Fonda's film, They Shoot Horses, Don't They?, which had just had a run in Albuquerque. In the same year, Fonda spoke out against the war at a rally organized by Vietnam Veterans Against the War (VVAW) in Valley Forge, Pennsylvania. She offered to help raise funds for VVAW, and, for her efforts, was rewarded with the title of Honorary National Coordinator.  On November 3, 1970, Fonda started a tour of college campuses on which she raised funds for the organization. As noted by The New York Times, Fonda was a "major patron" of the VVAW.
"Hanoi Jane" controversy
Fonda visited Hanoi in July 1972. Among other statements, she said the United States had been deliberately targeting the dike system along the Red River. The columnist Joseph Kraft, who was also touring North Vietnam, said he believed the damage to the dikes was incidental and was being used as propaganda by Hanoi, and if the U.S. Air Force were "truly going after the dikes, it would do so in a methodical, not a harum-scarum way". In North Vietnam, Fonda was photographed seated on an anti-aircraft battery; the controversial photo outraged a number of Americans.  In her 2005 autobiography, she writes that she was manipulated into sitting on the battery; she had been horrified at the implications of the pictures and regretted they were taken. In a recent entry at her official website, Fonda explained: It happened on my last day in Hanoi. I was exhausted and an emotional wreck after the 2-week visit ... The translator told me that the soldiers wanted to sing me a song. He translated as they sung. It was a song about the day 'Uncle Ho' declared their country's independence in Hanoi's Ba Dinh Square. I heard these words: "All men are created equal; they are given certain rights; among these are life, Liberty and Happiness." These are the words Ho pronounced at the historic ceremony. I began to cry and clap. These young men should not be our enemy. They celebrate the same words Americans do. The soldiers asked me to sing for them in return ... I memorized a song called Day Ma Di, written by anti-war South Vietnamese students. I knew I was slaughtering it, but everyone seemed delighted that I was making the attempt. I finished. Everyone was laughing and clapping, including me ... Here is my best, honest recollection of what happened: someone (I don't remember who) led me towards the gun, and I sat down, still laughing, still applauding. It all had nothing to do with where I was sitting. I hardly even thought about where I was sitting. The cameras flashed ... It is possible that it was a set up, that the Vietnamese had it all planned. I will never know. But if they did I can't blame them. The buck stops here. If I was used, I allowed it to happen ... a two-minute lapse of sanity that will haunt me forever ... But the photo exists, delivering its message regardless of what I was doing or feeling. I carry this heavy in my heart. I have apologized numerous times for any pain I may have caused servicemen and their families because of this photograph. It was never my intention to cause harm. "The Truth About My Trip To Hanoi". July 22, 2011. Jane Fonda official website.  During her trip, Fonda made ten radio broadcasts in which she denounced American political and military leaders as "war criminals". Fonda has defended her decision to travel to North Vietnam and her radio broadcasts.     Also during the course of her visit, Fonda visited American prisoners of war (POWs), and brought back messages from them to their families. When cases of torture began to emerge among POWs returning to the United States, Fonda called the returning POWs "hypocrites and liars". She added, "These were not men who had been tortured. These were not men who had been starved. These were not men who had been brainwashed."  Later, on the subject of torture used during the Vietnam War, Fonda told The New York Times in 1973, "I'm quite sure that there were incidents of torture ... but the pilots who were saying it was the policy of the Vietnamese and that it was systematic, I believe that's a lie."  Fonda said the POWs were "military careerists and professional killers" who are "trying to make themselves look self-righteous, but they are war criminals according to the law". Her visits to the POW camp led to persistent and exaggerated  rumors repeated widely in the press, and decades later have continued to circulate on the Internet. Fonda has personally denied the rumors.  Interviews with two of the alleged victims specifically named in the emails found these allegations to be false as they had never met Fonda. In 1972, Fonda helped fund and organize the Indochina Peace Campaign.  It continued to mobilize antiwar activists across the nation after the 1973 Paris Peace Agreement, through 1975, when the United States withdrew from Vietnam. Because of her time in North Vietnam, the ensuing circulated rumors regarding the visit, and statements made following her return, resentment against her among veterans and those currently serving in the U.S. military still exists. For example, at the U.S. Naval Academy, when a plebe shouts out "Goodnight, Jane Fonda!", the entire company will reply "Goodnight, bitch!"  In 2005, Michael A. Smith, a U.S. Navy veteran, was arrested for disorderly conduct in Kansas City after he spit chewing tobacco in Fonda's face during a book signing event for her autobiography My Life So Far. He told reporters that he "consider[s] it a debt of honor" and further stated, "she spit in our faces for 37 years. It was absolutely worth it. There are a lot of veterans who would love to do what I did."  
RegretsIn a 1988 interview with Barbara Walters, Fonda expressed regret for some of her comments and actions, stating: 
I would like to say something, not just to Vietnam veterans in New England, but to men who were in Vietnam, who I hurt, or whose pain I caused to deepen because of things that I said or did. I was trying to help end the killing and the war, but there were times when I was thoughtless and careless about it and I'm very sorry that I hurt them. And I want to apologize to them and their families. [...] I will go to my grave regretting the photograph of me in an anti-aircraft gun, which looks like I was trying to shoot at American planes. It hurt so many soldiers. It galvanized such hostility. It was the most horrible thing I could possibly have done. It was just thoughtless. 
 Critics pointed out that her apology came at a time when a group of New England Veterans had launched a campaign to disrupt a film project she was working on, leading to the charge that her apology was motivated at least partially by self-interest.  In a 60 Minutes interview on March 31, 2005, Fonda reiterated that she had no regrets about her trip to North Vietnam in 1972, with the exception of the anti-aircraft gun photo. She stated that the incident was a "betrayal" of American forces and of the "country that gave me privilege". Fonda said, "The image of Jane Fonda, Barbarella, Henry Fonda's daughter ... sitting on an enemy aircraft gun was a betrayal ... the largest lapse of judgment that I can even imagine." She later distinguished between regret over the use of her image as propaganda and pride for her anti-war activism: "There are hundreds of American delegations that had met with the POWs. Both sides were using the POWs for propaganda... It's not something that I will apologize for." Fonda said she had no regrets about the broadcasts she made on Radio Hanoi, something she asked the North Vietnamese to do: "Our government was lying to us and men were dying because of it, and I felt I had to do anything that I could to expose the lies and help end the war." 
Feminist causesFonda has been a longtime supporter of feminist causes, including V-Day, a movement to stop violence against women, inspired by the off-Broadway hit The Vagina Monologues, of which she is an honorary chairperson. She was present at their first summit in 2002, bringing together founder Eve Ensler, Afghan women oppressed by the Taliban, and a Kenyan activist campaigning to save girls from genital mutilation. In 2001, Fonda established the Jane Fonda Center for Adolescent Reproductive Health at Emory University in Atlanta, Georgia; the goal of the center is to prevent adolescent pregnancy through training and program development. On February 16, 2004, Fonda led a march through Ciudad Juárez, with Sally Field, Eve Ensler, and other women, urging Mexico to provide sufficient resources to newly appointed officials helping investigate the murders of hundreds of women in the rough border city. In 2004, she served as a mentor to the first ever all-transsexual cast of The Vagina Monologues. In the days before the Swedish election on September 17, 2006, Fonda went to Sweden to support the new political party Feministiskt initiativ in their election campaign. In My Life So Far Fonda says that she considers patriarchy to be harmful to men as well as women. She also states that for many years, she feared to call herself a feminist, because she believed that all feminists were "anti-male". But now, with her increased understanding of patriarchy, she feels that feminism is beneficial to both men and women, and states that she "still loves men". She states that when she divorced Ted Turner, she felt like she had also divorced the world of patriarchy, and was very happy to have done so. 
Native AmericansFonda went to Seattle, Washington, in 1970 to support a group of Native Americans who were led by Bernie Whitebear. The group had occupied part of the grounds of Fort Lawton, which was in the process of being surplussed by the United States Army and turned into a park. The group was attempting to secure a land base where they could establish services for the sizable local urban Indian population, protesting that "Indians had a right to part of the land that was originally all theirs."  The endeavor succeeded and the Daybreak Star Cultural Center was constructed in the city's Discovery Park. 
Israeli–Palestinian conflictIn December 2002, Fonda visited Israel and the West Bank as part of a tour focusing on stopping violence against women. She demonstrated with Women in Black against Israel's occupation of the West Bank and Gaza Strip outside the residence of Israel's Prime Minister. She later visited Jewish and Arab doctors and patients at a Jerusalem hospital, followed by visits to Ramallah to see a physical rehabilitation center, and a Palestinian refugee camp.  Fonda was criticized by right-wing Israelis, and was heckled by members of Women for Israel's Tomorrow as she arrived for a meeting with leading Israeli feminists. In September 2009, Fonda was one of over 1,500 signatories to a letter protesting the 2009 Toronto International Film Festival's spotlight on Tel Aviv.   The protest letter said that the spotlight on Tel Aviv was part of "the Israeli propaganda machine" because it was supported in part by funding from the Israeli government and had been described by the Israeli Consul General Amir Gissin as being part of a Brand Israel campaign intended to draw attention away from Israel's conflict with the Palestinians.  "Canadian director protests TIFF Tel Aviv spotlight". CBC News. August 29, 2009.   Other signers included actor Danny Glover, musician David Byrne, journalist John Pilger, and authors Alice Walker, Naomi Klein, and Howard Zinn.  Rabbi Marvin Hier of the Simon Wiesenthal Center stated that "People who support letters like this are people who do not support a two-state solution. By calling into question the legitimacy of Tel Aviv, they are supporting a one-state solution, which means the destruction of the State of Israel."  Hier continued, saying that "it is clear that the script [the protesters] are reading from might as well have been written by Hamas." Fonda, in The Huffington Post, said that she regretted some of the language used in the original protest letter and how it "was perhaps too easily misunderstood. It certainly has been wildly distorted. Contrary to the lies that have been circulated, the protest letter was not demonizing Israeli films and filmmakers." She continued, writing "the greatest 're-branding' of Israel would be to celebrate that country's long standing, courageous and robust peace movement by helping to end the blockade of Gaza through negotiations with all parties to the conflict, and by stopping the expansion of West Bank settlements. That's the way to show Israel's commitment to peace, not a PR campaign. There will be no two-state solution unless this happens." Fonda, Jane (September 15, 2009). "Expanding the Narrative". The Huffington Post.  Fonda emphasized that she, "in no way, support[s] the destruction of Israel. I am for the two-state solution. I have been to Israel many times and love the country and its people."  Several prominent Atlanta Jews subsequently signed a letter to The Huffington Post rejecting the vilification of Fonda, who they described as "a strong supporter and friend of Israel". 
Opposition to the Iraq War 
Fonda has argued that the military campaign in Iraq will turn people all over the world against America, and has asserted that a global hatred of America will result in more terrorist attacks in the aftermath of the war. In July 2005, Fonda announced plans to make an anti-war bus tour in March 2006 with her daughter and several families of military veterans, saying that some of the war veterans she had met while on her book tour had urged her to speak out against the Iraq War.  She later canceled the tour, due to concerns that she would distract attention from Cindy Sheehan's activism. In September 2005, Fonda was scheduled to join British politician and anti-war activist George Galloway at two stops on his U.S. book tour, Madison, Wisconsin and Chicago. She canceled her appearances at the last minute, citing instructions from her doctors to avoid travel following recent hip surgery. On January 27, 2007, Fonda participated in an anti-war rally and march held on the National Mall in Washington, D.C., declaring that "silence is no longer an option".  Fonda also spoke at an anti-war rally earlier in the day at the Navy Memorial, where members of the organization Free Republic picketed in a counter protest. 
Fonda and KerryIn the 2004 presidential election, her name was used as a disparaging epithet against John Kerry, the former VVAW leader, who was then the Democratic Party presidential candidate. Republican National Committee Chairman Ed Gillespie called Kerry a "Jane Fonda Democrat". In addition, Kerry's opponents circulated a photograph showing Fonda and Kerry in the same large crowd at a 1970 anti-war rally, although they were sitting several rows apart.  A faked composite photograph, which gave the false impression that the two had shared a speaker's platform, was also circulated. 
ReligionIn 2001, Fonda announced that she had become a Christian. She stated that she strongly opposed bigotry, discrimination and dogma, which she believes are promoted by a small minority of Christians. Her announcement came shortly after her divorce from Ted Turner. Fonda stated publicly on Charlie Rose in April 2006 that her Christianity may have played a part in the divorce, as Turner was known to be critical of religion. Fonda has in the past practiced Transcendental Meditation with Maharishi Mahesh Yogi,  and more recently has engaged in meditation at the Upaya Institute and Zen Center. 
Writing
On April 5, 2005, Random House released Fonda's autobiography My Life So Far.  The book describes her life as a series of three acts, each thirty years long, and declares that her third "act" will be her most significant, due in part to her commitment to the Christian religion, and that it will determine the things for which she will be remembered. Fonda's autobiography was well received by book critics, and was noted to be "as beguiling and as maddening as Jane Fonda herself" in its Washington Post review, pronouncing her a "beautiful bundle of contradictions".  The New York Times called the book "achingly poignant".   In January 2009, Fonda started chronicling her Broadway return in a blog, with posts ranging from her Pilates class to her fears and excitement about her new play.  She also uses Twitter and has a Facebook page. In 2011 Fonda published a new book: Prime Time: Love, health, sex, fitness, friendship, spirit--making the most of all of your life.  The book offers stories from her own life as well as from the lives of others, giving her perspective on how to better live what she calls "the critical years from 45 and 50, and especially from 60 and beyond". 
HonorsIn 1981, she was awarded the Women in Film Crystal Award.   In 1994, the United Nations Population Fund made Fonda a Goodwill Ambassador.   In 2004 Fonda was awarded the Women's eNews 21 Leaders for the 21st Century award as one of Seven Who Change Their Worlds In 2007, Fonda was awarded an Honorary Palme d'Or by Cannes Film Festival President Gilles Jacob for career achievement. Only three others had received such an award – Jeanne Moreau, Alain Resnais, and Gerard Oury. In December 2008, Fonda was inducted into the California Hall of Fame, located at The California Museum for History, Women and the Arts.  In December 2009, Fonda was given the New York Women's Agenda Lifetime Achievement Award.
Personal lifeFonda married her first husband Roger Vadim in 1965.  The couple had a daughter, Vanessa, born in 1968 and named for actress and activist Vanessa Redgrave. In 1973, shortly after her divorce from Vadim, Fonda married activist Tom Hayden. Fonda, 2005, p. 342.  Their son, Troy O'Donovan Garity (born 1973), was given his paternal grandmother's surname, Garity, since the names "Fonda and Hayden carried too much baggage",  and "Troy", an Americanization of the Vietnamese name "Troi".  Fonda and Hayden unofficially adopted an African-American teenager, Mary Luana Williams (known as Lulu),    who was the daughter of members of the Black Panthers.  Fonda and Hayden divorced in 1989. Sonneborn, 2002, p. 73. Fonda married her third husband, cable-television tycoon and CNN founder Ted Turner, in 1991. The pair divorced in 2001. Having been diagnosed with breast cancer in 2010, Fonda underwent a lumpectomy in November 2010, and has recovered. 
Filmography


Year Title Role Notes 
1960 Tall Story June Ryder  
1961 A String of Beads Gloria Winters TV movie 
1962 Walk on the Wild Side Kitty Twist  
1962 The Chapman Report Kathleen Barclay  
1962 Jane Herself Documentary 
1962 Period of Adjustment Isabel Haverstick Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy 
1963 In the Cool of the Day Christine Bonner  
1963 Sunday in New York Eileen Tyler  
1964 Joy House Melinda  
1964 Circle of Love Sophie  
1965 Cat Ballou Catherine 'Cat' Ballou Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy 
1966 The Chase Anna Reeves  
1966 The Game Is Over Renee Saccard  
1966 Any Wednesday Ellen Gordon Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy 
1967 Hurry Sundown Julie Ann Warren  
1967 Barefoot in the Park Corie Bratter Nominated—BAFTA Award for Best Foreign Actress 
1968 Spirits of the Dead Contessa Frederica  
1968 Barbarella Barbarella  
1969 They Shoot Horses, Don't They? Gloria Beatty Kansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated—BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama 
1971 Klute Bree Daniels Academy Award for Best Actress Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama Kansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actress New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Nominated—BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role 
1972 Tout Va Bien Suzanne  
1972 F.T.A. Herself Documentary 
1973 Steelyard Blues Iris Caine  
1973 A Doll's House Nora Helmer  
1976 The Blue Bird The Night  
1977 Fun with Dick and Jane Jane Harper  
1977 Julia Lillian Hellman BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role David di Donatello for Best Foreign Actress Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress 
1978 Coming Home Sally Hyde Academy Award for Best Actress Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress 
1978 Comes a Horseman Ella Connors  
1978 California Suite Hannah Warren  
1979 The China Syndrome Kimberly Wells BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated—American Movie Award for Best Actress Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama 
1979 The Electric Horseman Alice 'Hallie' Martin  
1980 9 to 5 Judy Bernly  
1981 On Golden Pond Chelsea Thayer Wayne American Movie Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated—Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated—BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Supporting Role Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Supporting Actress – Motion Picture 
1981 Rollover Lee Winters  
1984 The Dollmaker Gertie Nevels TV movie Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actress – Miniseries or a Movie Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Miniseries or Television Film 
1985 Agnes of God Dr. Martha Livingston  
1986 The Morning After Alex Sternbergen Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actress 
1989 Old Gringo Harriet Winslow  
1990 Stanley & Iris Iris Estelle King  
2002 Searching for Debra Winger Herself Documentary 
2003 V-Day: Until the Violence Stops Herself Documentary 
2005 Monster-in-Law Viola Fields  
2007 Georgia Rule Georgia Randall 
2011 ...And If We All Lived Together Jeanne  
2011 Peace, Love and Misunderstanding Grace  
2012 The Newsroom Leona Lansing TV series 
2013 The Butler Nancy Reagan Post-production 
2013 Better Living Through Chemistry  Post-production 

Exercise videos

Year Title Notes 
1982 Jane Fonda's Workout aka Workout Starring Jane Fonda 
1983 Jane Fonda's Pregnancy, Birth and Recovery Workout  
1983 Jane Fonda's Workout Challenge  
1984 Jane Fonda's Prime Time Workout Re-released as Jane Fonda's Easy Going Workout 
1985 Jane Fonda's New Workout  
1986 Jane Fonda's Low Impact Aerobic Workout  
1987 Jane Fonda's Start Up aka Start Up with Jane Fonda 
1987 Jane Fonda's Sports Aid  
1987 Jane Fonda's Workout with Weights Re-released as Jane Fonda's Toning and Shaping 
1988 Jane Fonda's Complete Workout  
1989 Jane Fonda's Light Aerobics and Stress Reduction Program Re-released as Jane Fonda's Stress Reduction Program 
1990 Jane Fonda's Lean Routine Workout  
1990 Jane Fonda's Workout Presents Fun House Fitness: The Swamp Stomp  
1990 Jane Fonda's Workout Presents Fun House Fitness: The Fun House Funk  
1991 Jane Fonda's Lower Body Solution  
1992 Jane Fonda's Step Aerobic and Abdominal Workout  
1993 Jane Fonda's Favorite Fat Burners  
1993 Jane Fonda's Yoga Exercise Workout  
1994 Jane Fonda's Step and Stretch Workout  
1995 Jane Fonda's Personal Trainer Series: Low Impact Aerobics & Stretch  
1995 Jane Fonda's Personal Trainer Series: Total Body Sculpting  
1995 Jane Fonda's Personal Trainer Series: Abs, Buns & Thighs  
2010  Jane Fonda's Prime Time: Fit and Strong  
2010 Jane Fonda's Prime Time: Walkout  
2011 Jane Fonda's Prime Time: Trim, Tone & Flex  
2011 Jane Fonda's Prime Time: Firm & Burn  

References 
Bibliography   

Andersen, Christopher. Citizen Jane. 1990: Henry Holt and Company. ISBN 0-8050-0959-0.
 
Davidson, Bill. Jane Fonda: An Intimate Biography. 1991: New American Library. ISBN 0-451-17028-8.
Fine, Carla and Jane Fonda. Strong, Smart, and Bold: Empowering Girls for Life. 2001: Collins. ISBN 0-06-019771-4.
Fonda, Jane. My Life So Far. 2005: Random House. ISBN 0-375-50710-8.
Fonda, Jane. Jane Fonda's Workout Book. 1986: Random House Value Publishing. ISBN 0-517-40908-9.
Fonda, Jane, with Mignon McCarthy. Women Coming of Age. 1987: Random House Value Publishing. ISBN 5-550-36643-6.
Fox, Mary Virginia and Mary Molina. Jane Fonda: Something to Fight for. 1980: Dillon Press. ISBN 0-87518-189-9.
Freedland, Michael. Jane Fonda: The Many Lives of One of Hollywood's Greatest Stars. 1989: HarperCollins Publishers. ISBN 0-00-637390-9.
French, Sean. Jane Fonda: A Biography. 1998: Trafalgar Square Publishing. ISBN 1-85793-658-2.
Gilmore, John. Laid Bare: A Memoir of Wrecked Lives and the Hollywood Death Trip. Amok Books, 1997. ISBN 1-878923-08-0.
Hershberger, Mary. Peace work, war myths: Jane Fonda and the antiwar movement. Peace & Change, Vol. 29, No. 3&4, July 2004.
Hershberger, Mary. Jane Fonda's War: A Political Biography of an Antiwar Icon. 2005: New Press. ISBN 1-56584-988-4.
Kiernan, Thomas. Jane: an intimate biography of Jane Fonda. 1973: Putnam. ISBN 0-399-11207-3.
 
External links 
 

Official Web Site
 
 
Jane Fonda at the University of Wisconsin's Actors Studio audio collection
 
 
 
 
 
Jane Fonda Profile at Turner Classic Movies
About.com article about Fonda's Vietnam era activities
Jane Fonda and Gloria Steinem discuss The Women's Media Center, their non-profit media organization. (video)
Fonda Family Genealogy
Photo gallery at CBS News

 
 
 
   
DEFAULTSORT

































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Sissy Spacek
 
Sissy Spacek (born Mary Elizabeth Spacek; December 25, 1949) is an Academy Award winning American actress and singer. She came to international prominence for her roles as Holly Sargis in Terrence Malick's 1973 film Badlands, and as Carrie White in Brian De Palma's 1976 horror film Carrie (based on the first novel by Stephen King) for which she earned her first Academy Award nomination. She won the Academy Award for Best Actress for her role as country star Loretta Lynn in the 1980 film Coal Miner's Daughter. She also received Oscar nominations for her roles in Missing, The River, Crimes of the Heart and In the Bedroom.Spacek is mainly a dramatic actress, but also has made comedies. The films that Spacek has starred in have earned more than $1 billion worldwide. 
Early lifeSpacek was born on Christmas Day (December 25), 1949, in Quitman, Texas. She is the daughter of Virginia Frances (née Spilman) and Edwin Arnold Spacek, Sr., a county agricultural agent.  
Spacek's paternal grandparents, Mary Červenka and Arnold A. Špaček (who served as Mayor of Granger, Texas in Williamson County), were of Czech (Moravian) and German ancestry. Note that Sissy pronounces her surname "SPACE'k",   while her family retains the original Czech pronunciation,  "SHPAH-chek".   Sissy has a male cousin who is a Blues musician in Texas,  Jimmy Spacek.   Jimmy has chosen to use the traditional/ethnic  pronunciation of his surname.   
 
  
Ancestry of Sissy Spacek. Wargs.com.  
Her mother, of English and Irish descent, was from the Rio Grande Valley of Texas. Stated on Inside the Actors Studio, 2002 Spacek was greatly affected by the death of her eighteen-year old brother, Robbie, in 1967, which she has called "the defining event of my whole life." 
   
After she graduated from high school she  moved to New York City, hoping to become a singer. There, she lived with her first cousin, actor Rip Torn, and his wife, actress Geraldine Page. 
Career
Early work in New York CityFor a while, Spacek sang and played guitar in many of the Greenwich Village coffeehouses, eventually landing some paying work singing commercial jingles. In late 1968, under the pseudonym of "Rainbo", Spacek recorded a novelty song titled '"John, You've Gone Too Far This Time";  the song proclaimed her disillusionment and shock over John Lennon, who on the cover of his newest album Two Virgins appeared in full-frontal nudity with his then-girlfriend Yoko Ono, shocking many fans.  The single did not appear on the record charts and failed to sell well, so she was dropped by the record company. 
1970s and beginning of acting careerWhile singing, Spacek also worked for a time as photographic model, and worked as an extra at Andy Warhol's Factory, appearing in a non-credited role in his 1970 film Trash. With the help of Rip Torn, she was enrolled in Lee Strasberg's Actors Studio and then the Lee Strasberg Institute in New York. Her first credited role was in the 1972 cult classic Prime Cut, in which she played Poppy, a girl sold into sexual slavery.  The role led to television work, which included a guest role in The Waltons, which she played twice in 1973. Spacek received international attention after starring in Terrence Malick's 1973 Badlands, in which she played Holly, the narrator of the film and 15-year old girlfriend of mass-murderer Kit (Martin Sheen).  Spacek has described Badlands as the "most incredible" experience of her career.  On the set of Badlands, Spacek met art director Jack Fisk, whom she married.Spacek's iconic and career-defining role came in 1976 with Brian De Palma's Carrie, in which she played Carietta "Carrie" White, a shy, troubled high school senior with telekinetic powers.  Spacek had to work hard to persuade director de Palma to engage her for the role,  set as he was on an alternative actress, whose identity, to this day, remains shrouded in mystery.  Rubbing Vaseline into her hair, and donning an old sailor dress her mother made for her as a child, Spacek turned up at the audition with the odds against her, but won the part.  She was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actress for her work in the film  (Veteran actress Piper Laurie, who played Carrie's religious, maniacal mother Margaret White, was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress). Spacek had previously been the set dresser for DePalma's film Phantom of the Paradise.After Carrie, Spacek played the small role of housekeeper Linda Murray in Alan Rudolph's ensemble piece Welcome to LA (1976), and cemented her reputation in independent cinema with her performance as Pinky Rose in Robert Altman's 1977 classic 3 Women. Altman was deeply impressed by her performance, having stated: 'She's remarkable, one of the top actresses I've ever worked with. Her resources are like a deep well.' Brian de Palma added: '[Spacek is] a phantom. She has this mysterious way of slipping into a part, letting it take over her. She's got a wider range than any young actress I know.'  Spacek also helped finance then-brother-in-law David Lynch's directorial debut,  Eraserhead (1976) and is thanked in the credits of the film.In the 1979 film Heart Beat, Spacek played Carolyn Cassady, who slipped (under the influence of John Heard's Jack Kerouac and Nick Nolte's Neal Cassady) into a combination of drudgery and debauchery.
1980s and Oscar winSpacek began the 1980s with an Oscar in 1980 for Coal Miner's Daughter, in which she played country music star Loretta Lynn, who selected her for the role.  In the film, both she and Beverly D'Angelo, who played Patsy Cline, performed their own singing.  Film critic Roger Ebert has credited the movie's success "to the performance by Sissy Spacek as Loretta Lynn. With the same sort of magical chemistry she's shown before, when she played the high school kid in Carrie, Spacek at 29 has the ability to appear to be almost any age on screen. Here, she ages from about 14 to somewhere in her 30s, always looks the age, and never seems to be wearing makeup."  Spacek also was nominated for a Grammy Award for her singing on the film's soundtrack album. She followed this with her own country album, Hangin' Up My Heart, in 1983; the album spawned one hit single, "Lonely But Only For You", a song written by K. T. Oslin, which reached No. 15 on the Billboard Country chart.
Also in the 1980s, Spacek starred alongside Jack Lemmon in Constantin Costa-Gavras's 1982 political thriller Missing (which was based on the book The Execution of Charles Horman), appeared with Mel Gibson in the rural drama The River (1984), and with Diane Keaton and Jessica Lange in 1986's Crimes of the Heart.  She was nominated for the Best Actress Oscar for all of these roles.  Other performances of the decade included star turns in husband Jack Fisk's directorial debut Raggedy Man (1981) and alongside Anne Bancroft in the suicide-themed drama Night Mother (1986).  Spacek also showed her lighter side by voicing the brain in the Steve Martin comedy The Man with Two Brains (1983).
1990s - 2000sThe 1990s saw Spacek slowly come back to Hollywood after her self-imposed hiatus. She had a supporting role as Jim Garrison's wife (played by Kevin Costner) in Oliver Stone's JFK (1991), and made a number of comedies, TV movies and the occasional film. Most notable of her appearances during these years was her turn as the evil Verena Talbo in the 1995 ensemble piece The Grass Harp, which reunited her with both Laurie and Lemmon, as well as a supporting performance, again alongside Nick Nolte, as the waitress Margie Fogg in Paul Schrader's father-son psychodrama Affliction (1997). She also played Rose Straight in David Lynch's The Straight Story (1999).
In 2001, she was again nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actress, for her work in Todd Field's In the Bedroom.  New York Times film critic Stephen Holden said of her work in the film: "Ms. Spacek's performance is as devastating as it is unflashy. With the slight tightening of her neck muscles and a downward twitch of her mouth, she conveys her character's relentlessness, then balances it with enough sweetness to make Ruth seem entirely human. It is one of Ms. Spacek's greatest performances."  Her performance as Ruth Fowler, a grieving mother consumed by revenge, won extraordinary praise and garnered the New York and Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress. Other performances of this decade include unfaithful wife Ruth in Rodrigo García's Nine Lives (2005) and a turn as a woman suffering from Alzheimer's in the television movie Pictures of Hollis Woods (2007). In 2008, Spacek had a supporting part in the Christmas comedy Four Christmases and a lead role in the independent drama, Lake City. Spacek appeared on the HBO drama Big Love, for a multi-episode arc, as a powerful Washington, D.C. lobbyist. In 2006, she narrated the audiobook of the classic 1960 Harper Lee novel To Kill a Mockingbird and it sold over 30 million copies. In 2011, she received a star on Hollywood's Walk of Fame. In 2012, Spacek published a memoir, "My Extraordinary Ordinary Life", written along with Maryanne Vollers.  
Personal lifeSpacek married production designer and art director Jack Fisk in 1974, after meeting on the set of Badlands.  Fisk later directed her in the films Raggedy Man and Violets Are Blue. They have two daughters, Schuyler Fisk (born July 8, 1982) and Madison Fisk (born September 21, 1988). 
Filmography

Film 
Year Film Role Notes 
1970 Women in Revolt Girl extra at bar uncredited 
1972 Prime Cut Poppy  
1973 The Girls of Huntington House Sara TV film 
The Waltons Sarah Jane Simmonds TV series (2 episodes) 
Badlands Holly Sargis Nominated — BAFTA Award for Best Newcomer 
1974 Ginger in the Morning Ginger TV film 
The Migrants Wanda Trimpin  
1975 Katherine Katherine Alman TV film (also known as The Radical) 
1976 Carrie Carietta "Carrie" White Avoriaz Fantastic Film Festival Award for Best Actress National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actress Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actress 
Welcome to L.A. Linda Murray  
1977 3 Women Pinky Rose New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Supporting Actress 
1978 Verna: U.S.O. Girl Verna Vane TV film 
1980 Coal Miner's Daughter Loretta Lynn Academy Award for Best Actress Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy Kansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress National Board of Review Award for Best Actress National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actress New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Nominated — BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role 
Heart Beat Carolyn Cassady  
1981 Raggedy Man Nita Longley Nominated — Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama 
1982 Missing Beth Horman Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated — BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated — Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama 
1983 The Man with Two Brains Anne Uumellmahaye voice (uncredited) 
1984 The River Mae Garvey Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated — Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama 
Terror in the Aisles  archival footage 
1985 Marie Marie Ragghianti  
1986 Violets Are Blue Augusta 'Gussie' Sawyer  
'night, Mother Jessie Cates  
Crimes of the Heart Babe Magrath Botrelle Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy Kansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actress 
1990 The Long Walk Home Miriam Thompson  
1991 Hard Promises Christine Ann Coalter  
JFK Liz Garrison  
1992 A Private Matter Sherri Finkbine TV film 
1994 A Place for Annie Susan Lansing Hallmark Hall of Fame TV film Nominated — Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Miniseries or Television Movie 
Trading Mom Various Roles aka The Mommy Market 
1995 The Good Old Boys Spring Renfro Nominated — Emmy Award for Outstanding Supporting Actress – Miniseries or a Movie 
The Grass Harp Verena Talbo  
Streets of Laredo Lorena Parker TV mini-series Bronze Wrangler for Television Feature Film Television Feature Film 
1996 Beyond the Call Pam O'Brien TV film 
If These Walls Could Talk Barbara Barrows  TV film, Segment "1974" 
1997 Affliction Margie Fogg  
1999 Blast from the Past Helen Thomas Webber Nominated — Saturn Award for Best Supporting Actress 
The Straight Story Rose 'Rosie' Straight Nominated — Chlotrudis Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated — Las Vegas Film Critics Society Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated — Satellite Award for Best Supporting Actress - Motion Picture 
2000 Songs in Ordinary Time Marie Fermoyle TV film 
2001 In the Bedroom Ruth Fowler AFI Actress of the Year Boston Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actress Broadcast Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Dallas-Fort Worth Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Florida Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama Independent Spirit Award for Best Lead Female Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Satellite Award for Best Actress - Motion Picture Drama Southeastern Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Special Jury Prize for Dramatic Acting  (Shared with Tom Wilkinson)  Vancouver Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actress Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated — BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated — Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Actress Nominated — Chlotrudis Award for Best Actress Nominated — Online Film Critics Society Award for Best Actress Nominated — Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Leading Role Nominated — Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Cast in a Motion Picture 
Midwives Sibyl Danforth Nominated — Satellite Award for Best Actress – Miniseries or Television Film Nominated — Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Miniseries or Television Movie 
2002 Last Call Zelda Fitzgerald Nominated — Emmy Award for Outstanding Supporting Actress – Miniseries or a Movie Nominated — Satellite Award for Best Actress – Miniseries or Television Film 
Tuck Everlasting Mae Tuck Nominated — Saturn Award for Best Supporting Actress 
2004 A Home at the End of the World Alice Glover  
2005 Nine Lives Ruth Locarno International Film Festival Award for Best Actress Ensemble Nominated — Gotham Award for Best Ensemble Cast 
The Ring Two Evelyn  
North Country Alice Aimes  
2006 An American Haunting Lucy Bell  
Summer Running: The Race to Cure Breast Cancer Mrs. Flora Good  
2007 Gray Matters Sydney  
Hot Rod Marie Powell  
Pictures of Hollis Woods Josie Cahill Nominated — Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Miniseries or Television Film 
2008 Lake City Maggie  
Four Christmases Paula (Brad's Mom)  
2009 Appalachia: A History of Mountains and People Narrator TV mini-series 
Get Low Mattie Darrow Nominated — Chlotrudis Award for Best Supporting Actress 
2010–2011 Big Love Marilyn Densham 5 episodes Nominated — Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Guest Actress in a Drama Series 
2011 The Help Mrs. Walters Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Cast in a Motion Picture 
2012 Deadfall June  

Discography
Albums

Year Album  US Country  Label 
1983 Hangin' Up My Heart 17 Atlantic 

Singles

Year Single Chart Positions Album 
 US Country   US Bubbling   CAN Country  
1980 "Coal Miner's Daughter" 24 — 7 Coal Miner's Daughter (Soundtrack) 
"Back in Baby's Arms" — — 71 
1983 "Lonely But Only for You" 15 10 13 Hangin' Up My Heart 
1984 "If I Can Just Get Through the Night" 57 — 41 
"If You Could Only See Me Now" 79 — — 

References 
 
External links

 
 

  
 
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Claude Rains
 
 
 William Claude Rains (10 November 1889 – 30 May 1967) was an English stage and film actor whose career spanned 46 years. He was known for many roles in Hollywood films, among them the title role in The Invisible Man (1933), The Wolf Man (1941), a corrupt senator in Mr. Smith Goes to Washington (1939), Mr. Dryden in Lawrence of Arabia (1962), and, perhaps his most notable performance, as Captain Renault in Casablanca (1942).
Early lifeRains was born in Camberwell, London. He grew up, according to his daughter, with "a very serious cockney accent and a speech impediment". Harmetz p. 147.  His parents were Emily Eliza (Cox) and English stage and film actor Frederick
William Rains.  The young Rains made his stage debut at 11 in Nell of Old Drury. His acting talents were recognised by Sir Herbert Beerbohm Tree, founder of the Royal Academy of Dramatic Art. Tree paid for the elocution lessons Rains needed in order to succeed as an actor. Later, Rains taught at the institution, teaching John Gielgud and Laurence Olivier, among others. Many years later, after he had gone to Hollywood and become a film star, Gielgud was to quip: "He was a great influence on me. I don`t know what happened to him. I think he failed and went to America."Rains served in the First World War in the London Scottish Regiment,  with fellow actors Basil Rathbone, Ronald Colman and Herbert Marshall. Rains was involved in a gas attack that left him nearly blind in one eye for the rest of his life. However, the war did aid his social advancement and, by its end, he had risen from the rank of Private to Captain.
Career
Rains began his career in the London theatre, having a success in the title role of John Drinkwater's play Ulysses S. Grant, the follow-up to the playwright's major hit Abraham Lincoln, and travelled to Broadway in the late 1920s to act in leading roles in such plays as Shaw's The Apple Cart and in the dramatisations of The Constant Nymph, and Pearl S. Buck's novel The Good Earth, as a Chinese farmer.Rains came relatively late to film acting and his first screen test was a failure, but his distinctive voice won him the title role in James Whale's The Invisible Man (1933) when someone accidentally overheard his screen test being played in the next room.  Rains later credited director Michael Curtiz with teaching him the more understated requirements of film acting, or "what not to do in front of a camera". Following The Invisible Man, Universal Studios tried to typecast him in horror films, but he broke free, starting with the gleefully evil role of Prince John in The Adventures of Robin Hood (1938), then with his Academy Award-nominated performance as the conflicted corrupt US senator in Mr. Smith Goes to Washington (1939), and followed with probably his most famous role, the flexible French police Captain Renault in Casablanca (1942). In 1943, Rains played the title character in Universal's full-colour remake of Phantom of the Opera. Bette Davis named him her favourite co-star, and they made four films together, including Mr. Skeffington and Now, Voyager. Rains became the first actor to receive a million dollar salary, playing Julius Caesar in Gabriel Pascal's lavish and unsuccessful version of Shaw's Caesar and Cleopatra (1945), made in Britain. In 1946, he played a refugee Nazi agent opposite Cary Grant and Casablanca co-star Ingrid Bergman in Alfred Hitchcock's Notorious. In 1949, he appeared in David Lean's The Passionate Friends.His only singing and dancing role was in a television musical version of Robert Browning's The Pied Piper of Hamelin, with Van Johnson as the Piper. This 1957 NBC colour special, shown as a film rather than a live or videotaped programme, was highly successful with the public. Sold into syndication after its first telecast, it was repeated annually by many local US TV stations.Rains remained a popular character actor in the 1950s and 1960s, appearing in many films. Two of his well-known later screen roles were as Dryden, a cynical British diplomat in Lawrence of Arabia (1962) and King Herod in The Greatest Story Ever Told (1965). The latter was his final film role.

RecordingsRains made several audio recordings, narrating a few Bible stories for children on Capitol Records, and reciting Richard Strauss's setting for narrator and piano of Tennyson's poem Enoch Arden, with the piano solos played by Glenn Gould. This recording was made by Columbia Masterworks Records.
Personal lifeRains became a naturalized citizen of the United States in 1939. He married six times, the first five of which ended in divorce: Isabel Jeans (1913–1915); Marie Hemingway (1920, for less than a year); Beatrix Thomson (1924 – 8 April 1935); Frances Proper (9 April 1935–1956); and to classic pianist Agi Jambor (4 November 1959–1960). He married Rosemary Clark Schrode in 1960, and stayed with her until her death on 31 December 1964. His only child, Jessica Rains, was born to him and Proper on 24 January 1938.He acquired the   Stock Grange Farm in West Bradford Township, Pennsylvania, just outside Coatesville, in 1941, and spent much of his time between takes reading up on agricultural techniques. He eventually sold the farm when his marriage to Proper ended in 1956.Rains died from an abdominal haemorrhage in Laconia, New Hampshire, on 30 May 1967 at the age of 77. He is interred in the Red Hill Cemetery, Moultonborough, New Hampshire.Claude Rains: An Actor's Voice, a biography by David J. Skal and Rains' daughter Jessica Rains, was published in 2008.
Awards and nominationsIn 1951, Rains won a Tony Award for Best Performance by a Leading Actor in a Play for Darkness at Noon. He was also nominated four times for the Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor, for Mr. Smith Goes to Washington (1939), Casablanca (1942), Mr. Skeffington (1944), and Notorious (1946).He has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame, at 6400 Hollywood Boulevard.
Filmography

Year Title Role Director Other cast members Notes 
1920 Build Thy House Clarkis   Henry Ainley  
1933 The Invisible Man Dr. Jack Griffin/The Invisible Man   Gloria Stuart, Henry Travers, Una O'Connor  
1934 The Clairvoyant Maximus   Fay Wray  
1934 Crime Without Passion Lee Gentry  , Charles MacArthur Margo, Whitney Bourne  
1934 The Man Who Reclaimed His Head Paul Verin   Lionel Atwill, Joan Bennett  
1935 The Last Outpost John Stevenson  , Charles Barton Cary Grant  
1935 The Mystery of Edwin Drood John Jasper   Douglass Montgomery, Heather Angel, David Manners  
1936 Hearts Divided Napoleon Bonaparte   Marion Davies, Dick Powell, Charlie Ruggles, Edward Everett Horton  
1936 Anthony Adverse Marquis Don Luis   Fredric March, Olivia de Havilland, Gale Sondergaard  
1937 Stolen Holiday Stefan Orloff   Kay Francis, Ian Hunter  
1937 The Prince and the Pauper Earl of Hertford   Errol Flynn, Billy and Bobby Mauch  
1937 They Won't Forget Dist. Atty. Andrew J. "Andy" Griffin   Gloria Dickson, Lana Turner  
1938 White Banners Paul Ward   Fay Bainter, Jackie Cooper, Bonita Granville, Henry O'Neill, Kay Johnson  
1938 Gold is Where You Find It Colonel Christopher "Chris" Ferris   George Brent, Olivia de Havilland, Tim Holt Technicolor 
1938 The Adventures of Robin Hood Prince John  , William Keighley Errol Flynn, Olivia de Havilland, Basil Rathbone Technicolor 
1938 Four Daughters Adam Lemp   Rosemary, Lola, and Priscilla Lane, Gale Page, John Garfield  
1939 They Made Me a Criminal Det. Monty Phelan   John Garfield, Gloria Dickson, May Robson  
1939 Juarez Emperor Louis Napoleon III   Paul Muni, Bette Davis, Brian Aherne, John Garfield  
1939 Sons of Liberty Haym Salomon   Gale Sondergaard Technicolor; two-reel short 
1939 Daughters Courageous Jim Masters   Rosemary, Lola, and Priscilla Lane, Gale Page, John Garfield  
1939 Mr. Smith Goes to Washington Sen. Joseph Harrison Paine   Jean Arthur, James Stewart, Thomas Mitchell Nomination—Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor 
1939 Four Wives Adam Lemp   Eddie Albert, Rosemary, Lola, and Priscilla Lane, Gale Page, John Garfield  
1940 Saturday's Children Mr. Henry Halevy   John Garfield, Anne Shirley  
1940 The Sea Hawk Don José Alvarez de Córdoba   Errol Flynn, Brenda Marshall, Henry Daniell, Flora Robson, Alan Hale Sepia tone (sequence) 
1940 Lady with Red Hair David Belasco   Miriam Hopkins, Laura Hope Crews  
1941 Four Mothers Adam Lemp   Rosemary, Lola, and Priscilla Lane, Gale Page  
1941 Here Comes Mr. Jordan Mr. Jordan   Robert Montgomery, Evelyn Keyes, Edward Everett Horton  
1941 The Wolf Man Sir John Talbot   Lon Chaney, Jr., Evelyn Ankers, Patric Knowles, Ralph Bellamy, Warren William, Bela Lugosi, Maria Ouspenskaya  
1942 Kings Row Dr. Alexander Tower   Ann Sheridan, Robert Cummings, Ronald Reagan, Betty Field, Charles Coburn  
1942 Moontide Nutsy   Jean Gabin, Ida Lupino, Thomas Mitchell  
1942 Now, Voyager Dr. Jaquith   Bette Davis, Paul Henreid, Gladys Cooper  
1942 Casablanca Capt. Louis Renault   Humphrey Bogart, Ingrid Bergman, Paul Henreid, Conrad Veidt, S.Z. Sakall, Sydney Greenstreet, Peter Lorre, Dooley Wilson Nomination—Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor 
1943 Forever and a Day Ambrose Pomfret   (sequence with Rains) Anna Neagle, Ray Milland, C. Aubrey Smith  
1943 Phantom of the Opera Erique Claudin/The Phantom of the Opera   Nelson Eddy, Susanna Foster Technicolor 
1944 Passage to Marseille Captain Freycinet   Humphrey Bogart, Michèle Morgan, Philip Dorn, Sydney Greenstreet, Peter Lorre, Helmut Dantine  
1944 Mr. Skeffington Job Skeffington   Bette Davis, Walter Abel, George Coulouris, Richard Waring Nomination—Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor 
1945 Strange Holiday John Stevenson   Jean Gabin, Richard Whorf, Allyn Joslyn, Ellen Drew  
1945 This Love of Ours Joseph Targel   Merle Oberon  
1945 Caesar and Cleopatra Julius Caesar   Vivien Leigh, Stewart Granger, Flora Robson Technicolor 
1946 Notorious Alex Sebastian   Cary Grant, Ingrid Bergman, Louis Calhern Nomination—Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor 
1946 Angel on My Shoulder Nick   Paul Muni, Anne Baxter  
1946 Deception Alexander Hollenius   Bette Davis, Paul Henreid  
1947 The Unsuspected Victor Grandison   Joan Caulfield, Audrey Totter, Constance Bennett, Hurd Hatfield  
1949 The Passionate Friends Howard Justin   Ann Todd, Trevor Howard  
1949 Rope of Sand Arthur "Fred" Martingale   Burt Lancaster, Paul Henreid, Peter Lorre  
1949 Song of Surrender Elisha Hunt   Wanda Hendrix, Macdonald Carey  
1950 The White Tower Paul DeLambre   Glenn Ford, Alida Valli, Oskar Homolka, Cedric Hardwicke, Lloyd Bridges Technicolor 
1950 Where Danger Lives Frederick Lannington   Robert Mitchum, Faith Domergue, Maureen O'Sullivan  
1951 Sealed Cargo Captain Skalder   Dana Andrews, Lloyd Bridges  
1953 The Man Who Watched the Trains Go By Kees Popinga   Märta Torén, Marius Goring Technicolor 
1956 Lisbon Aristides Mavros   Ray Milland, Maureen O'Hara Trucolor Naturama 
1957 The Pied Piper of Hamelin The Mayor of Hamelin   Van Johnson, Lori Nelson Technicolor 
1959 This Earth Is Mine Philippe Rambeau   Rock Hudson, Jean Simmons, Dorothy McGuire Technicolor CinemaScope 
1960 The Lost World Professor George Edward Challenger   Michael Rennie, Jill St. John, David Hedison, Fernando Lamas, Richard Haydn Deluxe color CinemaScope 
1961 Battle of the Worlds Professor Benson   Bill Carter Color 
1962 Lawrence of Arabia Mr. Dryden   Peter O'Toole, Alec Guinness, Jack Hawkins, Omar Sharif, Anthony Quinn, Anthony Quayle, Arthur Kennedy, José Ferrer Technicolor Super Panavision 70 
1963 Twilight of Honor Art Harper   Richard Chamberlain, Nick Adams, Joey Heatherton, Linda Evans  
1965 The Greatest Story Ever Told Herod the Great   Max von Sydow, plus many cameos Technicolor Ultra Panavision 70 

References 
Bibliography

Aljean Harmetz, Round Up the Usual Suspects: The Making of "Casablanca" (New York: Hyperion, 1992)
David J. Skal and Jessica Rains, Claude Rains: An Actor's Voice (University Press of Kentucky, 2008)


External links 
 
 

 
Performances listed in Theatre Archive University of Bristol
 
 
 
 
Stock Grange Farm


  
 
DEFAULTSORT













 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Greer Garson
 Greer Garson, CBE (29 September 1904 – 6 April 1996) was a British actress who was very popular during World War II, being listed by the Motion Picture Herald as one of America's top ten box office draws in 1942-46.   As one of MGM's major stars of the 1940s, Garson received seven Academy Award nominations, winning the Best Actress award for Mrs. Miniver (1942).
Early lifeGreer Garson was born Eileen Evelyn Greer Garson in Manor Park, Essex, England in 1904, the only child of George Garson (1865–1906), a clerk born in London, but with Scottish lineage, and his wife, Nina (née Nancy Sophia Greer; died 1958). Her maternal grandfather was David Greer, a RIC sergeant in Castlewellan, County Down, Ireland in the 1880s and who later became a land steward to the Annesley family (wealthy landlords who built the town of Castlewellan). He lived in a large detached house built on the lower part of what was known as Pig Street or known locally as the Back Way near Shilliday's builder's yard. The house was called ‘Claremount’ and today the street is named Claremount Avenue. It was often reported that Garson was born in this house. She was, in fact, born in London, but spent much of her childhood in Castlewellan.
EducationShe was educated at King's College London, where she earned degrees in French and 18th century literature, and at the University of Grenoble in France.  She had intended to become a teacher, but instead began working with an advertising agency, and appeared in local theatrical productions.
Career
Greer Garson's early professional appearances were on stage, starting at Birmingham Repertory Theatre in January 1932. She appeared on television during its earliest years (the late 1930s), most notably starring in a thirty-minute production of an excerpt of Twelfth Night in May 1937, with Dorothy Black. These live transmissions were part of the BBC's experimental service from Alexandra Palace and this is the first known instance of a Shakespeare play performed on television. Louis B. Mayer discovered Garson while he was in London looking for new talent. Garson was signed to a contract with MGM in late 1937, but did not begin work on her first film, Goodbye, Mr. Chips, until late 1938. She received her first Oscar nomination for the role, but lost to Vivien Leigh for Gone with the Wind. She received critical acclaim the next year for her role as Elizabeth Bennet in the 1940 film, Pride and Prejudice. Garson starred with Joan Crawford in When Ladies Meet in 1941, and that same year became a major box office star with the sentimental Technicolor drama, Blossoms in the Dust, which brought her the first of five consecutive Best Actress Oscar nominations, tying Bette Davis' 1938-42 record, a record that still stands.  Garson won the Academy Award for Best Actress in 1942 for her role as a strong British wife and mother in the middle of World War II in Mrs. Miniver. (Guinness Book of World Records credits her with the longest Oscar acceptance speech, at five minutes and 30 seconds,  after which the Academy Awards instituted a time limit.) She was also nominated for Madame Curie (1943), Mrs. Parkington (1944), and The Valley of Decision (1945).  
Garson was partnered with Clark Gable, after his return from war service, in Adventure (1945). The film was advertised with the catch-phrase "Gable's back and Garson's got him!"  Gable argued for "He put the Arson in Garson"; she countered "She put the Able in Gable!"; thereafter, the safer catchphrase was selected. Garson's popularity dropped somewhat in the late 1940s, but she remained a prominent film star until the mid-1950s. In 1951, she became a naturalised citizen of the United States.  She made only a few films after her MGM contract expired in 1954. In 1958, she received a warm reception on Broadway in Auntie Mame, replacing Rosalind Russell, who had gone to Hollywood to make the film version. In 1960, Garson received her seventh and final Oscar nomination for Sunrise at Campobello, in which she played Eleanor Roosevelt, this time losing to Elizabeth Taylor for Butterfield 8.
Greer was special guest on an episode of the TV series Father Knows Best, playing herself.On 4 October 1956, Garson appeared with Reginald Gardiner as the first two guest stars in the series premiere of NBC's The Ford Show, Starring Tennessee Ernie Ford. Ms. Garson appeared as a mystery guest on What's My Line on 6 April 1958. She stumped the panel.Garson's last film, in 1967, was Disney's The Happiest Millionaire, although she made infrequent television appearances afterwards. In 1968, she narrated the children's television special The Little Drummer Boy, which is currently being aired on ABC Family.
Personal lifeGarson was married three times. Her first marriage, on 28 September 1933, was to Edward Alec Abbot Snelson (1904–1992), later Sir Edward, a British civil servant who became a noted judge and expert in Indian affairs. The actual marriage reportedly lasted only a few weeks, but it was not formally dissolved until 1943.  Her second husband, whom she married (at age 39) in 1943, was Richard Ney (1916–2004), the younger actor (27 years old) who played her son in Mrs. Miniver. They divorced in 1947, with Garson claiming that Ney called her a "has-been" and belittled her age, as well as testimony from Garson that he also physically abused her.  Ney eventually became a respected stock-market analyst and financial consultant.In 1949,    she married a millionaire Texas oilman and horse breeder, E.E. "Buddy" Fogelson (1900–1987), and in 1967, the couple retired to their "Forked Lightning Ranch" in New Mexico. They purchased the U.S. Hall of Fame champion Thoroughbred Ack Ack from the estate of Harry F. Guggenheim in 1971 and were highly successful as breeders. They also maintained a home in Dallas, Texas, where Garson funded the Greer Garson Theatre facility at Southern Methodist University. Garson donated millions for the construction of the Greer Garson Theatre at both the Santa Fe University of Art and Design and at Southern Methodist University's Meadows School of the Arts on three conditions: 1) the stages be circular, 2) the premiere production be William Shakespeare's A Midsummer Night's Dream, and 3) they have large ladies' rooms. Garson was a devout Presbyterian. 
DeathGreer Garson died from heart failure at Presbyterian Hospital in Dallas on 6 April 1996 at the age of 91. She is interred beside her husband in the Sparkman-Hillcrest Memorial Park Cemetery in Dallas.
Filmography

List of film performances
Year Title Role Notes 
1939 Goodbye, Mr. Chips Katherine Chipping Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actress 
1939 Remember? Linda Bronson Holland  
1940   Herself colour test for Blossoms in the Dust 
1940 Pride and Prejudice Elizabeth Bennet  
1941 Blossoms in the Dust Edna Kahly Gladney Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actress 
1941 When Ladies Meet Mrs. Claire Woodruff  
1942 Mrs. Miniver Mrs. Kay Miniver Academy Award for Best Actress 
1942 Random Harvest Paula Ridgeway  
1943   Herself - Guest Star  
1943 Madame Curie Marie Curie Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actress 
1944 Mrs. Parkington Susie "Sparrow" Parkington Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actress 
1945   Mary Rafferty Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actress 
1945 Adventure Emily Sears  
1947 Desire Me Marise Aubert  
1948 Julia Misbehaves Julia Packett  
1949 That Forsyte Woman Irene Forsyte  
1950 Screen Actors  Herself - uncredited short subject 
1950   Mrs. Kay Miniver  
1951 The Law and the Lady Jane Hoskins  
1953 Scandal at Scourie Mrs. Victoria McChesney  
1953 Julius Caesar Calpurnia  
1954 Her Twelve Men Jan Stewart  
1955 Strange Lady in Town Dr. Julia Winslow Garth  
1960 Sunrise at Campobello Eleanor Roosevelt   
1960 Pepe Herself Cameo appearance 
1966   Mother Prioress  
1967   Mrs. Cordelia Biddle  
1968   "Our Story Teller" as Miss Greer Garson 
1978 Little Women Aunt Kathryn March  
1986 Directed by William Wyler Herself documentary 

References
Notes 
Bibliography

Sarvady, Andrea, Leading Ladies: The 50 Most Unforgettable Actresses of the Studio Era (edited by Frank Miller), (TCM Film Guides), San Francisco, Chronicle Books, 2006, ISBN 0-8118-5248-2
Troyan, Michael, A Rose for Mrs. Miniver: The Life of Greer Garson, Lexington, University Press of Kentucky, 1999, ISBN 0-8131-2094-2


External links 

Greer Garson test footage for her role in Goodbye Mr Chips
Garson's New York Times obituary
Elwy Yost interview with Greer Garson from TVO's Saturday Night at the Movies circa 1985
Greer Garson - Tribute site
 
 
 
 
Pecos National Historical Park Forked Lightning Page
Everything About Greer Garson - fan website

 
 
  
  
  
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT



















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Fredric March
 
 
Fredric March (born Ernest Frederick McIntyre Bickel; August 31, 1897 – April 14, 1975) was an American stage and film actor. Obituary Variety, April 16, 1975, page 95.  He won the Academy Award for Best Actor in 1932 for Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde and in 1946 for The Best Years of Our Lives. March is the only actor to win both the Academy Award and the Tony Award for acting twice.
Early lifeMarch was born in Racine, Wisconsin, the son of Cora Brown (née Marcher), a schoolteacher, and John F. Bickel, a devout 
Presbyterian Church elder who worked in the wholesale hardware business.  March attended the Winslow Elementary School (established in 1855), Racine High School, and the University of Wisconsin–Madison where he was a member of Alpha Delta Phi. He began a career as a banker, but an emergency appendectomy caused him to reevaluate his life, and in 1920 he began working as an extra in movies made in New York City, using a shortened form of his mother's maiden name, Marcher. He appeared on Broadway in 1926, and by the end of the decade signed a film contract with Paramount Pictures.
CareerMarch received an Oscar nomination in 1930 for The Royal Family of Broadway, in which he played a role based upon John Barrymore (which he had first played on stage in Los Angeles). He won the Academy Award for Best Actor in 1932 for Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde (tied with Wallace Beery for The Champ although March accrued one more vote than Beery), leading to a series of classic films based on stage hits and classic novels like Design for Living (1933) with Gary Cooper, Death Takes a Holiday (1934), Les Misérables (1935) with Charles Laughton, Anthony Adverse (1936) with Olivia de Havilland, and as the original Norman Maine in A Star is Born (1937) with Janet Gaynor, for which he received his third Oscar nomination.
March was one of the few leading actors of his era to resist signing long-term contracts with the studios, and was able to freelance and pick and choose his roles, in the process also avoiding typecasting. He returned to Broadway after a ten year absence in 1937 with a notable flop Yr. Obedient Husband, but after the huge success of Thornton Wilder's The Skin of Our Teeth he focused his work as much on Broadway theatre as often as on Hollywood film, and his screen career was not as prolific as it had been. He won two Best Actor Tony Awards: in 1947 for the play Years Ago, written by Ruth Gordon; and in 1957 for his performance as James Tyrone in the original Broadway production of Eugene O'Neill's  Long Day's Journey Into Night. He also had major successes in A Bell for Adano in 1944 and Gideon in 1961, and played Ibsen's An Enemy of the People on Broadway in 1951. He also starred in such films as I Married a Witch (1942) and Another Part of the Forest (1948) during this period, and won his second Oscar in 1946 for The Best Years of Our Lives. March also branched out into television, winning Emmy nominations for his third attempt at The Royal Family for the series The Best of Broadway as well as for television performances as Samuel Dodsworth and Ebenezer Scrooge. On March 25, 1954, March co-hosted the 26th Annual Academy Awards ceremony from New York City, with co-host Donald O'Connor in Los Angeles. 
In 1957, March was awarded The George Eastman Award, given by George Eastman House for distinguished contribution to the art of film.March's neighbor in Connecticut, playwright Arthur Miller, was thought to favor March to inaugurate the part of Willy Loman in the Pulitzer Prize-winning Death of a Salesman (1949). However, March read the play and turned down the role, whereupon director Elia Kazan cast Lee J. Cobb as Willy, and Arthur Kennedy as one of Willy's sons, Biff Loman, two men that the director had worked with in the film Boomerang (1947). March later regretted turning down the role and finally played Willy Loman in Columbia Pictures's 1951 film version of the play, directed by Laslo Benedek, receiving his fifth-and-final Oscar nomination as well as a Golden Globe Award. March also played one of the two leads in The Desperate Hours (1955) with Humphrey Bogart when Bogart and Spencer Tracy both insisted upon top billing and Tracy withdrew, leaving the part available for March.  Perhaps March's greatest later career role was in Inherit the Wind (1960), this time working opposite Spencer Tracy. In the 1960s,  March's film career proceeded apace with a notable performance as President Jordan Lyman in the political thriller Seven Days in May (1964) in which he co-starred with Burt Lancaster, Kirk Douglas, and Edmund O'Brien; the part earned March a nomination as Best Actor by Golden Globes.    March also made several spoken word recordings, including a version of Oscar Wilde's The Selfish Giant issued in 1945, in which he narrated and played the title role, and The Sounds of History, a twelve volume LP set accompanying the twelve volume set of books The Life History of the United States, published by Time-Life. The recordings were narrated by Charles Collingwood, with March and his wife Florence Eldridge performing dramatic readings from historical documents and literature. The set was originally issued between 1962 and 1964, but has never been reissued, perhaps due to what some today might term its "political incorrectness" (included in the Civil War section was a reading from Uncle Tom's Cabin, performed in somewhat melodramatic fashion by Ms. Eldridge).When March underwent major surgery for prostate cancer in 1970, it seemed his career was over, yet he managed to give one last great performance in The Iceman Cometh (1973), as the complicated Irish saloon keeper, Harry Hope.  March has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame at 1616 Vine Street. In addition, the 500-seat theater at the University of Wisconsin-Oshkosh is named after March,  as well as the 168-seat Fredric March Play Circle Theater at the University of Wisconsin-Madison Memorial Union.  
Personal life
Although March died in Los Angeles, California, at the age of 77 from cancer, he considered the rural Litchfield County town of New Milford, Connecticut his primary residence since the 1930s. This property was subsequently home to American playwright Lillian Hellman as well as former Secretary of State Henry Kissinger. March was married to actress Florence Eldridge from 1927 until his death, and they had two adopted children. He was buried at his estate in New Milford, Connecticut. Throughout his life, he and his wife were supporters of the Democratic Party. His support for the Republican side during the Spanish Civil War was particularly controversial. 
Filmography and awards

Year Film Role Notes 
1921 The Great Adventure uncredited extra 
Paying the Piper  uncredited extra 
The Education of Elizabeth  uncredited extra 
The Devil  uncredited extra 
1929 The Dummy  Trumbull Meredith  
The Wild Party  James 'Gil' Gilmore  
The Studio Murder Mystery  Richard Hardell  
Paris Bound  Jim Hutton  
Jealousy  Pierre  
Footlights and Fools  Gregory Pyne lost film; the soundtrack survives 
The Marriage Playground  Martin Boyne  
1930 Sarah and Son  Howard Vanning  
Paramount on Parade  Doughboy (cameo)  
Ladies Love Brutes  Dwight Howell  
True to the Navy  Bull's Eye McCoy  
Manslaughter Dan O'Bannon  
Laughter  Paul Lockridge  
The Royal Family of Broadway  Tony Cavendish Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actor 
1931 Honor Among Lovers  Jerry Stafford  
Night Angel  Rudek Berken  
My Sin  Dick Grady  
Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde  Dr. Henry Jekyll/Mr. Hyde Academy Award for Best Actor (tied with Wallace Beery for The Champ) 
1932 Strangers in Love  Buddy Drake/Arthur Drake  
Merrily We Go to Hell  Jerry Corbett  
Make Me a Star  himself behind-the-scenes drama  
Smilin' Through  Kenneth Wayne  
The Sign of the Cross  Marcus Superbus  
Hollywood on Parade No. A-1 himself short film 
1933 Tonight Is Ours  Sabien Pastal  
The Eagle and the Hawk  Jerry H. Young With Cary Grant and Carole Lombard 
Design for Living  Thomas B. 'Tom' Chambers With Gary Cooper and Miriam Hopkins 
1934 All of Me  Don Ellis With Miriam Hopkins and George Raft 
Death Takes a Holiday  Prince Sirki/Death  
Good Dame  Mace Townsley  
The Affairs of Cellini  Benvenuto Cellini  
The Barretts of Wimpole Street  Robert Browning With Norma Shearer and Charles Laughton 
We Live Again Prince Dmitri Nekhlyudov  
Hollywood on Parade No. B-6 himself short film 
1935 Les Misérables  Jean Valjean/Champmathieu  
Anna Karenina  Vronsky  
The Dark Angel  Alan Trent  
Screen Snapshots Series 14, No. 11 himself short film 
1936 The Road to Glory  Lieutenant Michel Denet  
Mary of Scotland  Bothwell With Katharine Hepburn Directed by John Ford 
Anthony Adverse  Anthony Adverse  
Screen Snapshots Series 16, No. 3 himself short film 
1937 A Star Is Born  Norman Maine Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actor With Janet Gaynor 
Nothing Sacred  Wallace 'Wally' Cook  
Screen Snapshots Series 16, No. 5 himself short film 
1938 The Buccaneer  Jean Lafitte  
There Goes My Heart Bill Spencer  
Trade Winds  Sam Wye  
1939 The 400 Million Narrator Documentary of Chinese history 
1940 Susan and God Barrie Trexel  
Victory Hendrik Heyst  
Lights Out in Europe Narrator War documentary about the outbreak of World War II in Europe 
1941 So Ends Our Night Josef Steiner  
One Foot in Heaven William Spence  
Bedtime Story Lucius 'Luke' Drake With Loretta Young and Robert Benchley 
1942 I Married a Witch  Jonathan Wooley/Nathaniel Wooley/Samuel Wooley With Veronica Lake and Robert Benchley 
Lake Carrier Narrator Documentary short 
1944 Valley of the Tennessee Narrator voice only 
The Adventures of Mark Twain  Samuel Langhorne Clemens  
Tomorrow, the World! Mike Frame  
1946 The Best Years of Our Lives  Al Stephenson Academy Award for Best Actor With Myrna Loy 
1948 Another Part of the Forest  Marcus Hubbard  
An Act of Murder  Judge Calvin Cooke  
1949 Christopher Columbus  Christopher Columbus  
The Ford Theatre Hour  Television  Episode: "The Twentieth Century" 
1950 The Titan: Story of Michelangelo  Narrator documentary about the life and works of Michelangelo Buonarroti 
Nash Airflyte Theatre  Television Episode: "The Boor" 
1951 It's a Big Country Joe Esposito  
Death of a Salesman Willy Loman Golden Globe Award for Best Actor – Motion Picture Drama Volpi Cup Nominated — Academy Award for Best Actor Nominated — BAFTA Award for Best Foreign Actor 
Lux Video Theatre  Television Episode: "The Speech" 
1952 Lux Video Theatre  Television Episode: "Ferry Crisis at Friday Point" 
Toast of the Town himself later known as The Ed Sullivan Show 
1953 25th Academy Awards himself presenter Academy Award for Best Actress to Shirley Booth for Come Back, Little Sheba 
Omnibus  Television Episode: "The Last Night of Don Juan" 
Man on a Tightrope  Karel Cernik With Terry Moore and Gloria Grahame 
The Bridges at Toko-Ri  Rear Admiral George Tarrant  
1954 26th Academy Awards himself Co-hosted from New York, with Donald O'Connor in Hollywood 
Executive Suite  Loren Phineas Shaw Venice Film Festival Special Jury Prize for Ensemble Acting (shared with the principal cast) Nominated — BAFTA Award for Best Foreign Actor 
The Best of Broadway Tony Cavendish Television Episode: "The Royal Family" (based on March's Broadway play and film of the same name) Nominated — Emmy Award for Best Single Performance by an Actor 
Shower of Stars Ebenezer Scrooge Television Episode: "A Christmas Carol" Nominated — Emmy Award for Best Single Performance by an Actor 
What's My Line? himself  
1955 The Desperate Hours  Dan C. Hilliard With Humphrey Bogart 
1956 Alexander the Great Philip of Macedonia  
The Man in the Gray Flannel Suit  Ralph Hopkins  
Producers' Showcase Sam Dodsworth Television Episode: "Dodsworth" Nominated — Emmy Award for Best Single Performance by an Actor 
Shower of Stars Eugene Tesh Television Episode: "The Flattering World" 
Island of Allah Narrator  
1957 Toast of the Town himself later known as The Ed Sullivan Show 
Albert Schweitzer Narrator documentary 
1958 The DuPont Show of the Month Arthur Winslow Television Episode: "The Winslow Boy" 
Tales from Dickens Host also known as Fredric March Presents Tales From Dickens, March hosted seven episodes during 1958 and 1959.  Episodes: "Bardell Versus Pickwick", "Uriah Heep", "A Christmas Carol", "David and Betsy Trotwood", "David and His Mother", "Christmas at Dingley Dell" and "The Runaways" 
1959 Middle of the Night  Jerry Kingsley Nominated — Golden Globe Award for Best Actor – Motion Picture Drama Written by Paddy Chayevsky 
1960 Inherit the Wind Matthew Harrison Brady Won — Silver Bear for Best Actor (Berlin Film Festival)    Nominated — BAFTA Award for Best Foreign Actor With Spencer Tracy 
1961 The Young Doctors  Dr. Joseph Pearson  
1962 I Sequestrati di Altona  (The Condemned of Altona) Albrecht von Gerlach  
1963 A Tribute to John F. Kennedy from the Arts Host broadcast on November 24, 1963, two days after the assassination of John F. Kennedy 
1964 Seven Days in May  President Jordan Lyman Nominated — Golden Globe Award for Best Actor – Motion Picture Drama With Burt Lancaster and Kirk Douglas 
The Presidency: A Splendid Mystery Narrator Television 
Pieta Narrator documentary 
1967 Hombre  Dr. Alex Favor With Paul Newman 
1970 …tick…tick…tick…  Mayor Jeff Parks  
1973 The Iceman Cometh  Harry Hope With Lee Marvin and Robert Ryan 

References 
External links 
 

 
Photographs of Fredric March

 
  
DEFAULTSORT



















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Jeff Kennett
 
 
 
 
Jeffrey Gibb Kennett AC (born 2 March 1948), a former Australian politician, was the Premier of Victoria between 1992 and 1999. He was the President of Hawthorn Football Club from 2005 - 2011.  He is the founding Chairman of beyondblue, a national depression initiative.
Early lifeKennett was born in Melbourne on 2 March 1948, and educated at Scotch College.  Kennett was an unexceptional student academically, but did well in Scotch's Cadet Corps Unit.  His failure to rise above the middle band academically almost led him to quit school in Fourth Form (Year 10 – 1963), but he was persuaded to stay on.  His Fifth and Sixth Forms were an improvement, but he was still described in school reports as "[a] confident and at times helpful boy.  Sometimes irritates.  Sometimes works hard" (1964), and "[a] keen, pleasant, though sometimes erratic boy" (1965). After leaving school, Kennett was persuaded by his father Ken to attend the Australian National University in Canberra, but lost interest and left after one year of an economics degree. He returned to Melbourne and found work in the advertising department of the retail giant Myer – kindling an interest for advertising that would one day earn him his living. Kennett's life in the regular workforce was cut short when, in 1968, he was conscripted into the Australian Army.   Kennett was singled out as 'officer material' early in his career, and graduated third in his class from the Officer Training Unit (OTU) Scheyville, near Windsor, New South Wales, outside Sydney. He was posted to Malaysia and Singapore as Second Lieutenant, commander of 1st Platoon, A Company, 1st Battalion, Royal Australian Regiment (1RAR).  This military career (and his earlier experience in the Scotch College Cadet Corps) has been noted by many biographers as an essential formative influence on the adult Kennett's character. His sense and regard for hierarchical loyalty, punctuality, and general intolerance of dissent or disobedience may be traced to this period. Kennett returned to civilian life in 1970, reentering a divided Australian society, split by the Vietnam War, of which Kennett was a firm supporter. Having returned to Myer, Kennett became impatient with his work, and so with Ian Fegan and Eran Nicols, he formed his own advertising company (KNF) in June 1971. 
Thereafter, in December 1972, Kennett married Felicity Kellar, an old friend whom he had first met on a Number 7 tram on the long trips to school.  Their first son, Ed, was born in 1974, followed by a daughter Amy, and two more sons, Angus and Ross.
Political careerInterested in local politics since the early 1970s, Kennett was elected as a Liberal Member of the Victorian Legislative Assembly (MLA) for Burwood in 1976. Economou, 'Jeff Kennett', p.366.  His preselection for the seat reportedly irritated then Premier Dick Hamer, who disliked Kennett's campaigning style, and had endorsed the sitting member, Haddon Storey.  Entering Hamer's government, Kennett was soon appointed Minister for Housing, Immigration and Ethnic Affairs in 1981. He retained this post when Hamer was replaced as Liberal leader and Premier by Lindsay Thompson in June of that year.  Following the defeat of the longstanding Liberal government in 1982, Kennett was the leading candidate to replace Lindsay Thompson, and on 26 October, he was elected Leader of the Liberal Party, despite being the youngest member of the outgoing Cabinet.  He was an aggressive Leader of the Opposition, and was criticised for his "bull-in-a-china-shop" style and his anti-government rhetoric. Kennett's performance as Opposition Leader is a subject of debate. Economou sees his 1985 and 1988 election campaigns as weak, Economou, 'Jeff Kennett', p.368.  while Parkinson believes he was a significant asset in pushing the Labor government of John Cain in several key seats.  Kennett soon faced a challenge to his leadership of the party from Ian Smith.  Kennett survived easily, but increasingly, he was seen as an erratic and unapproachable leader.  He faced two more challenges to his leadership in 1986 and 1987 respectively.   In 1987, in one notable incident Kennett referred to the Federal Liberal leader John Howard using colourful language in a mobile telephone conversation with Howard rival Andrew Peacock.   The car-phone conversation damaged both Howard and Kennett politically, but aided Peacock in his push to return as Federal Liberal leader (1989). Toward the end of its second term the Cain government had endured some loss in support and the Liberals were expected to win the 1988 election.  When Cain was returned with a small but workable majority, Kennett was again criticised within his own party, and in 1989 he was deposed as leader and replaced by Alan Brown, a little-known rural Member of the Legislative Assembly.  A furious Kennett described Alan Hunt, the instigator of the coup, as "a man never to be trusted" .  He publicly pledged never to attempt a return to the Liberal leadership, but when Brown proved unable to challenge the government effectively, he allowed his supporters to organise a party-room coup and restore him to the leadership, unopposed, in 1991.
First term as premier 
 
Given that Victoria's finances were in billions of dollars of debt, Kennett was seen from the beginning of his second leadership period as 'Premier-in-waiting'.  The Liberals (in coalition with the National Party of Australia) won the October 1992 election in a landslide.  In the second-largest landslide in history, the Liberals and Nationals attained a 34-seat majority in the Legislative Assembly.  The Liberals actually won 52 seats, enough for a majority in their own right.  However, the Coalition was retained.In office, Kennett immediately instituted a budget-cutting and privatisation program, in an effort to improve the State's economy. Having assumed office, the need for such action was justified when Kennett and his new Treasurer Alan Stockdale discovered that the outgoing government had left them with $2.2 billion budget deficit, a net public sector debt of $33 billion and budget sector debt of $16 billion.  To resolve this debt, some 50,000 public servants were retrenched between 1992 and 1995.Moreover, in the first three years of the 'Kennett Revolution' (as the Premier himself came to term it), government funding for the public school system was substantially reduced, with 350 government schools closed, and 7,000 teaching jobs removed.  Other controversial moves included the sacking of 16,000 public transport workers in a major technological upgrade of the system, and the initiation of a major scheme for privatisation of state-owned services, including the electricity (SECV) and gas (Gas and Fuel Corporation of Victoria) utilities, the ambulance service, as well as several prisons and other minor services.  The sale of the Totalisator Agency Board raised $609 million. Between 1995 and 1998, $29 billion of state assets in gas and electricity alone were sold to private enterprise (for statistics, see Parkinson, Jeff, 1999). 
In the wake of these changes, investment and population growth slowly resumed, though unemployment was to remain above the national average for the duration of Kennett's premiership. While the benefits to the State budget figures were indisputable, the social and longer-term economic cost of the Kennett reforms have been questioned by many commentators, academics and those who suffered economically through the period of reform.              This campaign of privatisations and cutbacks led to governmental acts of privatisation or budget-cutting becoming popularly known as being "Jeffed".  The largest public protest in Melbourne since the Vietnam War occurred on 10 November 1992, with an estimated 100,000 people marching in opposition to the retrenchment of many workers and the large State budget cutbacks. Kennett was undeterred by this protest, and famously commented that though there were 100,000 outside his office at Parliament that day, there were 4.5 million who stayed at home or at work. It was difficult to assess the merits or otherwise of Kennett's 'Revolution' in his first term at the time, as many including Auditor-General Ches Baragwanath) claimed that the true value of the reforms will not be apparent until well into the 21st century.   However, as time has passed, Kennett's policies have been widely criticised and used as examples of poor governmental decision making.    The Kennett government also embarked on a series of high-profile capital works projects, such as the restoration of Parliament House (never completed), construction of a new $250 million Melbourne Museum and IMAX theatre, and a new $130 million Melbourne Convention and Exhibition Centre (still known colloquially as 'Jeff's Shed'). Other projects, made possible in monetary terms by the early cutbacks and budget restructuring, included a $160 million expansion of the National Gallery of Victoria; $100 million for refurbishment of the State Library of Victoria; $65 million for a new Melbourne Sports and Aquatic Centre (MSAC); and $130 million for the construction of a new civic square on the site of the old Gas and Fuel Buildings, to be known as Federation Square.The relocation of the Formula 1 Grand Prix from Adelaide in 1993 was a particular coup for Kennett, who had worked hard with his friend Ron Walker, the Chairman of the Melbourne Major Events Company, helped deliver Melbourne the hosting rights for the event from Adelaide in 1993. The most controversial project of the Kennett era was the $1.85 billion Crown Casino and Entertainment Complex, a gambling and entertainment centre on Melbourne's Southbank. Initial plans for a casino had been made under the Labor government, however the tendering process and construction occurred under Kennett. Allegations of financial inconsistencies in the tendering process (which eventually saw longtime Kennett supporters Ron Walker and Lloyd Williams successful) were to dog the Kennett government for many years, despite the verdict of an enquiry which found no wrongdoing on its behalf. A $2 billion project to redevelop Melbourne's derelict Docklands area to include a new football stadium was also undertaken, in addition to the large CityLink project, a project resurrected from the 1969 Melbourne Transportation Plan, aimed at linking Melbourne's freeways, easing traffic problems in the inner city, and reducing commuting times from the outer suburbs to the CBD. 
Second term as premierKennett's personal popularity remained high through his first term, though that of the government as a whole went through peaks and troughs. Without a by-election in the previous four years, the 1996 election shaped up as the first test of the 'Kennett Revolution' with the electorate. Though expected to win, the scale of the victory was unanticipated. On 30 March 1996, Kennett was reelected with a 32-seat majority.Kennett was influential in Melbourne bidding for the 2006 Commonwealth Games. Three cities initially expressed interest in hosting the event; Melbourne, Wellington and Singapore. Singapore dropped out before its bid was officially selected by the Commonwealth Games Federation, leaving only two candidate cities. In the weeks prior to the announcement of the 2006 host, Wellington withdrew its bid, citing the costs involved with matching the bid plan presented by Melbourne, which became the default host without members of the Federation going to vote. Several negative trends (for the Liberals) were obscured somewhat by the euphoria of victory. The government's sharp cuts to government services were particularly resented in country Victoria, where the Liberals and their coalition partners, National Party held almost all the seats. The loss of the Mildura seat to an independent Russell Savage was an indication of this disaffection, and when in February 1997 independent Susan Davies was elected to the seat of Gippsland West, this trend seemed set to continue.However, the verdict of many was that the 'Kennett Revolution' was far from over – indeed it was seemingly set in stone with the opening of the Crown Casino in May 1997. Kennett's profile continued to grow as he became a major commentator on national issues, including urging the new government of John Howard to introduce tax reform, and actively opposing the rise of the One Nation Party of Pauline Hanson. In this last case, Kennett did not shy away from criticising the media, but also the decision of the Howard government to not actively oppose Hanson's agenda. The government lost ground over the next few years, with high-profile disagreements with the Director of Public Prosecutions Bernard Bongiorno, and Auditor-General Ches Baragwanath fuelling criticism of Kennett's governmental style. Kennett's perceived antipathy to Baragwanath led to 1997 legislation to restructure the office of the Auditor-General and set up Audit Victoria. While Kennett promised the independence of the office would be maintained, many saw his government's actions as an attempt to curb the Auditor-General's power to criticise government policy.  Widespread community debate and substantial public dissent from Liberal MPs and Party members ensued, with MLA Roger Pescott resigning from Parliament at the height of the debate; citing his disagreement with this Bill and Kennett's style in general.  The Liberal Party lost the by-election in Mitcham.Further scandals involving the handling of contracts for the state emergency services response system damaged the credibility of Kennett in 1997–1998, while rural dissent continued to grow.Personal difficulties also began to affect Kennett and his family. The strains of public life led to a trial separation between Felicity and Jeff in early 1998 (patched up by the end of the year), while earlier in Kennett's first term, public scrutiny had led to the forced sale of the KNF Advertising Company, despite all Kennett's involvement having been transferred to his wife's name. There were rumours in 1998 that Kennett might retire from politics; these were mostly centred around Phil Gude, a longtime minister (as Industry and Employment Minister, 1992–1996, and Minister for Education, 1996–1999). These eventually came to nothing.In July 1998, Liberal MP Peter McLellan, Member for Frankston East, resigned from the party in protest over alleged corrupt Liberal Party Senate preselection, changes to WorkCover and the auditor-general’s office.  Again, Kennett failed to pick up the warning signs of declining support for his style of leadership.Labor leader John Brumby took care to capitalise on each of Kennett's mistakes over this period, though his absences in rural electorates were misunderstood by many Labor MPs, and led to his replacement by Steve Bracks in early 1999. Bracks, who came from Ballarat, was popular in rural areas and was seen as a fresh alternative to Brumby, who nevertheless remained a key figure in the shadow Cabinet. Despite the appeal of Bracks, Kennett entered the 1999 election campaign with a seemingly unassailable lead, and most commentators and opinion polls agreed that he would win a third term. On the morning of the election a leading political journalist, Ewen Hannan, predicted that 'Labor supporters will be crying into their beers tonight'. 
1999 election lossThe Liberals lost 13 seats to Labor, led by Steve Bracks, at the 1999 election, most of them in regional centres such as Ballarat and Bendigo. The final result in the Legislative Assembly was: Labor, 42 seats; the Liberals and Nationals, 43; with three independents holding the balance of power.   Independents Russell Savage and Susan Davies were joined by a third Independent, Craig Ingram.   Negotiations began between Kennett's Liberal Party and the three independents. While Kennett acceded to their demands, his perceived poor treatment of Savage and Davies in the previous parliament meant that they held a position that they would never agree to support a Liberal Party minority government while Kennett remained leader.  The Liberal negotiators did not reveal this to their party and Labor was ultimately successful in winning their support to form a government, after signing a Charter of Good Government, pledging to restore services to rural areas, and promising parliamentary reforms.The defeat of the Kennett government was unexpected.  Kennett's supporters urged the Liberal Party to force a vote of 'no confidence' on the floor of the parliament in a last-ditch effort to force Savage, Davies and Ingram to support the Liberal government; however with the Liberal Party divided on Kennett's future role, Kennett resigned as Leader of the Liberal Party and from Parliament, saying he wished to have no further involvement in politics.  The consequent Burwood by-election was won by the Labor Party.
Rumoured returns to politicsAfter the Liberals' second election defeat in 2002, rumours began that Kennett was planning a comeback to politics. The issue came to a head in May 2006 after the sudden resignation of the Liberal Party leader, Robert Doyle, when Kennett announced he would contemplate standing in a by-election for the seat vacated by Doyle and offering himself as party leader. His stance was supported by Prime Minister John Howard, who rated him as the party's best hope to win the November 2006 state election. But within 24 hours Kennett announced he would not return to Parliament rather than running against Ted Baillieu, whom Kennett had been grooming for the top post since 1999.   John Howard was reported to have been "embarrassed" by having publicly supported Kennett before his decision not to re-enter politics. In 2008, it was rumoured that Kennett was intending to stand for Lord Mayor of Melbourne. Despite endorsing future Lord Mayor John So in the 2001 mayoral elections, Kennett was quoted as saying "I think the city is ready for a change". Kennett claimed he had been approached by "a range of interests" to run for the position, but in the end did not do so.  Former Liberal leader Robert Doyle ultimately won the election.
Life after politicsIn 2000 Kennett became the inaugural chairman of beyondblue (the National Depression Initiative), a body that was largely formed by the efforts of the Victorian State Government. On 24 June 2008, he announced that he would be stepping down from his role at beyondblue at the end of 2010.   This did not happen.For a brief period during 2002, Kennett was a radio presenter for Melbourne station 3AK, continuing an interest in mass communication which was also a feature of his premiership. He also serves on the boards of Australian Seniors Finance,  a reverse mortgage company, and SelecTV, a satellite television group.On 14 December 2005 Kennett was made President of Hawthorn Football Club, taking over from Ian Dicker. In the Australia Day Honours of 2005, Kennett received Australia's highest civilian honour, when he was made a Companion of the Order of Australia (AC).  He was also awarded an honorary doctorate – Hon DBus (Honoris Causa) – by the University of Ballarat.Mr Kennett said in an interview he rarely thinks anymore about the media or "bloody history", though he does still regret the "disastrous" introduction of the Metcard ticketing system for trains and trams.   Kennett angered gay rights groups in July 2008 when he supported the Bonnie Doon Football Club in their sacking of trainer Ken Campagnolo for being bisexual; and compared homosexuality to pedophilia.  Anti-discrimination campaigner Gary Burns pursued an action in the NSW Administrative Decisions Tribunal against Kennett for making the following statement:
 
"The club felt that once this had been pointed out and you had this gentleman there who was obviously close to young men – massaging young men – it ran an unnecessary risk, and that's why it decided it was best that he not perform those duties again. So the club was trying to do the right thing,"  Gay activist drops case against Kennett Sydney Morning Herald 8 September 2009 
 
The case was dropped due to Gary Burns' lack of funds to pursue the case. In 2011 Kennett was again accused of homophobia when he stated children have better mental health if raised in heterosexual marriages. 
Publications

Kennett, Jeff. Policies and principles for Victoria, Melbourne: Sir Robert Menzies Lecture Trust, Monash University, 1993.
Kennett, Jeff. Victoria's Commonsense Revolution, Melbourne: Alfred Deakin Lecture Trust, 1995.
Kennett, Jeff. Australia – defining a model for the new millennium, London: University of London, Institute of Commonwealth Studies, Sir Robert Menzies Centre for Australian Studies, 1998.


Further reading

Aldford, John & O'Neill, Deirdre (eds), Contract State: public management and the Kennett government, Geelong: Centre for Applied Research, 1994. 192 pages. ISBN 0-7300-2111-4
Costar, Brian & Economou, Nick (eds), The Kennett revolution : Victorian politics in the 1990s, Sydney: UNSW Press, 1999. 274 pages. ISBN 0-86840-545-0
Donovan, Barry (2000). Steve Bracks and Jeff Kennett: My part in their rise and fall, Melbourne: Information Australia. 224 pages. ISBN 1-86350-304-8
Parkinson, Tony (2000). Jeff: The Rise and Fall of a Political Phenomenon, Penguin: Melbourne. 471 pages. ISBN 0-670-88778-1
Strangio, Paul & Costar, Brian (eds) (2006). The Victorian Premiers: 1856–2006, Annandale: Federation Press. ISBN 1-86287-601-0


References 
External links  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   
DEFAULTSORT













 
	John Cain II
 
  
John Cain (born 26 April 1931), Australian Labor Party politician, was the 41st Premier of Victoria, holding office from 1982 to 1990. During his time as Premier, changes were enforced to the practices of various institutions in Melbourne which discriminated against women, while other reforms were introduced such as libearlized shop trading hours and liquor laws, equal opportunity initiatives, and occupational health and safety legislation. 
BiographyCain was born in Melbourne, the son of John Cain, leader of the Labor Party in Victoria from 1937 to 1957 and three times Premier. He was educated at Bell Primary School, Northcote High School, Scotch College, Melbourne and at the University of Melbourne, where he graduated in law. He practised law in suburban Melbourne, and was Chairman of the Victorian Law Institute in 1971–72. He was also a member of the Law Council of Australia and a member of the Australian Law Reform Commission.Cain was 24 at the time of the 1955 split in the Labor Party that brought down his father's last government.  He lost a preselection battle with Frank Wilkes for his late father's seat of Northcote in 1957. During the 1960s he was a member of the group, known as The Participants, which also included John Button, Richard McGarvie Frank Costigan and Barry Jones, who opposed the left-wing group which controlled the Victorian Labor Party from 1955 onwards. In 1971 he supported the moves by supporters of Gough Whitlam, led by Bob Hawke and others, that in 1971 brought about federal intervention in the Victorian branch and ended left-wing control. He became Vice-Chairman of the Victorian Labor Party in 1973. That group of Participants later became known as the Independents faction which predominantly voted with the Socialist Left.
CareerIn 1976 Cain was elected to the Victorian Legislative Assembly as MP for Bundoora. He became shadow Attorney-General under the leadership of Frank Wilkes, but when Wilkes lost the 1979 election to the Liberal premier, Dick Hamer, Cain challenged him for the leadership, becoming leader in September 1981. In April 1982 Cain defeated the Liberals and formed the first Labor government in Victoria for 27 years since the one led by his father.
PremiershipDuring the first term of his government, Cain's government carried out many reforms to Victorian government, particularly in the areas of education, environment, law reform and public administration. The Government brought in nude beaches, legalized brothels, extended Saturday shop trading hours, extended nightclub hours, extended hotel hours and allowed Sunday VFL football and more gambling opportunities. Cain enigma and me, Derryn Hinch, The Sun 11 August 1990. Cain was a Keynesian, opposed to the doctrines of economic rationalism, and he increased government spending in the hope of stimulating growth and investment. Following the lead of NSW premier Neville Wran, Cain demanded Government owned enterprises pay dividends to the treasury, these dividends were increased every year forcing these enterprises to borrow to pay the dividend. Other schemes such as the Victorian Economic Development Corporation, and the Victorian Equity Trust promised good returns. These schemes worked so long as the national economy remained buoyant.The Government of Victoria refused to approve the plans for the upgrade VFL Park in 1982/1983, because the upgrade would have threatened the Melbourne Cricket Ground's right to host the VFL Grand Final. Cain said that such a major event must be played in the centre of Melbourne.Cain was also responsible for the appointment as Governor of Davis McCaughey, then aged 71, who served from 1986 to 1992. A highly respected theologian, McCaughey was a popular choice after the controversy surrounding after the resignation of Rear Admiral Sir Brian Murray, following disputed accusations that he had improperly accepted free air travel.
Second TermCain remained very popular with the Victorian electorate, and was easily elected to a second term in 1985, becoming the first Labor premier to be reelected. Due to a tied vote in the upper house province of Nunawading, and having the winning vote drawn from a hat, a Labor government for the first time in its history had control of the Legislative Council. Cain was able to push his Workcare Act. A fresh election ordered by the Court of Disputed Returns after it was found that the Chief Electoral Officer drew a name from the hat rather than caste the deciding vote. The Liberals won re-election and Labor lost its slim majority. Within a week the Chairman of the Victorian Nuclear Disarmament Party, lodged an official complaint about a deceptive NDP how to vote card handed out at the booths. It was claimed that members of the Australian Labor Party were recognised handing out this card and that the allocation of preferences to the ALP on the card damaged the NDP. 
The government entered a cover-up to protect its state secretary Peter Batchelor and the Labor party. During its second term Cain's government began to run into difficulties with the state budget. The stock market crash of 1987 created a crisis which forced the government to cut spending, alienating some trade union supporters. The State Bank of Victoria, in particular its merchant banking arm Tricontinental, ran up a huge portfolion of bad loans, without adequate fiduciary supervision.Progress had created a vast amount of vacant inner-city land, with the introduction of containerisation in the shipping industry, the docks became inadequate for the new container ships. This made the docks within Victoria Harbour obsolete as the principal docking area shifted closer to the mouth of the Yarra, this was seen as a large urban blight by the Cain state government. The size of the Melbourne Docklands area meant that political influences were inescapable.The Docklands was high on the government's agenda,    however, the government at the time could not afford to initiate the investment for the project so the Docklands project stayed on the drawing board. There was a bid for the 1992 Olympic Games and another proposal was to turn the Docklands into a technology city known as the Multifunction Polis (MFP). 
Third TermThe Cain government was narrowly re-elected to a third term in 1988, but immediately after the election a huge shortfall in the government's workers' compensation scheme, WorkCare, was revealed. The collapse of the Victorian Economic Development Corporation, a venture-capital fund that tried to pick winners but racked up huge losses. The VEDC and its sister, the Victorian Investment Corporation, were created to back new industries to replace outdated smokestack manufacturers. The VEDC collapsed under poor management and an absence of political accountability after it had provided $450 million of loan and equity assistance to business. 
 
 This was followed by a budgetary crisis that the government was unable to deal with, partly because of the large spending programmes the government had previously instituted, partly because he was unable to obtain support from within his government for necessary spending reductions and also because the federal Government declined to "bail out" the Victorian government as they believed Cain's overspending was significantly to blame. The deputy premier Robert Fordham took some of the blame and resigned. This led to the elevation of Joan Kirner to deputy premier.His refusal to back down over banning tobacco advertising forced the Australian motorcycle Grand Prix to relocate from Phillip Island to Eastern Creek in Sydney.For 33 days from 1 January 1990, 250 trams were parked in Melbourne's CBD streets by tram drivers. The Cain government wanted to save $24 million a year, by the introduction of a  new Met Ticket system - or scratchies as they were colloquially known. Scratch tickets were supposed to save money by cutting 550 ticket conductor jobs and 550 train station staff. The trams did not move because the government shut down the power grid. 
 
 In February 1990 it was rumoured that Pyramid, a privately owned (but government regulated) building society, was in difficulties. Ministers in Cain's government accepted assurances from Pyramid directors that the society's position was sound, and passed these assurances on to the public. In fact the society was insolvent. When it failed, causing thousands of investors and depositors to lose their money, the government was blamed by investors and the media. This was followed shortly after by the collapse of Tricontinental Bank, which threatened to bankrupt the Victorian Government owned State Bank, Victoria's largest financial institution. The bank eventually had to be sold to the Commonwealth Bank, which was shortly thereafter privatised by the federal government. These disasters permanently ruined Cain's reputation for financial management.By this time Cain was becoming frustrated at the reluctance of his government's caucus members to approve his plans for tax rises and spending cuts to reduce the growing budget deficit. He issued an ultimatum at the Labor Party Conference to "back me or sack me." When the undermining of his position continued, he resigned on 7 August 1990. During an interview after his resignation, he remarked, "We appointed a few dills but we weren't crook."   Joan Kirner was elected Labor leader in Cain's place and became the first female premier of Victoria.  Cain retired from Parliament at the 1992 Victorian state election, which Labor lost.
Life after ParliamentCain became a Professorial Fellow in politics at the University of Melbourne in 1991, and has since completed three books. In 2004 he surfaced in the media with a damning critique of the University of Melbourne's experimentation with what he says are risky financial ventures and what he argues is its departure from its public mission. Off Course: From Public Place to Marketplace at Melbourne University attracted a range of critical commentary. He is a regular political commentator on local radio. He has remained active in the affairs of the Victorian Labor Party, and has recently  
 
  been critical of what he sees as the dominance of factions in the party, particularly the Labor Right. He is one of the ALP's Dispute Tribunal members, a panel of three people from which one is selected randomly to adjudicate internal party disputes. Some members have expressed concern that his public statements on factions means that he has prejudged disputes that could appear before him.John Cain sits on the board of the MCG Trust.  
  He is also a member of the Patrons Council of the Epilepsy Foundation of Victoria.
References 
Books

Cain, J. 1995. John Cain's years – power, parties and politics. Melbourne University Publishing.
Cain, J. 1998. On With the Show. Melbourne: Prowling Tiger Press. (on the entertainment industry in Australia)
Cain, J. and Hewitt, J. 2004. Off Course: From Public Place to Marketplace at Melbourne University. Melbourne: Scribe.

 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
    
DEFAULTSORT











	Mickey Mantle
 
Mickey Charles Mantle (October 20, 1931 – August 13, 1995) was an American baseball center fielder who played 18 seasons in Major League Baseball (MLB) for the New York Yankees from 1951 to 1968. Mantle is regarded by many to be the greatest switch hitter of all time,  and one of the greatest players in baseball history. Mantle was inducted into the National Baseball Hall of Fame in 1974   and was elected to the Major League Baseball All-Century Team in 1999.Mantle was noted for his hitting ability, both for average and for power.  He won the Triple Crown in 1956, leading MLB in batting average, home runs, and runs batted in (RBI).  He received three American League (AL) Most Valuable Player (MVP) Awards and played in twenty All-Star games. Mantle appeared in 12 World Series, winning 7 of them. He holds the records for most World Series home runs (18), RBIs (40), runs (42), walks (43), extra-base hits (26), and total bases (123).  He is also the career leader (tied with Jim Thome) in walk-off home runs, with a combined thirteen, twelve in the regular season and one in the postseason.
Early lifeMickey Mantle was born in Spavinaw, Oklahoma, the son of Elvin Charles Mantle, a lead miner known as "Mutt," and Lovell (née Richardson) Mantle.    He was of at least partial English ancestry; his great-grandfather, George Mantle, left Brierley Hill, in England's Black Country, in 1848. Mutt named his son in honor of Mickey Cochrane, the Hall of Fame catcher.  Later in his life, Mantle expressed relief that his father had not known Cochrane's true first name, as he would have hated to be named Gordon.  Mantle spoke warmly of his father, and said he was the bravest man he ever knew. "No boy ever loved his father more," he said. Mickey would use his natural right-handed swing against his left-handed father and then turn around and bat left-handed against his right-handed grandfather. His father died of Hodgkin's disease in 1952 at the age of 39, just as his son was starting his career.When Mantle was four years old, the family moved to the nearby town of Commerce, Oklahoma, where his father worked in lead and zinc mines.  As a teenager, Mantle rooted for the St. Louis Cardinals.  Mantle was an all-around athlete at Commerce High School, playing basketball as well as football (he was offered a football scholarship by the University of Oklahoma) in addition to his first love, baseball. His football playing nearly ended his athletic career, and indeed his life. Kicked in the shin during a game, Mantle's leg soon became infected with osteomyelitis, a crippling disease that would have been incurable just a few years earlier. A midnight drive to Tulsa, Oklahoma, enabled Mantle to be treated with newly available penicillin, saving his leg from amputation.  Additionally, Mantle's osteomyelitic condition exempted him from military service    in the Korean conflict; his exemption caused him to become very unpopular with fans early on, who doubtless reasoned that a person who was physically fit to play baseball was sufficiently fit to serve in the military, particularly when it was observed that he was selected as an All-Star in the same year that his "medical exemption" had been given (1952). 
Professional career
Minor league baseball (1948–1950)Mantle began his professional career with the semi-professional Baxter Springs Whiz Kids.  In 1948, Yankees' scout Tom Greenwade came to Baxter Springs to watch Mantle's teammate, third baseman Billy Johnson. During the game, Mantle hit three home runs. Greenwade returned in 1949, after Mantle's high school graduation, to sign Mantle to a minor league contract. Mantle signed for $140 per month ($  today) with a $1,500 ($  today) signing bonus. Mantle was assigned to the Yankees' Class-D Independence Yankees of the Kansas–Oklahoma–Missouri League,  where he played shortstop.  During a slump, Mantle called his father to tell him he wanted to quit baseball. Mutt drove to Independence and convinced Mantle to keep playing baseball.  Mantle hit .313 for the Independence Yankees.    In 1950, Mantle was promoted to the Class-C Joplin Miners of the Western Association.  Mantle won the Western Association batting title, with a .383 average. He also hit 26 home runs and recorded 136 runs batted in.  However, Mantle struggled defensively at shortstop. 
Major League Baseball (1951–1968)
Rookie season: 1951Mantle was invited to the Yankees instructional camp before the 1951 season. After an impressive spring training, Yankees manager Casey Stengel decided to promote Mantle to the majors as a right fielder instead of sending him to the minors.  
Mantle was assigned uniform #6, signifying the expectation that he would become the next Yankees star, following Babe Ruth (#3), Lou Gehrig (#4) and Joe DiMaggio (#5).  Stengel, speaking to SPORT, stated "He's got more natural power from both sides than anybody I ever saw."  Bill Dickey called Mantle "the greatest prospect [he's] seen in [his] time." After a brief slump, Mantle was sent down to the Yankees' top farm team, the Kansas City Blues. However, he was not able to find the power he once had in the lower minors. Out of frustration, he called his father one day and told him, "I don't think I can play baseball anymore." Mutt drove up to Kansas City that day. When he arrived, he started packing his son's clothes and, according to Mantle's memory, said "I thought I raised a man. I see I raised a coward instead. You can come back to Oklahoma and work the mines with me."  Mantle immediately broke out of his slump, going on to hit .311 with 23 homers and 87 RBIs during his stay in Kansas City. Mantle was called up to the Yankees after 40 games with Kansas City, this time wearing uniform #7.  He hit .267 with 13 home runs and 65 RBI in 96 games. He only appeared in two games of the 1951 World Series.
Stardom: 1952–1964
Mantle moved to center field in 1952, replacing DiMaggio, who retired at the end of the 1951 season.  Mantle played center field full-time until 1965, when he was moved to left field. His final two seasons were spent at first base. Among his many accomplishments are all-time World Series records for home runs (18), runs scored (42), and runs batted in (40).In 1956, Mantle won the Hickok Belt as top professional athlete of the year. This was his "favorite summer," a year that saw him win the Triple Crown, leading the majors with a .353 batting average, 52 home runs, and 130 runs batted in, and his first of three MVP awards. Mantle remains the most recent player to win the Major League Triple Crown by leading both leagues in all three categories. He is also the last player to win a single league Triple Crown as a switch hitter.Mantle won his second consecutive MVP award in 1957.  Mantle led the league in runs and walks, and batted a career-high .365 (second in the league to Ted Williams' .388), and hitting into a league-low five double plays. Mantle reached base more times than he made outs (319 to 312), one of two seasons in which he achieved the feat.On January 16, 1961, Mantle became the highest-paid player in baseball by signing a $75,000 ($  today) contract.    DiMaggio, Hank Greenberg, and Ted Williams, who had just retired, had been paid over $100,000 in a season, and Ruth had a peak salary of $80,000. Mantle became the highest-paid active player of his time.
Mantle's relationship with the New York press was not always friendly. During the 1961 season, Mantle and teammate Roger Maris, known as the M&M Boys, chased Babe Ruth's single-season home run record. Five years earlier, in 1956, Mantle had challenged Ruth's record for most of the season, and the New York press had been protective of Ruth on that occasion also. When Mantle finally fell short, finishing with 52, there seemed to be a collective sigh of relief from the New York traditionalists. Nor had the New York press been all that kind to Mantle in his early years with the team: he struck out frequently, was injury-prone, was a "true hick" from Oklahoma, and was perceived as being distinctly inferior to his predecessor in center field, Joe DiMaggio. Over the course of time, however, Mantle (with a little help from his teammate Whitey Ford, a native of New York's Borough of Queens) had gotten better at "schmoozing" with the New York media, and had gained the favor of the press. This was a talent that Maris, a blunt-spoken upper-Midwesterner, was never willing or able to cultivate; as a result, he wore the "surly" jacket for his duration with the Yankees. So as 1961 progressed, the Yanks were now "Mickey Mantle's team," and Maris was ostracized as the "outsider," and said to be "not a true Yankee." The press seemed to root for Mantle and to belittle Maris. But Mantle was felled by an abscessed hip late in the season, leaving Maris to break the record (he finished with 61). Mantle finished with 54 while leading the league in runs scored and walks.In the bottom of the ninth inning of Game 3 of the 1964 World Series against the St. Louis Cardinals, Mickey Mantle blasted Barney Schultz's first pitch into the right field stands at Yankee Stadium, which won the game for the Yankees 2–1. However, the Cardinals would ultimately walk away with the World Series title.
Decline: 1965–1968Injuries slowed Mantle and the Yankees during the 1965 season, and they finished in 6th, 25 games behind the Minnesota Twins.  Mantle hit .255 that season with only 19 home runs. After the 1966 season, he was moved to first base with Joe Pepitone taking over his place in the outfield. Mantle batted .237 in 1968.   Mantle announced his retirement on March 1, 1969. When he retired, Mantle was third on the all-time home run list with 536.  At the time of his retirement, Mantle was the Yankees all-time leader in games played with 2,401, which was broken by Derek Jeter on August 29, 2011. 
Player profile
Power hittingMantle also hit some of the longest home runs in Major League history. On September 10, 1960, he hit a ball left-handed that cleared the right-field roof at Tiger Stadium in Detroit and, based on where it was found, was estimated years later by historian Mark Gallagher to have traveled 643 feet (196 m). Another Mantle homer, hit right-handed off Chuck Stobbs at Griffith Stadium in Washington, D.C. on April 17, 1953, was measured by Yankees traveling secretary Red Patterson (hence the term "tape-measure home run") to have traveled 565 feet (172 m). Though it is apparent that they are actually the distances where the balls ended up after bouncing several times,  there is no doubt that they both landed more than 500 feet (152 m) from home plate. Mantle twice hit balls off the third-deck facade at Yankee Stadium, nearly becoming the only player (along with Negro Leagues star Josh Gibson, though Gibson's home run has never been conclusively verified) to hit a fair ball out of the stadium during a game. On May 22, 1963, against Kansas City's Bill Fischer, Mantle hit a ball that fellow players and fans claimed was still rising when it hit the   high facade, then caromed back onto the playing field. It was later estimated by some that the ball could have traveled     had it not been blocked by the ornate and distinctive facade. On August 12, 1964, he hit one whose distance was undoubted: a center field drive that cleared the   batter's eye screen, beyond the   marker at the Stadium.Although he was a feared power hitter from either side of the plate, Mantle considered himself a better right-handed hitter even though he had more home runs from the left side of the plate: 372 left-handed, 164 right-handed.  That was due to Mantle having batted left-handed much more often, as the large majority of pitchers are right-handed. In addition, many of his left-handed home runs were hit in Yankee Stadium, a park much friendlier to left-handed hitters than to right-handed hitters. When Mantle played for the Yankees, the distance to the right-field foul pole stood at a mere 296 feet (90 m), with markers in the power alleys of 344 and 407, while the left-field power alley ranged from 402 to 457 feet (139 m) from the plate.
InjuriesMickey Mantle's career was plagued with injuries. Beginning in high school, he accumulated both acute and chronic injuries to bones and cartilage in his legs. Applying thick wraps to both of his knees became a pre-game ritual, and by the end of his career, simply swinging a bat caused him to fall to one knee in pain. Baseball scholars often ponder "what if" had he not been injured, and he was able to lead a healthy career.    As a 19-year-old rookie in his first World Series, Mantle tore the cartilage in his right knee on a fly ball by Willie Mays while playing right field. Joe DiMaggio, in the last year of his career, was playing center field. Mays' fly was hit to deep right center, and as both Mantle and DiMaggio converged to make the catch, DiMaggio called for it at the last second, causing Mantle to suddenly stop short as his cleats caught a drainage cover in the outfield grass. His knee twisted awkwardly and he instantly fell. Witnesses say it looked "like he had been shot." He was carried off the field on a stretcher and watched the rest of the World Series on TV from a hospital bed.  Dr. Stephen Haas, medical director for the National Football League Players Association, has speculated that Mantle may have torn his anterior cruciate ligament (ACL) during the incident and played the rest of his career without having it properly treated since ACLs could not be repaired with the surgical techniques available in that era.  Still, Mantle was known as the "fastest man to first base" and won the American League triple crown after these injuries. With the Korean War raging, he was drafted by the US Army but failed the physical exam and was rejected as unfit for service. During the 1957 World Series, Milwaukee Braves second baseman Red Schoendienst fell on Mantle's left shoulder in a collision at second base.  Over the next decade, Mantle would experience increasing difficulty hitting from his left side.
Appearances outside of baseballMantle made a (talking) cameo appearance in Teresa Brewer's 1956 song "I Love Mickey," which extolled Mantle's power hitting.  The song was included in one of the Baseball's Greatest Hits CDs.In 1962, Mantle and Maris starred in Safe at Home!. In 1981, he had a cameo appearance in the White Shadow and Remington Steele with Whitey Ford in 1983. 
Post-playing career
Mantle served as a part-time color commentator on NBC's baseball coverage in 1969, teaming with Curt Gowdy and Tony Kubek to call some Game of the Week telecasts as well as that year's All-Star Game. In 1972 he was a part-time TV commentator for the Montreal Expos.Despite being among the best-paid players of the pre-free agency era, Mantle was a poor businessman, having made several bad investments. His lifestyle would be restored to one of luxury, and his hold on his fans raised to an amazing level, by his position of leadership in the sports memorabilia craze that swept the USA, beginning in the 1980s. Mantle was a prized guest at any baseball card show, commanding fees far in excess of any other player for his appearances and autographs. This popularity continues long after his death, as Mantle-related items far outsell those of any other player except possibly Babe Ruth, whose items, due to the distance of years, now exist in far smaller quantities. Mantle insisted that the promoters of baseball card shows always include one of the lesser-known Yankees of his era, such as Moose Skowron or Hank Bauer so that they could earn some money from the event.Despite the failure of Mickey Mantle's Country Cookin' restaurants in the early 1970s, Mickey Mantle's Restaurant & Sports Bar opened in New York at 42 Central Park South (59th Street) in 1988. It became one of New York's most popular restaurants, and his original Yankee Stadium Monument Park plaque is displayed at the front entrance. Mantle let others run the business operations, but made frequent appearances.In 1983, Mantle worked at the Claridge Resort and Casino in Atlantic City, New Jersey, as a greeter and community representative. Most of his activities were representing the Claridge in golf tournaments and other charity events. But Mantle was suspended from baseball by Commissioner Bowie Kuhn on the grounds that any affiliation with gambling was grounds for being placed on the "permanently ineligible" list. Kuhn warned Mantle before he accepted the position that he would have to place him on the list if Mantle went to work there. Hall of Famer Willie Mays, who had also taken a similar position, had already had action taken against him. Mantle accepted the position, regardless, as he felt the rule was "stupid." He was placed on the list, but reinstated on March 18, 1985, by Kuhn's successor, Peter Ueberroth. In 1992, Mantle wrote My Favorite Summer 1956 about his 1956 season. 

Personal life
On December 23, 1951, Mantle married Merlyn Johnson in Commerce, Oklahoma; they had four sons.    In an autobiography, Mantle said he married Merlyn not out of love, but because he was told to by his domineering father. While his drinking became public knowledge during his lifetime, the press (per established practice at the time) kept quiet about his many marital infidelities. Mantle was not entirely discreet about them, and when he went to his retirement ceremony in 1969, he brought his mistress along with his wife. In 1980, Mickey and Merlyn separated for 15 years, but neither filed for divorce. During this time, Mantle lived with his agent, Greer Johnson.
The couple's four sons were Mickey Jr. (1953–2000), David (born 1955), Billy (1957–94), whom Mickey named for Billy Martin, his best friend among his Yankee teammates, and Danny (born 1960). Like Mickey, Merlyn and their sons all became alcoholics,    and Billy developed Hodgkin's disease, as had several previous men in Mantle's family.During the final years of his life, Mantle purchased a luxury condominium on Lake Oconee near Greensboro, Georgia, near Greer Johnson's home, and frequently stayed there for months at a time. He occasionally attended the local Methodist church, and sometimes ate Sunday dinner with members of the congregation. He was well liked by the citizens of Greensboro, and seemed to like them in return. This was probably because the town respected Mantle's privacy, refusing either to talk about their famous neighbor to outsiders or to direct fans to his home. In one interview, Mickey stated that the people of Greensboro had "gone out of their way to make me feel welcome, and I've found something there I haven't enjoyed since I was a kid."Mantle's off-field behavior is the subject of the book The Last Boy: Mickey Mantle and the End of America's Childhood, written in 2010 by sports journalist Jane Leavy.   Excerpts from the book have been published in Sports Illustrated.
Illness and death
Well before he finally sought treatment for alcoholism, Mantle admitted his hard living had hurt both his playing and his family. His rationale was that the men in his family had all died young, so he expected to die young as well.    His father had died of Hodgkin's disease at age 40 in 1952, and his grandfather had also died young of the same disease. "I'm not gonna be cheated," he would say.  Mantle did not know at the time that most of the men in his family had inhaled lead and zinc dust in the mines, which contribute to Hodgkins' and other cancers.  As the years passed, and he had outlived all the men in his family by several years, he frequently used a line popularized by football legend Bobby Layne, a Dallas neighbor and friend of Mantle's who also died in part due to alcohol abuse: "If I'd known I was gonna live this long, I'd have taken a lot better care of myself."   Mantle's wife and sons all completed treatment for alcoholism, and told him he needed to do the same. He checked into the Betty Ford Clinic on January 7, 1994, after being told by a doctor that his liver was so badly damaged from almost 40 years of drinking that it "looked like a doorstop."  He also bluntly told Mantle that the damage to his system was so severe that  "your next drink could be your last." Also helping Mantle to make the decision to go to the Betty Ford Clinic was sportscaster Pat Summerall, who had played for the New York Giants football team while they played at Yankee Stadium, by then a recovering alcoholic and a member of the same Dallas-area country club as Mantle; Summerall himself had been treated at the clinic in 1992.Shortly after Mantle completed treatment, his son Billy died on March 12, 1994, at age 36 of heart problems brought on by years of substance abuse. Despite the fears of those who knew him that this tragedy would send him back to drinking, he remained sober. Mickey Jr. later died of liver cancer on December 20, 2000, at age 47. Danny later battled prostate cancer.Mantle spoke with great remorse of his drinking in a 1994 Sports Illustrated cover story.  He said that he was telling the same old stories, and realizing how many of them involved himself and others being drunk – including at least one drunk-driving accident – he decided they were not funny anymore. He admitted he had often been cruel and hurtful to family, friends, and fans because of his alcoholism, and sought to make amends. He became a born-again Christian because of his former teammate Bobby Richardson, an ordained Baptist minister who shared his faith with him. After the bombing of the Alfred P. Murrah Federal Building in Oklahoma City on April 19, 1995, Mantle joined with fellow Oklahoman and Yankee Bobby Murcer to raise money for the victims. Mantle received a liver transplant at Baylor University Medical Center in Dallas, on June 8, 1995.  His liver was severely damaged by alcohol-induced cirrhosis, as well as hepatitis C. Prior to the operation, doctors also discovered he had inoperable liver cancer known as an undifferentiated hepatocellular carcinoma, further facilitating the need for a transplant.   In July, he had recovered enough to deliver a press conference at Baylor, and noted that many fans had looked to him as a role model. "This is a role model: Don't be like me," a frail Mantle said. He also established the Mickey Mantle Foundation to raise awareness for organ donations. Soon, he was back in the hospital, where it was found that his cancer was rapidly spreading throughout his body.Though Mantle was very popular, his liver transplant was a source of some controversy. Some felt that his fame had permitted him to receive a donor liver in just one day,  bypassing other patients who had been waiting for much longer. Mantle's doctors insisted that the decision was based solely on medical criteria, but acknowledged that the very short wait created the appearance of favoritism.   While he was recovering, Mantle made peace with his estranged wife, Merlyn, and repeated a request he made decades before for Bobby Richardson to read a poem at Mantle's funeral if he died. Madden, Bill.  Pride of October: What It Was to Be Young and a Yankee.  ISBN 0-446-55460-X Mantle died on August 13, 1995, at Baylor University Medical Center with his wife at his side. The Yankees played Cleveland that day and honored him with a tribute. Eddie Layton played "Somewhere Over the Rainbow" on the Hammond organ because Mickey had once told him it was his favorite song. The team played the rest of the season with black mourning bands topped by a small number 7 on their left sleeves. Mantle was interred in the Sparkman-Hillcrest Memorial Park Cemetery in Dallas. In eulogizing Mantle, sportscaster Bob Costas described him as "a fragile hero to whom we had an emotional attachment so strong and lasting that it defied logic." Costas added: "In the last year of his life, Mickey Mantle, always so hard on himself, finally came to accept and appreciate the distinction between a role model and a hero. The first, he often was not. The second, he always will be. And, in the end, people got it."   Richardson did oblige in reading the poem at Mantle's funeral, something he described as being extremely difficult. After Mantle's death, Greer Johnson was taken to federal court in November 1997 by the Mantle family to stop her from auctioning many of Mantle's personal items, including a lock of hair, a neck brace, and expired credit cards.  Eventually, the two sides reached a settlement, ensuring the sale of some of Mickey Mantle's belongings for approximately $500,000.   
Honors 
On Mickey Mantle Day, June 8, 1969, in addition to the retirement of his uniform Number 7, Mantle was given a plaque that would hang on the center field wall at Yankee Stadium, near the monuments to Babe Ruth, Lou Gehrig, and Miller Huggins.    The plaque was given to him by Joe DiMaggio, and Mantle then gave DiMaggio a similar plaque, telling the crowd, "Joe DiMaggio's [plaque] deserves to be higher."  DiMaggio's plaque was hung one inch higher than Mantle's.    When Yankee Stadium was reopened in 1976 following its renovation, the plaques and monuments were moved to Monument Park, behind the left-center field fence. Shortly before his death, Mantle videotaped a message to be played on Old-Timers' Day, which he was too ill to attend. He said, "When I die, I wanted on my tombstone, 'A great teammate.' But I didn't think it would be this soon." The words were indeed carved on the plaque marking his resting place at the family mausoleum in Dallas. On August 25, 1996, about a year after his death, Mantle's Monument Park plaque was replaced with a monument, bearing the words "A great teammate" and keeping a phrase that had been included on the original plaque: "A magnificent Yankee who left a legacy of unequaled courage." Mantle's original plaque, along with DiMaggio's, are now on display at the Yogi Berra Museum and Learning Center, with the DiMaggio plaque still hung a few inches higher than Mantle's.Mantle and former teammate Whitey Ford were elected to the Baseball Hall of Fame together in 1974, Mantle's first year of eligibility, Ford's second. Beginning in 1997, the Topps Baseball Card company retired the card #7 in its base sets in tribute to Mantle, whose career was taking off just as Topps began producing baseball cards. Mantle's cards, especially his 1952 Topps card, are extremely popular and valuable among card collectors. Though Topps un-retired the #7 in 2006, the number is reserved for cards of Mantle, remade with each year's design.In 1998, "The Sporting News" placed Mantle at 17th on its list of "Baseball's 100 Greatest Players".  That same year, he was one of 100 nominees for the Major League Baseball All-Century Team, and was chosen by fan balloting as one of the team's outfielders. ESPN's SportsCentury series that ran in 1999 ranked him No. 37 on its "50 Greatest Athletes" series.In 2006, Mantle was featured on a United States postage stamp.  The stamp is one of a series of four honoring baseball sluggers, the others being Mel Ott, Roy Campanella, and Hank Greenberg.Newcastle Field at Bricktown, the home stadium of the Triple-A Oklahoma City RedHawks, is located at 2 South Mickey Mantle Drive in Oklahoma City.  A statue of Mantle is located at the Mickey Mantle Plaza at the stadium.
DepictionsIn 2001, the movie 61*, produced by Yankee fan Billy Crystal, chronicled Mantle (played by Thomas Jane) and Maris (played by Barry Pepper) chasing Babe Ruth's single season home run record.  Mickey's son, Danny, and grandson, Will, appeared briefly as a father and son watching as Mickey hit a home run. In 2003, Tom Russell's album Modern Art included the song "The Kid from Spavinaw", retelling the arc of Mantle's career. Mantle also had multiple references in the sitcom Seinfeld, specifically the episodes "The Visa" where Kramer punches him while at a baseball fantasy camp and "Seven" where George Costanza wants to name his future baby as 'Seven' based on Mickey Mantle's uniform number. The song "Talkin Baseball" released in 1981 by Terry Cashman had the refrain "Willie, Mickey and The Duke".The award-winning poet B. H. Fairchild wrote a narrative poem "Body and Soul" depicting the young Mickey Mantle.
Awards and achievements

Award/Honor 
of Times
 Dates Refs 
American League All-Star 20 1952, 1953, 1954, 1955, 1956, 1957, 1958, 1959 , 1959 , 1960 , 1960 , 1961 , 1961 , 1962 , 1962 , 1963, 1964, 1965, 1967, 1968     
American League batting champion 1 1956   
American League home run champion 4 1955, 1956, 1958, 1960   
American League MVP Award 3 1956, 1957, 1962   
American League Gold Glove Award winner 1 1962   
American League Triple Crown 1 1956   
Associated Press Male Athlete of the Year 1 1956   
Hickok Belt 1 1956     
Hutch Award 1 1965   
World Series champion 7 1951, 1952, 1953, 1956, 1958, 1961, 1962   

See also 
 

List of Major League Baseball players to hit for the cycle
50 home run club
500 home run club
List of Major League Baseball home run records
List of top 300 Major League Baseball home run hitters
List of major league players with 2,000 hits
List of Major League Baseball players with 1,000 runs
List of Major League Baseball players with 1,000 runs batted in
List of Major League Baseball leaders in career stolen bases
List of Major League Baseball batting champions
List of Major League Baseball home run champions
List of Major League Baseball runs batted in champions
List of Major League Baseball runs scored champions
List of Major League Baseball triples champions
Major League Baseball titles leaders
 
References

Bibliography
 
 
SPORT magazine, June 1951
 
 
Footnotes
 
External links 
 

 
Mickey Mantle at Findagrave.com
"50 Years Later, A Slide Still Confounds", New York Times, 30 September 2010
Archival Television Audio on Mickey Mantle

 
 
  
 
   
 
DEFAULTSORT



























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Patricia Highsmith
 
Patricia Highsmith (January 19, 1921 – February 4, 1995) was an American novelist and short story writer, most widely known for her psychological thrillers, which led to more than two dozen film adaptations. Her first novel, Strangers on a Train, has been adapted for stage and screen numerous times, notably by Alfred Hitchcock in 1951. In addition to her acclaimed series about murderer Tom Ripley, she wrote many short stories, often macabre, satirical or tinged with black humor. Although she wrote specifically in the genre of crime fiction, her books have been lauded by various writers and critics as being artistic and thoughtful enough to rival mainstream literature. Michael Dirda observed, "Europeans honored her as a psychological novelist, part of an existentialist tradition represented by her own favorite writers, in particular Dostoevsky, Conrad, Kafka, Gide, and Camus." 
Early lifeHighsmith was born Mary Patricia Plangman in Fort Worth, Texas, the only child of artists Jay Bernard Plangman (1889–1975) and his wife, the former Mary Coates (September 13, 1895 – March 12, 1991); the couple divorced ten days before their daughter's birth. Joan Schenkar, "The Misfit and Her Muses", Wall Street Journal, December 8, 2009, p. A19  She was born in her maternal grandmother's boarding house. In 1927, Highsmith, her mother and her adoptive stepfather, artist Stanley Highsmith (whom her mother had married in 1924), moved to New York City.  When she was 12 years old, she was taken to Fort Worth and lived with her grandmother for a year.  She called this the "saddest year" of her life and felt abandoned by her mother. She returned to New York to continue living with her mother and stepfather, primarily in Manhattan, but she also lived in Astoria, Queens. Pat Highsmith had an intense, complicated relationship with her mother and largely resented her stepfather.  According to Highsmith, her mother once told her that she had tried to abort her by drinking turpentine, although a biography of Highsmith indicates Jay Plangman tried to persuade his wife to have an abortion, but she refused.  .  Highsmith never resolved this love–hate relationship, which haunted her for the rest of her life, and which she fictionalized in her short story "The Terrapin", about a young boy who stabs his mother to death. Highsmith's mother predeceased her by only four years, dying at the age of 95.Highsmith's grandmother taught her to read at an early age, and Highsmith made good use of her grandmother's extensive library. At the age of eight, she discovered Karl Menninger's The Human Mind and was fascinated by the case studies of patients afflicted with mental disorders such as pyromania and schizophrenia.
Comic booksIn 1942, Highsmith graduated from Barnard College, where she had studied English composition, playwriting and the short story. Living in New York City and Mexico between 1942 and 1948, she wrote for comic book publishers. Answering an ad for "reporter/rewrite", she arrived at the office of comic book publisher Ned Pines and landed a job working in a bullpen with four artists and three other writers. Initially scripting two comic book stories a day for $55-a-week paychecks, she soon realized she could make more money by writing freelance for comics, a situation which enabled her to find time to work on her own short stories and also live for a period in Mexico. The comic book scriptwriter job was the only long-term job she ever held. With Nedor/Standard/Pines (1942–43), she wrote Sgt. Bill King stories and contributed to Black Terror. For Real Fact, Real Heroes and True Comics, she wrote comic book profiles of Einstein, Galileo, Barney Ross, Eddie Rickenbacker, Oliver Cromwell, Sir Isaac Newton, David Livingstone and others. In 1943–45, she wrote for Fawcett Publications, scripting for such Fawcett Comics characters as the Golden Arrow, Spy Smasher, Captain Midnight, Crisco and Jasper. She wrote for Western Comics in 1945–47. When she wrote The Talented Mr. Ripley (1955), one of the title character's first scam victims is comic book artist Frederick Reddington, a parting gesture directed at the earlier career she had abandoned: "Tom had a hunch about Reddington. He was a comic-book artist. He probably didn't know whether he was coming or going." 
Novels and adaptationsHighsmith's first novel was Strangers on a Train, which emerged in 1950, and which contained the violence that became her trademark. Patricia Cohen, "The Haunts of Miss Highsmith", New York Times, December 10, 2009.  At Truman Capote's suggestion, she rewrote the novel at the Yaddo writer's colony in Saratoga Springs, New York.  The book proved modestly successful when it was published in 1950. However, Hitchcock's 1951 film adaptation of the novel propelled Highsmith's career and reputation. Soon she became known as a writer of ironic, disturbing psychological mysteries highlighted by stark, startling prose.Highsmith's second novel, The Price of Salt, was published under the pseudonym Claire Morgan. It garnered wide attention as a lesbian novel because of its rare happy ending.  She did not publicly associate herself with this book until late in her life, probably because she had extensively mined her personal life for the book's content. As her other novels were issued, moviemakers adapted them for screenplays: The Talented Mr. Ripley (1955), Ripley's Game (1974) and Edith's Diary (1977) all became films.She was a lifelong diarist, and developed her writing style as a child, writing entries in which she fantasized that her neighbors had psychological problems and murderous personalities behind their façades of normality, a theme she would explore extensively in her novels.
Major themes in her novelsHighsmith included homosexual undertones in many of her novels and addressed the theme directly in The Price of Salt and the posthumously published Small g: a Summer Idyll. The former novel is known for its happy ending, the first of its kind in lesbian fiction. Published in 1952 under the pseudonym Claire Morgan, it sold almost a million copies. The inspiration for the book's main character, Carol, was a woman Highsmith saw in Bloomingdale's department store, where she worked at the time. Highsmith acquired her address from the credit card details, and on two occasions after the book was written (in June 1950 and January 1951) spied on the woman without the latter's knowledge.The protagonists in many of Highsmith's novels are either morally compromised by circumstance or actively flouting the law. Many of her antiheroes, often emotionally unstable young men, commit murder in fits of passion, or simply to extricate themselves from a bad situation. They are just as likely to escape justice as to receive it. The works of Franz Kafka and Fyodor Dostoevsky played a significant part in her own novels.Her recurring character Tom Ripley—an amoral, sexually ambiguous con artist and occasional murderer—was featured in a total of five novels, popularly known as the Ripliad, written between 1955 and 1991. He was introduced in The Talented Mr. Ripley.  After a 9 January 1956 TV adaptation on Studio One, it was filmed by René Clément as Plein Soleil (1960, aka Purple Noon and Blazing Sun) with Alain Delon, whom Highsmith praised as the ideal Ripley. The novel was adapted under its original title in the 1999 film directed by Anthony Minghella, starring Matt Damon, Gwyneth Paltrow, Jude Law and Cate Blanchett.A later Ripley novel, Ripley's Game, was filmed by Wim Wenders as The American Friend (1977). Under its original title, it was filmed again in 2002, directed by Liliana Cavani with John Malkovich in the title role. Ripley Under Ground (2005), starring Barry Pepper as Ripley, was shown at the 2005 AFI Film Festival but has not had a general release.In 2009, BBC Radio 4 adapted all five Ripley books with Ian Hart as Ripley.
Personal life
According to her biography by Andrew Wilson, Beautiful Shadow (2003), Highsmith's personal life was a troubled one; she was an alcoholic who never had a relationship that lasted for more than a few years, and she was seen by some of her contemporaries and acquaintances as misanthropic and cruel. She famously preferred the company of animals to that of people and once said, "My imagination functions much better when I don't have to speak to people.""She was a mean, hard, cruel, unlovable, unloving person", said acquaintance Otto Penzler. "I could never penetrate how any human being could be that relentlessly ugly." Mystery Girl | The Talented Mr. Ripley | Biz | News | Entertainment Weekly Other friends and acquaintances were less caustic in their criticism, however; Gary Fisketjon, who published her later novels through Knopf, said that "she was rough, very difficult... but she was also plainspoken, dryly funny, and great fun to be around." Highsmith had relationships with women and men, but never married or had children. In 1943, she had an affair with the artist Allela Cornell (who committed suicide in 1946 by drinking nitric acid ) and in 1949, she became close to novelist Marc Brandel. Between 1959 and 1961 she had a relationship with Marijane Meaker, who wrote under the pseudonyms of Vin Packer and Ann Aldrich, but later wrote young adult fiction with the name M.E. Kerr. Meaker wrote of their affair in her memoir, Highsmith: A Romance of the 1950s.In the late 1980s, after 27 years of separation, Highsmith began sharing correspondence with Meaker again, and one day she showed up on her doorstep, slightly drunk and ranting bitterly. Meaker once recalled in an interview the horror she felt upon noticing the changes in Highsmith's personality by that point. "Highsmith was never comfortable with blacks, and she was outspokenly anti-semitic—so much so that when she was living in Switzerland in the 1980s, she invented nearly 40 aliases, identities she used in writing to various government bodies and newspapers, deploring the state of Israel and the 'influence' of the Jews".  Nevertheless, some of her best friends were Jewish, such as authors Arthur Koestler and Saul Bellow. She was accused of misogyny because of her satirical collection of short stories Little Tales of Misogyny.Highsmith loved woodworking tools and made several pieces of furniture. She kept pet snails; she worked without stopping. In later life she became stooped, with an osteoporotic hump.  Though her writing—22 novels and eight books of short stories—was highly acclaimed, especially outside of the United States, Highsmith preferred for her personal life to remain private. She had friendships and correspondences with several writers, and was also greatly inspired by art and the animal kingdom. Highsmith believed in American democratic ideals and in the promise of US history, but she was also highly critical of the reality of the country's 20th century culture and foreign policy. Tales of Natural and Unnatural Catastrophes, her 1987 anthology of short stories, was notoriously anti-American, and she often cast her homeland in a deeply unflattering light. Beginning in 1963, she resided exclusively in Europe. In 1978, she was head of the jury at the 28th Berlin International Film Festival.   
DeathHighsmith died of aplastic anemia and cancer in Locarno, Switzerland, aged 74. She retained her United States citizenship, despite the tax penalties, of which she complained bitterly, from living for many years in France and Switzerland. She was cremated at the cemetery in Bellinzona, and a memorial service conducted at the Catholic Church in Tegna, Switzerland. In gratitude to the place which helped inspire her writing career, she left her estate, worth an estimated $3 million, to the Yaddo colony.  Her last novel, Small g: a Summer Idyll, was published posthumously a month later. Patricia Highsmith's literary estate is archived in the Swiss Literary Archives in Bern.
Bibliography
Novels

Strangers on a Train (1950)
The Price of Salt (as Claire Morgan) (1952), also published as Carol
The Blunderer (1954)
The Talented Mr. Ripley (1955)
Deep Water (1957)
A Game for the Living (1958)
This Sweet Sickness (1960)
The Cry of the Owl (1962)
The Two Faces of January (1964)
The Glass Cell (1964)
A Suspension of Mercy (1965), also published as The Story-Teller
Those Who Walk Away (1967)
The Tremor of Forgery (1969)
Ripley Under Ground (1970)
A Dog's Ransom (1972)
Ripley's Game (1974)
Edith's Diary (1977)
The Boy Who Followed Ripley (1980)
People Who Knock on the Door (1983)
Found in the Street (1987)
Ripley Under Water (1991)
Small g: a Summer Idyll (1995)


Short-story collections

Eleven (1970; also known as The Snail-Watcher and Other Stories)
Little Tales of Misogyny (1974)
The Animal Lover's Book of Beastly Murder (1975)
Slowly, Slowly in the Wind (1979)
The Black House (1981)
Mermaids on the Golf Course (1985)
Tales of Natural and Unnatural Catastrophes (1987)
Nothing That Meets the Eye: The Uncollected Stories (2002; posthumously published)


Collected works

Patricia Highsmith: Selected Novels and Short Stories (W.W. Norton, 2010)


Miscellaneous

Plotting and Writing Suspense Fiction (1966)
Miranda the Panda Is on the Veranda (1958; children's book of verse and drawings, co-written with Doris Sanders)


Awards

1946 : O. Henry Award for best publication of first story, for "The Heroine" in Harper's Bazaar
1951 : Edgar Award nominee for best first novel, for Strangers on a Train
1956 : Edgar Award nominee for best novel, for The Talented Mr. Ripley
1957 :  Grand Prix de Littérature Policière , for The Talented Mr. Ripley
1963 : Edgar Award nominee for best short story, for "The Terrapin"
1964 : Dagger Award – Category Best Foreign Novel, for The Two Faces of January from the Crime Writers' Association of Great Britain
1975 :  Grand Prix de l'Humour Noir  for  L'Amateur d'escargot 
1990 :  Chevalier dans l'Ordre des Arts et des Lettres  from the French Ministry of Culture


See also

1950 in literature


References 
External links

Publications by and about Patricia Highsmith in the catalogue Helveticat of the Swiss National Library
Choose Your Highsmith - A Patricia Highsmith Recommendation Engine from W. W. Norton & Company
 
Patricia Highsmith Papers at the Swiss Literary Archives
This Woman Is Dangerous Michael Dirda on Highsmith and her work from The New York Review of Books
 
The Haunts of Miss Highsmith – New York Times – Books
Hiding in Plain Sight – New York Times Sunday Review of "THE TALENTED MISS HIGHSMITH -The Secret Life and Serious Art of Patricia Highsmith" By Joan Schenkar.
1987 RealAudio interview with Patricia Highsmith by Don Swaim (MP3 also available)

  
 
DEFAULTSORT
















  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	W. H. R. Rivers
 
 
 William Halse Rivers Rivers,  FRCP ,  FRS , (  –  ) was an English anthropologist, neurologist, ethnologist and psychiatrist, best known for his work with soldiers during World War I who were suffering from shell shock.  Rivers's most famous patient was the poet Siegfried Sassoon.  He is also famous for his participation in the Torres Straits expedition of 1898, and his consequent   work on the subject of kinship.
Biography
Family background
Rivers was born in 1864 at Constitution Hill, Chatham, Kent, son of Elizabeth Hunt (16 October 1834 – 13 November 1897) and Henry Frederick Rivers (7 January 1830 – 9 December 1911).Records from the eighteenth and early nineteenth centuries show the Rivers family to be solidly middle-class with many Cambridge, Church of England and Royal Navy associations,    the most famous of which were Midshipman William Rivers and his father Gunner Rivers who both served aboard HMS Victory. The senior Rivers, also called William, was the master gunner aboard The Victory and it is thanks to his commonplace book (now kept in the Royal Naval Museum library in Portsmouth) that many of the thoughts of the sailors aboard Nelson's flagship are preserved.    Midshipman Rivers, claimed to be "the man who shot the man who fatally wounded Lord Nelson"  proved himself to be a model of heroism in the Battle of Trafalgar. In the course of his duties, the seventeen-year-old midshipman's foot was almost completely blown off by a grenade, left attached to him "by a Piece of Skin abought 4 inch above the ankle".   Rivers asked first for his shoes, then told the gunner's mate to look after the guns and informed Captain Hardy that he was going down to the cockpit.  The leg was then sawn off, without anaesthetic, four inches below the knee. According to legend, he did not cry out once during the amputation nor during the consequent sealing of the wound with hot tar.  When Gunner Rivers, anxious about his son's welfare, went to the cockpit to ask after him the young man called out from the other side of the deck, "Here I am, Father, nothing is the matter with me; only lost my leg and that in a good cause."  After the Battle, the senior Rivers wrote a poem about his remarkable son entitled "Lines on a Young Gentleman that lost his leg onboard the Victory in the Glorious action at Trafalgar": Born to another naval Rivers, Lt. William Rivers, R.N., then stationed at Deptford,  Henry Rivers followed many family traditions in being educated at Trinity College, Cambridge and entering the church.  Having earned his Bachelor of Arts in 1857, he was ordained as a Church of England priest in 1858,  a career that would span almost 50 years until, in 1904, he was forced to tender his  resignation due to "infirmities of sight and memory".   In 1863, having obtained a curacy at Chatham in addition to a chaplain's post, Henry Rivers was in a position to marry Elizabeth Hunt who was living with her brother James in Hastings, not far from Chatham. The Hunts, like the Riverses, were an established naval and Church of England family.  One of those destined for the pulpit was Thomas (1802–1851), but some quirk of originality set him off into an unusual career.   While an undergraduate at Cambridge, Thomas Hunt had a friend who stammered badly and his efforts to aid the afflicted student led him to leave the University without taking a degree in order to make a thorough study of speech and its defects.    He built up a good practise as a speech therapist and was patronised by Sir John Forbes MD FRS, who sent him pupils for twenty four years.   Hunt's most famous case came about in 1842 when George Pearson, the chief witness in the case respecting the attempt on the life of Queen Victoria made by John Francis, was brought into court he was incapable of giving his evidence. However, after just a fortnight's instruction from Hunt he spoke easily, a fact certified by the sitting magistrate.  Hunt died in 1851, survived by his wife Mary and their two children. His practise was then passed on to his son, James.   James Hunt (1833–1869) was an exuberant character, giving to each of his ventures his boundless energy and self-confidence.  Taking up his father's legacy with great zeal, by the age of 21 Hunt had published his compendious work, "Stammering and Stuttering, Their Nature and Treatment". This went into six editions during his lifetime and was reprinted again in 1870, just after his death, and for an eighth time in 1967 as a landmark in the history of speech therapy.  In the introduction to the 1967 edition of the book, Elliot Schaffer notes that in his short lifetime James Hunt is said to have treated over 1,700 cases of speech impediment, firstly in his father's practise and later at his own institute, Ore House near Hastings,    which he set up with the aid a doctorate he had purchased in 1856 from the University of Giessen in Germany.   In later, expanded editions, "Stammering and Stuttering" begins to reflect Hunt's growing passion for anthropology exploring, as it does, the nature of language usage and speech disorders in non-European peoples.  In 1856, Hunt had joined the Ethnological Society of London and by 1859 he was its joint secretary.  He was not, however, a popular man within the society as many of the members disliked his attacks on religious and humanitarian agencies represented by missionaries and the anti-slavery movement. As a result of the antagonism, Hunt founded the Anthropological Society and became its president,  a position that would be taken up by his nephew almost sixty years later.    It was mainly to do with Hunt's efforts that the British Association for the Advancement of Science (BAAS) accepted anthropology in 1866. Even by Victorian standards, Hunt was a decided racist.  His paper "On a Negro's Place in Nature", delivered before the  BAAS in 1863, was met with hisses and catcalls.  What Hunt saw as "a statement of the simple facts"    was in fact a defence of the subjection and slavery of African-Americans and a support of the belief in the plurality of human species. In addition to his extremist views, Hunt also led his society to incur heavy debts.   The controversies surrounding his conduct told on his health and, on 29 August 1869, Hunt died of "inflammation of the brain" leaving a widow, Henrietta Maria, and five children. Hunt's speech therapy practise was passed onto Hunt's brother-in-law, Henry Rivers, who had been working with him for some time.  With the practise came many of Hunt's established patients, most notably The Reverend Charles L. Dodgson (better known as Lewis Carroll) who had been a regular visitor to Ore House.   To his nephew William, Hunt had left his books though a young Rivers had refused them, thinking that they would be of no use to him.   
Early life
William Halse Rivers Rivers was the oldest of four children, with his siblings being brother Charles Hay (29 August 1865 – 8 November 1939) and sisters Ethel Marian (30 October 1867 – 4 February 1943) and Katharine Elizabeth (1871–1939).William, known as "Willie" throughout his childhood,  appears to have taken his Christian name from his famous uncle of Victory fame, as well as from a longstanding family tradition whereby the eldest son of every line would be baptised by that name.  The origin of "Halse" is unclear, though it is possible that there is some naval connection as it has been suggested that it could have been the name of someone serving alongside his uncle.  Slobodin states that it is probable that the second "Rivers" entered his name as a result of a clerical error on the baptismal certificate but since the register is filled in by his father's hand and he was to perform the ceremony, one would think it unlikely that a mistake would have been made in this case.  Slobodin is correct to note that there is a mistake on the registry of his birth but since his name was changed from the mistaken "William False Rivers Rivers"  to its later form, it seems probable that "Rivers" was intended to appear as a given name as well as a surname.Rivers suffered from a stammer that never truly left him, he also had no sensory memory although he was able to visualise to an extent if dreaming, in a half-waking, half-sleeping state or when feverish.    This had not always been the case; Rivers notes that in his early life- specifically before the age of five- his visual imagery was far more definite than it became in later life and perhaps as good as that of the average child. At first, Rivers had concluded that his loss of visual imagery had come about as a result of his lack of attention and interest in it.   However, as he later came to realise, while images from his later life frequently faded into obscurity, those from his infancy still remained vivid. As Rivers notes in Instinct and the Unconscious, one manifestation of his lack of visual memory was his inability to visualise any part of the upper floor of the house he lived in until he was five. This visual blank is made even more significant by the fact that Rivers was able to describe the lower floors of that particular house with far more accuracy than he had been able to with any house since and, although images of later houses were faded and incomplete, no memory since had been as inaccessible as that of the upper floor of his early home.   With the evidence that he was presented with, Rivers was led to the conclusion that something had happened to him on the upper floor of that house, the memory of which was entirely suppressed because it "interfered with [his] comfort and happiness".  Indeed, not only was that specific memory rendered inaccessible but his sensory memory in general appears to have been severely handicapped from that moment. If Rivers ever did come to access the veiled memory then he does not appear to make a note of it so the nature of the experience is open to conjecture. One such supposition was put forward by Pat Barker, in the second novel in her Regeneration Trilogy, The Eye in the Door. Whatever the case, in the words of Barker's character Billy Prior, Rivers's experience was traumatic enough to cause him to "put his mind's eye out".   Whatever his disadvantages, Rivers was an unquestionably able child. Educated first at a Brighton preparatory school and then, from the age of thirteen, as a dayboy at the prestigious Tonbridge School, his academic abilities were noted from an early age.  Young Rivers's talents led to him being placed a year above others of his age at school  and even within this older group he was seen to excel, winning prizes for Classics and all around attainment.    It is also worth noting that Rivers's younger brother Charles was also a high achiever at the school; he too was awarded with the Good Work prize  and would go on to become a civil engineer until, after a bad bout of malaria contracted whilst in the Torres Straits with his brother, he was prompted by the elder Rivers to take up outdoor work. The teenage Rivers, whilst obviously scholarly, was also involved in other aspects of school life. As the programme for the Tonbridge School sports day notes, on 12 March 1880 – Rivers's sixteenth birthday – he ran in the mile race. The year before this he had been elected as a member of the school debating society, no mean feat for a boy who at this time suffered from a speech impediment which was almost paralytic.   Rivers was set to follow family tradition and take his University of Cambridge entrance exam, possibly with the aim of studying Classics.  Unfortunately, his plans were thwarted when, at the age of sixteen, he was struck down by typhoid fever and forced to miss his final year of school.    Without the scholarship, his family could not afford to send him to Cambridge but with typical resilience, Rivers did not dwell on the disappointment.His illness had been a bad one, entailing long convalescence and leaving him with effects which at times severely handicapped him.   As L. E. Shore notes: "he was not a strong man, and was often obliged to take a few days rest in bed and subsist on a milk diet".  The severity of the sickness and the shattering of dreams might have broken lesser men but for Rivers in many ways the illness was the making of him. Whilst recovering from the fever, Rivers had formed a friendship with one of his father's speech therapy students, a young Army surgeon. His plan was formed: he would study medicine and apply for training in the Army Medical Department, later to become the Royal Army Medical Corps. Fuelled by this new resolve, Rivers studied medicine at the University of London, where he matriculated in 1882, and St Bartholomew's Hospital in London. He graduated aged just 22, the youngest person to do so until recent times. 
Life as a ship's surgeon
After qualifying, Rivers sought to follow his ambition and join the army but was not passed fit. Once again the Typhoid had denied him his dreams. As Elliot Smith was later to write, as quoted in Rivers's biography: "Rivers always had to fight against ill health: heart and blood vessels." Along with the health problems noted by Shore and Elliot Smith, Rivers had been left to the curse of "tiring easily".His sister Katharine wrote that when he came to visit the family he would often sleep for the first day or two. Astonishingly, considering the work that Rivers did in his relatively short lifetime, Seligman wrote in 1922 that "for many years he seldom worked for more than four hours a day".    As Rivers's biographer Richard Slobodin points out, "among persons of extraordinary achievement, only Descartes seems to have put in as short a working day".As ever, Rivers did not allow his drawbacks to dishearten him",  and instead of entering the army his love of travelling lead him to serve several terms as a ship's surgeon, travelling to Japan and North America in 1887.    This was the first of many voyages; for, besides his great expeditions for work in the Torres Straits, Melanesia, Egypt, India and the Solomon Islands, he took holiday voyages twice to the West Indies, three times to the Canary Islands and Madeira, to America, to Norway, to Lisbon, as well as numerous visits to France, Germany, Italy, Switzerland and to visit family in Australia. Such voyages helped to improve his health, and possibly to prolong his life.  He also took a great deal of pleasures from his experiences aboard ship, particularly when he had the honour of spending a month in the company of George Bernard Shaw; he later described how he spent "many hours every day talking – the greatest treat of my life". 
Beginnings of psychological career
Back in England, Rivers gained the distinction of an M.D. (London) and was elected a Fellow of the Royal College of Physicians.  Soon after, he became house surgeon at the Chichester Infirmary (1887–9) and, although he enjoyed the town and the company of his colleagues,  an appointment at Bart's and the opportunity to  return to the company of productive researchers in medicine proved too much to resist. He became house physician at St Bartholomew's in 1889 and remained there until 1890. At Bart's, Rivers had been a physician to Dr. Samuel Gee.    Those under Gee were conscious of his indifference towards, if not actual dislike of, the psychological aspects of medicine. As Walter Langdon-Brown surmises, it may have been a reaction against this which led Rivers and his fellow Charles S. Myers to devote themselves to these aspects. Whatever his motivation, the fact that Rivers's interests lay in neurology and psychology became evident in this period. Reports and papers given by Rivers at the Abernethian Society of St. Bart's indicate a growing specialism in these fields: Delirium and its allied conditions (1889), Hysteria (1891) and Neurasthenia (1893).Following the direction of his passion for the workings of the mind as it correlates with the workings of the body, in 1891 Rivers became house physician at the National Hospital for the Paralysed and Epileptic.  It was here that he and Henry Head were to meet and form a lasting friendship.   Rivers's interest in the physiology of the nervous system and in "the mind" that is, in sensory phenomena and mental states,  was further stimulated by work in 1891, when he was chosen to be one of Victor Horsley's assistants at in the series of investigations which elucidated the existence and nature of electrical currents in the mammalian brain which took place at University College, London.  That he was seconded to Horsley for the work is an indication of his growing reputation as a researcher. In the same year, Rivers joined the Neurological Society of London and presented A Case of Treadler's Cramp to a meeting of the society. The case serves today as a poignant reminder of the cost, to millions of lives, of Britain's industrial supremacy. Resigning from the National Hospital in 1892,  Rivers travelled to Jena to expand his knowledge of experimental psychology.  Whilst in Jena, Rivers became fluent in German and attended lectures, not only on psychology but on philosophy as well.  He also became deeply immersed in the culture; in a diary he kept of the journey he comments on the buildings, the picture galleries, the church services, and the education system, showing his wide interests and critical judgement.  In this diary he also wrote that: "I have during the last three weeks come to the conclusion that I should go in for insanity when I return to England and work as much as possible at psychology." And "go in for insanity" he did, becoming a Clinical Assistant at the Bethlem Royal Hospital upon his return to England. In 1893, at the request of G.H Savage, he began assisting with lectures in mental diseases at Guy's Hospital, laying special stress on their psychological aspect. At about the same time, due to the bidding of Professor Sully, he began to lecture on experimental psychology at University College, London. When, in 1893, the unexpected invitation came to lecture in Cambridge on the functions of the sense organs, he was already deeply read in the subject.  He had been captivated by Head's accounts of the works of Ewald Hering and had absorbed his views on colour vision and the nature of vital processes in living matter with avidity.  However, with typical thoroughness he prepared himself for his new duties by spending the summer working in Heidelberg with Emil Kraepelin on measuring the effects of fatigue. While it may have come as a surprise to Rivers, the offer of a Cambridge lectureship had come about as part of a long process of evolution within the University's Natural Science Tripos. Earlier in 1893, Professor McKendrick, of Glasgow, had examined subject and reported unfavourably on the scant knowledge of the special senses displayed by the candidates;  it was in reaction to this that Sir Michael Foster, who had seen the potential in this shy, retiring Bart's man,  appointed Rivers as a lecturer and he became Fellow Commoner at St John's College forthwith.   He was to become a Fellow of the College in 1902. At first, the appointment proved to be an arduous and exhausting one for Rivers who, at this point, still had ongoing teaching commitments at Guy's hospital and at University College.  In addition to these mounting responsibilities, in1897 he was put in temporary charge of the new psychological laboratory at University College. This was the same year in which Foster assigned him a room in the Physiology Department at Cambridge for use in psychological research. As a result, Rivers is listed in the histories of experimental psychology as simultaneously the director of the first two psychological laboratories in Britain. In retrospect, it is easy to see the monumental nature of Foster's appointment in lieu of the profound effects Rivers's work would have on Cambridge and indeed in the scientific world in general. However, at the time the Cambridge University Senate were wary of his appointment. As Bartlett writes: "how many times have I heard Rivers, spectacles waving in the air, his face lit by his transforming smile, tell how, in Senatorial discussion, an ancient orator described him as a 'Ridiculous Superfluity'!" The opposition of the Senate, while it was more vocal than serious,  was distinctly detrimental to Rivers's efforts since any assistance to his work was very sparingly granted.  It was not until 1901, eight years after his appointment, that he was allowed the use of a small cottage for the laboratory, and given thirty-five pounds annually (later, and somewhat begrudgingly, increased to fifty) for purchase and upkeep of equipment.   For several years Rivers continued thus, and then, stimulated by him and others, the Moral Science Board stretched out a rather timid and tentative hand again  and, in 1903, Rivers and his assistants and students moved to another small building in St Tibbs Row.  These working spaces were characterised as being "dismal", "damp, dark and ill-ventilated"     but these poor working conditions did not seem to dishearten the Cambridge psychologists. Indeed, the effect was quite the contrary, psychology began to thrive: "perhaps, in the early days of scientific progress, a subject often grows all the more surely if its workers have to meet difficulties, improvise their apparatus, and rub very close shoulders one with another."  It was not until 1912 that a well-equipped laboratory was built under the directorship of Charles S. Myers, one of Rivers's earliest and ablest pupils, who was wealthy and able to supplement the University grant with his own funds. 
At this point the preoccupations of the Cambridge psychologists and of Rivers were with the special senses: colour vision, optical illusions, sound-reactions and perceptual processes.  In these fields, Rivers was rapidly becoming eminent. He was invited to write a chapter on vision for Schäfer's Handbook of Physiology and this contribution, according to Bartlett, "still remains, from a psychological point of view, one of the best in the English Language".    In it he set out in a masterly way the work of previous investigators, modestly incorporating his own, and critically examining the rival theories of colour vision, pointing out clearly the importance of psychological factors in, for instance, the phenomena of contrast. For his own experiments on vision, Rivers worked with two of his graduate medical students, Charles S. Myers and William McDougall who assisted him at this period in a series of experiments on vision and with whom he formed close friendships.  Rivers also collaborated with the pioneer instrument maker Sir Horace Darwin in the improvement of apparatus for recording sensations, especially those involved in vision. This collaboration was the basis of a lifelong friendship between Rivers and the genial son of Charles Darwin. Another important work of this period was an investigation of the influence of tea, coffee, alcohol, tobacco, and a number of other drugs on the capacity for doing work both muscular and mental. For this research he was well fitted after his work under Kraepelin at Heidelberg. A great many of these experiments Rivers made on himself, and for this purpose gave up for a period of two years not only alcoholic beverages and tobacco, which was easy enough for him as he liked neither, but all tea, coffee and cocoa as well.  Although the investigation was initially formed with physiological motives in mind, it soon became clear that a strong psychological influence was also involved in the act of taking the substances.    Rivers realised that part of the effects- mental and physical- that substances had were caused psychologically by the excitement of knowing that one is indulging.  In order, therefore, to eliminate "all possible effects of suggestion, sensory stimulation and interest", Rivers made sure that the substances were disguised from him so that he was not aware, on any given occasion, whether he was taking a drug or a control substance.   This was the first experiment of its kind to use this double-blind procedure  and, in recognition of this momentous study, Rivers was appointed Croonian Lecturer to the Royal College of Physicians in 1906. In December 1897 Rivers's achievements were recognised by the University of Cambridge who honoured him with the degree of M.A. honoris causa  and, in 1904 with the assistance of Professor James Ward, Rivers made a further mark on the world of psychological sciences, founding and subsequently editing the British Journal of Psychology. Despite his many successes, Rivers was still a markedly reticent man in mixed company, hampered as he was by his stammer and innate shyness.  In 1897, Langdon-Brown invited Rivers to come and address the Abernethian Society. The occasion was not an unqualified success. He chose "Fatigue" as his subject, and before he had finished his title was writ large on the faces of his audience.  In the Cambridge physiological laboratory too he had to lecture to a large elementary class. He was rather nervous about it, and did not like it,  his hesitation of speech made his style dry and he had not yet acquired the art of expressing his original ideas in an attractive form, except in private conversation. Among two or three friends, however, the picture of Rivers is quite different. His conversations were full of interest and illumination;  "he was always out to elicit the truth, entirely sincere, and disdainful of mere dialect."  His insistence on veracity made him a formidable researcher, as Haddon puts it, "the keynote of Rivers was thoroughness. Keenness of thought and precision marked all his work."  His research was distinguished by a fidelity to the demands of experimental method very rare in the realms which he was exploring  and, although often overlooked, the work that Rivers did in this early period is of immense import as it formed the foundation of all that came later. 
Torres Straits ExpeditionRivers recognised in himself "the desire for change and novelty, which is one of the strongest aspects of my mental makeup"   
and, while fond of St. John's,    the staid lifestyle of his Cambridge existence showed in signs of nervous strain and led him to experience periods of depression. The turning point came in 1898 when Alfred Cort Haddon seduced "Rivers from the path of virtue... (for psychology then was a chaste science)... into that of anthropology:”  He made Rivers first choice to head an expedition to the Torres Straits.  Rivers's first reaction was to decline, but he soon agreed on learning that C.S Myers and William McDougall, two of his best former students, would participate.  The other members were Sidney Ray, C.G Seligman, and a young Cambridge graduate named Anthony Wilkin, who was asked to accompany the expedition as photographer.  In April 1898, the Europeans were transported with gear and apparatus to the Torres Straits.  Rivers was said to pack only a small handbag of personal effects for such field trips. From Thursday Island, several of the party found passage, soaked by rain and waves, on the deck of a crowded 47-foot ketch. In addition to sea sickness, Rivers had been badly sunburnt on his shins and for many days had been quite ill. On 5 May, in a bad storm nearing their first destination of Murray Island, the ship dragged anchor on the Barrier Reef and the expedition almost met disaster  Later Rivers recalled the palliative effect of near shipwreck. When the ketch dropped anchor, Rivers and Ray were at first too ill to go ashore. However the others set up a surgery to treat the native islanders and Rivers, lying in bed next-door tested the patients for colour vision: Haddon's diary noted "He is getting some interesting results.”  The warmth shown to the sickly Rivers by the Islanders contributed to strong positive feelings for the work and a deep concern for the welfare of Melanesians during the remainder of his life.” Rivers's first task was to examine first hand the colour vision of the islanders and compare it to that of Europeans.     In the course of his examinations of the visual acuity of the natives, Rivers showed that colour-blindness did not exist or was very rare, but that the colour vision of Papuans was not the same type as that of Europeans; they possessed no word for blue, and an intelligent native found nothing unnatural in applying the same name to the brilliant blue sea or sky and to the deepest black.     "Moreover," Head goes on to state in Rivers's obituary notice, "he was able to explode to old fallacy that the 'noble savage' was endowed with powers of vision far exceeding that of civilised natives. Errors of refraction are, it is true, less common, especially myopia. But, altogether the feats of the Torres Straits islanders equalled those reported by travellers from other parts of the world, they were due to the power of attending to minute details in familiar and strictly limited surrounding, and not to supernormal visual acuity." It was at this point that Rivers began collecting family histories and constructing genealogical tables  but at this point his purpose appears to have been more biological than ethnological since such tables seem to have originated as a means of determining whether certain sensory talents or disabilities were hereditary.    However, these simple tables soon took on a new prospective.It was at once evident to Rivers that "the names applied to the various forms of blood relationship did not correspond to those used by Europeans, but belonged to what is known as a 'classificatory system'; a man's 'brothers' or 'sisters' might include individuals we should call cousins and the key to this nomenclature is to be found in forms of social organisation especially in varieties of the institution of marriage."  Rivers found that relationship terms were used to imply definite duties, privileges and mutual restrictions in conduct, rather than being biologically based as ours are. As Head puts it: "all these facts were clearly demonstrable by the genealogical method, a triumphant generalisation which has revolutionised ethnology." The Torres Straits expedition was "revolutionary" in many other respects as well. For the first time, British anthropology had been removed from its "armchair" and placed into a sound empirical basis, providing the model for future anthropologists to follow.  In 1916, Sir Arthur Keith stated in an address to the Royal Anthropological Institute, that the expedition had engendered "the most progressive and profitable movement in the history of British anthropology." While the expedition was clearly productive and, in many ways, arduous for its members, it was also the foundation of lasting friendships. The team would reunite at many points and their paths would frequently converge. Of particular note is the relationship between Rivers and Haddon, the latter of whom regarded the fact he had induced Rivers to come to the Torres Straits as his claim to fame.    It cannot be denied that both Rivers and Haddon were serious about their work but at the same time they were imbued with a keen sense of humour and fun. Haddon's diary from Tuesday 16 August reads thus: "Our friends and acquaintances would often be very much amused if they could see us at some of our occupations ad I am afraid these would sometimes give occasion to the enemy to blaspheme – so trivial would they appear. Every now and then we then one thing hard- for example one week we were mad on Cat's cradle – at least Rivers, Ray and I were- McDougall soon fell victim and even Myers eventually succumbed." It may seem to be a bizarre occupation for a group of highly qualified men of science, indeed, as Haddon states: "I can imagine that some people would think we were demented – or at least wasting our time." However, both Haddon and Rivers were to use the string trick to scientific ends  and they are also credited as inventing a system of nomenclature that enabled them to be able to schematise the steps required and teach a variety of string tricks to European audiences. The expedition ended in October 1898 and Rivers returned to England.”  In 1900, Rivers joined Myers and Wilkin in Egypt to run tests on the colour vision of the Egyptians; this was the last time he saw Wilkin, who died  of dysentery in May 1901, aged 24.  
"A Human Experiment in Nerve Division"
Upon his return to England, Rivers became aware of a series of experiments being conducted by his old friend Henry Head in conjunction with James Sherren, a surgeon at the London Hospital where they both worked.  Since 1901, the pair had been forming a systematic study of nerve injuries among patients attending the hospital.  Rivers, who had long been interested in the physiological consequences of nerve division,  was quick to take on the role of "guide and counsellor".   It quickly became clear to Rivers, looking in on the experiment from a psycho-physical aspect, that the only way accurate results could be obtained from introspection on behalf of the patient is if the subject under investigation was himself a trained observer, sufficiently discriminative to realise if his introspection was being prejudiced by external irrelevancies or moulded by the form of the experimenter's questions, and sufficiently detached to lead a life of detachment throughout the entire course of the tests.  It was in the belief that he could fulfil these requirements, that Head himself volunteered to act, as Langham puts it, "as Rivers's experimental guinea-pig." So it was that, on 25 April 1903, the radial and external cutaneous nerves of Henry Head's arm were severed and sutured.  Rivers was then to take on the role of examiner and chart the regeneration of the nerves, considering the structure and functions of the nervous system from an evolutionary standpoint through a series of "precise and untiring observations" over a period of five years.  At first observation, the day after the operation, the back of Head's hand and the dorsal surface of his thumb were seen to be "completely insensitive to stimulation with cotton wool, to pricking with a pin, and to all degrees of heat and cold."  While cutaneous sensibility had ceased, deep sensibility was maintained so that pressure with a finger, a pencil or with any blunt object was appreciated without hesitation. So that the distractions of a busy life should not interfere with Head's introspective analysis, it was decided that the experimentation should take place in Rivers's rooms.  Here, as Head states, "for five happy years we worked together on week-ends and holidays in the quiet atmosphere of his rooms at St. John's College."  In the normal course of events, Head would travel to Cambridge on Saturday, after spending several hours on the outpatient department of the London Hospital. On these occasions, however, he would find that he was simply too exhausted to work on the Saturday evening so experimentation would have to be withheld until the Sunday. If, therefore, a long series of tests were to be carried out, Head would come to Cambridge on the Friday, returning to London on Monday morning. At some points, usually during Rivers's vacation period, longer periods could be devoted to the observations.  Between the date of the operation and their last sitting on 13 December 1907, 167 days were devoted to the investigation. Since Head was simultaneously collaborator and experimental subject, extensive precautions were taken to make sure that no outside factors influenced his subjective appreciation of what he was perceiving:  "No questions were asked until the termination of a series of events; for we found it was scarcely possible... to ask even simple questions without giving a suggestion either for or against the right answer... The clinking of ice against the glass, the removal of the kettle from the hob, tended to prejudice his answers... [Rivers] was therefore particularly careful to make all his preparations beforehand; the iced tubes were filled and jugs of hot and cold water ranged within easy reach of his hand, so that the water of the temperature required might be mixed silently." Moreover, although before each series of tests Head and Rivers would discuss their plan of action, Rivers was careful to vary this order to such an extent during the actual testing that Head would be unable to tell what was coming next. Gradually during the course of the investigation, certain isolated spots of cutaneous sensibility began to appear; these spots were sensitive to heat, cold and pressure.  However, the spaces between these spots remained insensitive at first,  unless sensations- such as heat or cold- reached above a certain threshold at which point the feeling evoked was unpleasant and usually perceived as being "more painful" than it was if the same stimulus was applied to Head's unaffected arm.  Also, although the sensitive spots were quite definitely localised, Head, who sat through the tests with his eyes closed, was unable to gain any exact appreciation of the locus of stimulation.  Quite the contrary, the sensations radiated widely, and Head tended to refer them to places remote from the actual point of stimulation. This was the first stage of the recovery process and Head and Rivers dubbed it the "protopathic",  taking its origins from the Middle Greek word protopathes, meaning "first affected".  This protopathic stage seemed to be marked by an "all-or-nothing" aspect since there was either an inordinate response to sensation when compared with normal reaction or no reaction whatever if the stimulation was below the threshold. Finally, when Head was able to distinguish between different temperatures and sensations below the threshold, and when he could recognise when two compass points were applied simultaneously to the skin, Head's arm began to enter the second stage of recovery.  They named this stage the "epicritic", from the Greek epikritikos, meaning "determinative". From an evolutionary perspective, it soon became clear to Rivers that the epicritic nervous reaction was the superior, as it suppressed and abolished all protopathic sensibility.  This, Rivers found, was the case in all parts of the skin of the male anatomy except one area where protopathic sensibility is unimpeded by epicritic impulses: the glans penis.  As Langham points out, with special references to "Rivers's reputed sexual proclivities",  it is at this point that the experiment takes on an almost farcical aspect to the casual reader.  It may not seem surprising to us that when Rivers was to apply a needle to a particularly sensitive part of the glans that "pain appeared and was so excessively unpleasant that [Head] cried out and started away";  indeed, such a test could be seen as a futility verging on the masochistic. Nor would we necessarily equate the following passage with what one might normally find in a scientific text:"The foreskin was drawn back, and the penis allowed to hang downwards. A number of drinking glasses were prepared containing water at different temperatures. [Head] stood with his eyes closed, and [Rivers] gradually approached one of the glasses until the surface of the water covered the glans but did not touch the foreskin. Contact with the fluid was not appreciated; if, therefore, the temperature of the water was such that it did not produce a sensation of heat or cold, Head was unaware that anything had been done." However, the investigations, bizarre as they may seem, did have a sound scientific basis since Rivers especially was looking at the protopathic and epicritic from an evolutionary perspective.  From this standpoint it is intensely interesting to note that the male anatomy maintains one area which is "unevolved" in so much as it is "associated with a more primitive form of sensibility".  Using this information about the protopathic areas of the human body, Rivers and Head then began to explore elements of man's psyche.  One way in which they did this was to examine the "pilomoter reflex" (the erection of hairs). Head and Rivers noted that the thrill evoked by aesthetic pleasure is "accompanied by the erection of hairs"  and they noted that this reaction was no greater in the area of skin with protopathic sensibility than it was in the area of the more evolved epicritic, making it a purely psychologically based phenomena.  As Langham puts it: "The image of a man reading a poem to evoke aesthetic pleasure while a close friend meticulously studies the erection of his hairs may seem ludicrous. However, it provides a neat encapsulation of Rivers's desire to subject possibly protopathic phenomena to the discipline of rigorous investigation." 
Pre-war psychological workIn 1904, with Professor James Ward and some others, Rivers founded the British Journal of Psychology of which he was at first joint editor.     From 1908 till the outbreak of the war Dr. Rivers was mainly preoccupied with ethnological and sociological problems. Already he had relinquished his official post as Lecturer in Experimental Psychology in favour of Dr. Charles Samuel Myers, and now held only a lectureship on the physiology of the special senses.      By degrees he became more absorbed in anthropological research. But though he was now an ethnologist rather than a psychologist he always maintained that what was of value in his work was due directly to his training in the psychological laboratory. In the laboratory he had learnt the importance of exact method; in the field he now gained vigor and vitality by his constant contact with the actual daily behaviour of human beings.During 1907–8 Rivers travelled to the Solomon Islands, and other areas of Melanesia and Polynesia. His two-volume History of Melanesian Society (1914), which he dedicated to St Johns,    presented a diffusionist thesis for the development of culture in the south-west Pacific.  In the year of publication he made a second journey to Melanesia, returning to England in March 1915, to find that war had broken out.
The Great War
During the war, he worked as a RAMC captain at Craiglockhart War Hospital near Edinburgh, where he applied techniques of psychoanalysis to British officers suffering from various forms of neurosis brought on by their war experiences.  Rivers's methods are often, somewhat unfairly, said to have stemmed from Sigmund Freud (essays such as Freud and the War Neuroses: [[Pat Barker]'s "Regeneration"] gladly compare the two) however, this is not truly the case as you can read both in Barker's novels and in the words of friends such as Myers. Although he was aware of Freud's theories and methods, he did not necessarily subscribe to them. (See Rivers's Conflict and Dream for his methods of dream analysis and his thoughts on Freud.) While he "admitted", as Myers describes, "the conflict of social factors with the sexual instincts in certain psychoneuroses" of civilian life, he saw the instinct of self-preservation rather than the sexual instinct, as the driving force behind war neuroses.  Therefore he formed his "talking cure", not on the basis that soldiers were repressing sexual urges, but rather their fear pertaining to their war experiences. As such, he really is a pioneer in his field – both for his new methods and for the fact that he went against the grain of the beliefs of the time (Shell shock was not considered a "real" illness and "cures" mainly involved electric shock, with doctors such as Lewis Yealland particularly keen on this form of "treatment"). Rivers's treatment also went against the grain of the society in which he had been brought up – he did not advocate the traditional "stiff upper-lip" approach but rather told his patients to express their emotions.Sassoon came to him in 1917 after publicly protesting against the war and refusing to return to his regiment, but was treated with sympathy and given much leeway until he voluntarily returned to France.  For Rivers, there was a considerable dilemma involved in "curing" his patients simply in order that they could be sent back to the Western Front to die. Rivers's feelings of guilt are clearly portrayed both in fiction and in fact. Through Pat Barker's novels and in Rivers's works (particularly Conflict and Dream) we get a sense of the turmoil the doctor went through. As Sassoon wrote in a letter to Robert Graves (24 July 1918): He did not wish to "break" his patients but at the same time he knew that it was their duty to return to the front and his duty to send them. There is also an implication (given the pun on Rivers's name along with other factors) that Rivers was more to Sassoon than just a friend, he called him "father confessor", a point that Jean Moorcroft Wilson picks up on in her biography of Sassoon, however Rivers's tight morals would have probably prevented such a relationship from progressing: Not only Sassoon, but his patients as a whole, loved him and his colleague Frederic Bartlett wrote of him   Sassoon described Rivers's bedside manner in his letter to Graves, written as he lay in hospital after being shot (a head wound that he had hoped would kill him – he was bitterly disappointed when it didn't):  
He was well known for his compassionate, effective and pioneering treatments; as Sassoon's testimony reveals, he treated his patients very much as individuals. Rivers published the results of his experimental treatment of patients at Craiglockhart in paper for The Lancet, "On the Repression of War Experience",   and began to record interesting cases in his book Conflict and Dream which was published a year after his death by his close friend Grafton Elliot Smith. 
Post war
After the war, Rivers became "another and far happier man – diffidence gave place to confidence, reticence to outspokenness, a somewhat laboured literary style to one remarkable for ease and charm".  He is quoted as saying "I have finished my serious work and I shall just let myself go." In those post war years, his personality seemed to change dramatically. The man who had been most at home in his study, the laboratory, or the field now dined out a good deal, had joined clubs, went yachting and appeared to welcome rather than shun opportunities for public speaking.   Always having been a voracious reader, he now began reading in philosophy, as he had not done for some years, and also in imaginative literature. Not all of his friends from former years welcomed these changes; some felt that, along with his shyness, his scientific caution and good sense may have deserted him to a degree but most people who saw how happy Rivers had become agreed that the slight alterations to his character were for the better. Rivers had visited his college frequently during the war although, having resigned his position as lecturer, he held no official post. However, upon his return from the Royal Flying Corps in 1919, the college created a new office for him – "Praelector of Natural Science Studies"  – and he was given a free rein to do as he pleased. As Leonard E. Shore recalled in 1923: "when I asked him if he would undertake that work... his eyes shone with a new light I had not seen before, and he paced his rooms for several minutes full of delight."  He took his new position to be a mandate to get to know every science student and indeed every other student at St. Johns, Cambridge and at other colleges. He would arrange "At Homes" in his rooms on Sunday evenings, as well as Sunday morning breakfast meetings; he also organised informal discussions and formal lectures (many of which he gave himself) in the College Hall.  He formed a group called The Socratics and brought to it some of his most influential friends, including H. G. Wells, Arnold Bennett, Bertrand Russell and Sassoon.  Sassoon (Patient B in Conflict and Dream), remained particularly friendly with Rivers and regarded him as a mentor.  They shared Socialist sympathies.Having already been made president of the anthropological section of the British Association for the Advancement of Science in 1911, after the war he became president of the English Folk-Lore Society (1920),  and the Royal Anthropological Institute (1921–1922).  He was also awarded honorary degrees from the universities of Manchester, St. Andrews and Cambridge in 1919. Rivers died of a strangulated hernia in the summer of 1922, shortly after being named as a Labour candidate for the 1922 general election.  He had agreed to run for parliament, as he said: He had been taken ill suddenly in his rooms at St John's on the evening of Friday 3 June, having sent his servant home to enjoy the summer festivities. By the time he was found in the morning, it was too late and he knew it. Typically for this man who, throughout his life "displayed a complete disregard for personal gain,  he was selfless to the last. There is a document granting approval for the diploma in anthropology to be awarded as of Easter term, 1922, to an undergraduate student from India. It is signed by Haddon and Rivers dated 4 June 1922. At the bottom is a notation in Haddon's handwriting: Rivers signed the papers as he lay dying in the Evelyn Nursing Home  following an unsuccessful emergency operation. He had an extravagant funeral at St. John's  in accordance with his wishes as he was an expert on funeral rites and was put to rest in Parish of the Ascension Burial Ground, formerly the churchyard of St Giles Church, Cambridge.  Sassoon was deeply saddened by the death of his father figure and collapsed at his funeral.  His loss prompted him to write two poignant poems about the man he had grown to love: " " and "Revisitation". 
 
Others' opinions of Rivers
PoetryIn the poem The Red Ribbon Dream, written by Robert Graves not long after Rivers's death, he touches on the peace and security he felt in Rivers's rooms:

For that was the place where I longed to be
And past all hope where the kind lamp shone.

An anonymously written poem Anthropological Thoughts can be found in the Rivers collection of the Haddon archives at Cambridge.   There is a reference that indicates that these lines were written by Charles Elliot Fox,  missionary and ethnographer friend of Rivers.
Quotations 
In Sassoon's autobiography (under the guise of The Memoirs of George Sherston) Rivers is one of the few characters to retain their original names. There is a whole chapter devoted to Rivers and he is immortalised by Sassoon as a near demi-god who saved his life and his soul. Sassoon wrote: Rivers was much loved and admired, not just by Sassoon. Bartlett wrote of his experiences of Rivers in one of his obituaries, as well as in many other articles, as the man had a profound influence on his life: Rivers's legacy continues even today in the form of The Rivers Centre, which treats patients suffering from Post Traumatic Stress Disorder using the same famously humane methods as Rivers had.  There is also a Rivers Memorial Medal, founded in 1923, which is rewarded each year to an anthropologist who has made a significant impact in his or her field. Appropriately, Haddon was the first to receive this award in 1924. 
In fiction
 Sassoon writes about Rivers in the third part of The Memoirs of George Sherston, Sherston's Progress. There is a chapter named after the doctor and Rivers appears in both books as the only character to retain his factual name, giving him a position as a sort of demi-god in Sassoon's semi-fictitious memoirs.The life of W. H. R. Rivers and his encounter with Sassoon was fictionalised by Pat Barker in the Regeneration Trilogy, a series of three books including Regeneration (1991), The Eye in the Door (1993) and The Ghost Road (1995). The trilogy was greeted with considerable acclaim, with The Ghost Road being awarded the Booker Prize in the year of its publication. Regeneration was filmed in 1997 with Jonathan Pryce in the role of Rivers.The first book, Regeneration deals primarily with Rivers's treatment of Sassoon at Craiglockhart. In the novel we are introduced to Rivers as a doctor for whom healing patients comes at price. The dilemmas faced by Rivers are brought to the fore and the strain leads him to become ill; on sick leave he visits his brother and the Heads and we learn more about his relationships outside of hospital life. We are also introduced in the course of the novel to the Canadian doctor Lewis Yealland, another factual figure who used electric shock treatment to "cure" his patients. The juxtaposition of the two very different doctors highlights the unique, or at least unconventional, nature of Rivers's methods and the humane way in which he treated his patients (even though Yealland's words, and his own guilt and modesty lead him to think otherwise).The Eye in the Door concentrates, for the most part, on Rivers's treatment of the fictional character of Prior. Although Prior's character might not have existed, the facts that he makes Rivers face up to did – that something happened to him on the first floor of his house that caused him to block all visual memory and begin to stammer. We also learn of Rivers's treatment of officers in the airforce and of his work with Head. Sassoon too plays a role in the book- Rivers visits him in hospital where he finds him to be a different, if not broken, man, his attempt at "suicide" having failed. This second novel in the trilogy, both implicitly and directly, addresses the issue of Rivers's possible homosexuality and attraction to Sassoon. From Rivers's reaction to finding out that Sassoon is in hospital to the song playing in the background ("You Made Me Love You") and Ruth Head's question to her husband, "do you think he's in love with him?" we get a strong impression of the author's opinions on Rivers's sexuality.The Ghost Road, the final part of the trilogy, shows a side of Rivers not previously seen in the novels. As well as showing his relationship with his sisters and father, we also learn of his feelings for Charles Dodgson- or Lewis Carroll. Carroll was the first adult Rivers met who stammered as badly as he did and yet he cruelly rejected him, preferring to lavish attention on his pretty young sisters. In this novel the reader also learns of Rivers's visit to Melenasia; feverish with Spanish Flu, the doctor is able to recount the expedition and we are provided with insight both into the culture of the island and into Rivers's very different "field trip persona".
Bibliography 
 

" " (Mind, New Series, Vol. 3, No. 12, Oct., 1894, pp. 583–584)
" " (Mind, New Series, 3, pp. 413–17)
" " (Mind, New Series, 4, pp. 400–3)
" " (Mind, New Series, Vol. 5, No. 17, Jan., 1896, pp. 71–80)
"The senses of primitive man" (Abstract in Science, New Series, 11, pp. 740–1, and trans. 'Über die Sinne d. primitiven Menschen'in Umschau, 25)
" " (Man, Vol. 1, 1901, pp. 171–172)
" ". Map, illus., 22 cm. London
" " (Man, Vol. 7, 1907, pp. 111–111)
" " (with H. Head) (Brain, XXXI., pp. 323–450)
The illusion of compared horizontal and vertical lines (with G.D. Hicks), and The influence of small doses of alcohol on the capacity for muscular work (with H.N. Webber) (Brit. J. of Psychol., II., pp. 252–5)
"Medicine, Magic and Religion" (Fitzpatrick Lects. 1915) (originally published in stages. Lancet XCIV., pp. 59–65, 117–23)
" " (Lancet, XCVI., pp. 513–33)
" " (Science, New Series, Vol. 49, No. 1268 (18 Apr. 1919), pp. 367–369)
Conflict and Dream (edit. G. Elliot Smith). London, 1923.


References 
External links 

"Everything is Relatives: William Rivers"
Cambridge Museum of Anthropology
The Rivers Centre
Torres Straits Essay
"W H R Rivers and the hazards of interpretation"
Historicism
Viewing Notes for "Everything is Relatives"
Sound files from the Torres Straits
"The Ethnographer's Eye"

DEFAULTSORT



















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Denis Gaultier

Denis Gaultier (Gautier, Gaulthier; also known as Gaultier le jeune and Gaultier de Paris) (1597 or 1602/3 – 1672) was a French lutenist and composer. He was a cousin of Ennemond Gaultier.
LifeGaultier was born in Paris; two conflicting sources point to either 1597 or 1603 as the year of birth. The former can be deduced from an account by Thorian, who claimed that Gaultier died in 1672 at the age of seventy-five. However, an archival document from the Hôtel-Dieu de Paris hospital states that Gaultier was twenty-three at the time of his convalescence in the hospital, which was from 24 October 1626 to 12 December 1626.Very little is known about Gaultier's career. He may have studied under Charles Racquet, since he commemorated the lutenist's death with a tombeau. Until at least 1631 Denis's career was closely linked to that of his older cousin, Ennemond; so much that contemporary writers referred to either composer by surname only, making no attempt to distinguish between them. Both lutenists had connections with Blancrocher and Henri de L'Enclos, and both secured a high reputation comparable to that of François Dufaut, Jacques Gallot, or Charles Mouton. In 1635 Denis married Françoise Daucourt. Their son Philippe Emmanuel would later become advisor to the king, but there is no evidence that Gaultier himself ever held a court position, even though his cousin did. Denis most probably gained fame and income through salon playing.
WorksDenis and Ennemond are confused in many contemporary manuscripts and prints, leading to numerous attribution problems. A number of pieces are signed simply with the surname, some are attributed to Denis in one collection and to Ennemond in another, and still others are now known to have been be misattributed. Gaultier's output, as is to be expected from a 17th-century French lutenist, consists mainly of dance suites for the lute. In general, Gaultier was a masterful melodist, effortlessly writing graceful melodic lines with clear phrase structures, but his music is less inventive harmonically than that of some other French lutenists of the era, such as René Mesangeau or Pierre Dubut.Three published collections of Gaultier's music have come down to us, all from his late years. La rhétorique des dieux (1652) contains 12 parts, each named after one of the Greek modes, but the actual harmonic procedures of the pieces are not connected to the modes. Many of the pieces reference Greek mythology. The collection, compiled under the patronage of Anne de Chambré, also contains engravings after Le Sueur, Abraham Bosse and Robert de Nanteuil. Two other collections, Pièces de luth sur trois différens modes nouveaux (c. 1669) and Livre de tablature [...] de Mr. Gaultier Sr. de Nève et de Mr. Gaultier son cousin (c. 1672) both begin with basic instructions on lute playing. All three manuscripts consist principally of dances. The one other genre Gaultier made an important contribution to is the tombeau.An adequate assessment of Gaultier's music and influence is difficult due to attribution problems. According to recent research, La rhétorique des dieux may consist of works not composed by Denis Gaultier, or original works by him changed by unknown scribes.  The 1672 collection was completed after Gaultier's death by his pupil Montarcis, and contains music by two different Gaultiers. Other pieces, found in various manuscripts, also pose numerous attribution problems. Nevertheless, Gaultier was an important exponent of the French style brisé, and as such an influence on harpsichordists such as Johann Jakob Froberger. Around 1680 a few of Gaultier's works were included in anthologies by Perrine, a French theorist who experimented with the writing of lute music in staff notation.
Media

 


Notes 
References

Buch, David Joseph (ed.). 1990. Denis Gaultier: La rhétorique des dieux. A-R Editions, Inc. ISBN 978-0-89579-238-9
 

  
DEFAULTSORT







 
 
 
 
 
 
	Herbert Beerbohm Tree

Sir Herbert Beerbohm Tree (17 December 1852 – 2 July 1917) was an English actor and theatre manager.Tree began performing in the 1870s.  By 1887, he was managing the Haymarket Theatre, winning praise for adventurous programming and lavish productions, and starring in many of its productions.  In 1899, he helped fund the rebuilding, and became manager, of His Majesty's Theatre.  Again, he promoted a mix of Shakespeare and classic plays with new works and adaptations of popular novels, giving them spectacular productions in this large house, and often playing leading roles.  His wife, actress Helen Maud Holt, often played opposite him and assisted him with management of the theatres.Although Tree was regarded as a versatile and skilled actor, particularly in character roles, by his later years, his technique was seen as mannered and old fashioned.  He founded the Royal Academy of Dramatic Art in 1904 and was knighted, for his contributions to theatre, in 1909.  His famous family includes his siblings, explorer Julius Beerbohm, author Constance Beerbohm and half-brother caricaturist Max Beerbohm.  His daughters were Viola, an actress, Felicity and Iris, a poet; and his illegitimate children included film director Carol Reed. A grandson was the actor Oliver Reed.
Early life and careerBorn in Kensington, London as Herbert Draper Beerbohm, Tree was the second son and second child of Julius Ewald Edward Beerbohm (1810–1892), of Dutch, Lithuanian, and German origin, who had come to England in about 1830 and set up as a prosperous corn merchant. He married an Englishwoman, Constantia Draper, and the couple had four children.  His younger brother was the author and explorer Julius Beerbohm, and his sister was author Constance Beerbohm. A younger half-brother was the parodist and caricaturist Max Beerbohm from his father's second marriage. Kachur, B. A. "Tree, Sir Herbert Beerbohm (1852–1917)". Oxford Dictionary of National Biography, Oxford University Press, September 2004; online edn, January 2008, accessed 1 May 2010   Max jokingly claimed that Herbert added the "Tree" to his name because it was easier for audiences than shouting "Beerbohm!  Beerbohm!" at curtain calls. The latter part of his surname, "bohm", is north German dialect for "tree". Tree's early education included Mrs Adams's Preparatory School at Frant, Dr Stone's school in King's Square, Bristol, and Westbourne collegiate school in Westbourne Grove, London.  After these, he attended his father's alma mater, Schnepfeuthal College in Thuringia, Germany.  Upon his return to England, he began performing with amateur troupes, eventually using the name Herbert Beerbohm Tree, while working in his father's business. In 1878 he played Grimaldi in Dion Boucicault's The Life of an Actress at the Globe Theatre; shortly after, he began his professional career.  For the next six years, he performed mainly on tour in the British provinces, playing character roles, although he made his London debut late in 1878 at the Olympic Theatre under the management of Henry Neville. His first real success was as the elderly Marquis de Pontsablé in Madame Favart, in which he toured towards the end of 1879. Palmer, J. L. Tree, Sir Herbert Beerbohm (1852–1917), actor-manager, Oxford Dictionary of National Biography archive (1927 article; subscription required).    Another London engagement was as Prince Maleotti in a revival of Forget-me-Not at the Prince of Wales's Theatre in 1880.  His first London success came as the Rev. Robert Spalding in Charles Hawtrey's adaptation of The Private Secretary in 1884. He made many comic embellishments to the role, which added to the popularity of the play. "Sir Herbert Tree", The Times, 3 July 1903, p. 11    His next role was Paolo Marcari in Called Back by Hugh Conway.  The contrast between this dashing Italian spy and his timid parson in Hawtrey's play, showed his versatility as a character actor.  Other appearances over the next two years included roles in revivals of A. W. Pinero's The Magistrate and W. S. Gilbert's Engaged.  In 1886 he played Iago in Othello and Sir Peter Teazle in The School for Scandal with F. R. Benson's company at Bournemouth.  The same year, in London, he made a success at the Haymarket Theatre, in the character role of Baron Harzfeld in Jim the Penman by Charles Young. 
Theatre manager and leading roles
In 1887, at age thirty-four, Tree took over the management of the Comedy Theatre in the West End of London.  His first production was a successful run of the Russian revolutionary play The Red Lamp by W. Outram Tristram, in which Tree took the role of Demetrius. Later in the year, he became the manager of the prestigious Haymarket Theatre.  Since the departure of the Bancrofts in 1885, that theatre's reputation had suffered, which Tree's tenure there restored.  He produced and appeared on stage in some thirty plays during this decade.  While popular farces and melodramas like the stage adaptation of Trilby anchored the repertoire (the production ran for an extraordinary 260 performances),   Tree also encouraged the new drama, staging Maeterlinck's The Intruder (1890), Ibsen's An Enemy of the People (1893) and Wilde's A Woman of No Importance (1893), among others.  He supported new playwrights by producing special "Monday night" performances of their new plays.  Tree also mounted critically acclaimed productions of Hamlet (1892), Henry IV, Part 1 (1896) and The Merry Wives of Windsor (1889), establishing himself as a Shakespearean leading man.  The Times thought his Hamlet a "notable success", but not everyone agreed: W.S. Gilbert said of it, "I never saw anything so funny in my life, and yet it was not in the least vulgar." Pearson (1950), p. 214. (The Manchester Guardian (obituary notice) attributed the joke to Tree's half-brother Max Beerbohm. George Bernard Shaw believed that Tree had made up the joke himself and fathered it on Gilbert: see Pearson, p. 215)   In 1889 Tree also produced Charles Haddon Chambers's play The Tyranny of Tears.    His Haymarket seasons were broken by American visits in January 1895 and November 1896, and occasional visits to the provinces. With the profits he had accumulated at the Haymarket, Tree helped financed the rebuilding of Her Majesty's Theatre in grand and tasteful Louis XV style, which he then owned and managed.   He lived in the theatre from its completion in 1897 until his death in 1917.  For his personal use, he had a banqueting hall and living room installed in the massive, central, square French-style dome.   Images of England, accessed 28 April 2007  The theatre historian W. J. MacQueen-Pope, wrote of the theatre, "Simply to go to His Majesty's was a thrill. As soon as you entered it, you sensed the atmosphere ... In Tree's time it was graced by footmen in powdered wigs and liveries ... Everything was in tone, nothing cheap, nothing vulgar."  Tree opened his theatre during Queen Victoria's Diamond Jubilee year, 1897, associating the new structure with an imperial celebration. Over the next two decades, Tree staged approximately sixty plays there, programming a repertory at least as varied as he had at the Haymarket.  his first production at Her Majesty's was a dramatization of Gilbert Parker's The Seats of the Mighty.  Tree mounted new plays by prominent British playwrights, such as Carnac Sahib (1899) by Henry Arthur Jones.  His productions were exceptionally profitable; they were famous, most of all, for their elaborate and often spectacular scenery and effects.  Unlike some other famous actor-managers, Tree engaged the best actors available to join his company and hired the best designers and composers for the plays with incidental music.  His productions starred such famous and talented actors as Constance Collier, Ellen Terry, Madge Kendal, Winifred Emery, Julia Neilson, Violet Vanbrugh, Oscar Asche, Arthur Bourchier, and Lewis Waller. Tree often starred in the theatre's dramatizations of popular nineteenth-century novels, such as Sydney Grundy's adaptation of Dumas's Musketeers (1898); Tolstoy's Resurrection (1903); Dickens's Oliver Twist (1905), The Mystery of Edwin Drood (1908) and David Copperfield (1914); and Morton's dramatization of Thackeray's The Newcomes, called Colonel Newcome (1906), among others.  Tree staged many contemporary verse dramas by Stephen Phillips and others, including Herod (1900),  Ulysses (1902), Nero (1906) and Faust (1908).  Adaptations of classic foreign plays included Beethoven by Louis Parker, an adaptation of the play by Réné Fauchois (1909); A Russian Tragedy, an English version by Henry Hamilton of the play by Adolph Glass (1909); and The Perfect Gentleman by W. Somerset Maugham, an adaptation of the classic Molière play, Le bourgeois gentilhomme (1913).  The classical repertory included such works as The School for Scandal (1909).  Tree also programmed popular melodramas, farces, romantic comedies and premieres, such as George Bernard Shaw's Pygmalion, in 1914, in which Tree played Henry Higgins opposite the Eliza of Mrs Patrick Campbell. The actor John Gielgud wrote, "Rehearsing Pygmalion with Tree she must have been impossible. They were both such eccentrics. They kept ordering each other out of the theatre with Shaw in the middle, trying to cope with them."   Tree also took his productions on tour in America many times and visited Berlin's Royal Opera House in 1907 at the invitation of Kaiser Wilhelm II. Gilbert remarked that Tree had been invited by the Kaiser "with the malignant motive of showing the Germans what impostors we all are." 
Shakespeare
Under Tree, however, Her (later His) Majesty's Theatre was most famous for its work with Shakespeare, building an international reputation as the premier British playhouse for his works during the Edwardian era, which had for so long belonged to Henry Irving at the Lyceum Theatre during the Victorian period.  Tree worked untiringly to make Shakespeare popular with the theatregoing public.  He mounted sixteen Shakespeare productions, many of which earned enough success to justify revivals during subsequent seasons.  He also established annual Shakespeare festival from 1905 to 1913 that showcased a total over two hundred performances by his company and other acting troupes.   Tree overturned the popular wisdom at the time that Shakespeare productions would lose money, creating stagings that appealed widely to patrons.  In fact, the theatre's first Shakespearian play, Julius Caesar, was its first commercial success in 1898, running for 165 consecutive performances and selling 242,000 tickets.  The next two years saw two more hits, King John and A Midsummer Night's Dream.  Tree's longest-running revival, Henry VIII, ran for a sensational 254 consecutive performances from 1 September 1910 to 8 April 1911.  Many of the others were similar hits. Tree staged the Shakespeare plays, in particular, to appeal to the broad public taste for realistic scenery and scenic effects and lavish spectacle, mirroring the Edwardian fashion for luxury and extravagance.  For example, in The Winter's Tale (1906), there was a woodland glade with a shepherd's cottage and babbling brook; in The Tempest (1904), a replica of a sixteenth-century vessel was tossed in a storm; in The Merchant of Venice (1908), he recreated an authentic Renaissance ghetto.  Tree expounded his views on staging in 1897:
 
Tree sometimes interpolated scenes of famous historical events into the plays to provide even more spectacle, such as King John's granting of Magna Carta or Anne Boleyn's coronation in Westminster Abbey. Tree also pursued four Shakespeare film projects during his career at Her Majesty's. Of great historical interest is the filming, in 1899, of three brief segments from his production of King John, in which he starred and directed.  This is the first film record of a Shakespeare play.  Charles Urban filmed the opening shipwreck from the 1904 revival of The Tempest at the theatre in 1905; Tree, whose role in the production was Caliban, did not appear in this scene.  Tree played Cardinal Wolsey in a 1911 studio film by William Barker of a five-scene version of Henry VIII, based on the theatre's 1910 production. Tree was paid the unprecedented sum of £1000 lest the film prove unsatisfactory, or damage ticket sales of the theatre presentation.  Filming took place at studios in Ealing, west London and took only one day, thanks to careful preparation beforehand. The film was presented to the public on 27 February 1911 in various theatres in London and in the provinces, and was a huge success. The Moving Picture World wrote, "The picture is without doubt the greatest that has even been attempted in this country, and I am almost tempted to say in any other ... the acting passes anything ever seen in moving pictures before.... The effect on the moving picture industry here will be enormous." Hamilton Ball, Robert. "The Shakespeare Film as Record: Sir Herbert Beerbohm Tree", Shakespeare Quarterly, Vol. 3, No. 3 (July 1952), pp. 227–36   In California in 1916, Tree played the title role in a film of Macbeth, by D. W. Griffith (considered a lost film). 
Reputation and last years
According to Tree's biographers, critics and audiences considered Tree to be the best character actor of his day. He himself detested the term "character actor": "All acting should be character acting. What is Shylock? A character part. What are Macbeth and Richard III but character parts? What are Hamlet, Iago, or Othello but character parts? What are Brutus, Mark Antony and Cassius? Such characters as Romeo of course require the appearance of youth and those graces of person which will alone commend the Mantuan lover to his Juliet. But even here, an audience will be more moved by the intellectual suggestion of a Jean de Reszke, than by the inadequate posturings of a youthful nincompoop."   He was an exceptional mime and demonstrated unrivalled versatility in creating individual characterisations.  He was particularly praised for his vivid characters with eccentric and idiosyncratic and habits, including Fagin, Falstaff and Svengali.  His diligent preparation and attention to detail in make-up, gesture, body position and facial expression allowed him to inhabit these roles.  He used his expressive eyes to project such varied emotions as "the dreamy languor of Hamlet during his moments of reflection and the baleful hatred of Shylock towards his persecutors to the nervous fear of Richard II during his surrender at Flint Castle.  His Malvolio was a swaggering and conceited fool, King John a superstitious and deceitful coward, and Macbeth a neurotic and self-torturing monarch."   The literary critic Desmond MacCarthy wrote of Tree: "He could make himself look like Falstaff. He understood and revelled in the character of Falstaff, but his performance lacked fundamental force. Hence the contradiction in his acting: his performance as a whole often fell short of high excellence, yet these same impersonations were lit by insight and masterly strokes of interpretation, which made the spectator feel that he was watching the performance of the most imaginative of living actors." In the great tragic Shakespearean roles, however, Tree was overshadowed by earlier actors such as Henry Irving.   During performance, Tree allowed inspiration to suggest to him appropriate stage business, which sometimes lead to inconsistent interpretations in his portrayals of a role. The Manchester Guardian wrote, "The wonderful thing about him was his amazing versatility, and there was an intellectual virility, an untiring earnestness about the man, which was irresistibly stimulating." "Death of Sir Herbert Tree", The Manchester Guardian, 3 June 1917, p. 7    Tree's versatility, however, was a two edged sword: he quickly tired of characters after a brief run and sought to add business and details to the part to sustain his interest, which led to further character inconsistencies in long runs.  Tree's voice was described as thin, and he was sometimes criticized for struggling to project it in a manner that made his performance seem unnatural.  In the last decade of his career, Tree's technique was seen as mannered and old fashioned.  His spectacles, too, in comparison with the experimental methods of Poel and other producers, seemed outdated, although Tree responded to his critics by noting that his productions remained profitable and well attended. 
PersonalTree married actress Helen Maud Holt (1863–1937) in 1882; she often played opposite him and assisted him with management of the theatres.  Her charm also assisted the couple's entry into prominent social and élite artistic and intellectual circles.  Their daughters were actresses Viola Tree (who married theatre critic Alan Parsons) and Felicity Tree (who married Sir Geoffrey Cory-Wright, third baronet) and poet Iris Tree (who married Curtis Moffat, becoming Countess Ledebur).  Tree also fathered several illegitimate children, including six with (Beatrice) May Pinney and other mistresses, including film director Carol Reed and Peter Reed, the father of the British actor Oliver Reed.   He was also the grandfather of Hollywood screenwriter and producer Ivan Moffat and the great-great-grandfather of actress Georgina Moffat. Tree founded the Royal Academy of Dramatic Art (RADA) in 1904.   He also served as president of the Theatrical Managers' Association and assisted the Actors' Benevolent Fund and the Actors' Association. For his contributions to theatre, he was knighted in 1909.   During World War I, Tree contributed his celebrity by delivering patriotic addresses.  He wrote several books discussing the importance of the theatre and the arts in modern society. Tree's last professional undertaking was a visit to Los Angeles in 1915 fulfilling a contract with a film company. He was in America for the greater part of 1915 and 1916.  He returned to England in 1917 and died, aged 64, from pulmonary blood clots.  According to writer Vera Brittain, he died suddenly in the arms of her friend, the novelist Winifred Holtby, then aged 19 and working as a nursing assistant at a fashionable London nursing home where Tree was recuperating from surgery to repair a broken leg.   His remains were cremated, and his ashes rest at Hampstead cemetery.
DiscographyTree recorded five 10" records for the Gramophone Company (afterwards HMV, couplings as E numbers) in 1906. 

1312 Hamlet's Soliloquy on Death – 'To be, or not to be' from Hamlet (Shakespeare) (3554/E162). (See external link)
1313 Svengali mesmerises Trilby – 'The roof of your mouth is like the dome of the Pantheon' from Trilby (G. du Maurier) (3751/E162).
1314 Mark Antony's lament over the body of Julius Caesar – 'Oh pardon me, thou bleeding piece of earth' from Julius Caesar (Shakespeare) (3557/E161).
1315 (Richard II's) Soliloquy on the death of kings – 'No matter where – of comfort no man speak' from Richard II (Shakespeare) (3556/E163).
1316 Falstaff's speech on Honour – 'Hal, if thou see me down in battle/'Tis not due yet...' from Henry IV, Part 1 (Shakespeare) (3555/E161).


Popular culture referencesThe songwriter Maude Valerie White dedicated her setting of Byron's "So we'll go no more a-roving" to Tree, "in grateful remembrance of 13 July 1888".In his autobiographical novel Memoirs of a Fox-Hunting Man (published in 1928), Siegfried Sassoon comments that his mother was "always intending to go to a matinee of Beerbohm Tree's new Shakespearean production".  In the musical Cats, Gus the Theatre Cat claims, "He has acted with Irving, he's acted with Tree". 
See also

Beerbohm family


Notes 
References

Beerbohm, Max. Herbert Beerbohm Tree (1917)
Bingham, H. The great lover: the life and art of Herbert Beerbohm Tree (1979)
Cran, M. Herbert Beerbohm Tree (1907)
Gielgud, John. An Actor and His Time, Sidgwick and Jackson, London (1979), ISBN 0-283-98573-9
Kachur, B. A. Herbert Beerbohm Tree: Shakespearean actor–director, PhD diss., Ohio State University, 1986
Lambert, A. Unquiet Souls: the Indian summer of the British aristocracy, 1880–1918 (1984)
Macqueen-Pope, W. Carriages at eleven: the story of the Edwardian theatre (1947)
Pearson, H. Beerbohm Tree: his life and laughter (1956)
Pearson, Hesketh. Gilbert and Sullivan, Penguin Books, Harmondsworth (1950)


External links 
 
 

 
Herbert Beerbohm Tree in postcards at Shakespeare & the Players, Emory University
Tree archive at the University of Bristol Theatre Collection, University of Bristol
Herbert Beerbohm Tree as Hamlet reading 'To be or not to be'
Image of the actor in costume

 
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Peter Lorre
 
 
Peter Lorre (26 June 1904 – 23 March 1964) was a Hungarian-American actor.Lorre caused an international sensation with his portrayal of a serial killer who preys on little girls in the German film M (1931). He later became a popular featured player in Hollywood crime films and mysteries (in particular with Humphrey Bogart and Sydney Greenstreet), and, though frequently typecast as a sinister foreigner,
became star of the successful Mr. Moto detective series.
Early lifeLorre was born László Löwenstein on 26 June 1904, as the first child of Jewish couple Alajos Löwenstein and Elvira Freischberger, in the Austrian-Hungarian town of Ružomberok in present-day Slovakia, then known by its Hungarian name Rózsahegy. His parents had recently moved there, following his father's appointment as chief bookkeeper at a local textile mill. Beside working as a bookkeeper, Alajos Löwenstein also served as a lieutenant in the Austrian army reserve, which meant that he was often away on military manoeuvres. Stephen D. Youngkin: The Lost One: A Life of Peter Lorre (2005), (pages 5 and 6)  When Lorre was four years old, his mother died, probably of food poisoning, leaving Alajos with three very young sons, the youngest only a couple of months old. He soon remarried, to his wife's best friend, Melanie Klein, with whom he had two more children. However, Lorre and his stepmother never got on, and this coloured his childhood memories. At the outbreak of the Second Balkan War in 1913, Alajos moved the family to Vienna, anticipating that this would lead to a larger conflict and that he would be called up. He was, at the outbreak of World War I in 1914, and served on the Eastern front during the winter of 1914-1915, before being put in charge of a prison camp due to heart trouble. Stephen D. Youngkin: The Lost One: A Life of Peter Lorre (2005), (pages 7 and 8) 
Acting career
In Europe (1922-1935)Lorre began acting on stage in Vienna at the age of 17, where he worked with the famous Viennese Art Nouveau artist and puppeteer Richard Teschner. He then moved to the then German town of Breslau, and later to Zürich in Switzerland. In the late 1920s, the young and short ( ) actor moved to Berlin, where he worked with German playwright Bertolt Brecht, including a role in Brecht's Mann ist Mann and as Dr. Nakamura in the musical Happy End (music by composer Kurt Weill), alongside Brecht's wife Helene Weigel and co-stars Carola Neher, Oskar Homolka and Kurt Gerron.The actor became much more widely known after director Fritz Lang cast him as a child killer in the film M (1931). In 1932 he appeared alongside Hans Albers in the science fiction film F.P.1 antwortet nicht about an artificial island in the mid-Atlantic.When the Nazis came to power in Germany in 1933, Lorre took refuge first in Paris and then London, where he was noticed by Ivor Montagu, Alfred Hitchcock's associate producer for The Man Who Knew Too Much (1934), who reminded the director about Lorre's performance in M.  They first considered him to play the assassin in the film, but wanted to use him in a larger role, despite his limited command of English,  which Lorre overcame by learning much of his part phonetically. He also was featured in Hitchcock's Secret Agent (1936).
Hollywood (1935-1964)Eventually, Lorre went to Hollywood, where he specialized in playing sinister foreigners, beginning with Mad Love (1935), directed by Karl Freund. He starred in a series of Mr. Moto movies, a parallel to the better known Charlie Chan series, in which he played John P. Marquand's seminal character, a Japanese detective and spy. He did not enjoy these films — and twisted his shoulder during a stunt in Mr. Moto Takes a Vacation — but they were lucrative for the studio and gained Lorre many new fans. In 1939, he was picked to play the role that would eventually go to Basil Rathbone in Son of Frankenstein; Lorre had to decline the part due to illness. In 1940, Lorre co-starred with fellow horror actors Bela Lugosi and Boris Karloff in the Kay Kyser movie  You'll Find Out.

Lorre enjoyed considerable popularity as a featured player in Warner Bros. suspense and adventure films. Lorre played the role of Joel Cairo in The Maltese Falcon (1941) and portrayed the character Ugarte in Casablanca (1942).  Lorre made nine movies altogether with Sydney Greenstreet counting The Maltese Falcon and Casablanca, most of them variations on the latter film, including Background to Danger (1943, with George Raft); Passage to Marseille (1944, reteaming them with Casablanca stars Humphrey Bogart and Claude Rains); The Mask of Dimitrios (1944, with character actor Greenstreet receiving top billing); The Conspirators (1944, with Hedy Lamarr and Paul Henreid); Hollywood Canteen (1944); Three Strangers (1946), a suspense film about three people who are joint partners on a winning lottery ticket starring top-billed Greenstreet, Geraldine Fitzgerald, and third-billed Lorre cast against type by director Jean Negulesco as the romantic lead; and Greenstreet and Lorre's final film together, suspense thriller The Verdict (1946), director Don Siegel's first movie, with Greenstreet and Lorre finally billed first and second, respectively.Lorre also branched out (without Greenstreet) into comedy with the role of Dr. Einstein in Arsenic and Old Lace, filmed by director Frank Capra in 1941, released in 1944, and starring Cary Grant and Raymond Massey. In 1941, Peter Lorre became a naturalized citizen of the United States.Writing in 1944, film critic Manny Farber described what he called Lorre's "double-take job," a characteristic dramatic flourish "where the actor's face changes rapidly from laughter, love or a security that he doesn't really feel to a face more sincerely menacing, fearful or deadpan." After World War II, Lorre's acting career in Hollywood experienced a downturn, whereupon he concentrated on radio and stage work. In Germany he co-wrote, directed and starred in Der Verlorene (The Lost One) (1951), a critically acclaimed art film in the film noir style. He then returned to the United States where he appeared as a character actor in television and feature films, often spoofing his 'creepy;' image.In 1954, he was the first actor to play a James Bond villain when he portrayed Le Chiffre in a television adaptation of Casino Royale, opposite Barry Nelson as an American James Bond. (In the spoof-film version of Casino Royale, British comedian Ronnie Corbett comments that SMERSH includes among its agents not only Le Chiffre, but also "Peter Lorre and Bela Lugosi".) Also in 1954, Lorre starred alongside Kirk Douglas and James Mason in 20,000 Leagues under the Sea.A famous story is told in Hollywood that in 1956, both Lorre and Vincent Price attended Bela Lugosi's funeral. According to Price, Lorre asked him "Do you think we should drive a stake through his heart just in case?"  However, according to Lugosi biographers Arthur Lennig and Gary Don Rhodes, neither actor attended Lugosi's funeral.  In 1959, Lorre appeared in NBC's espionage drama Five Fingers, starring David Hedison, in the episode "Thin Ice". In the early 1960s he worked with Roger Corman on several low-budgeted, tongue-in-cheek, and very popular films. He appeared in a supporting role in the 1961 film, Voyage to the Bottom of the Sea. In 1961, he was interviewed on the NBC program Here's Hollywood.
Marriages and familyHe was married three times: Celia Lovsky (1934 – 13 March 1945, divorced); Kaaren Verne (25 May 1945 – 1950, divorced) and Anne Marie Brenning (21 July 1953 – 23 March 1964, his death).  In 1953, Brenning bore his only child, Catharine. In later life, Catherine made headlines after serial killer Kenneth Bianchi confessed to police investigators after his arrest that he and his cousin and fellow "Hillside Strangler" Angelo Buono, disguised as police officers, had stopped her in 1977 with the intent of abducting and murdering her, but let her go upon learning that she was the daughter of Peter Lorre.  It was only after Bianchi was arrested that Catharine realised whom she had met.  Catharine died in 1985 of complications arising from diabetes. In 1963  actor Eugene Weingand, who was unrelated to Lorre, attempted to trade on his slight resemblance to the actor by changing his name to "Peter Lorie", but his petition was rejected by the courts.  After Lorre's death, however, he referred to himself as Lorre's son.  The incident was dramatized in Peter Lorre vs. Peter Lorre, a 45-minute radio play written/produced by Michael Button, directed by Toby Swift and broadcast on BBC Radio 4's Afternoon Play on 10 May 2010.  The cast starred Stephen Greif as Peter Lorre, Peter Marinker as Lester Salkow, Kerry Shale as Robert Shutan, John Chancer as Curtis Gemmil, Helen Longworth, Kenneth Collard, Nathan Osgood and John Rowe.
Health and death
Lorre had suffered for years from chronic gallbladder troubles, for which doctors had prescribed morphine. Lorre became trapped between the constant pain and addiction to morphine to ease the problem. It was during the period of the Moto films that Lorre struggled and overcame his addiction. Abruptly gaining a hundred pounds in a very short period and never fully recovering from his addiction to morphine, Lorre suffered many personal and career disappointments in his later years.  He died in 1964 of a stroke. Lorre's body was cremated and his ashes were interred at the Hollywood Forever Cemetery in Hollywood. Vincent Price read the eulogy at his funeral. 
Legacy and mimicry 
Lorre has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame, at 6619 Hollywood Boulevard.Lorre's distinctive accent and large-eyed face became a favorite target of comedians and cartoonists. In particular, several Warner Bros. cartoons used a caricature of Lorre's face with an impression by Mel Blanc, including Birth of a Notion, Hair-Raising Hare and Racketeer Rabbit. An additional impression is Howard Morris' voicing of the character Weirdly Gruesome in several episodes of "The Flintstones" dating from about 1964. 
Books and comicsIn the early 1940s, the adventures of Batman and Robin appeared in daily newspapers. One story, The Two-Bit Dictator of Twin Mills, drawn by Batman co-creator Bob Kane, featured a hitman called Jojo who was, according to writer Al Schwartz, made to look like Lorre. 
Films, television, and musicMusician and filker Tom Smith won a Pegasus award for Best Classic Filk Song in 2006 entitled "I Want to be Peter Lorre" which appears on his filk album "Homecoming: MarCon 2005", which includes his vocal impersonation of the actor. The Jazz Butcher's song "Peter Lorre" was first featured on the group's Conspiracy album, which was released in May 1986. The stop motion film Corpse Bride features "The Maggot", a small green worm who lives inside the title character's head. His features and voice (provided by Enn Reitel) are caricatures of Peter Lorre.
"From the very beginning Tim wanted the Maggot to be a Peter Lorre-esque character, and we had a good time working with that and it went through various design changes," said co-director Mike Johnson in the book Tim Burton's Corpse Bride: An Invitation to the Wedding.On September 11, 2007 Brooklyn-based punk band The World/Inferno Friendship Society released a full-length album about Lorre called Addicted to Bad Ideas: Peter Lorre's Twentieth Century, which traces Lorre's film career, drug addiction, and death. It has been performed at the Famous Spiegeltent.  The album was subsequently adapted into a multi-media stage production directed by Jay Scheib, which premiered at Webster Hall in New York City on January 9, 2009, and went on to play major arts festivals around the world, including Spoleto Festival USA (Charleston, SC), Luminato Festival (Toronto), Noorderzon Festival (Groningen, Holland) and Theaterformen (Hanover, Germany).
Filmography  

Die Verschwundene Frau (1929) (uncredited)
Der weiße Teufel (1930) aka The White Devil
Mann ist Mann (1931) aka A Man's a Man
M (1931)
Bomben auf Monte Carlo (1931) aka Bombs Over Monte Carlo 
Die Koffer des Herrn O.F. (1931)
Fünf von der Jazzband (1932)
Schuß im Morgengrauen (1932)
Der weiße Dämon (1932) aka Dope
Stupéfiants (1932)
F.P.1 antwortet nicht (1932)
Les Requins du pétrole (1933)
Du haut en bas (1933)
Was Frauen träumen (1933)
Unsichtbare Gegner (1933)
The Man Who Knew Too Much (1934)
Mad Love (1935)
Crime and Punishment (1935)
Secret Agent (1936)
Crack-Up (1936)
Nancy Steele Is Missing! (1937)
Think Fast, Mr. Moto (1937)
Lancer Spy (1937)
Thank You, Mr. Moto (1937)
Mr. Moto's Gamble (1938)
Mr. Moto Takes a Chance (1938)
I'll Give a Million (1938)
Mysterious Mr. Moto (1938)
Mr. Moto's Last Warning (1939)
 

Mr. Moto in Danger Island (1939)
Mr. Moto Takes a Vacation (1939)
Strange Cargo (1940)
I Was an Adventuress (1940)
Island of Doomed Men (1940)
Stranger on the Third Floor (1940)
You'll Find Out (1940)
Der Ewige Jude (1940) (archive footage) 
The Face Behind the Mask (1941)
Mr. District Attorney (1941)
They Met in Bombay (1941)
The Maltese Falcon (1941)
All Through the Night (1941)
Invisible Agent (1942)
The Boogie Man Will Get You (1942)
Casablanca (1942)
The Constant Nymph (1943)
Background to Danger (1943)
The Cross of Lorraine (1943)
Passage to Marseille (1944)
The Mask of Dimitrios (1944)
Arsenic and Old Lace (1944)
The Conspirators (1944)
Hollywood Canteen (1944)
Hotel Berlin (1945)
Confidential Agent (1945)
Three Strangers (1946)
Black Angel (1946)
The Chase (1946)
 

The Verdict (1946)
The Beast with Five Fingers (1946)
My Favorite Brunette (1947)
Casbah (1948)
Rope of Sand (1949)
Quicksand (1950)
Double Confession (1950)
Der Verlorene (1951) (also wrote and directed)
Beat the Devil (1953)
Casino Royale, a   episode of the television series Climax!
20,000 Leagues Under the Sea (1954)
Around the World in Eighty Days (1956)
Meet Me in Las Vegas (1956) (uncredited)
Congo Crossing (1956)
The Buster Keaton Story (1957)
Silk Stockings (1957)
The Story of Mankind (1957)
The Sad Sack (1957)
Hell Ship Mutiny (1957)
The Big Circus (1959)
Scent of Mystery (1960)
Voyage to the Bottom of the Sea (1961)
Tales of Terror (1962)
Five Weeks in a Balloon (1962)
The Raven (1963)
The Comedy of Terrors (1964)
Muscle Beach Party (1964)
The Patsy (1964)
 
See also 
References

Notes
 

Further reading
 
 
 


External links  

 
 
 
Watch Peter Lorre in Fritz Lang's M
The Lorre Library of Sound
The Peter Lorre Companion
Photographs of Peter Lorre
The Lodger on Mystery in the Air, 1947, starring Peter Lorre and Agnes Moorehead
Listen to Jack Benny Show 1941-03-09 (402) Guest Peter Lorre - Murder at the Racquet Club
Listen to Jack Benny Podcast 1946-03-24 (579) Guest Peter Lorre - I Stand Condemned
Mystery in the Air (1947)

 
DEFAULTSORT




















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Vanessa Redgrave
 
 
 
 
Vanessa Redgrave, CBE (born 30 January 1937) is an English actress of stage, screen and television, as well as a political activist.She rose to prominence in 1961 playing Rosalind in As You Like It with the Royal Shakespeare Company and has since made more than 35 appearances on London's West End and Broadway, winning both the Tony and Olivier Awards. On screen, she has starred in more than 80 films; including Mary, Queen of Scots, Isadora, Julia, The Bostonians,  Mission: Impossible and Atonement. Redgrave was proclaimed by Arthur Miller and Tennessee Williams as "the greatest living actress of our times," and she remains the only British actress ever to win the Oscar, Emmy, Tony, Cannes, Golden Globe, and the Screen Actors Guild awards. She was also the recipient of the 2010 BAFTA Fellowship "in recognition of an outstanding and exceptional contribution to film." A member of the Redgrave family of actors, she is the daughter of the late Sir Michael Redgrave and Lady Redgrave (the actress Rachel Kempson), the sister of the late Lynn Redgrave and the late Corin Redgrave, the mother of Hollywood actresses Joely Richardson and the late Natasha Richardson, and the aunt of British actress Jemma Redgrave.
Personal life and family 
Redgrave was born in Greenwich, London, the daughter of actors Sir Michael Redgrave and Rachel Kempson. Laurence Olivier announced her birth to the audience at a performance of Hamlet at the Old Vic, when he said that Laertes (played by Sir Michael) had a daughter. She was educated at the Alice Ottley School, Worcester & Queen's Gate School, London before "coming out" as a debutante. Her late siblings, Lynn Redgrave and Corin Redgrave, were also acclaimed actors.Redgrave's daughters, Natasha Richardson (1963–2009) and Joely Richardson (b. 1965) from her 1962–67 marriage to film director Tony Richardson, also built respected acting careers. Redgrave's son Carlo Gabriel Nero (né Carlo Sparanero), by Italian actor Franco Nero (né Francesco Sparanero), is a writer and film director. She met Franco while filming Camelot in 1967, the year she divorced her husband Tony Richardson, who left her for the French actress Jeanne Moreau. Redgrave and Nero married on 31 December 2006.  In 1967, Redgrave was made a Commander (CBE) of the Order of the British Empire. It was reported that she declined a damehood in 1999. From 1971 to 1986, she had a long-term relationship with actor Timothy Dalton, with whom she had starred in the film Mary, Queen of Scots. Within 14 months in 2009-10, she lost both a daughter and her two younger siblings. Her daughter Natasha Richardson died on 18 March 2009 from a traumatic brain injury caused by a skiing accident.   On 6 April 2010, her brother Corin Redgrave died, and on 2 May 2010, her sister Lynn Redgrave died.
Career
StageVanessa Redgrave entered the Central School of Speech and Drama in 1954. She first appeared in the West End, playing opposite her brother, in 1958.In 1959 she appeared at the Shakespeare Memorial Theatre under the direction of Peter Hall as Helena in A Midsummer's Night Dream opposite Charles Laughton as Bottom and Coriolanus opposite Laurence Olivier (in the title role), Albert Finney and Edith Evans.  In 1960, Redgrave had her first starring role in Robert Bolt's The Tiger and the Horse, in which she co-starred with her father. In 1962 she played Imogen in William Gaskill's production of Cymbeline for the Royal Shakespeare Company. In 1966 Redgrave created the role of Jean Brodie in the Donald Albery production of The Prime of Miss Jean Brodie, adapted for the stage by Jay Presson Allen from the novel by Muriel Spark. She won four Evening Standard Awards for Best Actress in four decades. She was awarded the Laurence Olivier Award for Actress of the Year in a Revival in 1984 for The Aspern PapersIn the 1990s, her theatre work included Prospero in The Tempest at Shakespeare's Globe in London. In 2003 she won a Tony Award for Best Actress in a Play for her performance in the Broadway revival of Eugene O'Neill's Long Day's Journey Into Night. In January 2006, Redgrave was presented the Ibsen Centennial Award for her "outstanding work in interpreting many of Henrik Ibsen's works over the last decades."  Previous recipients of the award include Liv Ullmann, Glenda Jackson and Claire Bloom.In 2007, Redgrave played Joan Didion in her Broadway stage adaptation of her 2005 book, The Year of Magical Thinking, which played 144 regular performances in a 24-week limited engagement at the Booth Theatre. For this, she won the Drama Desk Award for Outstanding One-Person Show and was nominated for the Tony Award for Best Performance by a Leading Actress in a Play. She reprised the role at the Lyttelton Theatre at the Royal National Theatre in London to mixed reviews. She also spent a week performing the work at the Theatre Royal in Bath in September 2008. She once again performed the role of Joan Didion for a special benefit at New York's Cathedral of Saint John the Divine on 26 October 2009. The performance was originally slated to debut on 27 April, but was pushed due to the death of Redgrave's daughter Natasha. The proceeds for the benefit were donated to the United Nations Children's Fund (UNICEF) and the United Nations Relief and Works Agency (UNRWA). Both charities work to provide help for the children of Gaza.In October 2010 she starred in the Broadway premiere of Driving Miss Daisy starring in the title role opposite James Earl Jones. The show premiered on 25 October 2010 at the John Golden Theatre in New York City to rave reviews.  The production was originally scheduled to run to 29 January 2011 but due to a successful response and high box office sales, was extended to 9 April 2011.  In May 2011, she was nominated for a Tony Award for Best Performance by a Leading Actress in a Play for the role of Daisy in Driving Miss Daisy.  The play transferred to the Wyndham's Theatre in London from 26 September to 17 December 2011. In a poll of "industry experts" and readers conducted by The Stage in 2010, Redgrave was ranked as the ninth greatest stage actor/actress of all time.  
Early film workHighlights of Redgrave's early film career include her first starring role in Morgan: A Suitable Case for Treatment (for which she earned an Oscar nomination, a Cannes award, a Golden Globe nomination and a BAFTA Film Award nomination); her portrayal of a cool London swinger in 1966's Blowup; her spirited portrayal of dancer Isadora Duncan in Isadora (for which she won a National Society of Film Critics' Award for Best Actress, a second Prize for the Best Female Performance at the Cannes Film Festival, along with a Golden Globe and Oscar nomination in 1969); and various portrayals of historical figures – ranging from Andromache in The Trojan Women, to Mary, Queen of Scots in the film of the same name. She also played the role of Guinevere in the film Camelot with Richard Harris and Franco Nero, and briefly as Sylvia Pankhurst in Oh! What a Lovely War.
Julia, The Palestinian and the Oscar controversyIn 1977, Redgrave funded and narrated a documentary film The Palestinian about Palestinians and the activities of the Palestinian Liberation Organisation. That same year she starred in the film Julia, about a woman murdered by the Nazi German regime in the years prior to World War II for her anti-Fascist activism. Her co-star in the film was Jane Fonda (playing writer Lillian Hellman), who, in her 2005 autobiography, noted that:
 When Redgrave was nominated for an Oscar in 1978, for her role in Julia, members of the Jewish Defense League (JDL), led by Rabbi Meir Kahane, burned effigies of Redgrave and picketed the Academy Awards ceremony to protest against both Redgrave and her support of the Palestinian cause. Redgrave's performance in Julia garnered an Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress. Accepting the award, Redgrave said: Later in the broadcast veteran screenwriter and Oscar presenter Paddy Chayefsky told the audience members that
 In 1978, Rabbi Meir Kahane published a book entitled Listen Vanessa, I am a Zionist, which was later renamed Listen World, Listen Jew, in direct response to Redgrave's comments at the Academy Awards. To this day some Jewish groups, such as the Jewish Defense League, consider Redgrave an opponent and a supporter of terrorism, citing remarks she has made such as, "Zionism is a brutal, racist ideology. And it is a brutal racist regime." 
Later film career
Later film roles of note include those of suffragist Olive Chancellor in The Bostonians (1984, a fourth Best Actress Academy Award nomination), transsexual tennis player Renée Richards in Second Serve (1986); Mrs. Wilcox in Howards End (1992, her sixth Academy Award nomination, this time in a supporting role); crime boss Max in Mission: Impossible (1996, when discussing the role of Max, DePalma and Cruise thought it would be fun to cast an actor like Redgrave; they then decided to go with the real thing); Oscar Wilde’s mother in Wilde (1997); Clarissa Dalloway in Mrs. Dalloway (1997); and Dr. Sonia Wick in Girl, Interrupted (1999). Many of these roles and others, garnered her various accolades.Her performance as a lesbian mourning the loss of her longtime partner in the HBO series If These Walls Could Talk 2 earned her a Golden Globe for “Best TV Series Supporting Actress” in 2000, as well as earning an Emmy Award for Outstanding Supporting Actress in a TV Film or Miniseries. This same performance also led to an “Excellence in Media Award” by the Gay & Lesbian Alliance Against Defamation (GLAAD). The award honours “a member of the entertainment community who has made a significant difference in promoting equal rights for lesbian, gay, bisexual and transgendered people”. In 2004, Redgrave joined the second season cast of the hit FX series Nip/Tuck, portraying Dr. Erica Noughton, the mother of Julia McNamara, who is played by her real-life daughter Joely Richardson. She also made appearances in the third and sixth seasons. In 2006, Redgrave starred opposite Peter O'Toole in the acclaimed film Venus. A year later, Redgrave starred in Evening and the acclaimed Atonement, in which she garnered a Broadcast Film Critics Association award nomination for her performance that only took up seven minutes of screen time. In 2008, Redgrave appeared as a narrator in an Arts Alliance production, id – Identity of the Soul. In 2009, Redgrave starred in the BBC remake of The Day of the Triffids, with her daughter Joely. In the midst of losing her daughter, Natasha Richardson, Redgrave signed on to play Eleanor of Aquitaine in Ridley Scott's version of Robin Hood, which began filming shortly after Natasha's death. Redgrave later withdrew from the film for personal reasons. The part was given to her Evening co-star Eileen Atkins.  She was next seen in Letters to Juliet opposite her husband Franco Nero.She had small roles in Eva, a Romanian drama film that premiered at the 2010 Cannes Film Festival as well as in Julian Schnabel's Palestinian drama, Miral that was screened at the 67th Venice International Film Festival and played the role of Winnie the Giant Tortoise in the 2010 environmental animated film Animals United. She has a supporting role in the Bosnia-set political drama, The Whistleblower, which premiered at the 2010 Toronto International Film Festival. Both Miral and The Whistleblower are scheduled for U.S. theatrical release in 2011. Redgrave also narrates Patrick Keiller's semi-fictional upcoming documentary, Robinson in Ruins.She has also filmed leading lady roles for two upcoming 2011 historical films. This includes, Ralph Fiennes' directorial debut of Shakespeare's Coriolanus in which Redgrave plays Volumnia; and Roland Emmerich's Anonymous in which Redgrave plays  .
Political activism
Redgrave and her brother Corin founded the Workers Revolutionary Party (UK) in the 1970s.  Vanessa ran for parliament several times as a party member but never received more than a few hundred votes. In 1980 Redgrave made her American TV debut as concentration camp survivor Fania Fénelon in the Arthur Miller-scripted TV movie Playing for Time, a part for which she won an Emmy as Outstanding Lead Actress in 1981. The decision to cast Redgrave as Fénelon was, however, a source of controversy. In light of Redgrave's support for the Palestine Liberation Organization (PLO),  even Fénelon objected to her casting. Redgrave was perplexed by such hostility, stating in her 1991 autobiography her long-held belief that "the struggle against anti-Semitism and for the self-determination of the Palestinians form a single whole." In 1984 Redgrave sued the Boston Symphony Orchestra, claiming that the orchestra had fired her from a performance due to her support of the PLO.  Lillian Hellman testified in court on Redgrave's behalf.    Redgrave won on a count of breach of contract, but did not win on the claim that the Boston orchestra had violated her civil rights by firing her. In 1995 Redgrave was elected to serve as a UNICEF Goodwill Ambassador.In December 2002 Redgrave paid £50,000 bail for Chechen separatist Deputy Premier and special envoy Akhmed Zakayev, who had sought political asylum in the United Kingdom and was accused by the Russian government of aiding and abetting hostage-takings in the Moscow Hostage Crisis of 2002 and guerrilla warfare against Russia.At a press conference Redgrave said she feared for Zakayev's safety if he were extradited to Russia on terrorism charges. He would "die of a heart attack" or some other mysterious explanation offered by Russia, she said.  On 13 November 2003, a London court rejected the Russian government's request for Zakayev's extradition. Instead, the court accepted a plea by lawyers for Zakayev that he would not get a fair trial, and could even face torture, in Russia. "It would be unjust and oppressive to return Mr Zakayev to Russia," Judge Timothy Workman ruled. In December 2003 it was revealed that Redgrave had declined the offer of being made a Dame from Tony Blair's New Labour government. In 2004 Vanessa Redgrave and her brother Corin Redgrave launched the Peace and Progress Party, which campaigned against the Iraq War and for human rights. However, in June 2005 Redgrave left the party.Redgrave has been an outspoken critic of the "war on terrorism".   During a June 2005 interview on Larry King Live, Redgrave was challenged on this criticism and on her political views. In response she questioned if there can be true democracy if the political leadership of the United States and Britain does not "uphold the values for which my father's generation fought the Nazis, [and] millions of people gave their lives against the Soviet Union's regime. [Such sacrifice was made] because of democracy and what democracy meant: no torture, no camps, no detention forever or without trial...[Such] techniques are not just alleged [against the governments of the U.S. and Britain], they have actually been written about by the FBI. I don't think it's being 'far left'...to uphold the rule of law." CNN Larry King Live interview with Vanessa Redgrave transcript, (Aired 18 June 2005), CNN.com. accessed 17 December 2006 In March 2006 Redgrave remarked in an interview with US broadcast journalist Amy Goodman: “I don't know of a single government that actually abides by international human rights law, not one, including my own. In fact, [they] violate these laws in the most despicable and obscene way, I would say.”Goodman’s interview with Redgrave took place in the actress’s West London home on the evening of 7 March, and covered a range of subjects, particularly the cancellation of the Alan Rickman production, My Name is Rachel Corrie, by the New York Theater Workshop. Such a development, said Redgrave, was an "act of catastrophic cowardice" as "the essence of life and the essence of theatre is to communicate about lives, either lives that have ended or lives that are still alive, [and about] beliefs, and what is in those beliefs." In June 2006 she was awarded a lifetime achievement award from the Transilvania International Film Festival, one of whose sponsors is a mining company named Gabriel Resources. She dedicated the award to a community organisation from Roşia Montană, Romania, which is campaigning against a gold mine that Gabriel Resources is seeking to build near the village. Gabriel Resources placed an "open letter" in The Guardian on 23 June 2006, attacking Redgrave, arguing the case for the mine, and exhibiting support for it among the inhabitants: the open letter is signed by 77 villagers. In December 2007 Redgrave was named as one of the possible suretors who paid the £50,000 bail for Jamil al-Banna, one of three British residents arrested after landing back in the UK following four years' captivity at Guantanamo Bay. Redgrave has declined to be specific about her financial involvement but said she was "very happy" to be of "some small assistance for Jamil and his wife", adding, "It is a profound honour and I am glad to be alive to be able to do this. Guantanamo Bay (Gitmo) is a concentration camp." 
Filmography

Year Title Role Notes 
1958 Behind the Mask Pamela Gray  
1966 Morgan: A Suitable Case for Treatment Leonie Delt Cannes Film Festival Best Actress Award Nominated – Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated – BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated – Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy 
A Man For All Seasons Anne Boleyn  
Blowup Unnamed  
1967 Camelot Guinevere   
1968   Mrs. Clarissa Morris  
  Nina  
Isadora Isadora Duncan Cannes Film Festival Best Actress Award National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actress Nominated – Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated – Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama 
1969 Oh! What a Lovely War Sylvia Pankhurst  
  Flavia  
1970 Dropout Mary  
     
1971 Mary, Queen of Scots Mary, Queen of Scots   
  Sister Jeanne  
Vacation Immacolata Meneghelli   
  Andromache  
1973   Katherine Mansfield Television film 
1974 Murder on the Orient Express Mary Debenham  
1975 Out of Season Ann  
1976   Lola Deveraux  
1977 Julia Julia   
1979 Agatha Agatha Christie  
Yanks Helen  
Bear Island Heddi Lindguist  
1981 Playing for Time Fania Fenelon Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actress – Miniseries or a Movie 
1982 My Body, My Child Leenie Cabrezi Television film 
1983 Sing Sing Queen  
Wagner Cosima Wagner Had a limited theatrical release; better known as a television mini-series; 2011 re-released as a feature film on DVD 
1984   Olive Chancellor   
1985 Wetherby Jean Travers National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actress 
Three Sovereigns for Sarah Sarah Cloyce  
Steaming Nancy  
1986 Comrades Mrs. Carlyle  
Peter the Great Sophia Nominated – Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Supporting Actress – Miniseries or a Movie 
Second Serve Richard Radley / Renee Richards   
1987 Prick Up Your Ears Peggy Ramsay   
1988 Consuming Passions Mrs. Garza  
  Lady Alice More Nominated – Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Miniseries or Television Film 
1990 Romeo.Juliet Mother Capulet  
Breath of Life Sister Crucifix   
Pokhorony Stalina English journalist  
Orpheus Descending Lady Torrance Television film 
1991   Miss Amelia  
Young Catherine Empress Elizabeth Nominated – Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Supporting Actress – Miniseries or a Movie 
What Ever Happened to Baby Jane? Blanche Hudson Television film 
1992 Howards End Ruth Wilcox Nominated – Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress Nominated – National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Supporting Actress 
1993   Kate Benson   
  Nivea del Valle  
Sparrow Sister Agata   
Great Moments in Aviation Dr. Angela Bead  
They Florence Latimer   
1994 Mother's Boys Lydia Madigan  
Little Odessa Irina Shapira Volpi Cup 
1995   Miss Bentley Nominated – Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy 
The Wind in the Willows Narrator Television Film 
1996 Mission: Impossible Max  
Two Mothers for Zachary Nancy Shaffell Television film 
1997 Smilla's Sense of Snow Elsa Lubing  
Wilde Lady Speranza Wilde  
Mrs. Dalloway Mrs. Clarissa Dalloway  
Déjà Vu Skelly  
Bella Mafia Graziella Luciano Nominated – Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Miniseries or Television Film 
1998 Deep Impact Robin Lerner  
Lulu on the Bridge Catherine Moore  
1999 Cradle Will Rock Countess Constance LaGrange  
Uninvited Mrs. Ruttenburn  
Girl, Interrupted Dr. Sonia Wick  
2000 If These Walls Could Talk 2 Edith Tress (segment "1961")   
Mirka Kalsan  
  Maddy Bennett  
2001   Annalise Hansen  
Jack and the Beanstalk: The Real Story Countess Wilhelmina/Narrator  
2002   Clementine Churchill Television film   
Crime and Punishment Rodian's Mother  
Searching for Debra Winger Herself Documentary 
  Esther Huish Television film 
2003 Byron Lady Melbourne Television film 
Good Boy!    
2004   Woman Also Executive Producer Nominated – Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Miniseries or Television Movie 
2004–2009 Nip/Tuck Dr. Erica Noughton Television series; 10 episodes 
2005      
Short Order Marianne  
  Vera Belinskya  
2006   Sister Antonia  
Venus Valerie Nominated – British Independent Film Award for Best Supporting Actress 
  Penelope Keeling Television film 
2007   Roberta Elliot  
How About You Georgia Platts  
Evening Ann Lord  
Atonement Older Briony Tallis   
2008 Restraint Sky News Reader  
Ein Job Hannah Silbergrau Television film 
Gud, lukt och henne   
2009 Eva Eva  
  Durrant Television miniseries 
2010 Letters to Juliet Claire Smith-Wyman   
  Madeleine Rees  
Miral Bertha Spafford  
Animals United Winnie Voice Only (English Version) 
2011 Coriolanus Volumnia   
Cars 2 Mama Topolino/Queen Voice Only 
Anonymous Queen Elizabeth I   
2012 Song for Marion Marion  
Political Animals Justice Diane Nash TV miniseries, 1 episode 

References 
External links
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
Vanessa Redgrave: Actress and Campaigner
"She's Got Issues" – The Observer, 19 March 2006

  
DEFAULTSORT
























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Friedrich Schiller
 
 
 Johann Christoph Friedrich von Schiller   (10 November 1759 9 May 1805) was a German poet, philosopher, historian, and playwright. During the last seventeen years of his life (1788–1805), Schiller struck up a productive, if complicated, friendship with already famous and influential Johann Wolfgang von Goethe. They frequently discussed issues concerning aesthetics, and Schiller encouraged Goethe to finish works he left as sketches. This relationship and these discussions led to a period now referred to as Weimar Classicism. They also worked together on Xenien, a collection of short satirical poems in which both Schiller and Goethe challenge opponents to their philosophical vision.
Early life and careerFriedrich Schiller was born on 10 November 1759, in Marbach, Württemberg as the only son of military doctor Johann Kaspar (later on von) Schiller (1733–96), and Elisabeth Dorothea Kodweiß (1732–1802). They also had five daughters. His father was away in the Seven Years' War when Friedrich was born. He was named after king Frederick the Great, but he was called Fritz by nearly everyone.  Kaspar Schiller was rarely home during the war, but he did manage to visit the family once in a while. His wife and children also visited him occasionally wherever he happened to be stationed.  When the war ended in 1763, Schiller's father became a recruiting officer and was stationed in Schwäbisch Gmünd. The family moved with him. Due to the high cost of living—especially the rent—the family moved to nearby Lorch. Although the family was happy in Lorch, Schiller's father found his work unsatisfying. He sometimes took his son with him.  In Lorch, Schiller received his primary education. The quality of the lessons was fairly bad, and Friedrich regularly cut class with his older sister.  Because his parents wanted Schiller to become a pastor, they had the pastor of the village instruct the boy in Latin and Greek. Pastor Moser was a good teacher, and later Schiller named the cleric in his first play Die Räuber (The Robbers) after him. As a boy, Schiller was excited by the idea of becoming a cleric and often put on black robes and pretended to preach. In 1766, the family left Lorch for the Duke of Württemberg's principal residence, Ludwigsburg. Schiller's father had not been paid for three years, and the family had been living on their savings but could no longer afford to do so. So Kaspar Schiller took an assignment to the garrison in Ludwigsburg. There the Schiller boy came to the attention of Karl Eugen, Duke of Württemberg. He entered the Karlsschule Stuttgart (an elite military academy founded by the Duke), in 1773, where he eventually studied medicine. During most of his short life, he suffered from illnesses that he tried to cure himself.While at the Karlsschule, Schiller read Rousseau and Goethe and discussed Classical ideals with his classmates. At school, he wrote his first play, The Robbers, which dramatizes the conflict between two aristocratic brothers: the elder, Karl Moor, leads a group of rebellious students into the Bohemian forest where they become Robin Hood-like bandits, while Franz Moor, the younger brother, schemes to inherit his father's considerable estate. The play's critique of social corruption and its affirmation of proto-revolutionary republican ideals astounded its original audience. Schiller became an overnight sensation. Later, Schiller would be made an honorary member of the French Republic because of this play.In 1780, he obtained a post as regimental doctor in Stuttgart, a job he disliked. In order to attend the first performance of The Robbers in Mannheim, Schiller left his regiment without permission. As a result, he was arrested, sentenced to 14 days of imprisonment, and forbidden by Karl Eugen from publishing any further works. He fled Stuttgart in 1782, going via Frankfurt, Mannheim, Leipzig, and Dresden to Weimar, where he settled in 1787. In 1789, he was appointed professor of History and Philosophy in Jena, where he wrote only historical works.
Marriage and familyOn 22 February 1790, Schiller married Charlotte von Lengefeld (1766–1826). Two sons (Karl Friedrich Ludwig and Ernst Friedrich Wilhelm) and two daughters (Karoline Luise Henriette and Luise Henriette Emilie) were born between 1793 and 1804. The last living descendant of Schiller was a grandchild of Emilie, Baron Alexander von Gleichen-Rußwurm, who died at Baden-Baden, Germany, in 1947. 
Weimar and later careerSchiller returned with his family to Weimar from Jena in 1799. Goethe convinced him to return to playwriting. He and Goethe founded the Weimar Theater, which became the leading theater in Germany. Their collaboration helped lead to a renaissance of drama in Germany.For his achievements, Schiller was ennobled in 1802 by the Duke of Weimar, adding the nobiliary particle "von" to his name. He remained in Weimar, Saxe-Weimar until his death at 45 from tuberculosis.
Legacy and honors

The first significant biography of Schiller was by his sister-in-law Caroline von Wolzogen in 1830.The coffin containing Schiller's skeleton is in the Weimarer Fürstengruft (Weimar's Ducal Vault), the burial place of Houses of Grand Dukes (großherzogliches Haus) of Saxe-Weimar-Eisenach in the Historical Cemetery of Weimar. On 3 May 2008, scientists announced that DNA tests have shown that the skull of this skeleton is not Schiller's, and his tomb is now vacant.  The physical resemblance between this skull and the extant death mask  as well as to portraits of Schiller, had led many experts to believe that the skull was Schiller's.The city of Stuttgart has named a square Schillerplatz and erected a statute in his memory on that square in 1839.In September 2008, Schiller was voted by the audience of the TV channel Arte as the second most important playwright in Europe after William Shakespeare.Schiller has become an inextricable part of pop culture at the American undergraduate college, Carleton College, in Northfield, Minnesota. Several secret student groups on campus own busts of Schiller, which they show at popular campus events. Other students are set on stealing these busts from the secret societies.  The Carleton's beloved "DVD Fest" has, in past years, been renamed "The Golden Schillers.  The college has also named its student dollars "Schillers",  and the "Schiller Society" is part of the admissions office. 
FreemasonrySome Freemasons speculate that Schiller was a Freemason, but this has not been proven. In 1787, in his tenth letter about Don Carlos, Schiller wrote:

"I am neither Illuminati nor Mason, but if the fraternization has a moral purpose in common with one another, and if this purpose for human society is the most important, ..." Eugen Lennhoff, Oskar Posner, Dieter A. Binder: Internationales Freimaurer Lexikon. Herbig publishing, 2006, ISBN 978-3-7766-2478-6 

In a letter from 1829, two Freemasons from Rudolstadt complain about the dissolving of their Lodge Günther zum stehenden Löwen that was honoured by the initiation of Schiller. According to Schiller's great-grandson Alexander von Gleichen-Rußwurm, Schiller was brought to the Lodge by Wilhelm Heinrich Karl von Gleichen-Rußwurm. No membership document has been found. 
Writing
Philosophical papers
Schiller wrote many philosophical papers on ethics and aesthetics. He synthesized the thought of Immanuel Kant with the thought of Karl Leonhard Reinhold. He elaborated Christoph Martin Wieland's concept of the Schöne Seele (beautiful soul), a human being whose emotions have been educated by reason, so that Pflicht und Neigung (duty and inclination) are no longer in conflict with one another; thus beauty, for Schiller, is not merely an aesthetic experience, but a moral one as well: the Good is the Beautiful. His philosophical work was also particularly concerned with the question of human freedom, a preoccupation which also guided his historical researches, such as the Thirty Years' War and the Dutch Revolt, and then found its way as well into his dramas (the Wallenstein trilogy concerns the Thirty Years' War, while Don Carlos addresses the revolt of the Netherlands against Spain.) Schiller wrote two important essays on the question of the sublime (das Erhabene), entitled "Vom Erhabenen" and "Über das Erhabene"; these essays address one aspect of human freedom—the ability to defy one's animal instincts, such as the drive for self-preservation, when, for example, someone willingly sacrifices themselves for conceptual ideals.
DramasSchiller is considered by most Germans to be Germany's most important classical playwright. Critics like F.J. Lamport and Eric Auerbach have noted his innovative use of dramatic structure and his creation of new forms, such as the melodrama and the bourgeois tragedy. What follows is a brief, chronological description of the plays.

The Robbers (Die Räuber): The language of The Robbers is highly emotional, and the depiction of physical violence in the play marks it as a quintessential work of Germany's Romantic 'Storm and Stress' movement. The Robbers is considered by critics like Peter Brooks to be the first European melodrama. The play pits two brothers against each other in alternating scenes, as one quests for money and power, while the other attempts to create revolutionary anarchy in the Bohemian Forest. The play strongly criticises the hypocrisies of class and religion, and the economic inequities of German society; it also conducts a complicated inquiry into the nature of evil. Schiller was inspired by the play Julius von Tarent by Johann Anton Leisewitz. 
Fiesco (Die Verschwörung des Fiesco zu Genua):
Intrigue and Love (Kabale und Liebe): The aristocratic Ferdinand von Walter wishes to marry Luise Miller, the bourgeois daughter of the city's music instructor. Court politics involving the duke's beautiful but conniving mistress Lady Milford and Ferdinand's ruthless father create a disastrous situation reminiscent of Shakespeare's Romeo and Juliet. Schiller develops his criticisms of absolutism and bourgeois hypocrisy in this bourgeois tragedy. Act 2, scene 2 is an anti-British parody that depicts a firing-squad massacre. Young Germans who refused to join the Hessians and British to quash the American Revolutionary War are fired upon. The Autobiography of Col. John Trumbull, Sizer 1953 ed., p. 184, n. 13)  Giuseppe Verdi's opera Luisa Miller is based on this play.
Don Carlos: This play marks Schiller's entrée into historical drama. Very loosely based on the events surrounding the real Don Carlos of Spain, Schiller's Don Carlos is another republican figure—he attempts to free Flanders from the despotic grip of his father, King Phillip. The Marquis Posa's famous speech to the king proclaims Schiller's belief in personal freedom and democracy.
The Wallenstein Trilogy: These plays follow the fortunes of the treacherous commander Albrecht von Wallenstein during the Thirty Years' War.
Mary Stuart (Maria Stuart): This "revisionist"   history of the Scottish queen, who was Elizabeth I's rival, portrays Mary Stuart as a tragic heroine, misunderstood and used by ruthless politicians, including and especially, Elizabeth.
The Maid of Orleans (Die Jungfrau von Orleans): about Joan of Arc
The Bride of Messina (Die Braut von Messina)
William Tell (Wilhelm Tell)
Demetrius (unfinished)


Aesthetic Letters
A pivotal work by Schiller was On the Aesthetic Education of Man in a Series of Letters (Über die ästhetische Erziehung des Menschen in einer Reihe von Briefen), first published 1794, which was inspired by the great disenchantment Schiller felt about the French Revolution, its degeneration into violence and the failure of successive governments to put its ideals into practice.  Schiller wrote that "a great moment has found a little people"; he wrote the Letters as a philosophical inquiry into what had gone wrong, and how to prevent such tragedies in the future. In the Letters he asserts that it is possible to elevate the moral character of a people, by first touching their souls with beauty, an idea that is also found in his poem Die Künstler (The Artists): "Only through Beauty's morning-gate, dost thou penetrate the land of knowledge."On the philosophical side, Letters put forth the notion of der sinnliche Trieb / Sinnestrieb ("the sensuous drive") and Formtrieb ("the formal drive"). In a comment to Immanuel Kant's philosophy, Schiller transcends the dualism between Formtrieb and Sinnestrieb with the notion of Spieltrieb ("the play drive"), derived from, as are a number of other terms, Kant's Critique of the Faculty of Judgment. The conflict between man's material, sensuous nature and his capacity for reason (Formtrieb being the drive to impose conceptual and moral order on the world), Schiller resolves with the happy union of Formtrieb and Sinnestrieb, the "play drive," which for him is synonymous with artistic beauty, or "living form." On the basis of Spieltrieb, Schiller sketches in Letters a future ideal state (a eutopia), where everyone will be content, and everything will be beautiful, thanks to the free play of Spieltrieb. Schiller's focus on the dialectical interplay between Formtrieb and Sinnestrieb has inspired a wide range of succeeding aesthetic philosophical theory, including notably Jacques Rancière's conception of the "aesthetic regime of art," as well as social philosophy in Herbert Marcuse, in the second part of his important work Eros and Civilization, where he finds Schiller's notion of Spieltrieb useful in thinking a social situation without the condition of modern social alienation. He writes, "Schiller's Letters ... aim at remaking of civilization by virtue of the liberating force of the aesthetic function: it is envisaged as containing the possibility of a new reality principle." 
WorksPlays

Die Räuber (The Robbers), 1781
Fiesco (Die Verschwörung des Fiesco zu Genua), 1783
Kabale und Liebe (Intrigue and Love),  1784
Don Karlos, Infant von Spanien (Don Carlos),  1787
Wallenstein,  1800
Maria Stuart (Mary Stuart), 1800
Die Jungfrau von Orleans (The Maid of Orleans), 1801
Die Braut von Messina (The Bride of Messina), 1803
Wilhelm Tell (William Tell), 1804
Demetrius (unfinished at his death)

Histories

Geschichte des Abfalls der vereinigten Niederlande von der spanischen Regierung or The Revolt of the Netherlands
Geschichte des dreißigjährigen Kriegs or A History of the Thirty Years' War
Über Völkerwanderung, Kreuzzüge und Mittelalter or On the Barbarian Invasions, Crusaders and Middle Ages

Translations

Euripides, Iphigenia in Aulis
William Shakespeare, Macbeth
Jean Racine, Phèdre
Carlo Gozzi, Turandot, 1801

Prose

Der Geisterseher or The Ghost-Seer (unfinished novel) (started in 1786 and published periodically. Published as book in 1789)
Über die ästhetische Erziehung des Menschen in einer Reihe von Briefen (On the Aesthetic Education of Man in a series of Letters), 1794
Der Verbrecher aus verlorener Ehre (Dishonoured Irreclaimable), 1786

Poems

An die Freude (Ode to Joy)  (1785) became the basis for the fourth movement of Beethoven's ninth symphony
Der Taucher (The Diver)
Die Kraniche des Ibykus (The Cranes of Ibykus)
Der Ring des Polykrates (Polycrates' Ring)
Die Bürgschaft (The Hostage; set to music by Schubert)
Das Lied von der Glocke (Song of the Bell)
Das verschleierte Bild zu Sais (The Veiled Statue At Sais)
Der Handschuh (The Glove)
Nänie (set to music by Brahms)


Quotations

"Stay true to the dreams of thy youth." (Elizabeth, in: Don Carlos)
"Mit der Dummheit kämpfen Götter selbst vergebens," which means "Against stupidity the gods themselves contend in vain." (Talbot, in: The Maid of Orleans)
"Deeper meaning resides in the fairy tales told to me in my childhood than in any truth that is taught in life."
"Eine Grenze hat die Tyrannenmacht", which literally means "A tyrant's power has a limit" (a Swiss freedom fighter, in: Wilhelm Tell)
"The voice of the majority is no proof of justice." (Talbot, in: Maria Stuart)
"It is not flesh and blood but the heart which makes us fathers and sons."
"Live with your century but do not be its creature." (From On the Aesthetic Education of Man)


Musical settingsLudwig van Beethoven said that a great poem is more difficult to set to music than a merely good one because the composer must rise higher than the poet – "who can do that in the case of Schiller? In this respect Goethe is much easier," wrote Beethoven. There are relatively few famous musical settings of Schiller's poems. Two notable exceptions are Beethoven's setting of "An die Freude" (Ode to Joy)  in the final movement of his Ninth Symphony, and Johannes Brahms' choral setting of "Nänie". In addition, several poems were set by Franz Schubert as Lieder, such as "Die Bürgschaft", mostly for voice and piano. In 2005 Graham Waterhouse set Der Handschuh (The Glove) for cello and speaking voice.The Italian composer Giuseppe Verdi admired Schiller greatly and adapted several of his stage plays for his operas: I masnadieri is based on The Robbers; Giovanna d'Arco on The Maid of Orleans; Luisa Miller on Intrigue and Love; and Don Carlos on the play of the same title. Donizetti's Maria Stuarda is based on Mary Stuart, and Rossini's Guillaume Tell is an adaptation of William Tell. Nicola Vaccai Giovanna d'Arco (1827) is based on The Maid of Orleans and his La sposa di Messina (1839) on The Bride of Messina. Tchaikovsky's 1881 opera The Maid of Orleans is partly based on Schiller's work. The 20th century composer Giselher Klebe adapted The Robbers for his first opera of the same name, which premiered in 1957.
Schiller's burialA poem written about the poet's burial:

Two dim and paltry torches that the raging storm
And rain at any moment threaten to put out.
A waving pall. A vulgar coffin made of pine
With not a wreath, not e'en the poorest, and no train –
As if a crime were swiftly carried to the grave!
The bearers hastened onward. One unknown alone,
Round whom a mantle waved of wide and noble fold,
Followed this coffin. 'Twas the Spirit of Mankind.




– Conrad Ferdinand Meyer 


Notes and citations
 
Bibliography

 
Engel, Manfred: "Schiller und wir – Ferne aus großer Nähe". Oxford German Studies 37 (2008) 1: 37–49
Schiller's complete works are published in the following excellent editions:

Historical-critical edition by K. Goedeke (17 volumes, Stuttgart, 1867–76)
Säkular-Ausgabe edition by Von der Hellen (16 volumes, Stuttgart, 1904–05)
historical-critical edition by Günther and Witkowski (20 volumes, Leipzig, 1909–10).
Other valuable editions are:

the Hempel edition (1868–74)
the Boxberger edition, in Kürschners National-Literatur (12 volumes, Berlin, 1882–91)
the edition by Kutscher and Zisseler (15 parts, Berlin, 1908)
the Horenausgabe (16 volumes, Munich, 1910, et. seq.)
the edition of the Tempel Klassiker (13 volumes, Leipzig, 1910–11)
Helios Klassiker (6 volumes, Leipzig, 1911).
Documents and other memorials of Schiller are in the Goethe- und Schiller-Archiv in Weimar.
See also 

Musen-Almanach


External links 
 
 
 

 
 
Friedrich Schiller Chronology
2005 is Schiller year: all dates
Letters upon the Education of Man
Letters Upon The Aesthetic Education of Man in PDF Format at filepedia.org
Schiller Monument in Schiller Park, German Village, Columbus, Ohio, USA
Schiller multimedial combines a biographical observation by Norbert Œllers with classic recordings and video clips
Mobile Schiller Mobile Java application containing 20 poems of Schiller
Say it loud – it's Schiller and it's proud What relevance does Schiller have today? By George Steiner at signandsight.com
Friedrich-Schiller University of Jena
 

 
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT





















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Jean Anouilh
  
 Jean Marie Lucien Pierre Anouilh ( ;  23 June 1910 – 3 October 1987)  was a French dramatist whose career spanned five decades. Though his work ranged from high drama to absurdist farce, Anouilh is best known for his 1943 play Antigone, an adaptation of Sophocles' classical drama, that was seen as an attack on Marshal Pétain's Vichy government. One of France's most prolific writers after World War II, much of Anouilh's work deals with themes of maintaining integrity in a world of moral compromise. 
Life and career

Early lifeAnouilh was born in Cérisole, a small village on the outskirts of Bordeaux, and had Basque ancestry. His father, François Anouilh, was a tailor and Anouilh maintained that he inherited from him a pride in conscientious craftmanship. He may owe his artistic bent to his mother, Marie-Magdeleine, a violinist who supplemented the family's meager income by playing summer seasons in the casino orchestra in the nearby seaside resort of Arcachon. Marie-Magdeleine worked the night shifts in the music-hall orchestras and sometimes accompanied stage presentations, affording Anouilh ample opportunity to absorb the dramatic performances from backstage. He often attended rehearsals and solicited the resident authors to let him read scripts until bedtime. He first tried his hand at playwriting here, at the age of 12, though his earliest works do not survive. The family moved in to Paris in 1918 where the young Anouilh where he received his secondary education at the Lycée Chaptal. Jean-Louis Barrault, later a major French director, was a pupil there at the same time and recalls Anouilh as an intense, rather dandified figure who hardly noticed a boy some two years younger than himself. He earned acceptance into the law school at the Sorbonne but, unable to support himself financially, he left after just 18 months to seek work as a copywriter at Publicité Damour. He liked the work and spoke more than once with wry approval of the lessons in the classical virtues of brevity and precision of language he learned while drafting advertising copy. Anouilh's financial troubles continued after he was called up to military service in 1929.  Supported by only his meager conscription salary Anouilh married the actress Monelle Valentin in 1931. Though she would go on to star in many of his plays, Anouilh's daughter Caroline (from his second marriage), claims that the marriage was not a happy one. Anouilh's youngest daughter Colombe even claims that there has never been an official marriage between Anouilh and Valentin. She allegedly had multiple extra-marital affairs, which caused Anouilh much pain and suffering.  The infidelity weighed heavily on the dramatist as a result of the uncertainty about his own parentage. According to Caroline, Anouilh had learned his mother had had a lover at the theatre in Arcachon who was actually his biological father. In spite of this, Anouilh and Valentin had a daughter, Catherine, in 1934 who would follow the pair into theatre work at an early age. Anouilh's growing family placed further strain on his already limited finances. Determined to break into writing full-time, he began to write comic scenes for the cinema to supplement their income. 
Theatre workAt the age of 25, Anouilh found work as a secretary to the French actor and director Louis Jouvet at the Comédie des Champs-Elysées. Though Anouilh's boss had happily lent him some of the set furniture left over from the production of Jean Giraudoux's  play Siegfried to furnish his modest home, the director was not interested in encouraging his assistant's attempts at playwriting.  Jouvet had risen to fame in the early 1930s through his collaborations with the playwright Giraudoux, and together the two worked to shift focus from the authorial voice of the director, (which had dominated the French stage since the early twentieth century) back to the playwright and his text.Giraudoux was an inspiration to Anouilh and, with the encouragement of the acclaimed playwright, he began writing again in 1929. Before the end of the year he made his theatrical debut with Humulus le muet, a collaborative project with Jean Aurenche. It was followed by his first solo projects, L’Hermine (The Ermine) in 1932 and Mandarine in 1933, both produced by Aurélien Lugné-Poe, an innovative actor and stage manager who was then head of the Théâtre de l'Œuvre.  Ruled by the philosophy, "the word creates the decor," Lugné-Poe let Anouilh's lyrical prose shine in front of a backdrop of simple compositions of line and color that created a unity of style and mood. The plays were not great successes, closing after 37 and 13 performances respectively, but Anouilh persevered. following it up with a string of productions, most notably Y'avait un prisonnier (1935). These works, most in collaboration with the experimental Russian director Georges Pitoëff, were considered promising despite their lack of commercial profits, and the duo continued to work together until they had their first major success in 1937 with Le voyageur sans bagage (Traveller Without Baggage). In subsequent years, there was rarely a season in Paris that did not prominently feature a new Anouilh play and many of these were also being exported to England and America.  After 1938, however, much of Anouilh's later work was directed by the prominent Paris scenic designer André Barsacq, who had taken over as director of the Théâtre de l'Atelier after Charles Dullin's retirement in 1940.  Barsacq was a champion for Anouilh and their affiliation was a major factor in the playwright's continued success after the war. 
PlaywrightIn the 1940s, Anouilh turned from contemporary tales to more mythical, classic, and historic subjects.  With protagonists who asserted their independence from the fated past, themes during this period are more closely related to the existential concerns of such writers as Jean-Paul Sartre and Albert Camus. The most famous play of this group is Antigone, which "established Anouilh as a leading dramatist, not only because of the power with which he drew the classic confrontation between the uncompromising Antigone and the politically expedient Creon, but because French theatre-goers under the occupation read the play as a contemporary political parable."  His post-war plays dealt with similar concerns and included Roméo et Jeannette, Médée (Medea), and Anouilh's Joan of Arc story L'Alouette (The Lark), which, in its distinct optimism, rivalled the commercial success of Antigone.Anouilh himself grouped his plays of this period on the basis of their dominant tone, publishing his later works in collected volumes to reflect what he felt "represented the phases of his evolution and loosely resembled the distinction between comedy and tragedy."  Pièces noires or "Black plays" were tragedies or realistic dramas and included Antigone, Jézabel, and La Sauvage (The Restless Heart).  This category typically featured "young,  idealistic, and uncompromising protagonists [who] are able to maintain their integrity only by choosing death."   By contrast, in Anouilh's pièces roses or " pink plays" were comedies where fantasy dominated with an atmosphere similar to that of fairy tales. In these plays such as Le Bal des voleurs (Carnival of Thieves), Le Rendez-vous de Senlis (Dinner with the Family) and Léocadia (Time Remembered), the focus is on "the burden of the environment and especially of the past on a protagonist seeking a happier, freer existence." Most of Anouilh's plays of the late 1940s and into the 1950s become darker and distinctly cruel and, in contrast with his earlier works, begin to feature middle-aged characters who must view life more practically than Anouilh's former idealistic youths. The playwright divided the works of this period into pièces brillantes ("brilliant plays") and pièces grinçantes ("grating plays"). The first group includes works such as L'Invitation au château (Ring Round the Moon) and Colombe, and are typified by aristocratic settings and witty banter. The grating plays like La Valse des toréadors (Waltz of the Toreadors) and Le Réactionnaire amoureux (The Fighting Cock) are more bitterly funny, trading clever word play for a darker tone of disillusionment.Another category Anouilh specifies are his pièces costumées ("costume plays") which include The Lark, La Foire d'Empoigne (Catch as Catch Can), and Becket, an international success, depicting the historical martyr Thomas à Becket, the Archbishop of Canterbury who sought to defend the church against the monarch (and his friend), Henry II of England, who had appointed him to his see. So classified because they share historical "costumed" settings, Anouilh also specifies that these plays must also prominently feature an enlightened protagonist seeking "a moral path in a world of corruption and manipulation." Anouilh's final period begins with La Grotte (The Cavern), in which he comments on his own progress as a writer and a theatre artist. The central character is a playwright suffering from writers' block who in his frustration recalls the foibles of Luigi Pirandello's Six Characters in Search of an Author. Anouilh's work had always contained hints of metatheatricality, or commentatry on the business of theatre within the world of the play, but in his late works these structures became more fully developed as he begins to write primarily about character who are dramatists or theatre directors. There is also a pronounced link, during this time, of Anouilh's emphasis of theatre and the family, displaying intimate relationships that are "more profound and more important than the traditional heightened action of 'theatre'". Antoine, the playwright-protagonist of Cher Antoine; ou, L'Amour raté (Dear Antoine; or, The Love That Failed), asserts that the world must take notice of these pièces secrètes (secret dramas) and Anouilh scholars have proposed this name, "pièces secrètes," to classify the collected works of his latest period." 
Political controversy
Anouilh remained staunchly apolitical for most of his life and career. He served in the military during at least two periods, having been drafted into the French Army in 1931 and 1939. He was a prisoner of war for a short time when the Germans conquered France and willingly lived and worked in Paris during the German occupation of France during World War II. Because he refused to take sides during France's collaboration with the Axis Alliance some critics have branded him as a potential Nazi sympathiser.  This controversy escalated as a result of Anouilh's public clashes with leader of the Free French Forces (and later President of the Fifth Republic), General Charles de Gaulle.  In the 1940s Anouilh and several other intellectuals signed a petition for clemency to save the writer Robert Brasillach, who was condemned to death for being a Nazi collaborator. Brasillach was executed by firing squad in February, 1945, despite the outcry from Anouilh and his peers that the new government had no right to persecute individuals for "intellectual crimes" in the absence of military or political action.  Nevertheless, Anouilh refused to comment on his political views, writing in a letter to the Belgian critic Hubert Gignoux in 1946, "I do not have a biography and I am very happy about it. The rest of my life, as long as God wills it, will remain my personal business, and I will withhold the details of it." 
Anouilh's plays provides the most important clues about his political point of view, though their reputation for ambiguity further complicates the matter. For instance, Antigone, provides an allegorical representation of the debate between the idealistic members of the French Resistance and the pragmatism of the collaborationists. Though many have read the play as having a strong anti-Nazi sentiment, the fact that the Vichy Regime allowed the piece to be performed without censure testifies to the fact that it was potentially seen as supportive of the occupation in its time.    Though the playwright romanticizes Antigone's sense of honor and duty to what is morally right, in this case resisting the Nazi forces, it can also be said that Anouilh, like Sophocles before him, makes a convincing argument for Creon’s method of leadership. 
Awards and recognitionIn 1970 his work was recognized with the Prix mondial Cino Del Duca.
Critical discussionBy the end of his career, Anouilh's reputation would outstrip all his contemporaries. Interestingly, though, his repertoire remained unusually confined to theatre and film. Most French dramatists of the 1930s and 1940s, including Anouilh's most significant contemporary influence, Giraudoux, not only wrote for the stage but also composed poetry, novels, or essays.  Nevertheless, he remained prolific, consistently producing and publishing performance works for more than fifty years.Anouilh's early works were "naturalistic studies of a sordid and corrupt world."  Many of these plays present the reader with the striking and inescapable dichotomy between pragmatism and a sort of transcendent idealism.  There is little to no "middle ground of ambiguity" that exists where this conflict asserts itself.  This is evidenced in Le Voyageur Sans Bagage. The main character Gaston, a World War I veteran who suffers from amnesia, cannot remember the moral depravity of his youth (he slept with his brother's wife and severely injured his best friend). This checkered past is invariably at odds with the near-angelic behavior that he now exhibits, and recognition of this truth forces him to leave his former identity behind, unable to reconcile the two sides of himself. In denouncing his past, Gaston reclasses his freedom as an illusion, but one of his own making. He befriends a young English boy and shows him his identifying scar; this gesture allows the boy to descripe Gaston to the authorities, thereby claiming him as kin. With a new life and a new family, Gaston has a fresh start.   David I. Grossvogel, describes this situation as the "restoration of a childhood paradise lost," attributing Le Voyageur Sans Bagage as the beginning of Anouilh's search to justify his the unhappiness of his youth.  Theatre historian Marvin Carlson agrees, noting that this play epitomizes the "complex tonality and deft dramatic technique" that remained throughout his work, though, he asserts, it was only as the playwright matured that his "dark view of the human condition [reached] its final expression." Anouilh disagreed with these somber readings of his best works, however, arguing that, like all great French literature, his plays had found ways to laugh at misfortune. "Thanks to Molière," Anouilh said, "the true French theatre is the only one that is not gloomy, in which we laugh like men at war with out misery and our horror. This humor is one of France's messages to the world." Disclosing his thoughts on French theatre and his personal perspective as a playwright, he said that the perception of his work was often misguided: In the 1950s, Anouilh examined his antagonism with General de Gaulle in L'Hurluberlu, ou Le Reactionnaire amoureux (1958) and La Songe du critique (1960). He began to lose the favor of audiences and critics alike, however, with the emergence of such playwrights as Eugène Ionesco and Samuel Beckett. Though he shared with these authors a "similar desperate vision of human existence,"  these new absurdist theatres' pursuit of alternative dramaturgies made Anouilh's semi-realistic plays seem dull and old-fashioned. In the 1980s Anouilh reinvented himself as a director, staging his own plays as well as those of other authors. He died of a heart attack in Lausanne, Switzerland on October 3, 1987. Divorced from Monelle Valentin, he was survived by his second wife, Nicole Lançon, and four children.
Works

Theatre productions
L'Hermine, Paris, Théâtre de l'OEuvre, 26 April 1932.
Y'avait un prisonnier, Paris, Théâtre des Ambassadeurs, 21 March 1935.
Le Voyageur sans bagage, Paris, Théâtre des Mathurins, 16 February 1937.
La Sauvage, Paris, Théâtre des Mathurins, 10 January 1938.
Le Bal de voleurs, Paris, Théâtre des Arts, 17 September 1938.
Léocadia, Paris, Théâtre de la Michodière, 28 November 1940.
Le Rendez-vous de Senlis, Paris, Théâtre de l'Atelier, 30 January 1941.
Eurydice, Paris, Théâtre de l'Atelier, 18 December 1941.
Antigone, Paris, Théâtre de l'Atelier, 4 February 1944.
L'Invitation au château, Paris, Théâtre de l'Atelier, 4 November 1947.
Ardèle, Paris, Comédie des Champs-Elysées, 3 November 1948.
La Répétition, Paris, Théâtre Marigny, 25 October 1950.
Colombe, Paris, Théâtre de l'Atelier, 11 February 1951.
La Valse des toréadors, Paris, Comédie des Champs-Elysées, 9 January 1952.
L'Alouette, Paris, Théâtre Montparnasse-Gaston Baty, 14 October 1952.
Médée, Paris, Théâtre de l'Atelier, 26 March 1953.
Cécile, ou L'école des pères, Paris, Comédie des Champs-Elysées, 29 October 1954.
Pauvre Bitos, ou Le dîner de têtes, Paris, Théâtre Montparnasse-Gaston Baty, 12 October 1956.
L'Hurluburlu, Paris, Comédie des Champs-Elysées, 5 February 1959.
Becket, ou L'Honneur de Dieu, Paris, Théâtre Montparnasse-Gaston Baty, 1 October 1959.
Le Songe du critique, Paris, Comédie des Champs-Elysées, 5 November 1960.
La Grotte, Paris, Théâtre Montparnasse-Gaston Baty, 6 October 1961.
L'Orchestre, Paris, Comédie des Champs-Elysées, 10 February 1962.
Le Boulanger, la boulangère, et le petit mitron, Paris, Comédie des Champs-Elysées, 14 November 1968.
Cher Antoine, ou L'amour raté, Paris, Comédie des Champs-Elysées, 1 October 1969.
Les Poissons rouges, ou Mon père, ce héros, Paris, Théâtre de l'OEuvre, 21 January 1970.
Ne Réveillez pas Madame, Paris, Comédie des Champs-Elysées, 21 October 1970.
Tu étais si gentil quand tu étais petit, Paris, Théâtre Antoine, 17 January 1972.
Le Directeur de l'Opéra, Paris, Comédie des Champs-Elysées, 27 October 1972.
Monsieur Barnett, Paris, Café-Théâtre des Halles, 29 October 1974.
Le Scénario, Paris, Théâtre de l'OEuvre, 1 October 1975.
Chers zoiseaux, Paris, Comédie des Champs-Elysées, 3 December 1976.



Films
Les Dégourdis de la onzième, by Jean Anouilh et al. 1936.
Vous n'avez rien à déclarer? by Jean Anouilh et al. 1937.
La Citadelle du silence, by Jean Anouilh et al. Impérial Film, 1937.
Les Otages, by Jean Anouilh et al. Nero-Film AG, 1938.
Calvacade d'amour, by Jean Anouilh and Jean Aurenche. Pressburger Films, 1940.
Marie-Martine, by Jean Anouilh (uncredited) and Jacques Viot. Eclair-Journal, 1943.
Le Voyageur sans bagages, by Jean Anouilh and Jean Aurenche. Eclair-Journal, 1944.
Monsieur Vincent, by Jean Anouilh, Jean Bernard-Luc, and Maurice Cloche. EDIC/Union Générale Cinématographique, 1947.
Anna Karenina, by Jean Anouilh, Guy Morgan, and Julien Duvivier. London Film Productions, 1948.
Pattes blanches, by Jean Anouilh and Bernard-Luc. Majestic Films, 1949.
Caroline chérie, by Jean Anouilh and Michel Audiard (uncredited). Cinéphonic/ Gaumont, 1950.
Deux sous de violettes, by Jean Anouilh (uncredited) and Monelle Valentin (uncredited). Gaumont, 1951.
Le Rideau rouge, by Jean Anouilh and André Barsacq. Gaumont, 1952.
Monsoon, by Jean Anouilh et al. CFG Productions/Film Group Judd, 1952.
Un caprice de Caroline chérie, by Jean Anouilh and Cécil Saint-Laurent. Cinéphonic, 1953.
Le Chevalier de la nuit, Telenet Film, 1954.
La Mort de Belle, Cinéphonic/Odeon, 1961.
La Ronde, Interopa Film/Paris Film Productions/Société Nouvelle Pathé Cinéma, 1964.
A Time for Loving, London Screenplays, 1971.



Television
Piége pour Cendrillon, by Jean Anouilh et al. Gaumont International/Jolly Film, 1965.
Le Jeune Homme et le lion, 1976.
Histoire du chevalier des Grieux et de Manon Lescaut, Hungarian TV/ Télécip, 1978.
La Belle vie,, 1979.
Le Diable amoureux, by Jean Anouilh et al. Bayerischer Rundfunk/France2/ Radiotelevisão Portuguesa/Telmondis/Westdeutscher Rundfunk, 1991.



Published plays
Y'avait un prisonnier (Paris: L'Illustration, 1935).
Le Voyageur sans bagage (Paris: L'Illustration, 1937); translated by John Whiting as Traveler without Luggage (London: Methuen, 1959).
Les Bal des voleurs (Paris: Fayard, 1938).
Antigone (Paris: Didier, 1942); translated by Lewis Galantière as Antigone (New York: Random House, 1946).
Pièces roses (Paris: Calmann-Lévy, 1942) – comprises "Le Bal des voleurs," "Le Rendez-vous de Senlis," and Léocadia;" Le Bal des voleurs translated by Lucienne Hill as Thieves' Carnival (London: Methuen, 1952); Le Rendez-vous de Senlis translated by Edwin O. Marsh as Dinner with the Family (London: Methuen, 1958); Léocadia translated by Patricia Moyes as Time Remembered (London: S. French, 1954).
Pièces noires (Paris: Calmann-Lévy, 1942) – comprises "L'Hermine," "La Sauvage," "Le Voyageur sans bagage," and "Eurydice;" L'Hermine translated by Miriam John as The Ermine, in Jean Anouilh . . . Plays, volume 1 (New York: Hill & Wang, 1958); La Sauvage translated by Hill as Restless Heart (London: Methuen, 1957); Eurydice translated by Kitty Black as Point of Departure (London: S. French, 1951); republished as Legend of Lovers (New York: Coward-McCann, 1952).
Nouvelles pièces noires (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1946) – comprises "Jézabel," "Antigone," "Roméo et Jeannette," and "Médée;" Roméo et Jeannette translated by John as "Romeo and Jeannette," in Jean Anouilh . . . Plays, volume 1 (New York : Hill & Wang, 1958); "Médée" translated in The Modern Theatre, volume 5, edited by Eric Bentley (Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1957).
Pièces brillantes (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1951) – comprises "L'Invitation au château," "Colombe," "La Répétition, ou L'Amour puni," and "Cécile, ou L'Ecole des pères;" L'Invitation au château translated by Christopher Fry as Ring round the Moon (London: Methuen, 1950); Colombe translated by Louis Kronenberger as Mademoiselle Colombe (New York: Coward-McCann, 1954).
L'Alouette (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1953); translated by Fry as The Lark (London: Methuen, 1955).
Pièces grinçantes (Paris: La Table ronde, 1956) – comprises "Ardèle, ou La Marguerite," "La Valse des Toréadors," "Ornifle, ou Le Courant d'air," and "Pauvre Bitos, ou Le Dîner de têtes;" Ardèle, ou La Marguerite translated by Hill as Ardèle (London: Methuen, 1951); La Valse des Toréadors translated by Hill as Waltz of the Toreadors (London: Elek, 1953; New York: Coward-McCann, 1953); Ornifle, ou Le Courant d'air translated by Hill as It's Later Than You Think (Chicago: Dramatic, 1970); Pauvre Bitos, ou Le dîner de têtes translated by Hill as Poor Bitos (London: Methuen, 1956).
Humulus le muet, with Jean Aurenche (Grenoble: Françaises Nouvelles, 1958).
Becket, ou L'Honneur de Dieu (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1959); translated by Hill as Becket, or The Honor of God (New York: Coward-McCann, 1960).
La Petite Molière (Paris: L'Avant-Scène, 1959).
L'Hurluberlu, ou Le Réactionnaire amoureux (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1959); translated by Hill as The Fighting Cock (London: Methuen, 1967).
Madame de . . ., translated by Whiting (London: S. French, 1959).
Le Songe du critique, edited by Richard Fenzl, (Dortmund: Lensing, 1960).
La Foire d'empoigne (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1960); translated by Anouilh and Roland Piétri as "Catch as Catch Can," in Jean Anouilh . . . Plays, volume 3 (New York: Hill & Wang, 1967).
La Grotte (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1961); translated by Hill as The Cavern (New York: Hill & Wang, 1966).
Fables (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1962).
Le Boulanger, la boulangère, et le petit mitron (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1969).
Cher Antoine, ou L'Amour rate (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1969); translated by Hill as Dear Antoine, or The Love That Failed (New York: Hill & Wang, 1971; London: Eyre Methuen, 1971).
Les Poissons rouges, ou Mon Père, ce héros (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1970).
Ne Réveillez pas Madame (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1970).
Nouvelles Pièces grinçantes (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1970)--includes "L'Hurluberlu, ou Le Réactionnaire amoureux," "La Grotte," "L'Orchestre," "Le Boulanger, la boulangère, et le petit mitron," and "Les Poissons rouges, ou Mon Père, ce héros;" "L'Orchestre" translated by John as "The Orchestra," in Jean Anouilh . . . Plays, volume 3 (New York: Hill & Wang, 1967).
Tu étais si gentil quand tu étais petit (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1972).
Le Directeur de l'opéra (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1972); translated by Hill as The Director of the Opera (London: Eyre Methuen, 1973).
L'Arrestation (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1975); translated by Hill as The Arrest (New York: S. French, 1978).
Le Scénario (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1976).
Chers Zoiseaux (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1977).
La Culotte (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1978).
La Belle vie suivi de Episode de la vie d'un auteur (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1980).
Le Nombril (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1981); translated by Michael Frayn as Number One (London & New York: S. French, 1985).
Oedipe, ou Le Roi boiteux: d'après Sophocle (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1986).
La Vicomtesse d'Eristal n'a pas reçu son balai mécanique: Souvenirs d'un jeune homme (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1987).



English language anthologies
Jean Anouilh . . . Plays, translated by Lewis Galantière et al., 3 volumes (New York: Hill & Wang, 1958–1967).
Collected Plays, 2 volumes translated by Lucienne Hill et al. (London: Methuen, 1966, 1967).
Five Plays by Jean Anouilh, introduction by Ned Chaillet translated by Timberlake Wertenbaker et al., (London: Methuen, 1987).



Theory and criticism
En marge du théâtre, edited by Efrin Knight, (Paris: La Table Ronde, 2000).
Le Dossier Molière,with Léon Thoorens et al., (Verviers: Gerard, 1964).



Translations
William Shakespeare, Trois comédies: Comme il vous plaira, La Nuit des rois, Le Conte d'hiver, [Three Comedies: As You like It, Twelfth Night, and The Winter's Tale] translated by Anouilh and Claude Vincent (Paris: La Table Ronde, 1952).
Graham Greene, L'Amant complaisant, translated by Anouilh and Nicole Anouilh (Paris: Laffont, 1962).
Oscar Wilde, Il est important d'être aimé, [The Importance of Being Earnest] translated by Anouilh and Nicole Anouilh (Paris: Papiers, 1985).



Other publications
Michel-Marie Poulain, by Anouilh, Pierre Imbourg, and André Warnod, preface by Michel Mourre (Paris: Braun, 1953).
Le Loup, ballet scenario by Anouilh and Georges Neveux, music by Henri Dutilleux (Paris: Ricordi, 1953).


References 
External links

 
  
DEFAULTSORT







 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Muhammad Ali
 
  
 
 
Muhammad Ali (born Cassius Marcellus Clay, Jr.; January 17, 1942) is an American former professional boxer,    philanthropist    and social activist.  Considered a cultural icon, Ali has both been idolized and vilified.  Originally known as Cassius Clay, Ali changed his name after joining the Nation of Islam in 1964, subsequently converting to Sunni Islam in 1975, more recently taking particular interest and embracing Sufism.  In 1967, three years after Ali had won the World Heavyweight Championship, he was publicly vilified for his refusal to be conscripted into the U.S. military, based on his religious beliefs and opposition to the Vietnam War. His 1966 statement, "Man, I ain't got no quarrel with them Viet Cong", was one of the more telling remarks of that era. Widespread protests against the Vietnam War had not yet begun, but with that one phrase, Ali articulated the reason to oppose the war for a generation of young Americans, and his words served as a touchstone for the racial and antiwar upheavals that would rock the 1960s. Ali's example inspired Martin Luther King, Jr. – who had been reluctant to alienate the Johnson Administration and its support of the civil rights agenda – to voice his own opposition to the war for the first time. Ali was eventually arrested and found guilty on draft evasion charges; he was stripped of his boxing title, and his boxing license was suspended. He was not imprisoned, but did not fight again for nearly four years while his appeal worked its way up to the U.S. Supreme Court, where it was eventually successful.Ali would go on to become the first and only three-time lineal World Heavyweight Champion.Nicknamed "The Greatest," Ali was involved in several historic boxing matches.  Notable among these were three with rival Joe Frazier, which are considered among the greatest in boxing history, and one with George Foreman, where he finally regained his stripped titles seven years later. Ali was well known for his unorthodox fighting style, epitomized by his catchphrase "float like a butterfly, sting like a bee", and employing techniques such as the Ali Shuffle and the rope-a-dope.  Ali brought beauty and grace to the most uncompromising of sports and through the wonderful excesses of skill and character, he became the most   athlete in the world.  He was also known for his pre-match hype, where he would "trash talk" opponents, often with rhymes.In 1999, Ali was crowned "Sportsman of the Century" by Sports Illustrated and "Sports Personality of the Century" by the BBC.  
Early lifeCassius Marcellus Clay, Jr., was born on January 17, 1942, in Louisville, Kentucky.  The older of two boys, he was named after his father, Cassius Marcellus Clay, Sr., who was named after the 19th century abolitionist and politician of the same name. His father painted billboards and signs,    and his mother, Odessa O'Grady Clay, was a household domestic. Although Cassius Sr. was a Methodist, he allowed Odessa to bring up both Cassius and his younger brother Rudolph "Rudy" Clay (later renamed Rahman Ali) as Baptists.    He is a descendant of pre-Civil War era American slaves in the American South, and is predominantly of African-American descent, with Irish and English ancestry. Clay was first directed toward boxing by Louisville police officer and boxing coach Joe E. Martin,  who encountered the 12-year-old fuming over a thief taking his bicycle. He told the officer he was going to "whup" the thief. The officer told him he better learn how to box first.   For the last four years of Clay's amateur career he was trained by legendary boxing cutman Chuck Bodak. Clay won six Kentucky Golden Gloves titles, two national Golden Gloves titles, an Amateur Athletic Union National Title, and the Light Heavyweight gold medal in the 1960 Summer Olympics in Rome. Clay's amateur record was 100 wins with five losses. Shortly after his return home from Rome following the Olympics, Ali would claim in his 1975 autobiography that he threw his medal into the Ohio River after he and a friend of his were being refused service at a "whites-only" restaurant, and fighting with a white gang.  However, two years later, in the 1977 biopic, The Greatest, a film scene depicting the medal-throwing incident only has Ali being forced out of the diner due to his race quickly cutting to the scene where Clay threw the medal into the river in disgust. Ali brought up the latter story of events in later years in interviews. Both stories have been heavily debated and several of Ali's friends from photographer Howard Bingham and Bundini Brown disputed this story calling it false, with Brown later telling Sports Illustrated writer Mark Kram, "Honkies sure bought into that one!"  It was stated that Ali kept his medal until "the gold rubbed off".  This incident is not mentioned in Thomas Hauser's own official biography of Ali, who confirmed that Ali was refused service at the diner but said he lost his medal a year after he won it. Ali later received a replacement medal at a basketball intermission during the 1996 Olympics in Atlanta, where he lit the torch to start the games.
Boxing career
Early careerClay made his professional debut on October 29, 1960, winning a six-round decision over Tunney Hunsaker. From then until 1963, Clay amassed a record of 19-0 with 15 wins by knockout. He defeated boxers including Tony Esperti, Jim Robinson, Donnie Fleeman, Alonzo Johnson, George Logan, Willi Besmanoff, Lamar Clark, Doug Jones and Henry Cooper. Clay was knocked down twice during this early run by Sonny Banks and Henry Cooper. The Cooper fight was stopped due to deep cuts in Cooper's eyes in the fifth round. Clay also beat his former trainer and veteran boxer Archie Moore in a 1962 match. After Clay left Moore's camp in 1960 partially due to Clay refusing to do chores such as dishwashing and sweeping, he hired Angelo Dundee, whom he had met in February of 1957 during Ali's amateur career , to be his trainer. Around this time, Clay sought longtime idol Sugar Ray Robinson to be his manager, but was rebuffed. A disputed ten-round decision over Doug Jones was later named "Fight of the Year" in 1963.Following the 1963 fights, Ali became the top contender for Sonny Liston's title. Despite his record, he was not expected to win. During the weigh-in on the day before the bout, the ever-boastful Clay, who frequently taunted Liston during the buildup by dubbing him "the big ugly bear" (among other things), declared that he would "float like a butterfly and sting like a bee," and, summarizing his strategy for avoiding Liston's assaults, said, "Your hands can't hit what your eyes can't see." At the pre-fight weigh-in, Clay's pulse rate was around 120, more than double his norm of 54.    Liston, among others, thought this stemmed from nervousness.
Heavyweight Champion 

Clay and Liston fought for six rounds in their first title fight, with Clay dominating most of the rounds, except in round four when it was alleged Clay had trouble seeing due to a substance in his eyes.  Though not confirmed that this happened to Clay, Bert Sugar claimed that at least two of Liston's opponents complained about their eyes 'burning'", suggesting a possibility that Liston's corner was deliberately attempting to cheat.  Despite Liston's attempts to knock Clay out in the fifth, Clay was able to escape Liston's offense until sweat and tears rinsed the substance from his eyes, leading to Clay to respond back with a flurry of combinations near the end of the fifth round. During the sixth round, Clay dominated Liston throughout. When Liston refused to answer the bell for the seventh round, Clay was declared the winner. Liston would later claim he had injured his shoulder. Following the win, a triumphant Clay rushed to the press stands, pointing to them and screaming "I fooled you!" During the now-infamous in-ring interview following the match, Clay shouted "I shook up the world!" and "I must be 'The Greatest'!" When Clay won, he became the youngest boxer to take the title from a reigning heavyweight champion at just 22; though Floyd Patterson was the youngest to win the heavyweight championship at 21, it was during an elimination bout following Rocky Marciano's retirement. Mike Tyson later broke the records for both Clay and Patterson in 1986 at 20 during his fight with Trevor Berbick. Clay, now having changed his name to Muhammad Ali following his Islam conversion, and Liston met up for their rematch in May the following year. Midway through the first round, Liston was knocked down by one of Ali's punches, later dubbed by the press as the "phantom punch". Referee Jersey Joe Walcott stopped the match shortly afterwards and Ali was declared the winner around 1:52 of the first round.  Rumors speculated that Liston dropped to the ground purposely due to threats from NOI extremists, or "threw" the fight to pay off debts, waiting to be counted out.Ali's second title defense was against Floyd Patterson. The bout was alleged to have been brutal due to Patterson's refusal to call Ali by his Muslim name. Throughout the fight, Ali taunted Patterson by shouting "what's my name" to him. It's alleged that Patterson may have strained his sacroiliac, which made it difficult for him to escape Ali's punches. Ali and then-WBA heavyweight champion boxer Ernie Terrell had agreed to meet for a bout in Chicago on March 29, 1966 but the Illinois Athletic Commission refused to host the fight due to Ali's Vietnam War statements.  Following these bouts, Ali traveled overseas and won championship bouts against George Chuvalo, Henry Cooper, Brian London and Karl Mildenberger. Ali's next fight after his return to the United States was against Cleveland Williams in the Houston Astrodome. According to Sports Illustrated, the bout drew a then-indoor world record of 35,460. Ali ended up beating Williams in three rounds, with Bert Sugar calling it Ali's greatest ring performance.  Williams was recovering from being shot at point-blank range by a Texas policeman a year and a half before, resulting in him entering the fight missing one kidney and   of his small intestine, and with a shriveled left leg from nerve damage from the bullet that was still lodged in his body.Ali and Terrell finally met in Houston to face off on February 6, 1967. Like Patterson before, Terrell would defy Ali's order to call him by his Muslim name. As a result, Ali set off on humiliating Terrell, shouting, "What's my name, Uncle Tom... what's my name?" Terrell later alleged that Ali had rubbed his thumbs on Terrell's eyes, causing problems. Critics described the fight as "one of the ugliest boxing fights". Tex Maule later wrote: "It was a wonderful demonstration of boxing skill and a barbarous display of cruelty." Despite this, Ali denied he intended to harm Terrell on purpose nor did he feel he was cruel to Terrell during the bout. His final title defense would be against Zora Folley a month later. Following this, Ali's title would be stripped after his refusal to be drafted to Army service , resulting in his boxing license being suspended and later being sentenced to five years for evasion.
Comeback from exile 
With his case still in appeal, Ali returned to the ring after winning a boxing license in Atlanta on August 12, 1970, thanks to State Senator Leroy R. Johnson, where he was granted a license to box by the City of Atlanta Athletic Commission.  Ali's first return bout was against Jerry Quarry on October 26, resulting in a win after three rounds. Following this, the New York State Boxing Commission reinstated Ali's license to fight there and Ali fought against Oscar Bonavena at Madison Square Garden in December 1970, knocking him out technically during the 15th round, leaving him as a top contender against heavyweight champion Joe Frazier.Ali and Frazier's first fight, held at the Garden on May 8, 1971, was nicknamed the "Fight of the Century", due to the hyped antics in their pre-fight. After being knocked down during the 15th round, Ali eventually suffered his first professional boxing loss afterwards from the fight. The boxer then returned with bouts against Quarry, a second bout with Floyd Patterson and Bob Foster in 1972, winning a total of six fights that year. In 1973, Ali suffered another loss at the hands of Ken Norton, who broke Ali's jaw during the fight, though it's contested which round he broke it, with Angelo Dundee later claiming Ali broke it in the second round, while others, including Norton, stated Ali broke it much later in the fight. After initially seeking retirement, Ali won against Norton in their second bout, leading to his second fight with Frazier, with Ali this time winning on points in their January 12, 1974 rematch.
Heavyweight Champion (second tenure) 
Ali faced off against heavyweight boxing champion George Foreman in Kinshasa on October 30, 1974 in a bout nicknamed "The Rumble in the Jungle". Going into the fight, Ali was not favored to win it, judging from Foreman's hard punches. During the fight, beginning in the second round, Ali began laying on the ropes, allowing Foreman to hit him with body punches, while avoiding Ali's head. Midway through, when Foreman began tiring, Ali would then counter with punches and some flurries. By the fifth round, Ali began to hit more effectively to Foreman, who was weakening. This practice would later become known as the "Rope-A-Dope". Midway through the eighth round, Ali hit Foreman with a flurry of punches that sent Foreman to the canvas, later resulting in him being counted out and Ali winning back the championship for the second time in his career.Ali's next opponents included Chuck Wepner, who stunned Ali with a knockdown in the ninth round – Ali would later said he tripped on Wepner's foot; Ron Lyle and Joe Bugner. Ali agreed to a third match with Joe Frazier in Manila. The bout, titled "The Thrilla in Manila", was held on October 1, 1975.  The fight lasted for fourteen rounds and was considered a brutal fight due to the sweltering heat with temperatures reaching   and both fighters' punches towards each other. Ali won by technical knockout after Frazier's corner refused to allow Frazier, who was technically blind during the fight, to answer for the fifteenth round. An ailing Ali said afterwards that the last Frazier fight "was the closest thing to dying that I know". Ali cited Frazier as "the greatest fighter of all times next to me" after their bout ended.
Decline
Following the bout, Ali fought against Jean-Pierre Coopman, Jimmy Young and Richard Dunn, with the latter bout being the final bout in which Ali scored by knockout. Later in 1976, Ali participated in an exhibition bout in Tokyo against Japanese professional wrestler and martial artist Antonio Inoki.    Though the fight was noted as a publicity stunt, the fight affected Ali's mobility as he suffered leg bruises throughout the fight due to Inoki's kicks.  Ali suffered two blood clots and an infection in the fight, which was ultimately declared a draw.  Ali fought against Ken Norton again in their third fight at Yankee Stadium in September of 1976, where Ali won by a heavily contested decision, which led to the audience booing in the ring. Ali reacted to the fallout of this by announcing a brief retirement to practice his faith in Islam, having converted to Sunni Islam after falling out with the Nation of Islam the previous year. After winning against Alfredo Evangelista in May of 1977, Ali struggled in his next fight to boxer Earnie Shavers that September, who pummeled Ali a few times with punches to the head. Ali later won the fight by another unanimous decision, but the Shavers fight caused Ali's longtime doctor Freddie Pacheco to quit after he was rebuffed for telling Ali he should retire. In February of 1978, Ali faced Leon Spinks, who had a 6-0-1 record going into their first fight at the Superdome in New Orleans, and lost the title by unanimous decision. Ali later won against Spinks by unanimous decision in their rematch eight months later, making him the first heavyweight champion to win the belt three times. Following this win, on July 27, 1979, Ali announced his retirement from boxing. His retirement was short-lived, however, after Ali announced his comeback to face Larry Holmes for the WBA belt in an attempt to win the heavyweight championship an unprecedented fourth time. It was around this time that Ali started struggling with vocal stutters and trembling hands. Ali's rapid decline caused concern and Ali checked himself into the Mayo Clinic for checkup, later declaring him fit to fight. Ali fought against Holmes on October 2, 1980 in Las Vegas with Holmes easily dominating the weakened Ali, who had taken thyroid medication to lose weight though the medication left him visibly tired and shortness with breath. Ali's trainer Angelo Dundee stopped the fight in the eleventh round, citing the only Ali fight in which the boxer lost by knockout. The Holmes fight is said to have contributed to Ali's Parkinson's syndrome.  Despite pleas for retirement, Ali fought one last time on December 21, 1981 in Nassau against Trevor Berbick losing a ten-round decision. Following the bout, Ali announced his retirement.
Later years
Ali was diagnosed with Parkinson's syndrome in 1984, a disease that is more common to head trauma from  activities such as boxing.    Ali still remained active during this time, however, later participating as a guest referee in the inaugural WrestleMania event.  Ali's other high profile events during this time included being selected by the California Bicentennial Foundation for the U.S. Constitution to personify the vitality of the U.S. Constitution and Bill of Rights around 1987. Ali rode on a float at the following year's Tournament of Roses Parade, launching the U.S. Constitution's 200th birthday commemoration. He published an oral history, Muhammad Ali: His Life and Times by Thomas Hauser, in 1991. That same year Ali traveled to Iraq during the Gulf War and met with Saddam Hussein in an attempt to negotiate the release of American hostages.  At the 1996 Summer Olympics in Atlanta, Ali famously lit the torch. Ali's bout with Parkinson's led to a gradual decline in Ali's health though he was still active into the early years of the millennium, even promoting his own biopic, Ali, in 2001. On November 17, 2002, Muhammad Ali went to Afghanistan as "U.N. Messenger of Peace".  He was in Kabul for a three-day goodwill mission as a special guest of the UN. In 2009, Ali visited Ennis, the ancestral site of his great-grandfather before he emigrated to the U.S. in the 1860s, before eventually settling in Kentucky.  Ali later received the honour of freedom at a civic reception in Ennis. He also became a freeman at Ennis, Co Clare, Ireland. On July 27, 2012, Ali was a titular bearer of the Olympic Flag during the opening ceremonies of the 2012 Summer Olympics in London. He was helped to his feet by his wife Lonnie to stand before the flag due to his Parkinson's rendering him unable to carry it into the stadium. 
Personal life
Marriages and childrenAli has been married four times and has seven daughters and two sons. Ali met his first wife, cocktail waitress Sonji Roi, approximately one month before they married on August 14, 1964.  Roi's objections to certain Muslim customs in regard to dress for women contributed to the breakup of their marriage. They divorced on January 10, 1966.On August 17, 1967, Ali married Belinda Boyd. After the wedding, she, like Ali, converted to Islam and more recently to Sufism,  changed her name to Khalilah Ali, though she was still called Belinda by old friends and family. They had four children: Maryum (b. 1968), twins Jamillah and Rasheda (b. 1970), and Muhammad Ali, Jr. (b. 1972).     Maryum has a career as an author and rapper. In 1975, Ali began an affair with Veronica Porsche, an actress and model. By the summer of 1977, Ali's second marriage was over and he had married Veronica.  At the time of their marriage, they had a baby girl, Hana, and Veronica was pregnant with their second child. Their second daughter, Laila, was born in December 1977. By 1986, Ali and Veronica were divorced. Laila later became a boxer in 1999,  despite her father's earlier comments against female boxing in 1978: "Women are not made to be hit in the breast, and face like that... the body's not made to be punched right here [patting his chest]. Get hit in the breast... hard... and all that." On November 19, 1986, Ali married Yolanda ("Lonnie") Williams. They had been friends since 1964 in Louisville. They have one son, Asaad Amin, whom they adopted when Amin was five.     Ali was a resident of Cherry Hill, New Jersey in the early 1970s.  Ali has two other daughters, Miya and Khaliah, from extramarital relationships.  Ali currently lives in Scottsdale, Arizona with Lonnie. They own a house in Berrien Springs, Michigan, which is for sale. On January 9, 2007, they purchased a house in eastern Jefferson County, Kentucky for $1,875,000.  Lonnie converted to Islam from Catholicism in her late 20s. 
The Nation of Islam and religious beliefs
Initially, Clay was refused entry to the Nation of Islam (often called the Black Muslims at the time) due to his boxing career.    However, after winning the championship from Liston in 1964, the Nation of Islam changed their minds and agreed to recruit him as a member.  On Friday, March 6, 1964, Malcolm X took Clay on a guided tour of the UN building (for a second time). The minister then announced that Clay would be granted his "X", renaming him Cassius X. That same night, Elijah Muhammad recorded a statement over the phone to be played over the radio that Clay would be renamed Muhammad (one who is worthy of praise) Ali (fourth rightly guided caliph). Only a few journalists (most notably Howard Cosell) accepted it at that time. Venerable boxing announcer Don Dunphy addressed the champion by his adopted name, as did British reporters. The adoption of this name symbolized his new identity as a member of the Nation of Islam. The name change to "Muhammad Ali" also led to the end of Ali's friendship with Malcolm X, as he would leave the NOI a couple of weeks after Ali joined.      Aligning himself with the Nation of Islam made him a lightning rod for controversy, turning the outspoken but popular champion into one of that era's most recognizable and controversial figures. Appearing at rallies with Nation of Islam leader Elijah Muhammad and declaring his allegiance to him at a time when mainstream America viewed them with suspicion—if not outright hostility—made Ali a target of outrage, as well as suspicion. Ali seemed at times to provoke such reactions, with viewpoints that wavered from support for civil rights to outright support of separatism. For example, Ali once stated, in relation to integration: "We who follow the teachings of Elijah Muhammad don't want to be forced to integrate. Integration is wrong. We don't want to live with the white man; that's all."    And in relation to inter-racial marriage: "No intelligent black man or black woman in his or her right black mind wants white boys and white girls coming to their homes to marry their black sons and daughters."  Indeed, Ali's religious beliefs at the time included the notion that the white man was "the devil" and that white people were not "righteous." Ali claimed that white people hated black people.Initially, Ali told reporters that his real goal in life was to be a minister for the NOI following his exile. But after Ali mentioned making a comeback to boxing during a 1969 interview, Elijah Muhammad rescinded the boxer's position, stating on the April 4, 1969 issue of Muhammad Speaks: "Mr. Muhammad Ali plainly acted the fool to the whole world."  Muhammad claimed Ali deliberately "stepped down off the spiritual platform of Islam to go and see if he can make money in the sports world".  Muhammad even went so far to denounce Ali's name telling Muhammad Speaks that Ali's name had reverted back to his birth name, Cassius Clay.  Ali was then ousted from the Muslim circle, under Elijah Muhammad, for a year.  Ali converted from the Nation of Islam sect to mainstream Sunni Islam in 1975. In a 2004 autobiography, written with daughter Hana Yasmeen Ali, Muhammad Ali attributes his conversion to the shift toward Sunni Islam made by Warith Deen Muhammad after he gained control of the Nation of Islam upon the death of Elijah Muhammad in 1975. Later in 2005 he embraced spiritual practices of Sufism.   
Vietnam WarIn 1964, Ali failed the U.S. Armed Forces qualifying test because his writing and spelling skills were sub-par. However, in early 1966, the tests were revised and Ali was reclassified as 1A.  This classification meant he was now eligible for the draft and induction into the U.S. Army during a time when the United States was involved in the Vietnam War. When notified of this status, he declared that he would refuse to serve in the United States Army and publicly considered himself a conscientious objector.  Ali stated: "War is against the teachings of the Holy Qur'an. I'm not trying to dodge the draft. We are not supposed to take part in no wars unless declared by Allah or The Messenger. We don't take part in Christian wars or wars of any unbelievers." He famously said in 1966: "I ain't got no quarrel with them Viet Congs..." Rare for a heavyweight boxing champion in those days, Ali spoke at Howard University, where he gave his popular "Black Is Best" speech to 4,000 cheering students and community intellectuals after he was invited to speak by sociology professor, Nathan Hare, on behalf of the Black Power Committee, a student protest group.  Appearing shortly thereafter for his scheduled induction into the U.S. Armed Forces on April 28, 1967 in Houston, he refused three times to step forward at the call of his name. An officer warned him he was committing a felony punishable by five years in prison and a fine of $10,000. Once more, Ali refused to budge when his name was called. As a result, he was arrested and on the same day the New York State Athletic Commission suspended his boxing license and stripped him of his title. Other boxing commissions followed suit. Ali would not be able to obtain a license to box in any state for over three years. At the trial on June 20, 1967, after only 21 minutes of deliberation, the jury found Ali guilty.  After a Court of Appeals upheld the conviction, the case went to the U.S. Supreme Court. During this time, the public began turning against the war and support for Ali began to grow. Ali supported himself by speaking at colleges and universities across the country, where opposition to the war was especially strong. On June 28, 1971, the Supreme Court reversed his conviction for refusing induction by unanimous decision in Clay v. United States.  The decision was not based on, nor did it address, the merits of Clay's/Ali's claims per se; rather, the Government's failure to specify which claims were rejected and which were sustained, constituted the grounds upon which the Court reversed the conviction. 
Quotes about Vietnam war   
Boxing style
Standing at 6'3" (1.91 m), Ali had a highly unorthodox style for a heavyweight boxer. Rather than the normal style of carrying the hands high to defend the face, he instead relied on foot speed and quickness to avoid punches, and carried his hands low. During the early part of Ali's career, he built a reputation for predicting rounds in which he would "finish" several opponents, and by boasting before his triumphs.  Ali admitted he adopted the latter practice from "Gorgeous" George Wagner, a popular professional wrestling champion in the Los Angeles area who drew thousands of fans.  Often referred to as "the man you loved to hate," George could incite the crowd with a few heated remarks, and Ali followed suit.Later, Ali responded to punches by lying on the ropes to withstand the blows, only to return the blows back, sometimes holding his opponents by the neck and taunting them for being "weak" and "slow" and "can't throw no punch". Starting in the mid-1960s, Ali would openly taunt his opponents in the ring sometimes taunting them as instructions were read and later on, hitting them and taunting them throughout. Ali's later style of laying on the ropes to avoid bigger punches while hitting back would later be cited as "the rope-a-dope", a style that had started during Ali's first fight with Frazier and became something of a trademark move following "The Rumble in the Jungle".
Legacy
Muhammad Ali defeated every top heavyweight in his era, which has been called the golden age of heavyweight boxing. Ali was named "Fighter of the Year" by Ring Magazine more times than any other fighter, and was involved in more Ring Magazine "Fight of the Year" bouts than any other fighter. He is an inductee into the International Boxing Hall of Fame and holds wins over seven other Hall of Fame inductees. He is one of only three boxers to be named "Sportsman of the Year" by Sports Illustrated.In 1978, three years before Ali's permanent retirement, the Board of Aldermen in his hometown of Louisville, Kentucky, voted 6–5 to rename Walnut Street to Muhammad Ali Boulevard. This was controversial at the time, as within a week 12 of the 70 street signs were stolen. Earlier that year, a committee of the Jefferson County Public Schools considered renaming Central High School in his honor, but the motion failed to pass. At any rate, in time, Muhammad Ali Boulevard—and Ali himself—came to be well accepted in his hometown.  In 1993, the Associated Press reported that Ali was tied with Babe Ruth as the most recognized athlete, out of over 800 dead or alive athletes, in America. The study found that over 97% of Americans over 12 years of age identified both Ali and Ruth. He was the recipient of the 1997 Arthur Ashe Courage Award. Two years later, in 1999, the BBC produced a special version of its annual BBC Sports Personality of the Year Award ceremony, and Ali was voted their Sports Personality of the Century,  receiving more votes than the other four contenders combined. On September 13, 1999, Ali was named "Kentucky Athlete of the Century" by the Kentucky Athletic Hall of Fame in ceremonies at the Galt House East.  On January 8, 2005, Muhammad Ali was presented with the Presidential Citizens Medal by President George W. Bush. Later that November, he received the Presidential Medal of Freedom at a White House ceremony.   and the "Otto Hahn Peace Medal in Gold" of the UN Association of Germany (DGVN) in Berlin for his work with the US civil rights movement and the United Nations (December 17, 2005).On November 19, 2005 (Ali's 19th wedding anniversary), the $60 million non-profit Muhammad Ali Center opened in downtown Louisville. In addition to displaying his boxing memorabilia, the center focuses on core themes of peace, social responsibility, respect, and personal growth. A youth club in Ali's hometown and a species of rose (Rosa ali) have been named after him. On June 5, 2007, he received an honorary doctorate of humanities at Princeton University's 260th graduation ceremony. 
Ranking in heavyweight historyAli is generally considered to be one of the greatest heavyweights of all time by boxing commentators and historians. Ring Magazine, a prominent boxing magazine, named him number 1 in a 1998 ranking of greatest heavyweights from all eras. Ali was named the second greatest fighter in boxing history by ESPN.com behind only welterweight and middleweight great Sugar Ray Robinson.  In December 2007, ESPN listed Ali second in its choice of the greatest heavyweights of all time, behind Joe Louis. The Associated Press voted Ali the No. 1 heavyweight of the 20th century in 1999. 
In the media and popular culture
 
 As a world champion boxer and social activist, Ali has been the subject of numerous books, films and other creative works. In 1963, he released an album of spoken word on Columbia Records titled I am the Greatest! He has appeared on the cover of Sports Illustrated on 37 different occasions, second only to Michael Jordan.   He appeared in the documentary film Black Rodeo (1972) riding both a horse and a bull. His autobiography The Greatest: My Own Story, written with Richard Durham, was published in 1975.    In 1977 the book was adapted into a film called The Greatest, in which Ali played himself and Ernest Borgnine played Angelo Dundee. When We Were Kings, a 1996 documentary about the Rumble in the Jungle, won an Academy Award,  and the 2001 biopic Ali garnered an Oscar nomination for Will Smith's portrayal of the lead role.  The latter film was directed by Michael Mann, with mixed reviews, the positives given to Smith's portrayal of Ali. Prior to making the film, Smith rejected the role until Ali requested that he accepted it. Smith said the first thing Ali told him was: "Man you're almost pretty enough to play me." For contributions to the entertainment industry, Ali was honored with a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame at 6801 Hollywood Boulevard.     Ali recorded the song Stand by Me in 1964.  The Muhammad Ali Effect is a term used in psychology that was named after him when he stated, "I only said I was the greatest, not the smartest" in his autobiography The Greatest: My Own Story.  According to this effect, when people are asked to rate their intelligence and moral behavior in comparison to others, people will rate themselves as more moral, but not more intelligent than others.  
Professional boxing record 
|-
| style="text-align:center;" colspan="8"|56 Wins (37 knockouts, 19 decisions), 5 Losses (4 decisions, 1 TKO), 0 Draws 
|-  style="text-align:center; background:#e3e3e3; background:#e3e3e3;"
| style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Res.
| style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Opponent
| style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Type
| style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Round, Time
| style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Date
| style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Age
| style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Location
| style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Notes
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Loss
| Trevor Berbick
| Decision  
| 10  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Nassau, Bahamas
| Align=left|    
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Loss
| Larry Holmes
| TKO  
| 10  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Las Vegas, NV
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Leon Spinks
| Decision  
| 15  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  New Orleans, LA
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Loss
| Leon Spinks
| Decision  
| 15  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Las Vegas, NV
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Earnie Shavers
| Decision  
| 15  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  New York City
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Alfredo Evangelista
| Decision  
| 15  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Landover, MD
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Ken Norton
| Decision  
| 15  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  The Bronx, New York
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Richard Dunn
| TKO
| 5  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Munich, West Germany
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Jimmy Young
| Decision  
| 15  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Landover, MD
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Jean-Pierre Coopman
| KO
| 5  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  San Juan, Puerto Rico
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Joe Frazier
| TKO
| 14  , 0:59
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Quezon City, Philippines
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Joe Bugner
| Decision  
| 15  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Ron Lyle
| TKO
| 11  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Las Vegas, NV
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Chuck Wepner
| TKO
| 15  , 2:41
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Richfield, OH
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| George Foreman
| KO
| 8  , 2:58
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Kinshasa, Zaire
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Joe Frazier
| Decision  
| 12  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  New York City, NY
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Rudi Lubbers
| Decision  
| 12  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Jakarta, Indonesia
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Ken Norton
| Decision  
| 12  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Inglewood, CA
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Loss
| Ken Norton
| Decision  
| 12  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  San Diego, CA
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Joe Bugner
| Decision  
| 12  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Las Vegas, NV
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Bob Foster
| KO
| 7  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Stateline, NV
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Floyd Patterson
| TKO
| 7  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  New York City, NY
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Alvin Lewis
| TKO
| 11  , 1:15
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Dublin, Ireland
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Jerry Quarry
| TKO
| 7  , 0:19
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Las Vegas, NV
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| George Chuvalo
| Decision  
| 12  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Vancouver, Canada
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Mac Foster
| Decision  
| 15  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Tokyo, Japan
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Jürgen Blin
| KO
| 7  , 2:12
|  
|  
| Align=left| Zurich, Switzerland
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Buster Mathis
| Decision  
| 12  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Houston, TX
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Jimmy Ellis
| TKO
| 12  , 2:10
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Houston, TX
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Loss
| Joe Frazier
| Decision  
| 15  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  New York City, NY
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Oscar Bonavena
| TKO
| 15  , 2:03
|  
|  
| Align=left|  New York City, NY
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Jerry Quarry
| TKO
| 3  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Atlanta, GA
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Zora Folley
| KO
| 7  , 1:48
|  
|  
| Align=left|  New York City, NY
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Ernie Terrell
| Decision  
| 15  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Houston, TX
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Cleveland Williams
| TKO
| 3  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Houston, TX
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Karl Mildenberger
| TKO
| 12  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Frankfurt, West Germany
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Brian London
| KO
| 3  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  London, England
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Henry Cooper
| TKO
| 6  , 1:38
|  
|  
| Align=left|  London, England
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| George Chuvalo
| Decision  
| 15  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Toronto, Canada
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Floyd Patterson
| TKO
| 12  , 2:18
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Las Vegas, NV
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Sonny Liston
| KO
| 1  , 2:12
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Lewiston, ME
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Sonny Liston
| TKO
| 7  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Miami Beach, FL
| Align=left| 
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Henry Cooper
| TKO
| 5  , 2:15
|  
|  
| Align=left|  London, England
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Doug Jones
| Decision  
| 10  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  New York City, NY
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Charley Powell
| KO
| 3, 2:04
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Pittsburgh, PA
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Archie Moore
| TKO
| 4  , 1:35
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Los Angeles, CA
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Alejandro Lavorante
| KO
| 5  , 1:48
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Los Angeles, CA
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Billy Daniels
| TKO
| 7  , 2:21
|  
|  
| Align=left|  New York City, NY
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| George Logan
| TKO
| 4  , 1:34
|  
|  
| Align=left|  New York City, NY
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Don Warner
| TKO
| 4, 0:34
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Miami Beach, FL
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Sonny Banks
| TKO
| 4  , 0:26
|  
|  
| Align=left|  New York City, NY
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Willi Besmanoff
| TKO
| 7  , 1:55
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Louisville, KY
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Alex Miteff
| TKO
| 6  , 1:45
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Louisville, KY
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Alonzo Johnson
| Decision  
| 10  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Louisville, KY
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Duke Sabedong
| Decision  
| 10  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Las Vegas, NV
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| LaMar Clark
| KO
| 2  , 1:27
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Louisville, KY
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Donnie Fleeman
| TKO
| 7  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Miami Beach, FL
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Jim Robinson
| KO
| 1  , 1:34
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Miami Beach, FL
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Tony Esperti
| TKO
| 3  , 1:30
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Miami Beach, FL
| Align=left|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Herb Siler
| KO
| 4  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Miami Beach, FL
|
|- style="text-align:center;"
|  Win
| Tunney Hunsaker
| Decision  
| 6  
|  
|  
| Align=left|  Louisville, KY
|
 
See also 

List of heavyweight boxing champions
List of North American Muslims
List of people from Louisville, Kentucky
List of WBA world champions
List of WBC world champions
Notable boxing families
Conscientious Objector


Notes 
References

 
 


External links 
 
 

 
 
Barrow Neurological Institute: Muhammad Ali Parkinson Center
 
WLRN: Muhammad Ali: Made in Miami
Muhammad Ali Interview with Ian Wooldridge (1969)
Life Magazine: Cassius Clay: Before He Was Ali (photo essay)
BoxRec: list of world heavyweight champions?
BoxRec: list of world P4P champions?
William Addams Reitwiesner Genealogical Services: Ancestry of Muhammad Ali

 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
  
 
 
  
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
   
DEFAULTSORT



































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Philip V of Spain
 Philip V (Spanish: Felipe V; French: Philippe de France;  19 December 1683 – 9 July 1746)  was King of Spain from 1 November 1700 to 15 January 1724, when he abdicated in favor of his son Louis, and from 6 September 1724, when he assumed the throne again upon his son's death, to his death.Before his reign, Philip occupied an exalted place in the royal family of France as a grandson of King Louis XIV. His father, Louis, the Grand Dauphin, had the strongest genealogical claim to the throne of Spain when it became vacant in 1700. However, since the Grand Dauphin and Philip's older brother, Louis, Duke of Burgundy, could not be displaced from their place in the succession to the French throne, King Charles II of Spain named Philip as his heir in his will. It was well known that the union of France and Spain under one monarch would upset the balance of power in Europe, such that other European powers would take steps to prevent it. Philip was the first member of the House of Bourbon to rule as king of Spain. The sum of his two reigns, 45 years and 21 days, is the longest in modern Spanish history.
Early Years
Philip was born at the Palace of Versailles  in France the second son of Louis, Grand Dauphin, the heir apparent to the throne of France, and his wife Maria Anna Victoria of Bavaria, Kamen, Henry. "Philip V of Spain: The King who Reigned Twice", Published by Yale University Press, 2001. ISBN 0-300-08718-7  Dauphine Victoire. He was a younger brother of Louis, Duke of Burgundy, the father of Louis XV of France. At birth, Philip was created Duke of Anjou, a traditional title for younger sons in the French royal family. He would be known by this name until he became the king of Spain. Since Philip's older brother, the Duke of Burgundy, was second in line to the French throne after his father, there was little expectation that either he or his younger brother Charles, Duke of Berry, would ever rule over France.Philip was tutored with his brothers by François Fénelon, Archbishop of Cambrai. The three were also educated by Paul de Beauvilliers.
Claims to the Spanish throne
In 1700 the King Charles II of Spain died childless. His will named the 16-year old Philip, grandson of Charles' half-sister Maria Theresa of Spain, the first wife of Louis XIV, as his successor.  Upon any possible refusal, the crown of Spain would be offered next to Philip's younger brother, the Duke of Berry, then to the Archduke Charles of Austria, later Holy Roman Emperor Charles VI.  Philip had the better genealogical claim to the Spanish throne, because his Spanish grandmother and great-grandmother were older than the ancestors of the Archduke Charles of Austria. However, the Austrian branch claimed that Philip's grandmother had renounced the Spanish throne for herself and her descendants as part of her marriage contract. This was countered by the French branch's claim that it was on the basis of a dowry that had never been paid. After a long council meeting in France at which the Dauphin spoke up in favour of his son's rights, it was agreed that Philip would ascend the throne, but would forever renounce his claim to the throne of France for himself and his descendants. After the Royal Council decided to accept the provisions of the will of Charles II that named Philip king of Spain, the Spanish ambassador was called in and introduced to his new king. The ambassador, along with his son, knelt before Philip and made a long speech in Spanish which Philip did not understand, although Louis XIV (the son and husband of Spanish princesses) did. Philip only later learned to speak Spanish.
First marriage
On 2 November 1701 Philip married the 13-year old Maria Luisa of Savoy, as chosen by his grandfather. She was the daughter of Victor Amadeus II, Duke of Savoy, and Philip's second cousin Anne Marie d'Orléans, also the parents of the Duchess of Burgundy, Philip's sister-in-law. There was a proxy ceremony at Turin, the capital of the Duchy of Savoy, and another one at Versailles on 11 September.As queen of Spain, Maria Luisa proved very popular with her subjects. She served as regent for her husband on several occasions. Her most successful term was when Philip was away touring his Italian domains for nine months in 1702. In 1714, she died at the age of 26 from tuberculosis, a devastating emotional blow to her husband.
War of the Spanish Succession 
The actions of Louis heightened the fears of the English, the Dutch and the Austrians, among others.  In February 1701, the French King caused the Parlement of Paris (a court) to register a decree that should Louis himself have no heir then the Duke of Anjou—Phillip V of Spain—would surrender the Spanish throne for that of the French, ensuring dynastic continuity in Europe's greatest land power.
However, a second act of the French King "justified a hostile interpretation": pursuant to a treaty with Spain, Louis occupied several towns in the Spanish Netherlands (modern Belgium and Nord-Pas-de-Calais). This was the spark that ignited the powder keg created by the unresolved issues of the War of the League of Augsburg (1689–97) and the acceptance of the Spanish inheritance by Louis XIV for his grandson.Almost immediately the War of the Spanish Succession began. Concern among other European powers that Spain and France united under a single Bourbon monarch would upset the balance of power pitted powerful France and weak Spain against the Grand Alliance of England, the Netherlands and Austria. Inside Spain, the Kingdoms of Castile and Navarre supported Philip of France. On the other hand, the majority of the nobility of the Kingdom of Aragon supported Charles of Austria, son of Holy Roman Emperor Leopold I and claimant to the Spanish throne by right of his grandmother Maria Anna of Spain. Charles was even hailed as King of Aragon under the name Charles III.The war was centred in Spain and west-central Europe (especially the Low Countries), with other important fighting in Germany and Italy. Prince Eugene of Savoy and the Duke of Marlborough distinguished themselves as military commanders in the Low Countries. In colonial North America, the conflict became known to the English colonists who fought against French and Spanish forces as Queen Anne's War. Over the course of the fighting, some 400,000 people were killed. It was with this war as a backdrop that, beginning in 1707, Philip issued the Nueva Planta decrees, which centralized Spanish rule under the Castilian political and administrative model and in the process abolished the charters of the independently administered kingdoms within Spain – including most notably the Crown of Aragon, which was supporting Charles VI in the conflict. The policy of centralization had as model the French State under Louis XIV and was strongly supported by politicians such as Joseph de Solís and the Sardinian-born political philosopher Vicente Bacallar. At one point in 1712 Philip was offered the choice of renouncing the throne of Spain so that he could be made heir of France, but he refused.Philip decided to relinquish his right of succession to France under one condition: the introduction of semi-Salic law in Spain. Under this law, the succession to the Spanish crown was limited to his entire male line before it could pass to any female, a condition of his renunciation made clear to the allies during the preliminaries of the Treaties of Utrecht. It was not until this was successfully accomplished (10 May 1713) that Spain and Great Britain made their own peace terms at the second Treaty of Utrecht (annexing the new law to the Treaty). By the terms of the Treaty of Utrecht that concluded the war, Spain was forced to cede Minorca and Gibraltar to Great Britain; the Spanish Netherlands, Naples, Milan, and Sardinia to the Austrian Habsburgs; and Sicily and parts of Milan to Savoy. These losses greatly diminished the Spanish Empire in Europe, which had already been in decline. Throughout his reign, Philip sought to reverse the decline of Spanish power as Great Britain increasingly began to dominate at sea. Trying to overturn the terms of the Treaty of Utrecht, Spain attempted to re-establish its territories in Italy, triggering the War of the Quadruple Alliance in which a coalition of states fought Spain. Phillip V was eventually forced to sue for peace following a failed invasion of Scotland and a British raid on Vigo.
Second marriage
Shortly after the death of Queen Maria Luisa in 1714, the King decided to marry again. His second wife was Elisabeth of Parma, daughter of Odoardo Farnese, Hereditary Prince of Parma, and Dorothea Sophie of the Palatinate. At the age of twenty-one, on 24 December 1714, she was married by proxy in Parma. The marriage was arranged by Cardinal Alberoni, with the concurrence of the Princesse des Ursins, the Camarera mayor de Palacio ("chief of the household") of the king of Spain.
Abdication
On 14 January 1724, Philip abdicated the throne to his eldest son, the seventeen-year old Louis, for reasons still subject to debate. One theory suggests that Philip V, who exhibited many elements of mental instability during his reign, did not wish to reign due to his increasing mental decline. 
A second theory puts the abdication in context of the Bourbon dynasty. The French royal family recently had lost many legitimate agnates to diseases, making the lack of an heir and another continental war of succession a possibility. Philip V was a legitimate descendant of Louis XIV, but matters were complicated by the Treaty of Utrecht, which forbade a union of the French and Spanish crowns. The theory supposes that Philip V hoped that by abdicating the Spanish crown he could circumvent the Treaty and succeed to the French throne. In any case, Louis died on 31 August 1724 in Madrid of smallpox, having reigned only seven months and leaving no issue. Philip was forced to return to the Spanish throne as his younger son, the later Ferdinand VI, was not yet of age.
Later reignPhilip helped his Bourbon relatives to make territorial gains in the War of the Polish Succession and the War of the Austrian Succession by reconquering Naples and Sicily from Austria and Oran from the Ottomans. Finally, at the end of his reign Spanish forces also successfully defended their American territories from a large British invasion during the War of Jenkins' Ear.During Philip's reign, Spain began to recover from the stagnation it had suffered during the twilight of the Spanish Habsburg dynasty. Although the population of Spain grew, the financial and taxation systems were archaic and the treasury ran deficits. The king employed thousands of highly paid retainers at his palaces—not to rule the country but to look after the royal family. The army and bureaucracy went months without pay and only the shipments of silver from the New World kept the system going. Spain suspended payments on its debt in 1739—effectively declaring bankruptcy. 
DeathPhilip was afflicted by fits of manic depression and increasingly fell victim to a deep melancholia.  His second wife, Elizabeth Farnese, completely dominated her passive husband. She bore him further sons, including another successor, Charles III of Spain.    Beginning in August 1737 his affliction was eased by the castrato singer Farinelli, who, became the "Musico de Camara of Their Majesties." Farinelli would sing eight or nine arias for the king and queen every night, usually with a trio of musicians. Philip died on 9 July 1746 in El Escorial, in Madrid, but was buried in his favorite Royal Palace of La Granja de San Ildefonso, near Segovia.   Ferdinand VI of Spain, his son by his first queen Maria Luisa of Savoy, succeeded him.
Legacy

Historians have not been kind to the king. Lynch says Philip V advanced the government only marginally over that of his predecessors and was more of a liability than the incapacitated Charles II. When a conflict came up between the interests of Spain and France, he usually favored France. However Philip did make some reforms in government, and strengthened the central authorities relative to the provinces. Merit became more important, although most senior positions still went to the landed aristocracy. Below the elite level inefficiency and corruption was as widespread as ever. The reforms started by Philip V culminated in much more important reforms of Charles III.  The economy, on the whole, improved over the previous half-centuries, with greater productivity, and fewer famines and epidemics. 



To commemorate the indignities the city of Xàtiva suffered after Philip's victory in the Battle of Almansa in the War of the Spanish Succession, in which he ordered the city to be burned and renamed San Felipe, the portrait of the monarch hangs upside down in the local museum of L'Almodí. 
All agnatic descendants of Louis XIV alive today are descended from Philip V.


Issue
By Maria Luisa
Philip married his double-second cousin Princess Maria Luisa of Savoy (17 September 1688 – 14 February 1714) on 3 November 1701  and they had four sons:

Name  Portrait  Lifespan  Notes   
Louis Philip King of Spain  25 August 1707 –  31 August 1724 King of Spain from 14 January 1724 until his death. His reign is recorded as one of the shortest in history, as he was king for just over seven months; married Louise Élisabeth d'Orléans and had no issue; 
Infante Philip Peter   2 July 1709 –  18 July 1709 died in infancy; 
Infante Philip Peter Gabriel   7 June 1712 –  29 December 1719 died in childhood; 
Ferdinand King of Spain  23 September 1713 –  10 August 1759 King of Spain from 1746 till death; married Barbara of Portugal and had no issue; 


Family of Philip V of Spain in 1723 

 

By Elisabeth
He married Elisabeth of Parma, (25 October 1692 – 11 July 1766), on 24 December 1714,  they had seven children:


Name  Portrait  Lifespan  Notes   
Charles Duke of Parma King of Naples and Sicily King of Spain  20 January 1716 –  14 December 1788 was the King of Spain and the Spanish Indies from 1759 to his death in 1788. In 1738 he married the cultured Princess Maria Amalia of Saxony with whom he had 13 children; 
Infante Francis   21 March 1717 –  21 April 1717 died in infancy 
Infanta Mariana Victoria Queen of Portugal  31 March 1718 –  15 January 1781 was Queen Consort of Portugal and the Algarves due to her marriage to Joseph I. She also acted as Queen Regent of Portugal. 
Philip Duke of Parma  20 March 1720 –  18 July 1765 Duke of Parma, Plasencia and Guastalla (15 March 1720 – 18 July 1765) was duke of Parma from 1748 to 1765. He founded the house of Bourbon-Parma (a.k.a. the Bourbons of Parma); married Princess Louise Élisabeth of France and had issue. 
Infanta Maria Theresa Antonia Rafaela Dauphine of France  11 June 1726 –  22 July 1746 was Dauphine of France as spouse of Louis, Dauphin of France. In France, she was known simply as Madame la Dauphine. 
Infante Luis Count of Chinchón  25 July 1727 –  7 August 1785 known as the Cardinal-Infante. Was Archbishop of Toledo, Primate of Spain and Cardinal since 1735. In 1754 renounced his ecclesiastical titles and became Count of Chinchón. In 1776, he married morganatically Doña María Teresa de Vallabriga y Rozas and had issue, but without royal titles. 
Infanta Maria Antoinetta Ferdinanda Queen of Sardinia  17 November 1729 –  19 September 1785 was Queen of Sardinia as the wife of King Victor Amadeus III of Sardinia. She was a mother of 3 rulers of Sardinia. 


Family of Philip V of Spain in 1743 

 

Ancestry
 
  
 

Titles, styles, honours and arms
Titles and styles
 
 

Heraldry of His Majesty Philip V, King of Spain 
  
Coat of Arms of the Duke of Anjou  Coat of Arms of Philip as the Duke of Anjou.  Held by him from his birth till his Coronation as King of Spain in 1700. 
(1683–1700) Coat of Arms of Felipe V, King of Spain  Coat of Arms of Philip as Felipe V, King of Spain.  Held by him from his Coronation till his death in 1746.  (1700–1746) 
 

19 December 1683 – 15 November 1700 His Royal Highness the Duke of Anjou (Monseigneur le duc d'Anjou)
15 November 1700 – 15 January' 1724 His Majesty the King of Spain
15 January 1724 – 6 September 1724 His Majesty King Philip V of Spain
6 September 1724 – 9 July 1746 His Majesty the King of Spain


Notes
 

Further reading

 
 
Lynch, John. Bourbon Spain 1700–1808 (1989)
 


 
 
 
 
 
  
}
  
}
  
}
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 

 
DEFAULTSORT






















 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   
	Pompeu Fabra
    
Pompeu Fabra i Poch ( ) (Barcelona 1868 - Prada de Conflent 1948) was a Catalan grammarian, the main author of the normative reform of contemporary Catalan language.Trained as a chemical engineer, from a quite young age he dedicated himself to the study of the Catalan language. Through a group called L'Avenç, he promoted a campaign to reform Catalan orthography (1890–91), publishing in (1904) with Jaume Massó i Torrents and Joaquim Casas i Carbó a Tractat d'ortografia catalana. He participated actively in the First International Congress of the Catalan language (1906). In 1912 he published his Gramática de la lengua catalana (in Spanish).Fabra moved from Bilbao to Barcelona in 1911, to become a professor (catedràtic) of Catalan — a position created by the diputació (local government) of Barcelona — and a member of the department of philology at the newly created Institut d'Estudis Catalans, of which he later became president.The Institute published the Normes ortogràfiques in 1913, the Diccionari ortogràfic in 1917, and its official Gramàtica catalana in 1918.In 1918, Fabra edited the textbook Curs mitjà de gramàtica catalana, published by l'Associació Protectora de l'Ensenyança Catalana (1918).His "Converses filològiques", first published in the newspaper "La Publicitat", were later collected as "Popular Barcino". Probably his most famous work was the Diccionari general de la llengua catalana (1932), the first edition of which later became the Institute's official dictionary.In 1932, owing to his scientific prestige, he was unanimously named a professor (catedràtic) of the Republican Universitat Autònoma de Barcelona (not to be confused with the later Universitat Autònoma de Barcelona created in the 1960s during the Francoist régime).Imprisoned in 1934 (during the Second Spanish Republic), he later (1939) went into exile in France, where he was to live in Paris, Montpellier and Prada de Conflent. He presided over the literary competition of Jocs Florals in Montpellier in 1946. Every year, his tomb in the Cuixà monastery near Prada, is visited by thousands of Catalans.The Universitat Pompeu Fabra in Barcelona bears his name.
External links

 
Biographical notice by Josep Pla (in catalan)

 
 
DEFAULTSORT








 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Martin Strel
 Martin Strel ( ) (born 1 October 1954) in Mokronog, SFR Yugoslavia, is a Slovenian long-distance swimmer, best known for swimming the entire length of various rivers. Strel holds successive Guinness World Records for swimming the Danube river, the Mississippi River, the Yangtze River, and the Amazon River.  His motto is "swimming for peace, friendship and clean waters."  
Swimming historyStrel was born in the town of Mokronog, in the Slovenian region of Lower Carniola, then part of the Socialist Federal Republic of Yugoslavia. 
Strel's first two  river swims were the Krka river (105 km) in his homeland, in 28 hours in 1992, and the boundary Kolpa river ( ), in 16 hours in 1993. In 2000, he swam the Danube River ( ) and achieved the world long distance swimming record ( ) in 58 days. In July 2001, he achieved one more world record —   of non-stop swimming in Danube within 84 hours and 10 minutes. In 2002, he swam the entire Mississippi River ( ) in 68 days. In 2003, he swam the Argentine Paraná River ( ). On 10 June 2004, Martin started swimming down the Yangtze River ( , the longest river in Asia, the third longest in the world) in China. He reached Shanghai in 40 days on 30 July 2004, one day before planned.Strel swam the Amazon River, commencing on 1 February 2007,    finishing 66 days later on April 7, 2007.  This was a record-breaking distance of  , longer than the width of the Atlantic Ocean. He had escort boats that were prepared to pour blood into the river to distract meat-eating fish such as piranhas. In 2007, the Nile had been proposed as his next river, but Strel said, "I am not going to do the Nile. It's long but not challenging enough, it is just a small creek. The Amazon is much more mighty." He plans to swim across Lake Arenal on September 29, 2010 as part of his visit to an environmentalist international film festival in Costa Rica. He plans to swim about 6 kilometres from shore and then back to his starting point. In June 2011 Strel completed his Colorado River Swim challenge for the documentary Stan Lee's Superhumans More about the swim can be found at: Colorado Swim 2011.
Big River ManStrel was recently the subject and star of a feature documentary entitled Big River Man directed by the acclaimed art-house director John Maringouin.  The film, which won a Best Cinematography prize at the 2009 Sundance Film Festival, was critically praised for its extraordinary blend of comedy and drama.  The film chronicled Strel's 3,300 mile historic swim of the Amazon.
Strel Swimming AdventuresIn 2011, Martin Strel and his son Borut Strel, have founded a company that organizes Swimming Adventure Holidays in the Mediterranean and at Lake Powell, Arizona. They currently offer swimming adventure holiday tours at Lake Powell, Arizona, in Slovenia (Lake Bled, Lake Bohinj, River Soca) and at Croatian Dalmatian Coast swimming from island to island. Strel takes part of some trips.
References 
External links

Strel's official site
The Amazon Swim Project site
Strel Swimming Adventure Holidays site
Diary of Amazon swim at BBC news

 
DEFAULTSORT





 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Chaim Potok
 Chaim Potok (February 17, 1929 – July 23, 2002) was an American Jewish author and rabbi.  Potok is most famous for his first book The Chosen, a 1967 novel which was listed on The New York Times’ best seller list for 39 weeks and sold more than 3,400,000 copies.    
BiographyHerman Harold Potok was born in The Bronx, New York City, to Benjamin Max (died 1958) and Mollie (née Friedman) Potok (died 1985), Jewish immigrants from Poland. He was the oldest of four children, all of whom either became rabbis or married one. His Hebrew name was Chaim Tzvi (חיים צבי). He received an Orthodox Jewish education. After reading Evelyn Waugh's novel Brideshead Revisited as a teenager, he decided to become a writer (he often said that the novel Brideshead Revisited is what inspired his work and literature). He started writing fiction at the age of 16. At age 17 he made his first submission to the magazine The Atlantic Monthly. Although it wasn't published, he received a note from the editor complimenting his work.In 1949, at the age of twenty, his stories were published in the literary magazine of Yeshiva University,  which he also helped edit. In 1950, Potok graduated summa cum laude  with a B.A. in English Literature.

After four years of study at the Jewish Theological Seminary of America he was ordained as a Conservative rabbi. He was appointed director of LTF, Leaders Training Fellowship, a youth organization affiliated with Conservative Judaism.Potok met Adena Sara Mosevitzsky, a psychiatric social worker, at Camp Ramah in Ojai, California, where he served as camp director (1957–1959). They were married on June 8, 1958, and had three children.After receiving a master's degree in Hebrew literature, Potok enlisted with the U.S. Army as a chaplain. He served in South Korea from 1955 to 1957. He described his time in South Korea as a transformative experience.  Brought up to believe that the Jewish people were central to history and God's plans, he experienced a region where there were almost no Jews and no anti-Semitism, yet whose religious believers prayed with the same fervor that he saw in Orthodox synagogues at home.Upon his return, he joined the faculty of the University of Judaism in Los Angeles and became the director of a Conservative Jewish summer camp affiliated with the Conservative movement. A year later he began his graduate studies at the University of Pennsylvania and was appointed scholar-in-residence at Temple Har Zion in Philadelphia. In 1963, he spent a year in Israel, where he wrote his doctoral dissertation on Solomon Maimon and began to write a novel.In 1964 Potok moved to Brooklyn. He became the managing editor of the magazine Conservative Judaism and  joined the faculty of the Teachers’ Institute of the Jewish Theological Seminary. The following year, he was appointed editor-in-chief of the Jewish Publication Society in Philadelphia and later,  chairman of the publication committee. Potok received a doctorate in philosophy from  the University of Pennsylvania. In 1970, Potok relocated to Jerusalem with his family. He returned to Philadelphia in 1977. After the publication of Old Men At Midnight, he was diagnosed with brain cancer. He died at his home in Merion, Pennsylvania on July 23, 2002, aged 73.
Literary careerIn 1967 Potok published his most critically praised novel, The Chosen, which won the Edward Lewis Wallant Prize and was nominated for the National Book Award. Potok wrote a sequel to The Chosen in 1969 entitled The Promise, which details the issues of the value and identity between Orthodox and Hasidic Jews.  This book won the Athenaeum Literary Award the same year of its publication    Not long afterward the Jewish Publication Society appointed him as its special projects editor. In 1972, he published My Name is Asher Lev, the story of a boy struggling with his relationship with his parents, religion and his love of art. In 1975, he published In the Beginning.
 
From 1974 until his death, Potok served as a special projects editor for the Jewish Publication Society.  During this time, Potok began translating the Hebrew Bible into English.   In 1978 he published his non-fiction work, Wanderings: Chaim Potok’s Story of the Jews, a historical account of the Jews. Potok described his 1981 novel The Book of Lights as an account of his experiences in Asia during the war. He said “it reshaped the neat, coherent model of myself and my place in the world.” His novel The Chosen was made into a film released in 1981, which won the most prestigious award at the World Film Festival, Montreal. Potok had a cameo role as a professor. The film featured  Rod Steiger, Maximilian Schell and Robby Benson. It also became a short-lived Off-Broadway musical and was adapted subsequently as a stage play by Aaron Posner in collaboration with Potok, which premiered at the Arden Theatre Company in Philadelphia in 1999.Potok’s 1985 novel Davita’s Harp is his only book featuring a female protagonist. In 1990, he published  The Gift of Asher Lev, the sequel to My Name is Asher Lev.  Potok wrote many plays, among them Sins of The Father and Out of The Depths.  In 1992 Potok completed another novel, I am the Clay, about the courageous struggle of a war-ravaged family. His 1993 young adult literature The Tree of Here was followed by two others, The Sky of Now (1995) and Zebra and Other Stories (1998).
Literary influencesChaim Potok's parents discouraged his writing and reading of non-Jewish subjects. He spent many hours in the public library reading secular novels.  Potok cited James Joyce, Thomas Mann, Fyodor Dostoevsky, Ernest Hemingway, and S.Y. Agnon as his chief literary influences. Many of his novels are set in the urban environments in New York in which he himself grew up.  While not Hasidic, Potok was raised in an extremely Orthodox home. In the book, Asher Lev wants to be a painter which causes much conflict with his father who wants him to do something else, much as Chaim Potok did during his childhood. Asher decides to continue as a painter and it disturbs his family, but Potok eventually decided to be an author and painted in his free time. Potok has said he relates to Asher Lev more than any of his other characters. 
Artistic careerChaim Potok was also an artist. He recreated the painting "The Brooklyn Crucifixion", which the character Asher Lev painted in the book My Name is Asher Lev. 
LegacyChaim Potok has had a considerable influence on Jewish American authors.     His work was significant for discussing the conflict between the traditional aspects of Jewish thought and culture and modernity to a wider, non-Jewish culture." .  He taught a highly regarded graduate seminar on Postmodernism at the University of Pennsylvania from 1993 through 2001 He bequeathed his papers to the University of Pennsylvania  The university houses a collection of Potok correspondence, writings, lectures, sermons, article clippings, memorabilia and fan mail. One of his admirers was Elie Wiesel, who wrote to Potok saying he had read all his books “with fervor and friendship”. 
Published works

Jewish Ethics (1964–69, 14 volumes)
The Chosen (1967)
The Promise (1969)
My Name Is Asher Lev (1972)
In the Beginning (1975)
The Jew Confronts Himself in American Literature (1975)
Wanderings: Chaim Potok's History of the Jews (1978)
The Book of Lights (1981)
Davita's Harp (1985)
Theo Tobiasse (1986)
The Gift of Asher Lev (1990)
I Am the Clay (1992)
The Tree of Here (1993)
The Sky of Now (1994)
The Gates of November (1996)
Zebra and Other Stories (1998)
Isaac Stern: My First 79 Years (with Isaac Stern) (1999)
Old Men at Midnight (2001)
Conversations with Chaim Potok (edited by Daniel Walden) (2001)


See also 

List of brain tumor patients


References 
External links

Chaim Potok resource site created by William M. Allen, PhD, La Sierra University
 
Interview with Quiara Alegría Hudes in Guernica, July 2012

 
 
DEFAULTSORT















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Chuck Palahniuk
 
Charles Michael "Chuck" Palahniuk ( ;  born February 21, 1962) is an American novelist and freelance journalist, who describes his work as transgressional fiction. He is best known as the author of the award-winning novel Fight Club, which also was made into a feature film. He maintains homes in the states of Oregon and Washington.   
Early lifePalahniuk was born in Pasco, Washington, the son of Carol and Fred Palahniuk, and he grew up living in a mobile home in nearby Burbank, Washington with his family. His parents separated when he was fourteen and subsequently they divorced, often leaving him and his three siblings to live with their maternal grandparents at their cattle ranch in Eastern Washington.  His paternal grandfather was Ukrainian and immigrated to New York from Canada in 1907.  Palahniuk's father began a relationship with a woman, whose ex-boyfriend murdered the couple.  Later, Palahniuk's mother died of cancer. For the Hell of it   In his twenties, Palahniuk attended the University of Oregon School of Journalism, and graduated in 1986. While attending college he worked as an intern for National Public Radio member station KLCC in Eugene, Oregon. He moved to Portland soon afterward. After writing for the local newspaper for a short while, he began working for Freightliner as a diesel mechanic, continuing in that job until his writing career took off. During that time, he also wrote manuals on fixing trucks and had a stint as a journalist (a job he did not return to until after he became a successful novelist). After casually attending a free, introductory seminar held by an organization called Landmark Education, Palahniuk quit his job as a journalist in 1988.  Palahniuk performed volunteer work for a homeless shelter; later, he also volunteered at a hospice as an escort; he provided transportation for terminally ill people and brought them to support group meetings. He ceased volunteering upon the death of a patient to whom he had grown attached. As an adult, Palahniuk became a member of the rebellious Cacophony Society. He is a regular participant in their events, including the annual Santa Rampage (a public Christmas party involving pranks and drunkenness) in Portland. His participation in the Society inspired some of the events in his writings, both fictional and non-fictional.  Most notably, he used the Cacophony Society as the basis for Project Mayhem in Fight Club.
CareerPalahniuk began writing fiction in his mid-thirties. By his account, he started writing while attending workshops for writers that were hosted by Tom Spanbauer, which he attended to meet new friends. Spanbauer largely inspired Palahniuk's minimalistic writing style.
Fight ClubHis first book, Insomnia: If You Lived Here, You'd Be Home Already, never was adapted due to his disappointment with the story   (although a small part of it later was salvaged for use in Fight Club). When he attempted to publish his next novel, Invisible Monsters, publishers rejected it for its disturbing content.  This led him to work on his most famous novel, Fight Club, which he wrote as an attempt to disturb the publisher even more for rejecting him.  Palahniuk wrote this story in his spare time while working for Freightliner. After initially publishing it as a short story (which would become chapter 6 of the novel) in the 1995 compilation, Pursuit of Happiness, Palahniuk expanded it into a full novel, which—contrary to his expectations—the publisher was willing to publish.  While the original hardcover edition of the book received positive reviews and some awards, it had a short shelf life.Initially, Palahniuk struggled to find a literary agent and went without one until after the publication of Fight Club. Author FAQ: "How did he land an agent? Believe it or not, Chuck had to go through hell and back to land an agent..."  After he began receiving attention from Twentieth Century Fox, Palahniuk was signed by actor and literary agent, Edward Hibbert,    Hibbert eventually guided and brokered the deal that took Fight Club to the big screen.  In 1999, three years after the novel's publication, the film adaptation by director David Fincher was released. The film was a box office disappointment (although it was #1 at the U.S. box office in its first weekend) and critical reaction was mixed, but a cult following soon emerged as the DVD of the film became popular upon release. Three editions of the novel have been published in paperback, in 1999, in 2004 (with a new introduction by the author about the success of the film adaptation), and in 2005 (with an afterword by Palahniuk).
Invisible Monsters, Survivor, and ChokeA revised version of Invisible Monsters, as well as his fourth novel, Survivor, were published in 1999. A few years later Palahniuk managed to make his first New York Times bestseller, the novel Choke, which later was made into a movie.
LullabyThe year 1999 brought a series of great personal tragedies to Palahniuk's life. At that time, his father, Fred Palahniuk, had started dating a woman named Donna Fontaine, whom he had met through a personal ad under the title, " " soon after her former boyfriend, Dale Shackleford, had been imprisoned for sexual abuse. Shackleford had vowed to kill Fontaine as soon as he was released from prison. Palahniuk believes that using a personal ad, Fontaine was looking for "the biggest man she could find" to protect her from Shackleford and Palahniuk's father qualified.  After his release, Shackleford followed Fontaine and the senior Palahniuk to Fontaine's home in Kendrick, Idaho after they had gone out for a date. Shackleford then shot them both and dragged their bodies into Fontaine's cabin home, which he then set afire. In the spring of 2001, Shackleford was found guilty for two counts of murder in the first degree and sentenced to death. In the wake of these events, Palahniuk began working on the novel Lullaby. He has stated that he wrote the novel to help him cope with having participated in the decision to have Shackleford receive the death sentence.In September 2003, Palahniuk was interviewed by Karen Valby, a reporter for Entertainment Weekly. During the interview, in confidence, Palahniuk mentioned information pertaining to his partner. It previously had been believed by many that he was married to a woman (some members of the press had claimed he had a wife), but in fact, Palahniuk had been living with his boyfriend. Some time later, Palahniuk came to believe that Valby was going to print this information in her article, without his consent. In response, he made an angry audio recording and put it on his web site, not only revealing that he was gay, but also making negative comments about Valby and a member of her family. Palahniuk's fears turned out to be incorrect, however,  and Valby's article did not reveal anything about his personal life outside of the fact that he was unmarried. The recording was later removed from the web site, making some fans believe that Palahniuk was embarrassed by his homosexuality. According to Dennis Widmyer, the site's webmaster, the recording was not removed because of the statements regarding his sexuality, but because of the negative statements about Valby. Palahniuk later posted a new recording to his site, asking his fans not to overreact to these events. He also apologized for his behavior, claiming that he wished he had not recorded the message.  Palahniuk now is openly gay and according to a profile and interview in The Advocate in May 2008, he and his unnamed male partner, live in "a former church compound outside Vancouver, Washington."    
"Guts" and HauntedWhile on his 2003 tour to promote his novel, Diary, Palahniuk read to his audiences a short story entitled, "Guts," a sensational tale of accidents involving masturbation, which appears in his book, Haunted. The story begins with the author telling his listeners to inhale deeply and that "this story should last about as long as you can hold your breath." It was reported that forty people had fainted listening to the readings while holding their breath.  Playboy magazine later published the story in their March 2004 issue and Palahniuk offered to let them publish another story along with it, but the publishers found the second work too disturbing to publish.  On his tour to promote Stranger Than Fiction: True Stories during the summer of 2004, he read "Guts" to audiences again, bringing the total number of fainters up to fifty-three (and later up to sixty while on tour to promote the softcover edition of Diary). In the fall of that year, he began promoting Haunted, and continued to read "Guts". At his October 4, 2004 reading in Boulder, Colorado, Palahniuk noted that, after that day, his number of fainters was up to sixty-eight. The last fainting occurred on May 28, 2007, in Victoria, British Columbia, Canada, where five people fainted, one of whom fell and hit his head on the door while trying to leave the auditorium.  Since then audio recordings of his readings of the story have been circulated on the Internet. In the afterword of the latest edition of "Haunted", Palahniuk reported that "Guts" had been responsible for seventy-three fainting events.At a 2005 appearance in Miami, Florida, during the Haunted tour, Palahniuk commented that Haunted represented the last of a "horror trilogy" (including Lullaby and Diary). He also indicated that his then-forthcoming novel, Rant, would be the first of a "science fiction trilogy".In 2008, Palahniuk spent a week at the Clarion West Writers Workshop, instructing eighteen students about his writing methods and theory of fiction . 
AdaptationsIn addition to the film, Fight Club was adapted into a fighting video game  loosely based on the film, which was released in October 2004, receiving poor reviews universally.  Palahniuk has mentioned at book readings that he is working on a musical based on Fight Club with David Fincher and Trent Reznor.  Edward Norton has said that he thinks it is unlikely that he and Brad Pitt, who "can't sing", would reprise their film roles in a musical. Graphic novel adaptations of Invisible Monsters and Lullaby, drawn by comic artist, Kissgz, aka Gabor, are available online. Following the success of the movie of Fight Club, interest began to build about adapting Survivor to film.  The film rights to Survivor were sold in early 2001, but no movie studio had committed to filming the novel. After the attacks on The Pentagon and World Trade Center on September 11, 2001, movie studios apparently deemed the novel too controversial to film because it includes the hijacking and crashing of a civilian airplane.  In mid-2004, however, Twentieth Century Fox committed to adapting Palahniuk's novel. Palahniuk has said that the same people who made the film, Constantine, will be working on this film. Following that, the film rights to Invisible Monsters and Diary also were sold. While little is known about some of these projects, it is known that Jessica Biel was signed on to play the roles of both Shannon and Brandy in Invisible Monsters, which was supposed to begin filming in 2004, but   is still in development. On January 14, 2008, the film version of Choke premiered at the Sundance Film Festival, starring Sam Rockwell and Anjelica Huston with Clark Gregg directing.  David Fincher has expressed interest in filming Diary as an HBO miniseries.  
Television appearancesBeside his various promotional outings, Palahniuk has made several notable television appearances to discuss cultural issues, including Anthony Bourdain: No Reservations exploring his beloved Pacific Northwest in 2007   and the BBC's Hardtalk Extra in 2004. 
Writing style 
Palahniuk's books prior to Lullaby have distinct similarities. The characters are people who have been marginalized in one way or another by society, and often react with self-destructive aggressiveness. He labels these stories as transgressional fiction. Beginning with Lullaby, the style of his novels changed to satirical horror stories.The narratives of Palahniuk's books often are structured in medias res, starting at the temporal end, with the protagonist recounting the events that led up to the point at which the book begins. Lullaby used a variation of this, alternating between the normal, linear narrative and the temporal end, after every few chapters. Exceptions to this narrative form, however, include the more linear Choke and Diary. Often a major plot twist exists that is revealed near the end of the book, which relates in some way to this temporal end (what Palahniuk refers to as "the hidden gun"). His more linear works also include similar plot twists.Palahniuk's writing style has been influenced by authors such as the minimalist Tom Spanbauer (who taught Palahniuk in Portland from 1991 to 1996),  Amy Hempel, Mark Richard, Denis Johnson, Thom Jones, and Bret Easton Ellis.  In what the author refers to as a minimalistic approach, his writings include a limited vocabulary and short sentences to mimic the way that an average person telling a story would speak. In an interview, he said that he "prefers to write in verbs instead of adjectives". Repetitions of certain lines in the story narrative (what Palahniuk refers to as "choruses") are one of the most common characteristics of his writing style, being dispersed within most chapters of his novels.  Palahniuk has said that there also are some choruses between novels, noting that the color cornflower blue and the city of Missoula, Montana appear in many of his novels. The characters in Palahniuk's stories often break into philosophical asides (either by the narrator to the reader, or spoken to the narrator through dialogue), offering numerous odd theories and opinions, often misanthropic or darkly absurdist in nature, on complex issues such as death, morality, childhood, parenthood, sexuality, and a deity.Many of the intellectual concepts in his novels have been influenced by Continental thinkers such as Michel Foucault and Albert Camus. When not writing fiction, Palahniuk tends to write short non-fiction works. Working as a freelance journalist, he writes essays and reports on a variety of subjects. He sometimes participates in the events about which he writes, which are heavy in field research. He also has written interviews with celebrities, namely, Juliette Lewis and Marilyn Manson. These works appear in various magazines and newspapers, such as the Los Angeles Times and Gear magazine. Some of these writings have shown up in his book, Stranger Than Fiction: True Stories. Palahniuk also includes some non-fiction factoids within his fictional works and according to the author, these are included in order to further immerse the reader in his work.
AwardsPalahniuk has won the following awards:

the 1997 Pacific Northwest Booksellers Association Award (for Fight Club)
the 1997 Oregon Book Award for Best Novel (for Fight Club) 
the 2003 Pacific Northwest Booksellers Association Award (for Lullaby) 

He was nominated for the 1999 Oregon Book Award for Best Novel for Survivor and for the Bram Stoker Award for Best Novel for Lullaby in 2002 and for Haunted in 2005.
Bibliography
Fiction

Fight Club (1996)
Survivor (1999)
Invisible Monsters (1999)
Choke (2001)
Lullaby (2002)
Diary (2003)
Haunted (2005)
Rant (2007)
Snuff (2008)
Pygmy (2009)
Tell-All (2010) 
Damned (2011) 
Invisible Monsters Remix (2012)


Short fiction

"Guts" in Playboy (2004) 
"Mister Elegant" in VICE Magazine (2007)  
"Fetch" in Dark Delicacies III (2009)
"Loser" in Stories (2010)
"knock, knock" in Playboy (2010)
"Romance" in Playboy (2011)


Non-fiction

Fugitives and Refugees: A Walk in Portland, Oregon (2003)
Stranger Than Fiction: True Stories (2004)
You Do Not Talk About Fight Club: I Am Jack's Completely Unauthorized Essay Collection (2008) (introduction)


Films

Fight Club (1999)
Choke (2008)


See also 

List of novelists from the United States


Notes 
External links 
 

 
 
2011 Interview on the Geek's Guide to the Galaxy podcast
Author profile at Internet Book List
 
Academic Journal (Stirrings Still) Issue Devoted to Palahniuk
NPR: Novelist Palahniuk Sets Aside Time for His Fans
Palahniuk Interview on The Hour' with George Stroumboulopoulos
Palahniuk's Snuff SuicideGirls interview with Garrett Faber
Palahniuk interview in The List magazine
2005 Chuck Palahniuk interview with TMO magazine
  
DEFAULTSORT















  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Michael Heseltine
 
 
Michael Ray Dibdin Heseltine, Baron Heseltine, CH, PC (born 21 March 1933) is a British businessman, Conservative politician and patron of the Tory Reform Group. He was a Member of Parliament from 1966 to 2001 and was a prominent figure in the governments of Margaret Thatcher and John Major. In 1990, he stood for leadership of the Conservative Party against Margaret Thatcher, and whilst he was unsuccessful, this triggered Thatcher's eventual resignation.A self-made millionaire, Heseltine entered parliament in 1966, entered the Cabinet in 1979 as Secretary of State for the Environment, and was Secretary of State for Defence from 1983 to 1986. In the latter role, he was instrumental in the political battle against the Campaign for Nuclear Disarmament. Heseltine was widely considered an adept media performer and charismatic Minister, although frequently at odds with Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher. He resigned from the Cabinet in 1986 over the Westland Affair and returned to the backbenches. Following Geoffrey Howe's resignation speech in November 1990, Heseltine challenged the incumbent Margaret Thatcher for the leadership of the Conservative Party, polling well enough to deny her an outright victory on the first ballot. Following her resignation in a dramatic Tory "palace coup", Heseltine returned to the Cabinet under her successor John Major.Under John Major, of whom he eventually became a key ally, Heseltine rose to become President of the Board of Trade and from 1995, Deputy Prime Minister and First Secretary of State. Declining to seek the leadership of the Conservative Party following the 1997 election defeat, Heseltine remained a vocal voice for modernisation in the Party and is widely considered a leading elder statesman in the United Kingdom.
Early lifeMichael Heseltine was born in Swansea in Wales and is a distant descendant of Charles Dibdin (from whom one of his middle names was taken). His mother, Eileen Ray (Pridmore), originated in West Wales. His father's ancestors were farm labourers in Pembrey. His maternal great-grandfather worked at the Swansea docks  (as a result, Heseltine was latterly made an honorary member of the Swansea Dockers Club). His maternal grandfather, James Pridmore, founded West Glamorgan Collieries Ltd, a short-lived company that briefly worked two small mines on the outskirts of Swansea (1919–21). Heseltine was brought up in relative luxury at No. 1, Uplands Crescent (now No. 5). He enjoyed angling in Brynmill Park and won a junior competition.  He was educated at Shrewsbury School.  He campaigned briefly as a volunteer in the October 1951 General Election before going up to Pembroke College, Oxford, where, in frustration at his inability to be elected to the committee of the Oxford University Conservative Association, he founded the breakaway Blue Ribbon Club. Julian Critchley recounts a story from his student days of how he plotted his future on the back of an envelope, a future that would culminate as Prime Minister in the 1990s.  A more detailed apocryphal version has him writing down: 'millionaire 25, cabinet member 35, party leader 45, prime minister 55'. He became a millionaire and was a member of the shadow cabinet from the age of 41 but did not manage to become Party Leader or Prime Minister.Heseltine's biographers Michael Crick and Julian Critchley recount how, despite not being a natural speaker, he became a strong orator through much practice which included speaking in front of a mirror, listening to tape recordings of the speeches of Charles Hill and taking speaking lessons from a vicar's wife. In the 1970s and 1980s Heseltine's conference speech was often to be the highlight of the Conservative Party Conference despite his views being well to the left of the then leader Margaret Thatcher.He was eventually elected to the committee of the Oxford Union after five terms at the University. The following year (1953-4), having challenged unsuccessfully for the Presidency the previous summer, he served  in top place on the committee, then as Secretary, and then Treasurer. During this last post he reopened the Union cellars for business and persuaded the visiting Sir Bernard and Lady Docker to contribute to the considerable cost. After graduating with a second-class degree in Philosophy, Politics and Economics,  described by his own tutor as "a great and undeserved triumph", he was permitted to stay on for an extra term to serve as President of the Oxford Union for Michaelmas term 1954 having been elected with the assistance of leading Oxford socialists Anthony Howard and Jeremy Isaacs.After graduating he built up a property business in partnership with his Oxford friend Ian Josephs. With financial support from both of their families they started with a boarding house in Clanricarde Gardens and progressed to various other properties in the Bayswater area. He trained as an accountant but after failing his accountancy exams in 1958  could no longer avoid conscription into National Service.Heseltine later admitted to admiring the military as his father, who died in 1957,  had been a Lieutenant-Colonel in the Royal Engineers in the Second World War and active in the Territorial Army thereafter. Heseltine felt that his business career was too important to be disrupted although he and his father took the precaution of arranging interviews to increase his chances of attaining an officer's commission in case he had to serve.   Heseltine had been lucky not to be called up for the Korean War in the early 1950s or the Suez Crisis in 1956 but in the final years of National Service, already due for abolition by 1960, an effort was made to call up men who had so far managed to postpone service. Despite having almost reached the newly reduced maximum call-up age of twenty-six, Heseltine was conscripted in January 1959, becoming a Second Lieutenant in the Welsh Guards. Heseltine left the Guards to contest the General Election that year; according to Ian Josephs this had been his plan from the start,   and he was exempted on business grounds from the remaining sixteen months of service. During the 1980s his habit of wearing a Guards regimental tie, sometimes incorrectly tied with a red stripe across the knot, was the subject of much acerbic comment from military figures and from older MPs with extensive war records. Crick estimated that he must have worn the tie on more days than he actually served in the Guards. Heseltine built a housing estate at Tenterden, Kent which failed to sell and was beset with repair problems until after his election to Parliament,  founded the magazine publishing company Haymarket in collaboration with another Oxford friend Clive Labovitch and early in the 1960s acquired the famous (but unprofitable) magazine Man About Town whose title he shortened to About Town then simply Town. In 1962 he also briefly published a well-received  weekly newspaper,Topic, which folded but whose journalists later became the Sunday Times Insight Team. Between 1960 and 1964 he also worked as a part-time interviewer for ITV.After rapid expansion, Heseltine's businesses were badly hit by the Selwyn Lloyd credit squeeze of 1962 and, still not yet thirty years old, he would eventually owe £250,000 (over £3 million at 2007 prices). He claims to have been lent a badly needed £60,000 by a bank manager who retired the same day. Later, during the 1990s, Heseltine joked about how he had avoided bankruptcy by such stratagems as paying bills only when threatened with legal action or sending out insufficiently completed cheques although it has never been suggested that he did not pay off all his debts eventually. It was during this period of stress that he took up gardening as a serious hobby.In 1967, Heseltine secured Haymarket's financial future by selling a majority stake to the British Printing Corporation retaining a large shareholding himself.  Under the management of Lindsay Masters, the company grew publishing a series of profitable motoring, management and advertising journals and making Heseltine a personal fortune of hundreds of millions of pounds. 
Member of ParliamentHeseltine contested the safe Labour seat of Gower in 1959 and  in 1964 the marginal constituency of Coventry North, which he lost to the Labour incumbent Maurice Edelman by 3,530 votes. Heseltine was eventually successful in 1966, becoming the Member of Parliament (MP) for the safe Conservative seat of Tavistock in Devon. After the abolition of the Tavistock constituency he represented Henley from February 1974.Following the Conservative victory in the 1970 General Election Heseltine was promoted to the Government by the Prime Minister Edward Heath, serving briefly as a junior minister at the Department of Transport before moving to the Department for the Environment where he was partly responsible for shepherding the Local Government Act 1972 through Parliament. In 1972, he moved to the Department of Industry, which he subsequently shadowed, now as a member of the Shadow Cabinet - during the subsequent spell in opposition.As Minister for Aerospace in 1973, Heseltine was responsible for persuading other governments to invest in Concorde and was accused of misleading the House of Commons when he stated that the government was still considering giving financial support to the Tracked Hovercraft when the Cabinet had already decided to withdraw funding. Although his chief critic Airey Neave disliked Heseltine as a brash 'arriviste' Neave's real target, in the view of Heseltine's PPS Cecil Parkinson, was Heath, whom Neave detested and later helped to topple from party leader in 1975.Heseltine was Shadow Industry Secretary throughout the Conservative's 1974-79 time in opposition gaining notoriety following a 1976 incident in the House of Commons during the debate on measures introduced by the Labour Government to nationalise the shipbuilding and aerospace industries. Accounts of exactly what happened vary but the most colourful image portrayed Heseltine seizing the mace and brandishing it towards Labour left-wingers who were celebrating their winning the vote by singing the Red Flag. The Speaker suspended the sitting. Heseltine subsequently acquired the nickname Tarzan and was thereafter depicted as such, complete with loin-cloth, in the "If" series drawn by satirical political cartoonist Steve Bell. During the 1980s this macho image was reinforced by the satirical TV puppet show Spitting Image, which portrayed him as a camouflage wearing psychopath reminiscent of the 1960s white British mercenary of the Congo "Mad Mike" Col. Mike Hoare. This was after an occasion when, as Defence Secretary in Margaret Thatcher's government, he had been persuaded to don a camouflaged anorak over his suit while inspecting troops in the rain on 6 February 1985 when he deployed 1500 police and soldiers to fence off RAF Molesworth to prevent anti-nuclear protesters from entering the cruise missile base.
Member of the CabinetPrime Minister Margaret Thatcher appointed Heseltine to the cabinet as Secretary of State for the Environment in 1979 after her election victory that year. He was a key figure in the sale of council houses and was sent in as a troubleshooter to deal with the explosion of violence in Britain's inner cities in the aftermath of the Brixton and Toxteth riots during the early 1980s. As Environment Secretary in 1981 he opened Britain's first Enterprise Zone at Corby in Northamptonshire. Heseltine was responsible for developing the policies that led to five bi-annual National Garden Festivals starting in 1984. He established Development Corporations that were directly appointed by the minister and overrode local authority planning controls, a controversial measure in Labour strongholds such as East London, Merseyside and North East England.Heseltine then served as Secretary of State for Defence from January 1983 - his presentational skills being used to take on the Campaign for Nuclear Disarmament in the June 1983 General Election - until January 1986, when he resigned in a bitter dispute with Margaret Thatcher over the Westland Affair. Heseltine gathered his papers, got up from his chair and proclaimed "I can no longer be a member of this Cabinet" and then left the room.  Heseltine then stormed out of Downing Street and famously announced his resignation to the assembled media.
Backbenches and leadership contestHe returned to the backbenches where he became increasingly critical of Margaret Thatcher's performance, declining to support the passage of the Community Charge (popularly known as the poll tax) through Parliament in 1988, although he actually voted against the government only when he supported an amendment proposed by his ally Michael Mates that would have adjusted the charge tax to take account of ability to pay. He abstained in the November 1989 Conservative Party leadership election, in which Sir Anthony Meyer challenged for the party leadership and repeatedly insisted that he could "not foresee ... circumstances" in which he would challenge Thatcher for the leadership. Following Sir Geoffrey Howe's resignation speech on 13 November 1990  Heseltine announced his candidacy for the leadership of the Conservative Party.During the subsequent leadership election on 20 November, he polled 152 votes (just over 40%) in the first round of voting by Conservative MPs, enough to prevent an outright Thatcher victory (the rules required an incumbent leader to obtain a majority of 15% on the first ballot; Thatcher had polled 204, just under 55%). Heseltine was thought by many pundits to be on course to beat her in the second ballot as many Conservative MPs were now rumoured to be ready to switch support from Thatcher and only 27 would have had to do so to give Heseltine the overall majority he needed in the second ballot. With lukewarm support from her Cabinet, most of whom told her that she could not win and faced with the bitter prospect of a Heseltine premiership Thatcher withdrew from the contest and announced her resignation on the morning of 22 November, although she continued to serve as Prime Minister until a new party leader had been chosen. Over the weekend on 24–25 November, many Conservative MPs were faced with the anger of their local party members who overwhelmingly supported Thatcher but did not at that time have a vote in leadership elections, and opinion polls showed that chancellor John Major would also boost Conservative support if leader (previously Heseltine's unique selling-point). In the second ballot, a week after the first, Heseltine's vote actually fell to 131 (just over 35%) as some MPs had voted for him in the first ballot as a protest against or to try to oust Thatcher but preferred to vote for other candidates now that they had a wider choice. John Major, with 185 votes, was only two votes short of an overall majority and Heseltine immediately and publicly conceded defeat announcing that he would vote for Major if the third ballot went ahead (it did not, as Douglas Hurd, who had finished a distant third, also conceded). Although for the rest of his career Heseltine's role in Thatcher's downfall earned him enmity from Thatcher's supporters in the Conservative Party, this opprobrium was not universal. In a reference to the reluctance of the Cabinet to support Thatcher on the second ballot, Edward Leigh said of Heseltine: "At least he stabbed her in the front".
Return to the CabinetHeseltine then returned to government as Secretary of State for the Environment, with particular responsibility for 'reviewing' the Community Charge,  widely and correctly expected to lead to poll tax being abolished, allegedly declining an offer of the position of Home Secretary. Following the 1992 general election he was appointed Secretary of State for Trade and Industry choosing to be known by the title, dormant since 1974, of President of the Board of Trade and promising to intervene "before breakfast, dinner and tea" to help British companies.Heseltine's responsibilities also included Energy, which was previously a separate ministry. When plans were made in 1992 for the privatisation of British Coal it fell to Heseltine to announce that 31 collieries were to close  including many of the mines in Nottinghamshire that had continued working during the 1984-5 strike. Although this policy was seen as a betrayal by the Nottinghamshire miners there was hardly any organised resistance to the programme. The following week a threatened rebellion by some Conservative MPs over the plans led to the number of closures being scaled back to the 10 least viable mines.  The government stated that since the pits were money losers they could be sustained only through unjustifiable government subsidies. Mine supporters pointed to the mines' high productivity rates and to the fact that their monetary losses were due to the large subsidies that other European nations were supplying their coal industries. Whilst Heseltine is generally seen as a One Nation Conservative, his reputation in the coalfields remains low.  The band Chumbawamba released the critical song "Mr Heseltine meets the public" that portrayed him as an out-of-touch figure with; the same group had once dedicated a song to the village of Fitzwilliam, West Yorkshire, which was reduced to a ghost town following the closure of local pits.In June 1993, Heseltine suffered a severe heart attack whilst in Venice, which led to concerns on his ability to remain in government after he was televised leaving hospital in a wheelchair. In 1994 Chris Morris jokingly implied on BBC Radio 1 that Heseltine had died, and persuaded MP Jerry Hayes to broadcast an on-air tribute. Morris was subsequently suspended. Heseltine, who after being seen as an 'arriviste' in his younger days, was now something of a grandee and elder statesman and reemerged as a serious political player in 1994 helped by his flirting with the idea of privatising the Post Office and by his testimony at the Arms to Iraq Inquiry at which it emerged that he had refused to sign the certificates attempting to withhold evidence. The cover of Private Eye announced "A Legend Lives" and one major newspaper ended an editorial by proclaiming that the "balance of probability" was that Heseltine would be Prime Minister before the end of the year - this being at a time when John Major's leadership had lost much credibility after the "Back to Basics" scandals. However there was no leadership election that autumn.
Deputy Prime MinisterIn mid-1995, John Major found himself consistently opposed by a minority of Eurosceptic MPs in his party and challenged them to "put up or shut up" by resubmitting himself to a leadership election in which he was unsuccessfully opposed by John Redwood the Secretary of State for Wales. There was speculation that Heseltine's supporters would engineer Major's downfall in the hope that their man would take over, but they stayed loyal to Major.Heseltine, who showed his ballot paper to the returning officers to prove that he had voted for Major, commented that "John Major deserves a great deal better than that from his colleagues". He was then was promoted to Deputy Prime Minister and First Secretary of State. In this capacity he chaired a number of key Cabinet committees and was also an early key enthusiast for the Millennium Dome. In December 1996 Heseltine, angering eurosceptics, joined with Conservative Chancellor Kenneth Clarke in preventing any movement away from the government's official refusal to decide on whether or not to join the single currency.Heseltine suffered further heart trouble early in 1997, and declined to stand for the Conservative Party leadership again after the 1997 election, although there was still speculation that Clarke might have stood aside for him to stand as a compromise candidate. He became active in promoting the benefits for Britain of joining the single European Currency appearing on the same stage as Tony Blair, Gordon Brown and Robin Cook as part of an all-party campaign to promote Euro membership. He was also made a Companion of Honour by John Major in the 1997 resignation Honours List.
RetirementHeseltine resigned his Henley-on-Thames constituency at the 2001 election, being succeeded by Spectator editor Boris Johnson, but remained outspoken on British politics. He was given a life peerage as Baron Heseltine, of Thenford in the County of Northamptonshire.In December 2002, Heseltine controversially called for Iain Duncan Smith to be replaced as leader of the Conservatives by the "dream-ticket" of Clarke as leader and Michael Portillo as deputy. He suggested the party's MPs vote on the matter rather than party members as currently required by party rules. Without the replacement of Duncan Smith, the party "has not a ghost of a chance of winning the next election" he said. Duncan Smith was removed the following year. In the 2005 party leadership election, he backed young moderniser David Cameron. Following Cameron's election to the leadership he set up a wide-ranging policy review. Chairmen of the various policy groups included ex-Chancellor Kenneth Clarke and other former cabinet ministers John Redwood, John Gummer, Stephen Dorrell and Michael Forsyth as well as ex-leader Iain Duncan Smith. Heseltine was appointed to head the cities task force having been responsible for urban policy twice as Environment Secretary under Thatcher and Major.He was ranked 170th in the Sunday Times Rich List 2004 with an estimated wealth of £240 million.  He is a keen gardener and arboriculturalist and his arboretum was featured in a one-off documentary on BBC Two in December 2005.In 2008 Heseltine took part in the BBC Wales programme Coming Home about his Welsh family history.In March 2011, he was asked to head up an audit of the UK's industrial performance for the Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne and HM Treasury, upon which, after 11 years as a Member of the House of Lords, he made his maiden speech to the chamber. 
Publications

Michael Heseltine, Raising The Sights - A Tory Perspective, in the Primrose League Gazette, vol.91, no.2, Aug/Sept 1987 edition, London.
Julian Critchley, Heseltine - The Unauthorised Biography, André Deutsch, London, September 1987, ISBN 0-233-98001-6
Michael Crick, Michael Heseltine: A Biography, Hamish Hamilton, 1997, ISBN 0-241-13691-1
Michael Heseltine, Life in the Jungle, Hodder & Stoughton, 2000, ISBN 0-340-73915-0, written with the acknowledged assistance of Heseltine's lifelong friend Anthony Howard.


References

Michael Crick, Michael Heseltine: A Biography, Hamish Hamilton, 1997, ISBN 0-241-13691-1, p92-3
Michael Crick, Michael Heseltine: A Biography, Hamish Hamilton, 1997, ISBN 0-241-13691-1, p79
Michael Heseltine, Life in the Jungle, Hodder & Stoughton, 2000, ISBN 0-340-73915-0,p49


Notes 
External links

Haymarket Group
BBC: Heseltine: Political CV
Guardian: Aristotle article on Michael Heseltine
Guardian interview with Michael Heseltine by Simon Hattenstone
Interview about battling CND for the WGBH series,
War and Peace in the Nuclear Age
Thatcher's First Cabinet
Michael Heseltine's interview about Europe, economics, and how he really got on with Thatcher.


External links

 

 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT
































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Jack Kilby
 
 
 Jack St. Clair Kilby (November 8, 1923 – June 20, 2005) was an American electrical engineer who took part (along with Robert Noyce) in the realization of the first integrated circuit while working at Texas Instruments (TI) in 1958. He was awarded the Nobel Prize in physics in 2000. He is also the inventor of the handheld calculator and the thermal printer.
Life and career
Born in Jefferson City, Missouri, Kilby grew up and attended school in Great Bend, Kansas, graduating from Great Bend High School. Road signs at the entrances to the town commemorate his time there, and the Commons Area at Great Bend High School has been named The Jack Kilby Commons Area.Kilby received his bachelor of science degree from the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign, where he is an honorary member of Acacia Fraternity. In 1947, he received a degree in Electrical Engineering. He obtained his master of science in Electrical Engineering from the University of Wisconsin-Extension in Milwaukee, which later became the University of Wisconsin–Milwaukee in 1950, while simultaneously working at Centralab in Milwaukee.In mid-1958, Kilby was a newly employed engineer at Texas Instruments who did not yet have the right to a summer vacation. He spent the summer working on the problem in circuit design that was commonly called the "tyranny of numbers" and finally came to the conclusion that manufacturing the circuit components en masse in a single piece of semiconductor material could provide a solution. On September 12 he presented his findings to the management, which included Mark Shepherd: he showed them a piece of germanium with an oscilloscope attached, pressed a switch, and the oscilloscope showed a continuous sine wave, proving that his integrated circuit worked and thus that he solved the problem. U.S. Patent 3,138,743 for "Miniaturized Electronic Circuits", the first integrated circuit, was filed on February 6, 1959.    Along with Robert Noyce (who independently made a similar circuit a few months later), Kilby is generally credited as co-inventor of the integrated circuit.From 1978 to 1985, he was Distinguished Professor of Electrical Engineering at Texas A&M University. In 1983, Kilby retired from Texas Instruments.

Kilby died June 20, 2005 when he was 81, in Dallas, Texas, following a brief battle with cancer.On December 14, 2005, Texas Instruments created the Historic TI Archives. The Jack Kilby family donated his personal manuscripts and his personal photograph collection to Southern Methodist University. The collection will be cataloged and stored at DeGolyer Library, SMU.In 2008, the SMU School of Engineering, with the DeGolyer Library and the Library of Congress, hosted a yearlong celebration of the 50th anniversary of the birth of the digital age with Jack Kilby’s Nobel Prize-winning invention of the integrated circuit. Symposia and exhibits examined the many ways in which technology and engineers shaped the modern world. Jack Kilby was a holder of an honorary Doctorate of Science from SMU and longtime associate of SMU through the Kilby Foundation.
Awards and honors
Recognition of Kilby’s outstanding achievements have been made by the Institute of Electrical and Electronic Engineers (IEEE), including the election to IEEE Fellow in 1966, the IEEE David Sarnoff Award in 1966,  co-recipient of the first IEEE Cledo Brunetti Award in 1978,  the IEEE Centennial Medal in 1984 and the IEEE Medal of Honor in 1986.  He was co-recipient of the Franklin Institute’s Stuart Ballantine Medal in 1966.    In 1982 and 1989, he received the Holley Medal from the American Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME).  He was elected to member of the National Academy of Engineering (NAE) in 1967,  received the Academy’s Vladimir K. Zworykin Award in 1975, and was co-recipient of the first NAE’s Charles Stark Draper Prize in 1989.  The Kilby Award Foundation was founded in 1980 in his honor.He is also the recipient of the nation’s most prestigious honors in science and engineering:  the National Medal of Science in 1969 and the National Medal of Technology in 1990. In 1982, he was inducted into the National Inventors Hall of Fame.In 1993 he was awarded the prestigious Kyoto Prize by the Inamori Foundation. He was awarded both the Washington Award, administered by the Western Society of Engineers and the Eta Kappa Nu Vladimir Karapetoff Award in 1999. In 2000, Kilby was awarded the Nobel Prize in Physics for his breakthrough discovery, and delivered his personal view of the industry and its history in his acceptance speech.Kilby was awarded nine honorary doctorate degrees from Universities including Southern Methodist University, the University of Miami, University of Illinois, University of Wisconsin-Madison, Texas A&M University, Yale and Rochester Institute of Technology. The National Chiao Tung University (NCTU) in Taiwan awarded Kilby with a certificate of Honorary Professorship in 1998.The Kilby Center, TI's research center for silicon manufacturing, is named after him.The Jack Kilby Computer Centre at the Merchiston Campus of Edinburgh Napier University in Edinburgh is also named in his honor. 
Kilby patents

  Plug-in Circuit Units, filed December 1953, issued June 1959, assigned to Globe-Union, Inc.
  Semiconductor Structure Fabrication, filed May 1959, issued January 1963
  Miniature Semiconductor Integrated Circuit, filed May 1959, issued December 1963
  Miniature Semiconductor Network Diode and Gate, filed May 1959, issued June 1964
U.S. Patent 3,138,743 Miniaturized Electronic Circuits, filed February 6, 1959, issued June, 1964
  Miniaturized Self-contained Circuit Modules, filed May 1959, issued June 1964
  Semiconductor Structure Fabrication, filed May 1959, issued April 1969
  Thermal Printer, filed October 1965, issued February 1970
U.S. Patent 3,819,921 Miniature Electronic Calculator, originally filed September 1967, issued June 1974


See also 

Geoffrey Dummer, the British engineer who first conceived the idea of the integrated circuit.


Notes 
References

Berlin, Leslie The man behind the microchip: Robert Noyce and the invention of Silicon Valley  Publisher Oxford University Press US, 2005 ISBN 0-19-516343-5
Lécuyer, Christophe. Making Silicon Valley: Innovation and the Growth of High Tech, 1930-1970 Published by MIT Press, 2006.ISBN 0262122812
Nobel lectures, World Scientific Publishing Co., Singapore, 2000.


External links 

"Jack St. Clair Kilby: A Man of Few Words", biography by Ed Millis.
"Video about Jack Kilby", video presentation from Texas Instruments.
"Jack St. Clair Kilby", biography by Texas Instruments.
Oral history interview with Jack S. Kilby at Charles Babbage Institute, University of Minnesota, Minneapolis.  Interview covers Kilby's entire career, including his education, work experiences at Centralab, where he worked with Alfred Khouri and Robert Wolff , and Texas Instruments (TI) under Willis Adcock.  Kilby discusses TI's development and manufacturing of integrated circuits. He discusses his involvement in the development of the first hand-held calculator at TI. Discusses semiconductor developments at Fairchild Corporation and his independent work after leaving TI in 1970.
"Jack Kilby, Touching Lives on Micro and Macro Scales - By T.R. Reid", The Washington Post (June 2005).
Obituary: The Economist, Jul 7th 2005
 
Nobelprize.org posts Mr Kilby’s Nobel lecture
Jack S. Kilby, Autobiography in English
Jack S. Kilby Patents
Inventors of the Modern Computer
Nobel Prize in Physics 2000
Kilby statue in Great Bend
 
The Chip That Jack Built, a short film by public television station KERA profiling Kilby


 
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT


















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
